It is better to settle these matters in the courts...
... than on the streets.
And new laws are needed at every level.
But law alone cannot make men see right.
We are confronted primarily with a moral issue.
The heart of the question is...
... whether all Americans are to be afforded equal rights...
...and equal opportunities...
... whether we treat our fellow Americans...
...as we want to be treated.
If an American, because his skin is dark...
...cannot eat lunch in a restaurant open to the public...
...if he cannot send his children...
... to the best public school available...
...if he cannot vote for the officials who represent him...
...if, in short, he cannot enjoy the full and free life...
... which all of us want...
... then who among us would be content...
... to have the color of his skin changed?
Who among us would then be content...
... with the counsels of patience and delay?
One hundred years of delay have passed...
...since President Lincoln freed the slaves...
... yet their heirs, their grandsons are not fully free.
They are not yet freed from the bonds of injustice.
They are not yet freed from social and economic oppression.
That looks like a police car.
And this nation, for all its hopes and all its boasts...
... will not be fully free until all its citizens are free.
We preach freedom around the world and we mean it.
And we cherish our freedom here at home.
Are we to say to the world...
...and much more importantly, to each other...
... that this is a land of the free, except for the Negroes?
That we have no second-class citizens, except Negroes?
That we have no class or caste system...
...no ghettos, no master race, except with respect to Negroes?
Now the time has come for this nation to fulfill its promise.
The events in Birmingham and elsewhere...
...have so increased the cries for equality that no city...
...or state or legislative body can prudently choose...
... to ignore them.
The fires of frustration and discord...
...are burning in every city,
North and South...
... where legal remedies are not at hand.
Redress is sought in the streets.
We face a moral crisis as a country and a people.
It cannot be met by repressive police action.
It is a time to act in the Congress...
...in your state and local legislative body...
...and above all, in all of our daily lives.
A great change is at hand...
...and our task...
...our obligation is to make that revolution, that change...
...peaceful and constructive for all.
Those who do nothing...
...are inviting shame as well as violence.
Those who act boldly are recognizing right...
...as well as reality.
Medgar!
-Get down!
-Get the baby!
Medgar!
Oh, my God!
Daddy! Daddy!
Daddy, I love you!
Daddy, don't die!
I want my daddy!
Turn me loose.
Turn me loose.
Medgar Evers believed in this country.
It now remains to be seen whether his country believed in him.
The Citizens Council's raised thousands for your defense.
Money's pouring in from all over the South.
Nice likeness.
What do you think, boys?
Mr. Beckwith, glad to see you.
Mighty glad to be here.
And isn't it true your husband was the first...
...to attempt to integrate the University of Mississippi?
At the time of his death, he was involved in a lawsuit...
...to integrate the public school system, wasn't he?
Your husband must've had quite a few enemies, would you agree?
Yes, he did.
Your eldest boy, his name is Kenyatta, isn't it?
Darrell Kenyatta Evers.
Kenyatta's a Mau Mau name, isn't it?
Objection.
Sustained.
Isn't it true that over 100 people were arrested during a demonstration...
...that your husband organized boycotting...
...a department store in downtown
Jackson known as Kennington's?
Who's that?
Ross Barnett.
You're kidding.
Nope. You don't see that every day of the week.
A former governor shaking hands with an assassin in front of the jury.
There's not a court in America that would stand for that.
What's America got to do with anything?
This is Mississippi.
Byron De La Beckwith.
-You live in Greenwood, Mississippi?
-Y es, sir.
My mother was a Yerger.
Her mother was Susan Yerger...
...a close personal friend of Mrs. Jefferson Davis.
You shoot Medgar Evers?
No, sir!
Your Honor, may l?
Mr. Beckwith, is this your rifle?
Let's see.
Well, it bears a similarity...
...but I couldn't say for certain.
I don't record the serial numbers of my weapons...
...and my gun was stolen from my home several days before...
...this whole business.
How do you feel, Delay?
I got tears in my eyes.
For Dixie, huh?
In summation...
...not only did surveillance cameras provide us with a visual record...
...of the crime being committed...
...but four eyewitnesses observed the defendant removing his mask...
...upon exiting the convenience store.
Short of you ladies and gentlemen attending the actual event...
...we don't feel the state could have a stronger case.
Thank you.
Counsel?
Hey, Bobby. How'd it go?
Through a combination of superior lawyering...
...and a less than stellar performance by our criminal, I got a conviction.
Congratulations.
My rape victim's reluctant to testify.
Can you handle the Harrison motion?
-You bet.
-You're a lifesaver.
-DeLaughter, your wife just called.
-What'd she want?
To remind you you're having lunch with her mother and your parents at 1:00.
How could I forget?
Bobby.
-You seen this?
-Yes, I have.
Evers' widow is calling for the re-prosecution of De La Beckwith.
Ed, this guy was killed over 25 years ago.
Dig up whatever you can on Medgar Evers and be in my office at 3:00.
Ed, this is ridiculous.
Well, sure it is.
But if we try to bury this...
...she'll have every black politician climbing all over me.
My office, 3:00.
Do we have any files here on Medgar Evers?
Who?
The civil rights leader that got himself shot in the 1960s?
I just saw that file. It was next to the one on the Lindbergh baby.
Clara, just bring me what we have.
Good afternoon, sir.
Did you make Hinds County safer today?
You know how it is with criminals.
It's like finding a gray hair.
You pull one and two more pop up to take its place.
I love those earrings.
Have you worn them before?
I've had them for quite some time.
I just never wear them during the day.
You see that nonsense about the Sovereignty Commission?
Yeah, isn't that awful?
That fool, Rea Hederman.
Since he took over that paper...
...Iiberals like Jerry Mitchell been trying to rewrite history.
The Sovereignty Commission was a fine organization that did a lot of good.
Dixie, would you pass me the butter?
Why do they dig up things that happened 25 years ago anyway?
Medgar Evers' widow wants to reopen the case.
You can't be serious.
Ed asked me to look into it.
You just tell him, "No, thank you."
When will these people get it through their heads that the '60s are over?
The 1860s and the 1960s.
I thought they found that Beckwith fella not guilty.
Actually, there were two hung juries.
The reason I know is because my late husband, Judge Moore...
...was a spectator at both those trials.
He'd never miss a day.
And he told me...
...that they'd never convict Beckwith, no matter how many trials they had.
It's just political. I don't think anything will come of it.
Son, for your sake, it had better not.
You want to be a judge someday.
You persecute a 70-year-old man, guilty or not, over some nigger...
...you'll have everybody in Mississippi lined up against you.
-Hey, Howard.
-How you doing?
Y'all got any of that crawdad chowder today?
Yes, sir.
-How many for crawdad chowder?
-Oh, come on!
Mrs. Evers, Mr. Dees, I'm Jerry Mitchell from The Clarion-Ledger.
I broke the story on the jury tampering in your husband's case.
-I talked to you on the phone.
-That's right.
Thank you for your good work. I can't tell you how much it's appreciated.
I'm just doing my job, ma'am.
What do you think your chances are of getting the D.A. to reopen the case?
I've passed this way before.
Let's just say I've adopted an attitude of tempered optimism.
DeLaughter, hear the news?
President Lincoln just got shot.
Some guy named Booth did it.
The Sovereignty Commission, a state agency, worked against the D.A...
...to ensure the jury had Beckwith sympathizers to keep him out of jail.
That's grounds for a new trial.
With all due respect...
...those old files have been leaking out for years.
They only ran background checks which, while unethical, was not illegal.
We can't prove jury tampering.
I'd like you to meet Bob DeLaughter.
How do you do?
-Pleasure.
-Mr. Morris Dees...
...the Southern Poverty Law Center.
-How you doing?
-I was explaining...
...that in order for us to pursue this...
...we'll need more than an article in a newspaper.
We'll need new evidence.
In 1964, you had a mountain of evidence.
All you gotta do is retry Beckwith.
On the basis of that alone, you'll get a conviction.
As you can see, the mountain has crumbled a bit.
What's this?
That's all that's left of the state's case against De La Beckwith.
Just a few pages of the old police report.
-Where's the gun? Where--
-Where's the bullet?
Where's the original trial transcript?
Where are the files? Beats me.
Are you telling us it is lost?
I'm telling you, we don't have it.
Well, that's outrageous.
Even if we had the evidence, we'd never get around...
...to the Sixth Amendment right to a speedy trial.
Mr. Dees would agree that 25 years isn't exactly what you'd call speedy.
May I see that?
Mrs. Evers, this is pretty strong stuff.
I'd like to see it.
"June 13, 1963.
To the Jackson Police Department:
When you catch whoever killed the nigger, pin a medal on him...
...because he just did Mississippi one hell of a favor.
June 14, 1963.
A female who refused to identify herself stated...
...that she'd heard a rumor that Medgar Evers' wife...
...had gotten jealous of Lena Horne, who appeared with Evers at a rally...
...and might have gotten her brother-in-law to kill Evers."
Who wouldn't be jealous of Lena Horne?
What a beautiful woman.
Y es, ma'am.
The cops wrote that garbage down because they actually took it seriously.
Mr. Dees.
Do you think the police in Washington,
D.C. would have written it up...
...if some nitwit said Jackie Kennedy had a hand in J.F.K.'s death...
...because her husband ran around with Marilyn Monroe?
What's your point?
The murder of Medgar Evers was a race crime...
...a political crime.
An assassination.
Beckwith is free today...
...thanks to a racist jury, a racist police department...
...and a racist D.A.'s office.
Twenty-five years ago,
Waller and this office...
...went after Beckwith not once but twice.
I don't need to sit here and listen--
Twenty-five years ago,
I sat on the witness stand...
...and I watched as the former governor of this state...
...shook hands with the man who murdered my husband...
...while I was on the stand.
I don't expect you to understand...
...the pain and suffering my family went through...
...but I did come here thinking...
...that this office might want to see justice finally served.
You've given me all the reasons why you can't pursue this.
Perhaps you can find one reason why you can.
Good afternoon, gentlemen.
Ed Peters is a good man...
...but as you can see, we simply don't have a case.
I know you've been living with this thing for a long while...
...but maybe it's just time you....
Let it go?
I can understand why you'd think that, Mr. DeLaughter.
For years, I said the same thing to Medgar.
"Let it go.
Let's get out of Mississippi."
Do you know what he said to me?
" I don't know if I'm going to heaven or to hell...
...but I'm going from Jackson."
Good afternoon, Mr. DeLaughter.
Hey, everybody, I'm home.
Hey, tiger.
Hi, Dad.
You sure you got enough distractions?
I can go get your Game Boy.
Dad.
Hi, Daddy.
Hi, Dad.
-Did you bring me a lollipop?
-I did. I got one for Claire too.
-Thanks, Daddy.
-How was school today, sweetie?
Did Miss Collins like the bracelet you made?
Daddy, tell us a story.
-A real scary one.
-Claire, you want to hear a story?
Okay, but not too scary.
Let's go to Mommy and Daddy's room, because we don't wanna disturb Burt.
-You want something to eat?
-No, I got something at the office.
Thanks for letting me know.
Honey, what are you doing up?
I can't sleep.
The ghost is back.
I'll go. I'll go.
The ghost is back?
Where is he this time?
In my bed.
Really? We'll just have to see about that.
You were right.
He's right there on the bed.
No, Daddy.
Now he's over by the window.
I see.
Your bottle tree was supposed to keep him away.
Maybe I don't have the right kind of bottles.
You know, baby...
...when we lived in Natchez, there was a ghost...
...that lived right next door...
...in the remains of this house that got burned during the war.
And sometimes he'd come over and get right in my closet.
How'd you make him go away?
Granny would come in and sing a song...
...and before you knew it, he was gone.
What'd she sing?
She sang the song every ghost from Mississippi loves.
Sing it, Daddy.
All right.
I wish I was in the land of cotton
Old times there are not forgotten
Look away
Look away
Look away, Dixieland
In Dixieland where I was born
Early on one frosty morn'
Look away, look away
Look away, Dixieland
Oh, I wish I was in Dixie
Hooray, hooray
In Dixieland I'll take my stand
To live and die in Dixie
Away, away
Away down South
In Dixie
I'd ask what's new, but I'm afraid you'd tell me.
My readers are on the edge of their collective seat.
Will Mr. DeLaughter go after
Byron De La Beckwith?
The D.A.'s office will investigate the possibility of reopening the case.
I didn't go to law school, but that sounds like bullshit.
Nice talking to you.
Have a nice day.
Can you tell me how I can get ahold of Lewis Skinner...
...or Fred Sanders?
If you want Lewis Skinner, you'll need a shovel and six hours of digging time.
What's Fred's status?
As far as I know, he's still aboveground.
Back in '63, none of those houses were there.
That was all vacant lot.
And this here was all covered over with brush.
I got out here eight minutes after the call came in.
The way Mrs. Evers yelled at me, you'd think I was the one who done it.
This is where they found the gun, hidden in some honeysuckle vines.
Any idea where that gun might be today?
Hell, no.
Back in those days...
...evidence had a habit of disappearing after the trials.
Look at that.
My grandmother could have picked Evers off from over here.
That's where he was shot.
That big tree wasn't there at the time.
There was blood everywhere.
All over the driveway, all over the car.
It was as if somebody had butchered a hog.
But Evers must've been one hell of a strong man because somehow he managed...
...to drag himself all the way up to his door.
After that bullet tore through his back, it slammed through that window...
...crashed through a wall...
...ricocheted off the refrigerator and busted the coffeepot.
We found it on the kitchen counter next to a watermelon.
You're kidding me.
No, sir.
Did he have any kids?
If my memory serves, I believe there were three little ones there that night.
What kind of man shoots another man in the back in front of his family?
I love the land of my birth.
I do not mean just America as a country...
...but Mississippi...
... the state in which I was born.
So the deplorable things
I speak of here today...
... will be said to you in hopes of a future...
... where such will not be the case in Mississippi.
In the horrific deaths...
...of Emmett Till...
...Reverend G. W. Lee...
...Lamar Smith and a variety of other atrocities...
...no one has been convicted.
And we feel those guilty of having committed these ungodly acts...
...had the feeling of assurance that nothing ever would be done.
For you see, ladies and gentlemen...
... white juries have yet to convict a white man in Mississippi...
...guilty of a crime against a Negro.
The failure of the so-called decent or moderate white person...
... to take a positive and uncompromising stand....
Who's that?
Medgar Evers.
Why are you looking at it?
I just wanted to get an idea of who he was.
I'd like to get an idea of who you are.
What's that supposed to mean?
I was willing to go down that road with you...
...when you got out of law school and did that pro bono work.
And when you worked for that Jew lawyer who ran you ragged.
I minded a little when you turned down that offer from Morse & Braggs...
...so you could be assistant D.A. at one-fourth the salary.
But I'll be damned if I spent
10 years supporting your career...
...just so you can humiliate me.
You're gonna pursue this, aren't you?
You're gonna humiliate me in front of my friends...
...my family and the entire state.
I'm just looking at a couple of tapes.
Fine. Look at your tapes.
That's all you'd better do.
-Why not?
-Because you can't win.
Who says?
-The Sixth Amendment.
-Suppose I could get around it.
It's one thing for the grieving widow to carry on--
Suppose an argument could be made that the Sixth Amendment doesn't apply.
You want to retry Beckwith?
Fine.
Dig up 26-year-old physical evidence which probably no longer exists...
...identify it, and then you'll have to locate the key witnesses...
...who, if you find them, are probably dead or senile.
Their testimony could be read from the transcript.
We haven't seen a certified transcript in over 25 years.
-What if I found one?
-Let's say, by some miracle...
...you found one, got an indictment.
Then by some greater miracle...
...the state Supreme Court and U.S.
Supreme Court didn't throw it out...
...and you actually got to trial.
What if you lose?
The whole state, which is supposed to have changed so much...
...will be facing the worst public relations disaster...
...since that black kid, Emmett Till, bobbed up out of the river.
Are you telling me
I can't go after this?
I'm telling you you're dealing with the past.
Mississippi's not a place you wanna be.
Hopefully, Jerry Mitchell can keep this thing alive for us.
Jerry Mitchell's fine, but what we need is national press.
Darrell, CNN won't run a major story about how the D.A. of Hinds County...
...is refusing to re-prosecute a case...
...that's a quarter of a century old.
Stop annoying your grandmama.
The greatest joy in your mother's life is being annoyed by her grandchildren.
Next to being annoyed by you, Walter.
I'll get it.
I'm not here no matter who it is.
Who?
Just a minute, please.
I want you to eat those beans.
It's long distance from Jackson.
A man by the name of DeLaughter.
You want me to take it?
No, I'll take it.
Eat those beans.
I don't eat beans.
Hello, Mrs. Evers.
I know you probably left here feeling pretty discouraged...
...but I hope you understand
Mr. Peters was just being realistic.
I understand perfectly.
I also wanted you to know...
...that we are going to be keeping this case open.
Mrs. Evers?
Did it suddenly occur to
Mr. Peters that he'd better...
...start making nice with the black community before November?
-Mrs. Evers--
-He made it clear to me...
...that in addition to having no evidence and no witnesses...
...he also had no interest.
Looking into this wasn't so much
Mr. Peter's idea as it was mine.
-Yours?
-Yes, ma'am.
Judge Russel Moore was perhaps the most racist judge...
...in the history of the state of Mississippi.
Why would his son-in-law be interested in this case?
Mrs. Evers, I'm 37 years old, just like Medgar was...
...and I've got three kids, like he did.
I was 11 years old when your husband was killed...
...and I hardly remember him at all.
But I went by your house the other day and I could see him there...
...watering his lawn...
... working on his roof...
...playing with his children.
No man has the right to take another man away from his children.
I appreciate the call,
Mr. DeLaughter.
I'll keep in touch, Mrs. Evers.
Did you plan on telling me...
...or was I just gonna read about it in the papers?
We should be at the
Walkers' house in 15 minutes.
Well, I've got a lot of work to do here.
Suit yourself.
Nobody gives a goddamn what Byron De La Beckwith did...
...to some Medgar Evers 26 years ago.
Hell, Larry Smith got shot down in his own driveway just last week.
And it wasn't for no civil rights.
It was for his spare change.
I could have had any investigator
I wanted, and I asked for you.
Am I meant to be flattered by that?
We're supposed to nail Eddie Williams for killing Wendell Washington...
...or that guy Pierson for shooting Donny Brown.
That's why we're only gonna work on this case in our spare time.
Holy shit.
Will you look at this?
You could buy a whole damn General
Electric refrigerator for $185.
T alk about your good old days.
That's my daddy.
I didn't know he was on the force too.
Sure. Detective L.C. Bennett.
He was there when they found Beckwith's rifle, but I've never seen this.
John Goza is dead.
Herbert Speight is dead.
B.L. Pittman is dead.
Is anybody alive?
This is pointless.
It's Jerry Mitchell.
Jerry.
I don't have the gun yet.
I don't have anything. If I find the gun, you'll be the first to know.
-Pain in my ass.
-It's funny.
I came by to see if you could use some help on this case...
...and you've got a picture of my daddy.
We sure could use some help.
Can you bring people back from the dead?
You're joking, but that's exactly what we have to do.
We have to make the past start living again.
This whole case is one big resurrection.
I want you to go through all the literature...
...from every organization
Beckwith was part of:
White Citizens Council,
Sons of the American Revolution, KKK.
Good, I always loved homework.
We'll start by paying these boys a little visit.
-Who's that?
-Two cops.
They saw Beckwith 90 miles away at the time of the murder.
You think Holley and Cresswell will admit they lied under oath?
Time has a way of cleaning up people's memories.
I love the Delta.
It's the best place on earth.
If you're a mosquito.
-T ake care now.
-Thank you, Mr. Holley.
Sometimes you can't win for losing.
I asked you boys to meet me out here...
...so as to avoid running into any of my constituents.
How long have you been an alderman up here, Mr. Holley?
Must be going on about five years.
I'll tell you this:
If word got out that I testified on behalf of Byron De La Beckwith....
I suppose, in a way, your boss and me got the same problem.
Sir?
If we want to keep our jobs...
...we'll have to kiss an awful lot of black behind.
Mr. Holley...
...Evers was killed shortly after midnight, 90 miles away in Jackson.
There's no way the killer could have been here...
...at 1 a.m. pumping gas.
No, sir, that'd be impossible.
It was a long while ago, but I'd like you to think back and tell me...
...are you sure about the time...
...you saw Mr. Beckwith at that gas station?
This old memory of mine...
...gets worse and worse with each passing year...
...but there's two things
I am pretty sure about:
It was approximately 1:03 in the morning...
...and old Delay was gassing up that Valiant of his.
Lying son of a bitch.
You thought you'd hear something different?
Maybe we'll have better luck with his partner.
Y'all wanna subpoena me...
...then you go right ahead and do it.
But if I see you,
Byron De La Beckwith...
...or the blackest nigger in this country...
...putting gas in his car at the time of a murder...
...then that's what I'll say.
I'd say he's in our camp.
I wish I had better news for her today.
Who's that?
Mrs. Evers.
Fill it up for me, would you, buddy?
I call her every Friday and let her know how the case is progressing.
Got a flash for you.
This case ain't progressing.
I think about her keeping this thing alive all this time.
Imagine a woman loving a man so much.
I can't even get a woman to love me while I'm still alive.
Know what I did after my last divorce?
I took up golf.
Man needs a hobby to occupy his mind, or he'll start doing crazy things...
...Iike drinking too much...
...or chasing 26-year-old murder cases across the Mississippi Delta.
I told you I'd call you every Friday.
And it's Friday, Mrs. Evers, so I'm calling.
This really isn't necessary.
It's important to me you know we're doing what we can.
I wish I had better news for you today...
...but we still haven't been able to locate the autopsy report.
Most of the physical evidence is still missing.
A number of the witnesses have died, which really hurts us...
...and we've had no luck finding the original trial transcript.
I've just spoke with both Holley and Cresswell...
...and they're sticking by their stories.
I'm sure as the assistant district attorney of Hinds County...
...you're doing everything in your power...
...to see that justice is done.
I'll call you next Friday.
I'll be on pins and needles till then.
I waited for you to come home.
I'm not taking the children with me.
I just need to be on my own for a while.
I was just wondering when we stopped loving each other.
I don't know.
What happened, Bobby?
People change.
You saying I've changed?
I'm saying you haven't.
-It's a beautiful area, Mr. Beckwith.
-It's heaven on earth.
Of course, like everywhere else...
... we do get the occasional stray nigger moving in.
But their houses always seem to burn down.
You know how careless niggers are with their cigarettes.
A real beauty.
-Where'd you get this?
-Ed Bryson at Channel 3.
They're running a piece on Beckwith.
Do you think...
...it's a crime for a white man to kill a black man?
God put the white man here to rule over all the dusky races.
It says so in the Bible.
Is there a chance...
... you'd be indicted again for the murder of Medgar Evers?
Why would I be?
Do you know of any new evidence?
-Are you a Jew?
-Catholic.
I told you, I won't talk to no Jew.
Anybody who knows anything about Jews and niggers...
...knows that Jews put the niggers up to all this foolishness.
This CORE and SNCC and NAACP.
If you were indicted again?
Well, I'm just gonna tend to my business...
...Iike I always have.
I'm gonna look out for my God, my family...
...and the whole state of Christ's church.
That don't encompass anybody but white Christians.
All these other...
...races and colors and creeds and sissies...
... they are anti-Christs.
See, many of them...
...believe in human sacrifices and voodoo and such.
According to your way of thinking...
...how could justice be done in the Medgar Evers murder?
First, find out who killed the nigger.
Then you just...
...do whatever the law says that you can do...
...if you're big enough to do it.
He's daring us to get him.
-We still ain't got nothing.
-I know what you'll say.
-Did I kill Medgar Evers?
-Did you?
I did not kill him.
But he sure is dead.
And he ain't coming back.
What did you think when you heard he'd been killed?
I didn't shed a tear.
No, sir.
Here. The latest literary efforts from the "Hate Group of the Month" Club.
For people who got one thing on their minds...
...they got a lot of ways to tell you about it.
I wonder what old Judge Moore would think about all this.
Dixie still living with her mom?
Shit, I'm late!
Hot off the presses. Armed robbery.
A guy named Spratlin held up
Crechelle's, got away with $3800...
-...and an order of onion rings.
-I'll take care of it.
Where you going?
-I said I'd be home by 6.
-What about the Owens case?
-The assault with the baseball bat.
-No, the carjacking.
Right. I'm on top of it.
You want this Evers thing to be your life's work...
...but there's cases that occurred in this decade.
I promise.
This office can't keep covering for you with the judges.
-You'd best be in court tomorrow.
-I'll be there.
Daddy...
...how come Grandpa Russel would be mad at you?
Mommy said Grandpa Russel would be mad at you.
Great. What else did Mommy say?
She said that you're doing something that Grandpa won't like.
Yeah, well....
What are you doing?
Grandpa Russel and I didn't always agree on things.
What things?
Let's see, how can I explain this?
Explain it.
Right.
You know how sometimes people can just be different?
Like how?
Grandpa used to eat pig's knuckles.
That's how I feel.
See, we're different.
Grandpa used to like to build things.
I can't build anything, but I like to work in the garden.
Grandpa had guns all over his house, and we don't have any guns.
I have a gun.
Yours is a nuclear-powered laser gun.
I'm talking about handguns and rifles.
Holy shit!
Claire, watch Drew!
Holy shit.
Don't say that.
That's a bad word.
Benny?
Sanders said something about evidence disappearing after trials.
Do you know anything about that?
My daddy told me that kind of thing happened all the time.
People used to take stuff as souvenirs.
You know, lawyers, bailiffs, clerks.
How about judges?
That's true.
I'm afraid I won't be able to play Tuesday.
We have a round robin at the club, and I promised Lou Ann.
Honey, don't worry about it.
I'll call Charlynne.
If she can't make it, I'll get Louise.
Sugar, play that jack of clubs for me there, if you would. Please, ma'am.
Hi, Grandma.
What are you doing here?
Dixie's not here.
I thought you'd enjoy a visit from your grandkids.
Darlin', it's my bridge night tonight.
Drew! Come here.
Well, we can't stay but a minute.
Remember that rifle Judge Moore used to hold open the door to his study?
Have you seen that around anywhere?
Ladies, y'all know Bobby.
That's Marilyn and Jill and Leah.
I won't keep you from your game.
Go ahead and I'll be right back.
Now, what is he doing here, Caroline?
He's looking for a gun.
I don't appreciate your roaming around.
I want you coming down those stairs now, and leave.
I spent many a happy hour up here arguing the law with your husband.
And if he knew what you were up to with this Evers nonsense...
...that man would turn over in his grave.
I said that to myself just this morning.
Dixie always said that you were crazy as hell.
Maybe she did have a point.
I love you...
...but you and Dixie aren't any more right for each other...
...than the man in the moon.
I'll go back and resume my bridge game.
You go on ahead.
I'll be right down.
It's best if you come on back down with me right now.
I prefer it.
Be careful. It could be loaded.
-Hold on to that.
-What are you doing?
-Checking this serial number.
-I love my grandchildren.
-A little bit higher.
-It's inappropriate to march in here...
...and you expect me to just let you....
What?
I love you, Caroline.
-You're full of shit.
-I logged it in the evidence locker.
-Logged what in?
-The gun that killed Medgar Evers.
-You're full of shit.
-Who?
He says he found the gun.
-You're full of shit.
-That's something to tell Mrs. Evers.
I'm not gonna tell Mrs. Evers.
You've been making those Friday calls so she'd trust you.
-lf she finds out....
-I can't have her find out.
This can't leave the office.
The only way we're gonna get a new indictment is if we find something...
...they didn't have 27 years ago.
The way I see it, that something will come from Beckwith.
Right now, he's on his mountaintop...
...shooting his mouth off to anyone who'll listen.
No telling what incriminating thing's liable to come out of that man.
But if he knows we have something like this...
...he'll know we're serious and clam up.
I doubt that Beckwith and Myrlie speak all that often.
Myrlie speaks to Jerry Mitchell.
Jerry Mitchell speaks to the world.
"You best stop wasting our taxpayers' money.
Enjoy your drive home."
Nice to see Jackson still has some concerned citizens.
Well, heck, son, what did you expect?
I expect people to act like decent, law-abiding citizens.
This is 1990, for crying out loud.
Of course it is. And we got blacks and whites playing ball together...
...and on the police force, in the government, on TV.
We are a fully evolved society.
Aren't we, son?
Let me tell you something:
This country may be legally integrated, but emotionally...
...we will always be segregated.
I don't know that I accept that.
Of course not.
You're Bobby DeLaughter...
...Mississippi's self-appointed new civil rights leader.
Barney...
...do we have to talk about this?
No, we do not.
Who all wants some of your grandpa's famous baby backs?
I do! I do!
You're my son.
I don't want you to get hurt.
In Jackson, Mississippi
In 1963
There lived a man
Who was brave
He fought for freedom
Hello, Mrs. Evers?
It's Bobby DeLaughter.
Nothing earth shattering, no.
We've located all the witnesses...
...but without the original trial transcript...
...it's tough piecing the case together.
No, ma'am, that's about it.
-I wish I had more to report.
-Hang up the phone.
-Hang up the phone.
-I hope I'll have something...
...a little more exciting next Friday.
-You too.
-Hang up.
I'll call you next Friday, Mrs. Evers.
Thank you. Goodbye.
What is going on?
Would a confession by Mr. Beckwith qualify as exciting?
What do you got?
You know Jack Ables?
The lawyer?
He's representing a movie studio in a defamation of character suit...
...brought by a couple Klansmen.
While he was doing his research...
...he came across that.
"Klandestine."
It was written 20 years ago...
...about this Klan titan turned
FBl informant, Delmar Dennis.
On page 38, he talks about attending a Klan rally in August of 1965.
Guess who was a motivational speaker?
-Beckwith?
-Our boy.
Listen to this.
And I quote:
" Killing that nigger gave me no more discomfort than our wives endure...
...when they give birth to our children."
Sounds like a confession to me.
Let's run down this Delmar Dennis.
We need to have a chat with him.
$100 says old Delmar chickens out on us.
He's probably hiding in the woods, shitting in his drawers.
Where the hell is this place?
This guy informed on the Klan.
He could have made a deal with them to save his butt by delivering us.
That's a happy thought.
One of you Bobby DeLaughter?
Holding rallies and burning crosses is one thing...
...but when they killed them three kids up in Neshoba County...
-...freedom riders--
-Goodman, Chaney, Schwerner?
That made a lot of people come to their senses.
That's why I decided to go undercover for the FBl.
I need to ask you if what you say in that book happened.
That part about Beckwith's speech at that Klan rally. Is that a fact?
It's a fact.
I was shocked, and I remember thinking how stupid he was...
...shooting off his mouth like that in front of 100 men.
-Did you report that to the FBl?
-Sure, I did.
But Beckwith was a white man accused of killing a black.
The FBl wasn't gonna blow my cover on a case they couldn't win.
They were saving me for Neshoba because--
Two of the victims were white.
Mr. Dennis, if I can't build the case...
...I give you my word that we never had this conversation.
But if I can...
...will you testify?
Byron De La Beckwith is the craziest...
...most dangerous son of a bitch
I ever come across.
He's so crazy even the Klan's afraid of him.
He's an old man now.
That old man is probably more dangerous today than he was 30 years ago.
Mr. Dennis, we need your help.
I can't make no promises.
You know something, Mr. Dennis?
Six months I've worked this case.
A lot of people have told me to give it up.
" It's 27 years old.
Let sleeping dogs lie."
But I don't see what difference it makes...
...if a man was bushwhacked yesterday...
...today or 27 damn years ago.
Murder is murder.
It's still my job to bring the son of a bitch to justice.
It's still your job to help me.
No. I did my job.
I testified against the Klan.
They shot out my windows, blew up my car.
They hunted and harassed me for 25 years!
Don't that get me even for the wrong I done?
We never get even for the wrong we've done.
If I do this thing...
...you gotta promise me protection.
What's going on?
Stop that.
Stop that. IKnock it off.
Enough of that!
-What's going on?
-Eddy called you a nigger lover.
My dad says you're after a man for something that isn't even a crime.
That's enough fighting, son.
You get on home. Go on home.
Let me take a look at you.
My God. Get in this house.
What's gotten into you?
All this fighting.
All this name-calling.
Is this what you want?
To drag your children into this?
What would you have me do?
Let a murderer go free?
I'd never tell you your business.
I'm thinking about the children.
I don't understand why every decent person in this state...
...isn't sickened by what happened here 27 years ago.
-Oh, Bobby.
-You're not, are you?
-Not in front of the children.
-Why not?
I was just a kid...
...and I still remember you and your friends discussing it.
And I recollect someone saying,
"That nigger needed to be shot."
I never said a hateful thing like that.
-You didn't cry, did you?
-I can't say that I shed any tears--
Had it been our beloved governor,
Ross Barnett, got himself shot...
...you would've been bawling your eyes out.
Evers left a young widow and three little kids. Why didn't you cry?
-I don't wanna discuss this now.
-Why?
Because he tried to destroy our way of life.
And he succeeded all too well.
This state's going to hell on account of integration.
That's a fact. If you think they appreciate one thing...
...we gave them, you're crazy.
-Tiger, how do you feel?
-I'm all right.
-Your son has one tough nose.
-So it's not broken?
It'll be tender for a couple days, then it'll be good as new.
Thank you. I appreciate it.
You're welcome.
Thank you, ma'am.
Are you the one involved in this Medgar Evers thing?
Yes, I am.
I think what you're trying to do is very important.
Thank you very much.
I don't want you kids getting into anymore fights.
-But he called you a--
-I don't care what he called me.
It doesn't bother me. You gotta learn not to let it bother you.
A lot of people around here don't like what Daddy's doing now.
What are you doing, Daddy?
I'm trying to put a bad man in jail.
Mama says what you're doing is wrong.
Grandma said Edgar Mevers is ruining our life.
Medgar Evers was a good guy who tried to help people.
Did he try to beat the bad guys?
Yes, he did. He fought so that black people...
...could eat in the same restaurants, swim in the same pools...
...shop in the same stores and go to the same schools as white people.
What's wrong with that?
Nothing.
But you'll hear people say all kinds of bad things...
...about what your daddy's doing.
They're gonna tease you, try to pick fights.
But no matter what they do...
...I want you to walk away.
What if they say something really mean?
They're only words. They can't hurt you unless you let them.
Is this about sticks and stones?
That's exactly what this is about.
Y'all understand what I'm saying?
Yes, sir.
All right.
All y'all get on to bed now.
Good night.
I heard you had a little visit with my friend Delmar.
Mr. Beckwith?
Next time you see old Delmar, you tell him for me...
...there are a lot of dark, winding roads...
... between the backwoods of Louisiana and a courtroom in Mississippi.
A man could get lost.
Claire, what's the matter?
The ghost's in my room again.
Let's see what we can do.
-Where is he?
-Sitting right there.
Oh, right.
Daddy, sing "Dixie."
Hop into bed, sweetie.
Sing.
You know, sweetie, maybe
" Dixie" is not the right song.
Maybe that's why this ghost keeps coming back.
-But you said--
-I know, baby.
But I'm not so sure that all ghosts like "Dixie."
But how do we know what this ghost likes?
Seeing as this is your special ghost, maybe he'll like your favorite song.
"Old MacDonald"?
Let's give it a try.
Old MacDonald had a farm
E-I-E-I-O
And on that farm he had a--
What?
A ghost?
And on that farm he had a ghost
E-I-E-I-O
With a boo boo here
And a boo boo there
Here a boo, there a boo
Everywhere a boo boo
You wanted to have lunch to talk about Burt's nose?
No, actually, l....
I didn't think so.
So then, this is a date?
Apparently.
In the hospital cafeteria?
I took a chance. I thought it would either be stupid or charming.
What do you think?
Is there a third choice?
Extremely charming?
That's the one.
How'd you get into all this?
You want the standard answer or the truth?
How about a little of both?
I always liked helping people...
...and I like the hours.
Which answer was that?
A little of both.
But I do like that I work one week on and one week off.
Can't beat that.
Have to be careful not to shop too much in that week off.
That can kill you.
What about you?
I wanted to be a lawyer since I was a little kid.
I watched Perry Mason...
...all the time.
I identified with him.
-But he was a defense attorney.
-I know.
Later, I realized the only way he ever won a case...
...is if some guy jumped up and yelled, "I did it!"
That didn't happen often, so I switched to the other side.
I think it's a good thing you did.
You would be in the minority these days.
There are a lot more people on your side than you think.
You're not saying that because
I bought you a lime Jell-O?
Well, it is the way to a woman's heart.
But if you could pull this off, it'd do Mississippi a whole lot of good.
And if I don't?
I'll pretend I never met you.
I have renewed faith in the institution of marriage.
I can't get enough of my hunk of burning love.
Not now, Clara May!
Clara Mayfield.
-It's Jerry Mitchell.
-I'll take it.
-I know you have the gun.
-We've been over this.
I know you found it in Russel Moore's den.
There'll be a story about how the
D.A. Iied to the people of Jackson...
...and how Bobby DeLaughter lied to Myrlie Evers.
I'm calling to see if you care to comment.
You've explained why you lied to the press.
You still have not explained why you lied to me.
I told you. Jerry Mitchell is a loose cannon.
This case was so delicate,
I didn't want to take chances.
I'm the last person on earth who would jeopardize this investigation.
There's something you're not telling me.
I swear to God, there is no cover-up.
You fully intend to seek an indictment and a new trial?
That's what we've been working toward.
I thought so, Mr. DeLaughter.
I thought so.
This latest revelation only proves what we've suspected all along.
Peters and DeLaughter are just putting on a show for the black community.
As far as I'm concerned, they're nothing but a pair of lying racists...
...who never, I repeat, never...
...had any intention of prosecuting this case.
You wanted to see me?
Come on, sit down.
You don't mind being seen in the same room with a "lying racist"?
I don't mind if you don't.
You know Pat Bennett?
Sure, she's one of the best lawyers in the state.
Why are we talking about her?
I thought she might be able to help you on the case.
I've got it under control, Ed.
You have your share of the 93 capital murder cases...
...we have waiting for trial under control?
What new excuse would you suggest I give...
...to the families as to why those who've murdered their loved ones...
...have yet to see a courtroom?
I'm just curious.
The fact that Pat Bennett is black...
...wouldn't have anything to do with this, would it?
I'm not gonna dignify that.
Whatever you may think, this is not the Bobby DeLaughter case.
This is a case against the peace and dignity of Mississippi.
Monday morning, I'm making a change.
You're about to hear the testimony of a fingerprint expert...
...concerning evidence he claims to have identified in a certain glass.
You're entitled to consider...
... the prosecution's failure to make the glass available to the defense.
It is permissible that for one fact alone to raise a doubt in your minds...
... that will require
Mrs. Savage's acquittal.
-Can he do that?
-This is my case, damn it.
How dare they say
I'm putting on a show?
Only two people care about this case, and I'm one of them.
If anybody's putting on a show, they are. The only thing they' re--
They're only trying to stir up emotions and position themselves...
...as the saviors of the black community.
Where you going?
This is Bobby DeLaughter.
I hope I didn't disturb you.
This won't take but a minute, ma'am.
When I started off,
I had nothing more than...
...a couple of pages in an old police report.
I spent the better part of a year bumping up against dead witnesses...
...and tracking down live ones.
My car's been vandalized, my son's been in a fight...
...and I've been called ugly things by every racist in Mississippi.
Now, when there's a chance for an indictment...
...I've gotta fight off black politicians too.
I'm sorry I lied about the gun, but I've made a commitment to this case.
I'll be goddamned--
Pardon me, if I give it up to some special prosecutor...
...I don't care if he's black, green or blue.
I'm committed and I'm asking you to make a commitment to me.
If you do, I'll ride this thing to the finish line...
...or collapse heading in that direction.
Thank you for your call,
Mr. DeLaughter.
The hell with her!
She's like all the rest.
The white world hasn't gone out of its way to make her trusting.
When does it start?
What do I have to do?
We had a real chance to send a message to this country...
...that Mississippi isn't a bunch of redneck racists.
My mother was right. We should separate and let the South rise again.
-You don't believe that.
-Why not?
She doesn't want my help.
I'm just another white man putting her in her place.
She sees no difference between me and Beckwith.
-You didn't tell her about the gun.
-Right.
If I had it to do over again,
I still wouldn't have told her.
IKeeping the discovery of the murder weapon a secret was a good strategy.
It wouldn't bother her a lick if I was black. I'd just be a smart lawyer.
You can't have it both ways.
What do you mean by that?
You said the reason you didn't tell her about the gun...
...was that you were afraid she would leak the story.
You can't expect her to trust you, if you don't trust her.
I want you to meet with Pat Bennett and bring her up to speed.
Fine.
It's for the best.
If you say so.
I'm going out.
You want something?
I'd like a Mercedes convertible, but I'd settle for a Dr. Pepper.
There are four important things in my life:
Medgar, Walter...
...my children...
...and this...
...the original court-certified transcript.
I've kept this for 27 years...
...through three district attorneys.
Once I give this up...
...I know that it may be gone forever.
I don't believe you'll find anymore opposition...
...to your continuing to handle this case.
Thank you, ma'am.
It's truly appreciated.
Let's get the son of a bitch.
My pleasure.
The decision by the D.A.'s office...
...to re-open the 27-year-old murder case of Byron De La Beckwith...
...continues to cause controversy.
Citizens of Jackson are concerned...
... that taxpayers' money is being used to dig up the past.
The grand jury handed down an indictment of Byron De La Beckwith...
...in the murder of civil rights leader Medgar Evers.
Extradition in the Beckwith case...
...is seen as a stumbling block for the D.A.'s office.
I plan to fight repossession--
What's the word?
Extradition tooth, nail and claw!
In an attempt to replace a lost autopsy report...
... the D.A.'s office of Hinds County today received permission...
...by the Evers family to exhume the body...
...of slain civil rights leader
Medgar Evers.
The body, buried in
Arlington National Cemetery in 1963...
... was found in remarkably near-perfect condition.
After 18 months, extradition was finally granted...
...in the case of Byron De La Beckwith...
... the man accused of slaying civil rights leader Medgar Evers.
Beckwith will face murder charges
30 years after the initial two trials...
...for the same offense ended in hung juries.
Thank you, son.
" I first received the call...
...at 9 :42 p. m...
...on the night of June 12, 1963.
My partner and I responded and proceeded to the crime scene...
...Iocated at 2332 Guynes Street."
That's pretty good, Benny...
...but just because you read the part of a dead witness...
...doesn't mean you have to act like you're actually dead.
I'm doing my best.
I know you are.
Medgar Evers' autopsy report just came in.
You're not gonna believe this.
He's still dead.
Thank you, Clara.
I got off the phone with Charles Evers.
He won't come to the trial.
Did he say why?
He wouldn't say.
Get me the address of his radio station.
They found a bullet fragment in the body.
It's consistent with a.30-06 Enfield.
You'll be sorry. What happened to that nigger will happen to you.
Another one?
Closer we get to trial, the more nutjobs will crawl out of the woodwork.
You got a gun?
Here. T ake this.
No, wait. T ake this.
T ake this.
That was Muddy Waters doing his thing for y'all.
Now I'll play a little something that goes way back.
The great Robert Johnson.
Mr. Evers?
-Hi, I'm--
-Bobby DeLaughter.
Please sit down.
Robert Johnson.
IKing of the Delta Blues.
-Thank you.
-You're welcome.
May your soul rise up to heaven...
...'fore the devil knows you're dead.
They say Robert Johnson sold his soul to the devil to play the guitar like that.
What do you think?
If the devil wanted my soul, it'd cost a lot more than some guitar lessons.
I believe after this trial's over...
...Mississippi come through this time.
That's why I came here to talk with you, Mr. Evers.
Would you change your mind and come to the trial? Your presence...
...would mean a great deal.
Let me tell you something.
Medgar was my baby brother.
There ain't nothing
I wouldn't do for him.
When we were little kids...
...we used to sleep in the same bed.
And on cold nights...
...I'd climb in first just so I could warm up the sheets for him.
I didn't go to the first two trials.
Myrlie...
...a lot of people, they criticized me for that.
But I won't go to no third trial neither...
...and for the exact same reason.
I know if I ever got in the same room with Byron De La Beckwith...
...as God is my witness...
...I'd wrap my hands around his chicken neck and snap it in half.
And nobody...
...be able to stop me.
I wouldn't blame you.
Nobody hardly ever...
...remembers Medgar anymore.
Whites or blacks.
And that's a goddamn shame.
Because whatever rights the black man has now...
...he's got because of something called the Civil Rights Movement.
And for a long time here in the state of Mississippi...
...before the television, newspapers, back before the fancy speeches...
...my brother, Medgar, was the Civil Rights Movement.
I'm sitting here tonight, talking to my friend and your friend...
...Assistant District Attorney
Bobby DeLaughter.
We're talking about my brother,
Medgar Evers...
...and we're gonna play the blues for Medgar all night long.
You and my sister-in-law...
...you get justice for my brother.
Devil, if you listening...
...I won't sell my soul for no guitar lessons...
...but I'll sell my soul for that.
Are you surprised bail was granted so quickly?
Mr. Beckwith was being held as a political prisoner.
He's not been found guilty.
Why should he be kept in jail?
Mr. Scott, you're an officer of the Nationalist Movement, correct?
Is that where the money came from to secure his bond?
Mr. Beckwith has a lot of friends here.
We'll do whatever it takes.
Suppose he doesn't show for the trial?
Suppose he leaves the country?
If he runs, we'll find him.
How long will that take?
Another five years? Another 10?
I've already devoted a lifetime to this.
That ought to be enough.
Yes, ma'am. It sure ought to be.
I'm sorry, Bobby.
It's all right, Mrs. Evers.
It's quite all right.
-How's Jared doing?
-Fine.
He and Burt seem like they've been brothers all their lives.
They all sleeping?
And that's what you should be doing.
I want the opening statement to be great.
It was great when you read it three nights ago.
Unless you snuck in something about...
...Beckwith deserving the Nobel Peace Prize...
...I'm sure it'll be great tomorrow morning.
You see? That's why I look to you.
Eliminate Nobel Peace Prize reference.
That's good.
I left a gift for you in appreciation for everything you're doing...
... to ruin civilized society.
-What the hell is this?
-It's scheduled to go off at 10 p.m.
You have a nice night.
It's a bomb.
Everybody, get up.
Let's go.
What's going on?
It's nothing at all. Outside that door.
A little drill is all.
Head for the front door.
Is this still the drill?
Where are we going, Dad?
Told you we're going to the Holiday Inn.
Is that where we're going?
The Holiday Inn?
That's right.
We haven't found anything, but we'll go through it one more time.
I appreciate that.
I told them if anything ever happened, all they had to do was walk away.
How're they supposed to walk away from a bomb?
There wasn't a bomb.
This time.
If you want to give this thing up,
I understand.
No one could fault you. But the world isn't going to be any safer.
I don't give a shit about the world.
These are my children.
Yes, they are.
Someday they'll be able to tell their children...
...that their daddy put away
Medgar Evers' killer.
Medgar Evers was a fool, and my daddy was right.
Doesn't matter how many civil rights laws you pass.
You'll never legislate how people think.
There are always gonna be a few misguided people.
I'm not talking about a few people.
I'm talking about everybody, about us.
Do we have one single black friend? No.
We don't have dinner with them or have them over.
We don't sit with them in church.
You think this one trial will magically change this?
No, I don't.
It's a step.
That's all anyone can do is take a step.
Why do I have to take that step?
So some sick son of a bitch can murder my wife and kids?
Excuse me if I'm not interested in taking that step.
Where are you going?
For a drive.
" I don't know if I'm going to heaven or hell, but I'm going from Jackson."
We're on record in the matter of Mississippi v. Byron De La Beckwith.
Does prosecution have its opening statement?
We do, Your Honor.
Ladies and gentlemen...
...this is a very simple case.
It's about a man whose life was snuffed out...
...on June the 12th of 1963...
...by a bullet that tore through his body.
A bullet aimed out of prejudice...
...propelled by hatred...
...and fired by a back-shooting coward...
...from ambush...
...at night.
The evidence will overwhelmingly show that Byron De La Beckwith...
...a self-proclaimed, rabid racist on a lifelong mission...
...to purge society of anyone and anything...
...that stood for integration...
...is the man that fired that bullet.
Evidence will show how, when he thought he beat the system...
...he bragged about what he'd done.
Bragged about getting away with murder.
The evidence will undeniably show that the person who pulled the trigger...
...and ended the life of Medgar Evers is this defendant...
...Byron De La Beckwith.
Mr. Coxwell?
Good morning, ladies and gentlemen.
My name is Merrida Coxwell.
This is James Kitchens...
...and we are representing
Mr. Beckwith.
Mr. DeLaughter started his opening statement...
...by saying that this was a very simple case.
I agree with him.
But what Mr. DeLaughter is going to rely on is for you...
...to convict Mr. Beckwith simply because of his opinions.
That's because...
...he knows that the state cannot prove to you beyond a reasonable doubt...
...that the defendant committed the crime.
By the time this trial is over...
...you will have seen it was physically impossible...
...for Mr. Byron De La Beckwith to have killed Medgar Evers.
Mr. Beckwith is not guilty.
That's what the proof will show.
Thank you.
The state may call its first witness.
The state calls Myrlie Evers.
Raise your right hand.
Do you swear to tell the truth...
-...the whole truth, so help you God?
-I do.
Be seated.
Will you tell us your name?
My name is Myrlie Evers.
Going back to 1963, were you married at that time?
Yes, I was.
And to whom were you married?
Medgar Wylie...
...Evers.
When was the last time you saw your husband alive?
June 11, 1963.
I'd fallen behind...
...in my housework and got up early that morning...
...to iron some shirts for Medgar.
By the time he woke...
...I had 10 freshly ironed shirts neatly hung on hangers.
He said, "I thank you for ironing these shirts...
...but I'm not going to need them."
Before he left for work that morning, he kissed us all goodbye...
...and then left.
But then he came back...
...and took me aside.
He said, "If anything should happen to me...
...I want you to promise me...
...you will take care of my babies."
I said, "Of course.
They're my babies too."
He then kissed us all goodbye again and left.
Could you tell the jury what you remember...
...seeing and hearing when your husband returned home that night?
It was just after midnight when he got home.
We heard the car.
And then there was...
...this horrible blast.
The children...
...fell to the floor as their father had taught them.
I bolted to the front door.
Medgar was lying in the carport.
He still had his keys in his hand.
Blood everywhere.
The children came out shortly after I did...
...and they were screaming...
... "Daddy!
Daddy, get up!
Daddy, please get up."
But I knew he would never get up again.
Nothing further, Your Honor.
Mr. McIntyre, have you ever owned a 1917 Enfield.30-06 rifle?
Yes, I have.
Did you own that rifle in 1963?
Sometime, I believe in 1960,
I traded it to Mr. Beckwith.
Mr. McIntyre, I want to show you this firearm and ask if you would...
...read the serial number on the barrel, please.
Thank you. Going back to exhibit 35, would you read the serial number...
...on the invoice of the gun that you purchased...
...and later traded to Mr. Beckwith?
Ms. Holder, were you at Joe's Drive-In on the night of June 11, 1963?
Yes, sir.
I wasn't working, but I was there hanging out with my friends.
T ell the jury if there came a time when your attention...
...was directed towards any particular automobile.
Being a carhop, you notice cars.
This one had a long antenna on the side of it.
We thought at first it was a patrol car.
It was white and it had a lot of mud on it.
It was a Plymouth Valiant.
Mr. Hargrove, were you employed by the
Jackson Police Department in June 1963?
Yes, I was.
In charge of the ldentification Division for 42 years.
Did you reach a conclusion as to whose fingerprint...
...was on the telescopic side of the gun...
...recovered in your presence on June 12, 1963?
Yes, sir. I did.
With 14 points of identification, there's more than enough...
...to identify the fingerprint of Mr. Byron De La Beckwith.
After four days of testimony in the trial of white supremacist Beckwith...
...the prosecution, thus far, has presented essentially the same case...
...as was offered up in the two original trials.
However, this time there are two significant differences.
First, the makeup of the jury.
In 1964, Beckwith faced two all-male, all-white juries.
Today, he faces a jury made up of eight blacks and four whites.
Tomorrow the prosecution is expected to introduce three new witnesses...
... who did not testify in the first two trials.
State your name for the record.
Delmar Dennis.
Mr. Dennis, in March of 1964...
...were you a member of an organization known as...
...the White Knights of the Ku Klux Klan?
I was.
In September of that year...
...did you become a paid informant for the FBl?
I did.
And in your capacity as informant...
...did you ever encounter the defendant, Byron De La Beckwith?
I did.
What were the circumstances of that encounter?
On August 8, 1965,
I met Mr. Beckwith...
...at a Klan meeting in Byram, Mississippi.
He was a featured speaker that night.
Now, during that talk, would you tell the jury what, if anything...
...the defendant said about the murder or shooting death of Medgar Evers.
He said, "Killing that nigger gave me no more inner discomfort...
...than our wives endure giving birth to our children.
We gotta kill those enemies...
...including the President, from the top down."
Did he say anything else?
Yes, sir.
He said, "You're gonna get away with it like I did."
Thank you, Mr. Dennis.
Your witness.
You have seen FBl reports about your activities...
...as a paid informant, haven't you?
Mr. DeLaughter's office furnished me with copies.
In fact, there are...
...pages and pages of dialogue...
...that you reported to the FBl of things...
...that various people said over lunch, over dinner...
...riding in cars, meetings.
Isn't that right?
Yet, nowhere in all those reports...
...does the quotation that you attributed to Mr. Beckwith appear.
Does it?
Maybe the pages got lost over the years.
And maybe they never existed.
Objection.
Sustained.
Dog ate my homework.
Mr. Dennis, did Byron De La Beckwith...
...ever specifically say that he killed Medgar Evers?
He never said, "I killed
Medgar Evers. "That's true.
No further questions.
That's what he meant.
We ask that the witness's unsolicited opinion be stricken...
...and that the jury disregard it.
The jury will disregard
Mr. Dennis' last statement.
I was standing out in the yard, and he said something to me about...
...having been tried twice in Mississippi...
...for "killing that nigger."
And what'd he say about that?
He said...
... "I had a job to do and I did it."
Thank you, Mr. Prince.
Nothing further.
Back in 1986, when Mr. Beckwith allegedly made this statement to you...
...you went straight to the authorities, didn't you?
Well, you must've told some of your buddies.
You didn't tell anybody you were renting a house from a man...
...who admitted to you that he'd killed somebody?
I didn't at that time, no.
Mr. and Mrs. Beckwith had you thrown out of the house...
...because you had a drinking problem, right?
I had a drinking problem...
...but that's not why they--
You don't particularly like Mr. Beckwith for throwing you out, do you?
Mrs. Morgan...
...when you lived in Greenwood,
Mississippi in the early 1970s...
...did you and your husband give the defendant a ride to Parchman Prison?
Yes, sir.
Me and my husband, Lloyd, was going to see Lloyd's brother...
...Jimmy Dale Morgan...
...and Mr. Beckwith was going to see some friend of his...
...whose name he wouldn't tell us.
During that time, did he make any statements concerning the murder...
...of Medgar Evers?
Yes, sir.
He said that he had killed
Medgar Evers, a nigger...
...and said we'd better not say anything about us driving him up to Parchman...
...because he wasn't scared to kill again.
Thank you, Mrs. Morgan.
You have had some very traumatic things...
...happen to you in your life, haven't you?
Most definitely.
Your estranged husband...
...Lloyd Morgan, was very abusive to you.
Objection. Irrelevant.
Where are you going with this?
If you'll allow me...
...this line of questioning speaks directly to this witness's credibility.
Overruled.
Your husband, you told us...
...carried on an incestuous relationship with one of his children.
Yes, he did.
And your father...
...was very abusive to you when you were a child.
Yes, sir.
And as a result...
...of all this...
...you have been diagnosed by psychiatrists...
...as having an anxiety disorder.
Yes, sir, I have.
I have nothing further.
If this jury wants to believe a lying drunk, a paid informant...
...and a damn loony bird...
...then I might be in a bit of trouble.
But not as much trouble as our beloved justice system.
And this Prince fella still owes me $ 64 worth of rent.
How do you account for the matching numbers on the gun?
My rifle was stolen days before this nigger turned up dead.
Turn those lights off.
Mom, how can you stand watching this idiot?
When your father died...
...I carried around such hatred for that man...
... I actually made inquiries into having him killed.
But in time, I was able to let that hatred go.
I don't know how.
I remembered something your father once said to me.
He said, "When you hate, the only person who suffers is you.
Because most of the people you hate...
...don't know it and the others don't care."
The big question here is will Beckwith testify...
...as he did so confidently back in 1964?
Everybody wants to see the Byron De La Beckwith Show.
What if putting him on is too risky?
You kidding? He'll wanna tell that cock-and-bull story...
...about his gun being stolen two days before the murder.
Besides, this is Byron De La Beckwith we're talking about.
Summoned from his mountain by God Almighty...
...to give us the word according to Delay.
He'll testify.
I'll see you upstairs.
Something happen to you in your boyhood make you mean-spirited...
...enough to turn on your own?
Do what the good Lord and Mississippi got every right to expect you to do.
Which is?
Putting niggers away for killing white people instead of the other way around.
Mr. Peters and y'all should be run out of this state for this foolishness...
...and y'all probably will be.
This is not some deer you brought down.
This is a human being.
A deer, Mr. DeLaughter, is a beautiful animal.
It's one of God's creatures.
I would never kill a deer.
A nigger, on the other hand, that's another matter entirely.
Are you standing here admitting to me that you--
IKilled Medgar Evers?
What if I did?
It's not like there's anything you nor anybody else can do about it.
Is there?
We'll see about that.
Oh, that we will.
That we will.
You know, it only takes but one of them, doesn't it?
The question is...
...which one will it be?
Maybe that chubby white gal who'd be sorely vexed...
...to let one of her own kind be put away, no matter what she told you.
Or maybe that old nigger minister...
...who won't want sending a sick old man to prison on his conscience.
You ain't never gonna get 12 people to convict me of killing a nigger...
...in the state of Mississippi.
No, sir. Hell, I don't even have to take the stand.
Couple more days, I'll be heading back to my home in T ennessee...
...where I will sit on my porch...
...and live out my days in peace and prosperity.
What are you gonna do?
What are you gonna do?
" Free at last, free at last.
Great God Almighty, I'm free at last!"
The defense calls James Holley.
Relax. He's just needling you.
He'll testify.
Raise your right hand.
You swear the testimony you'll give is the whole truth, so help you God?
-I do.
-Be seated.
Mr. Holley, did you have a personal relationship with the defendant?
No, sir. None whatsoever.
I just kind of knew who he was.
Mr. Holley, in the early morning of June 12th, 1963...
...did you have occasion to see Mr. Beckwith?
He was standing outside at a Shell station...
...while the attendant was putting gas in his car.
T ell the jury what time you saw him.
At approximately 1:03 in the morning.
About how many miles is it from Greenwood to Jackson?
Must be around 90, 95 miles.
So you saw the defendant less than an hour after the murder...
...calmly standing by his car some 95 miles away from the scene of the crime?
I have nothing further.
Mr. Holley...
...on the night you say you saw...
...Byron De La Beckwith in Greenwood....
Delay, as you call him, I believe.
Is that right?
Delay Beckwith, yes, sir.
Why do you call him Delay?
Are y'all first-name buddies?
No, sir. I call him Mr. Beckwith most of the time.
We just noted...
... "Delay's car" and "Delay and the attendant."
Isn't that exactly what you told me and my investigators...
...when we asked what you were doing that night?
"Delay."
Your buddy.
My friend.
And how long has he been your friend?
-Just shortly after World War ll.
-When you said...
...you had no personal relationship with him, that wasn't entirely true.
You've known him a long time and been friends a long time, right?
Well, sure, we're friends.
Just like I hope you and I are friends.
Pardon?
I said just like I would hope you and I are friends.
I'm flattered.
Let me ask you this.
At the time the defendant was arrested...
...there were a whole lot of law enforcement people...
...trying to gather information, am I right?
FBl, Jackson Police.
Do you remember that?
Did you speak to...
...Detective Sanders, one of the investigators?
I might've spoken a word with him.
Then you told him you saw Beckwith in Greenwood the night of the killing.
-ls that right?
-I did not.
Why not?
I had no reason to tell unless he asked.
You had no reason, as a sworn police officer, to tell an investigator...
...in an important murder case...
...that you knew the suspect was 90 miles away at the time of the murder?
I'd have been butting into his investigation--
You'd have been "butting into his investigation "by telling him an alibi?
Sure.
Did you ever go to the D.A. and tell them what was going on?
Did you tell the FBl what was going on?
The only person you spoke to about this case was Hardy Lott...
...Mr. Beckwith's defense attorney.
-When he called me--
-How long was...
...the defendant in jail by then?
A couple of weeks?
I don't remember, exactly.
Well, let me help you out.
It was over eight months.
Eight months.
You let your buddy sit in jail all that time...
...and never once told anyone,
"You've got the wrong guy."
You're asking this jury to believe that?
Yes, sir.
Earlier in your testimony, you said that you and I are friends, right?
Said what?
That we're friends.
You and I are friends.
You still think we're friends?
Sure.
As my friend, if I ever go to jail for murder...
...don't leave me there for eight months...
...if you know where I was when the murder took place.
Objection!
That was a thing of beauty.
Nothing further.
Will you redirect?
Thank you, Your Honor.
Would you lie for Mr. Beckwith?
Did he ask you to?
As a former police officer, you know perjury is a serious crime.
I'm gonna ask you this one last time.
On the night that Medgar Evers was killed...
...did you or did you not see
Beckwith some 95 miles away...
...from where the murder took place?
I saw him.
As God is your judge.
As God is my judge.
Thank you, Mr. Holley.
We have nothing further.
No further questions.
You may step down.
Is the defense prepared to call its next witness?
Your Honor...
...the defense rests.
-What?
-Damn!
Quiet.
Ladies and gentlemen.
Quiet or I'll order the bailiff to clear the courtroom.
Coward to the end.
To my knowledge...
...this jury is being asked to look further...
...into the past than any jury...
...in the history of American jurisprudence.
That places you folks at a considerable disadvantage.
Evidence has been lost.
They don't have the bullet.
They don't have the spent cartridge case that was found in the gun.
They don't have the live ammunition that was found in the gun.
Where is it?
Nobody knows.
Does this create reasonable doubt?
Of course it does.
And you have heard a number of witnesses testify...
...that years after the crime,
Mr. Beckwith said this...
...or Mr. Beckwith said that.
But the defense has presented you with an eyewitness.
A sworn officer of the law...
...who has testified under oath that he saw the defendant...
...in Greenwood, Mississippi, over 90 miles from Jackson...
...Iess than an hour after the murder.
Does that create reasonable doubt?
You bet it does.
And reasonable doubt means one thing...
...and one thing only.
By law...
...you must render a not guilty verdict.
Forget that it's Byron "Delay" Beckwith.
Forget that you may not like him, that you...
...may not agree with him.
Judge the evidence...
...and judge it fairly.
Because...
...in the United States...
...we don't do that for people we just like and admire.
We do that for everybody...
...that's on trial...
...in an American court of law.
Because if the system doesn't work...
...for Byron De La Beckwith...
...it doesn't work...
...for anyone.
I ask you to let the system work...
...and once and for all...
...find the defendant...
...Byron De La Beckwith, not guilty.
Thank you.
An unarmed man...
...arrives home in the late hours of the night...
...home to his family, his wife...
...and three small children...
...gets out of his car...
...and with his back turned...
...is gunned down by a coward.
That coward is...
...Byron De La Beckwith.
His gun.
His scope.
His fingerprint.
His car.
And lastly, but certainly not least, his mouth.
When he thought he got away with it...
...he couldn't keep his mouth shut with people he wanted to impress.
And now his venom has come back to do him in...
...because, ladies and gentlemen...
...there is no statute of limitations on murder.
The law doesn't say that if you killed someone...
... 10 years ago or 20 years ago...
...or even 30 years ago, that you don't have to pay the price.
The law doesn't say that if you are
50 years old or 60 years old...
...or 70 years old, that you don't have to pay the price.
No man...
...is above the law.
And for what reason...
...was Medgar Evers' life taken?
For wanting some degree of equality for himself...
...his family and his fellow man.
Ladies and gentlemen, when that kind of murder happens...
...no matter who the victim...
...no matter what his race...
...there is a gaping wound...
...Iaid open on society as a whole.
Justice...
...has sometimes been referred to...
...as the soothing balm to be applied...
...to the wounds inflicted on society.
But when there is no justice...
...those wounds can never be cleansed.
Those wounds can never be healed.
When I addressed you in my opening statement...
...I said that this was a simple case.
Well, I was right and I was wrong.
The evidence is simple...
...and the conclusion is more than obvious.
But the reason we are all...
...sitting in this courtroom so many years after...
...this disgraceful assassination took place...
...is anything but simple.
President John F. Kennedy...
...in his landmark civil rights speech to the nation...
...delivered on the very night
Medgar Evers was murdered, said...
... "We face a moral crisis as a country...
...and as a people.
Those who do nothing are inviting shame...
...as well as violence.
Those who act boldly are recognizing right...
...as well as reality."
Today, 30 years later...
...on behalf of the state of Mississippi...
...I'm asking you 12 ladies and gentlemen to act boldly.
To hold this defendant accountable and find him guilty...
...simply because it is right...
...it is just...
...and Lord knows, it is time.
Is it ever...
...too late to do the right thing?
For the sake of justice...
...and for the hope of us as a civilized society...
...I sincerely pray that it is not.
Thank you.
How long do you think they'll be out?
All I know is a short time is good and a long time is...
...not so good.
Then I'll pray for a short time.
This reminds me of Medgar's office on Lynch Street.
You know, I used to be
Medgar's secretary.
He insisted that we behave in the office...
...strictly as employer-employee.
He'd call me Mrs. Evers, and I'd have to call him Mr. Evers.
Is that right?
Everybody thought he was crazy.
But he was just so determined to do a good job.
You remind me of Medgar.
Thank you, ma'am.
Would you like a cup of coffee?
No, thanks.
As many trials as I've been through and I can never take the waiting.
Wanna go for a walk?
No, you go ahead. I've gotten pretty good at waiting.
That Judge Hilburn...
...he don't have a lot of patience.
That jury ain't back with a verdict in a few hours...
...he'll declare a mistrial.
I'm not sure I got that.
Would you mind repeating that, please?
You did say mistrial, didn't you?
I'm gonna snooch you.
All rise.
When the verdict is read...
...there will be no demonstrations...
...or any emotional outbursts of any type.
Has the jury reached a verdict?
It has, Your Honor.
If the bailiff will hand me the verdict.
I'll ask the jury at this time to stand and face the defendant.
The defendant will face the jury.
The jury foreman will now read the verdict.
We the jury...
...find the defendant...
...Byron De La Beckwith, guilty as charged.
-Quiet in this courtroom.
-Guilty.
Mrs. Evers, how did you feel when the verdict came in?
It's been a long journey.
Medgar, I've gone the last mile of the way.
I've gone the last mile of the way.
And all I want to say...
...is yea, Medgar!
bing Crosby:  I'm 
 dreaming 
 of a white 
 Christmas 
 just like the ones 
 I used to know 
 where the treetops 
 glisten 
 and children 
 listen 
 to hear 
 sleigh bells in the snow 
 I'm 
 dreaming 
 of a white 
 Christmas 
 with every Christmas card 
 I write 
 may your days 
 be merry 
 and bright 
 and may all your 
 christmases 
 be white  chorus:  I'm 
 dreaming 
 of a white 
 Christmas  men's chorus:
 just like the ones 
 I used to know  full chorus:
 where the treetops 
 glisten 
 and children 
 listen 
 to hear 
 sleigh bells in the snow  women's chorus:  I'm 
 dreaming of a white 
 Christmas 
 with every Christmas card 
 I write 
 may your days  women's chorus and bing Crosby:
 be merry 
 and bright  bing Crosby:
 and may all your 
 christmases 
 be white 
Do you prefer German or English?
English.
You are to write down your memoirs for the haifa institute for the documentation of war criminals.
You have 3 weeks to complete your memoirs before your trial begins.
Do you have any questions?
No. This is great.
Thanks for everything.
Man: You are the only man I know who has a bad conscience about the war.
Who is this?
Bernard liebman.
I have guard duty from 2:00 till 10:00.
Oh. I see.
Everyone else on either side is convinced he couldn't have acted in any other way.
How do you know I have a bad conscience?
The way you talk in your sleep.
I can tell something is troubling you.
What do you imagine is troubling me, Bernard liebman?
All I heard were a couple of names.
"Helga" was one.
Hmm.
"Hoess" was the other one.
I knew hoess.
He had no trouble sleeping.
Slept like a baby right up to the end.
You know this?
I guess so.
I helped hang him.
With your testimony?
No.
With my hands.
Did that give you lots of satisfaction?
My job was to strap his ankles.
I did a very good job.
Hmm.
I see.
Afterwards, I packed my bags to go home.
The catch on my suitcase was broken, so I buckled it shut with a big leather strap.
Twice, within one hour,
I did the very same job.
Once to hoess...
Once to my suitcase.
Both jobs felt about the same.
Yeah.
I, Howard w. Campbell Jr., am an American by birth, a Nazi by reputation, and a nationless person by inclination.
I am awaiting a fair trial for my war crimes by the state of Israel.
Howard: I was born in schenectady, New York, on February the 16th, 1904.
My father was raised in Tennessee, the son of a baptist minister.
He was a service engineer for general electric.
Because of his work, most of his reading consisted of trade journals and technical books.
There were a few notable exceptions.
Howard!
Howard: In 1919, when general electric relocated my father, we left schenectady and moved to Berlin, Germany.
By 1938,
I had become a successful playwright in the German language, and I had married the young, beautiful, and famous German actress
Helga noth.
When my parents left Germany, they asked me to return to the United States with them.
I didn't.
Helga: "My dear...
"Sweet Ava,
"this is the only way.
"I know how to make good the frightful wrong which has befallen us."
"It does not matter what lies ahead,
"for I have a full life behind me...
"all in those few...
Sweet hours with you."
"I once told you
"that I would pledge my life
"for our nation of 2...
"And reside there...
"Even in death...
"As surely as I reside in heaven when your arms are around me."
"Soon it will be time to keep that pledge,
"and I rejoice to think
"that earthly distractions will no longer intrude on my eternal devotion to you."
"From this moment forward..."
"Our nation of 2..."
"Is the only country
I've ever known."
Howard: As the insanity of the world descended on us, my Helga and I survived by pledging our undying loyalty to the only nation that made any sense to us.
It was called...
Das reich zu zwei... the nation of 2.
Heil Hitler!
Heil Hitler!
Heil Hitler!
Heil Hitler!
Heil Hitler!
Heil Hitler!
Heil Hitler!
Heil Hitler!
Heil Hitler!
Heil Hitler!
Heil Hitler!
Heil Hitler!
Howard: It was only one month after my parents returned to the United States,
3 years before America would enter the war, when I first met my blue fairy godmother.
Howard: I call him my blue fairy godmother because no one believes he existed but me.
But he really does exist, or at least he did on that Sunday afternoon so long ago in Berlin.
Nice-lookin' men.
I suppose. Ahem.
Do you speak English?
Yes.
Thank God.
I've been goin' crazy tryin' to find someone to talk to.
Ha ha.
Pardon me?
I'm sorry. You mind if I come over there so we don't have to holler?
As you please. Ahem.
"As you please," huh?
That sounds like something an englishman would say.
You English, are ya?
Ho ho. No. I'm American.
That a fact?
Any of my beeswax what you do for a living?
Writer.
No kiddin'?
Well, there's a coincidence,
'cause I was just sittin' over there wishin' I could write,
'cause I thought up one hell of a story.
There's this American, see?
And he's been livin' in Germany so long he's practically a German himself.
He writes plays in German.
He's married to a beautiful German actress.
He knows a lot of big-shot Nazis who like to hang around theater people.
Ha ha ha.
Who are you?
Oh, wait a minute.
This gets better.
So this fella knows there's a war comin'.
He figures America's gonna be on one side,
Germany's gonna be on the other.
So this American, who's been nothin' but polite to the Nazis up to now, decides to pretend he's a Nazi himself, and he stays on in Germany once the war comes and gets to be a very useful American spy.
Ha.
I asked, "who are you?"
I'm sorry. I'm sorry.
I got so carried away I just...
Here you go.
That's me.
Mm.
Oh.
Ahem.
So, Mr. Campbell, what'd you think of my little story?
What did I think of it?
Oh, I don't think much of it.
I mean, it's, uh...
Highly implausible.
It's ridiculous.
Oh, that's ok, 'cause...
Today isn't when you give me your final answer, anyway.
Final answer?
Look, if you imagine that I'm gonna go home and think this over, you're mistaken.
I'm gonna sleep like a log.
I'm not a political man.
I'm just not.
I'm an artist.
If a war comes, it's just gonna have to get along without me.
Well, I wish ya all the luck in the world, Howard.
The worse this Nazi thing gets, the less anyone's gonna sleep like a log.
Well, I don't know, maybe.
We'll see.
That's right. We'll see.
That's why I don't expect your final answer today.
If you go through with this, it'll be strictly on your own.
Working your way up with the
Nazis as high as you can go.
To do this right, you'll have to commit nothing less than high treason.
Even if you do live through the war without being caught, your government will never acknowledge your role as an agent.
We couldn't afford the security breach.
You come lookin' for a pardon, they'll deny they ever heard of ya.
You'll be left hung out to dry.
Ha.
You make it sound so attractive.
Oh, I have a feeling
I've made it sound very attractive to you, Howard.
I've seen your plays.
Really?
And what did you learn from them?
You're obsessed with the notion of pure hearts and heroism.
You love good, and you hate evil.
And you'd sacrifice anything in the name of romance.
I'll be in touch.
Howard: It was every playwright's secret dream... to create the most challenging role I could imagine and then play the part myself.
Man: Cue theme music.
Howard: "Good afternoon, ladies and gentlemen.
"This is
Howard w. Campbell Jr.,
"the last free American,
"speaking to you from Berlin, Germany,
"the heart of the free world.
"There is a fine article
"in the current reader's digest
"entitled,
"there are no atheists in foxholes.
"Well, today, I would like to expand on this theme a little
"and tell you that even though this is a war
"inspired by the Jews,
"a war that only the Jews can profit from,
"you will find
"there are no Jews in foxholes, either.
Every g.I. Joe knows..."
Howard narrating:
Every Sunday afternoon, wherever my voice could be heard, people stopped whatever they were doing just to hear what I'd say next.
Even Berlin's chief of police and his family were devoted listeners... and not just because they were my in-laws.
Howard on radio: "Now, to the American folks at home,
"I want you to think of all the Jews living in your neighborhood."
Howard narrating: It took me only a couple of hours to write each speech, after which I'd hand it over to the propaganda ministry for their notes.
Among those who examined it was another allied agent whose identity never was revealed to me.
"Do they have more or less gasoline?"
My speech would be returned with all sorts of notations, including those left by my fellow spy.
"...to these questions..."
These markings would dictate certain vocal mannerisms... pauses, emphases, coughs, stumbles, throat clearings.
"Now let me ask you this:
"Do you know...
"Of a single Jewish family
"that has ever received a telegram from Washington
"that begins... ahem...
"the secretary of war expresses his deep regret
"that your son was killed in defense of his country?
"Hmph. Of course not.
No Jewish family would ever receive such a telegram..."
"Thanks to a personal guarantee
"from the American dictator...
Franklin delano rosenfeld."
Howard narrating:
It was in this manner that I broadcast coded information out of Germany.
I don't know to this day what information went out through me.
"Why do you take arms
"against your German brothers?
"You know that
Germany's objectives
"are the same as your own.
"You must understand that the Jews...
"Can only thrive in a nation
"which lives in slavery.
"So, my brothers,
"lay down your arms.
"By fighting this war,
"you'll only fortify the bank accounts
"of your political leaders who blindly serve their Jewish masters."
"This has been
Howard w. Campbell Jr.,
"the last free American.
"Thank you for listening.
Heil Hitler."
You are a murderer.
You are a coward.
You are all cowards!
You are murdering children!
You should rot in hell!
Damn you! Phooey!
Aah! Aah!
Man: Howard just instinctively understands the German ideal of right and wrong, the certain triumph of good over evil, and the redemptive power of romance.
Ah, that is quite taken... just promise me one thing, that you will not leave the propaganda ministry and return to play writing full-time.
Little chance of that, herr goebbels.
I've always found it ironic that the man who so eloquently communicates our ideals to the masses should be born in America.
Well, it's...
It's not so ironic.
I've long considered myself a spiritual native of my adopted fatherland.
Something I've always wondered, herr Campbell, do you ever miss America?
Sometimes. Of course I do.
It's, um...
But I could never be happy with the Jews in charge of everything.
Goebbels: Jews. The Jews will be taken care of in due time.
Our friend hoess here is seeing to that at a little health resort he's running in Auschwitz.
My wife and I live for that day.
Is there a chance we might meet Mrs. Campbell?
Yes. Of course, herr hoess.
I'll ask Helga to join us, if you'll excuse me.
Goebbels: If that woman walked off a cliff,
I swear, Howard would follow her.
Howard: Time passed.
I never told my Helga
I was a spy.
To tell her would only put her in danger and make her live in constant fear.
So I hid my true self from her, knowing that politics had no place in our nation of 2.
I suppose the moral here is:
You must be careful what you pretend to be, because in the end, you are what you pretend to be.
Howard: History says the war ended in 1945.
In fact, it ended one year earlier.
My nation of 2 was the loser, insanity the Victor.
There were no prisoners.
No survivors.
Why would the Germans want to kill my Helga?
Man: Sir...
I said enemy guns.
The Russians.
It was Russian fire.
The Russians.
Oh.
It was tragic timing, sir.
The Russians fired on the crimean camp where she was entertaining troops.
Reich marshal goring will issue an official commendation for Mrs. Campbell's bravery.
I am sure she would be very proud.
Yes. Yes, of course.
Hmm.
Is there anything
I can do for you...
No, no, no.
Herr Campbell?
Please.
Good afternoon, ladies and gentlemen.
This is
Howard w. Campbell, Jr., the last free American, speaking to you from Berlin, Germany, the heart of the free world.
Radio: As you know, the bolshevik hordes continue their barbaric advance towards Berlin.
Let the Jewish leaders who are exalted by our temporary setbacks be warned that national socialism will never allow Germany to fall under the heels of the black beast who terrorizes our women and children.
As for my American brothers, you are fools if you believe your dictator.
Franklin delano rosenfeld is concerned with your welfare.
Ahem.
If you fail to heed the warning of your Aryan brothers, the fate that awaits you is the fate you deserve.
German victory is certain, for it is a moral victory.
The final blow will be struck by Adolf Hitler.
This has been
Howard w. Campbell, Jr., the last free American.
You may not hear from me for a while.
Thank you for listening.
Heil Hitler.
Howard...
Herr noth.
Interesting time to visit your in-laws.
If you wish to stay a while, perhaps you can help me greet the Russians when they arrive.
I'm going to the front.
Right over that way.
An easy walk from here.
You can make it in a day...
Picking buttercups as you go.
May I ask where you're moving to?
I'm staying here.
My wife is at my brother's home in cologne.
Resi will join her today.
But why stay here?
With the Russian army at my doorstep?
I'm still the chief of police.
I'll not have my people say that I fled with my tail between my legs.
Is there anything I can do?
Yes.
You can shoot resi's dog.
It can't make the trip, and I can't take care of it here, so you can shoot it.
Where is it?
In the music room with resi.
She knows it's to be shot.
You'll have no trouble with her.
All right.
You broke my heart when you married my daughter.
I wanted a German soldier for a son-in-law.
Yes. I know.
Because I hated you so much,
I studied you.
I listened to everything you said.
Never missed a broadcast.
Did you know that until this very moment nothing would have delighted me more than to prove you a spy...
To see you shot.
Now I couldn't care less if you are a spy.
Do you know why?
No.
Because now I know that even if you were a spy, you could never have served the enemy as well as you served us.
All the ideals that make me proud of being a Nazi, they came not from Hitler, not from goebbels, but from you.
You alone kept me from concluding that Germany had gone insane.
Resi...
Now, look how you've grown.
You are here to kill my dog, aren't you?
Ahem.
Yes.
But, resi, it's not something
I want to do very much.
That's all right.
I never liked it anyway.
I just felt sorry for it.
I'm going to the front.
I just came to say good-bye.
Which front?
The Russian.
You'll die, then?
Well, maybe not.
Everybody who isn't dead now will be dead soon, including me.
No, no, no, no, no, resi.
I'm sure you're going to be fine.
That's all right.
It won't hurt.
Suddenly I just won't be anymore.
Since we'll all be dead soon,
I might as well tell you something.
What is it?
I love you.
Oh, resi, that's very sweet.
No. I mean I really love you.
When Helga was alive and you two would come here, sometimes I envied her, and sometimes I hated her.
When she died, I dreamt that I would grow up and marry you and be a famous actress, and you'd write plays for me.
Hmm.
I see.
Resi...
I'm very honored.
That's all right.
It doesn't mean anything now.
Nothing means anything.
Go ahead and shoot the dog.
Howard: Resi was only half right.
From what I could gather, she was dead before long, but I went on living.
Had I actually traveled to the Russian front, surely I would have died as resi predicted.
Instead, I motorcycled around the German countryside thinking I could simply wait out the war.
My little respite ended
2 months later when I was captured by lieutenant Bernard b.
O'Hare of the American 3rd army.
I had said good morning to him in passing, and he recognized my voice from the radio broadcasts.
O'Hare seemed to take all those things I said rather personally.
Uhh!
After my capture the American army escorted me on a private tour of the Nazi death camp at oerdre.
They thought it would be interesting to see my reaction to the fruits of my labor.
Take a good look at your kraut friends, Campbell,
'cause you're next.
To me, they looked quite peaceful.
2 days later I was driven away by 2 American soldiers.
I couldn't quite tell if they knew who I was.
Well, Howard...
What did you think of that war?
Is that you, wirtanen?
I got to hand it to you... you lived through it.
A lot of people didn't, you know.
Yes.
Yes, I know. I know.
My wife... My wife, for instance.
Yeah. Sorry about that.
I found out about that a few days before you did.
You found out about it before me?
How did you find that out?
That was one of the pieces of information you broadcast that week.
I broadcast that...
That my wife had died?
I didn't even know it?
You knew she was dead and I didn't?
I... I would have liked to have mourned.
Well, what happens to me now?
You've already disappeared.
The 3rd army's been relieved of ya, there's no records to show that you were ever captured.
So, Howard, where do you want to go from here?
Oh, I don't know.
I don't suppose there's a hero's welcome waiting for me anywhere.
Hardly.
We can't exactly start bragging about all the clever tricks we pulled.
We might need them again for the next war.
No, your role will remain classified, and Uncle Sam's official position is that you're the scum of the earth.
Scum of the earth, huh?
What about my parents?
I'm sorry, Howard. They both died about 6 months ago.
Both?
Father first and your mother 2 days later.
Heart both times.
Oohh...
Uh, did anyone tell them what I was really doing?
Come on, Howard. What were we supposed to do, sacrifice our radio station in the heart of Berlin for the peace of mind of two old people?
Oh, no, no.
We wouldn't want that!
Well, how many people did know what I was really doing?
There were three of us.
Just three?
That's plenty. It's probably too many.
Three people knew me for what I really was?
Everyone else knew you for what you were, too.
Wait. How can you say that?
What are you thinking,
I'm a Nazi?
I wasn't a Nazi.
Well, let me ask you something, Howard... what would you have done if Germany had won the war, marched right up to your pal goebbels and surrendered, told him you were actually a patriotic American spy?
Yes, I might have! I might have marched right in there!
I might've escaped.
I don't know.
Oh, all right...
You want me to be a Nazi?
You go ahead.
Classify me as a Nazi.
You want to hang me?
You go ahead, you hang me if you think it'll raise morale.
I don't consider this life any great treasure.
Well, I just want you to know how little we can really do for you.
How little?
False identity, some cash, transportation to a new place...
Anywhere you'd like to go, Howard?
How 'bout New York?
You can lose yourself pretty easily.
There's plenty of work if you want it.
All right.
New York, then.
Of the three that knew I was a spy, who were the other two?
The second was general
Donovan of the o.S.S., and the third...
I'm sorry to say is dead.
You used to attack him every night on your broadcast.
You called him
Franklin delano rosenfeld.
He got a big kick out of that.
He used to listen to you every night.
Howard: At first I lived under a false name.
The idea was to start from scratch, lead a new life.
After a while, though, it became clear that I really had no life, so the alias became unnecessary, and I went back to using my own name.
No one ever asked whether I was the Howard w. Campbell, Jr.
All of my belongings, like myself, were war surplus, coming from recreation kits intended for troops overseas.
They even included phonograph records, so I became the proud owner of 26 copies of bing Crosby's white Christmas.
Bing Crosby:  ...Christmas 
 just like the ones 
I survived my purgatory in New York the same way I survived the hell of wartime Germany...
I let my emotions be stirred by only one thing... my love for Helga.
It remained the permanent axis about which my thoughts revolved.
To you, my love, to your beauty, and to my undying devotion.
To das reich... Zu zwei...
Nation of 2.
Mm...
It's very nice, isn't it?
It's very dry.
Just the way you like it, hmm?
Yes.
 And children listen 
 to hear 
 sleigh bells in the snow 
 I'm dreaming 
 of a white... 
 With every Christmas card I write... 
Dr. Epstein?
Yes.
I'm your neighbor from upstairs.
I've cut myself.
Well, you won't need stitches.
The blood often makes these things look worse than they really are.
Well, thank you, doctor.
I'm very grateful.
No problem.
I'm only sorry it took this to provide an introduction.
Yes.
Yes. No, you're right.
That's a very famous name you have.
Pardon me?
You never heard of
Howard w. Campbell, Jr., broadcasting from Berlin?
From Berlin...
Yes, I do remember now.
Um... It was a long time ago.
I never listened to him, but I remember he was in the news.
Those things fade.
Those things should fade.
That insane moment in history should be forgotten.
You know of Auschwitz?
Yes, yes, of course
I know of Auschwitz.
That is where I spent my young womanhood, and my son the doctor here, he spent his childhood.
Oh, well, I'm sorry.
Forget Auschwitz.
It doesn't do any good.
There.
No need for amputation.
Just keep it dry for a few days.
Well, thank you.
No problem.
I'll see you out.
Sprechen sie deutsch?
What?
Pardon me?
I asked if you spoke German.
Oh... No, no, no,
I'm afraid not.
Uh...
Auf wiedersehen.
Good-bye. That's good-bye, isn't it?
No.
It's "till we meet again."
Oh. Till we meet again.
Well...
Auf wiedersehen.
Yes.
Auf wiedersehen.
Man: Campbell?
Yes?
Campbell...
It's adolph eichmann.
I'm in the cell above you.
Yes. Eichmann, hello.
You're always typing in there, day and night and night and day.
Typing, typing, typing...
Is it bothering you?
No.
I'm a heavy sleeper.
I'm only curious.
Are you preparing your memoir?
Yes. A command performance for the haifa institute.
Ah. You're a lucky man.
I'm lucky?
How do you consider me lucky?
You can type.
I'm writing mine longhand.
Howard: One day I got the idea that a hobby might help pass the time in purgatory.
Ironically, in my solitude
I had created something that could only be used in concert with another human being.
Yeah.
George kraft?
Who is it?
I'm, uh, Howard Campbell, your neighbor from upstairs.
What do you want?
I want to know if you play chess.
I didn't know I had a painter living under me.
Where do you show your work?
I don't show my work.
Well, you should.
You been painting all your life?
Well, not really.
Uh...
My wife died 4 years ago, and I had the choice of either coming to greenwich village and becoming a painter or blowing my brains out, so I, uh, I flipped a coin, and here I am.
At least you had painting you could turn to.
What does that mean?
You mean you lost your wife, too?
Yeah. I see you in the hallway, and I say, "yes, this man, too, is a member of the brotherhood."
The brotherhood?
The brotherhood of the walking wounded.
It's the largest organization in the world.
You don't even know it exists until you're in it.
You get your membership card when you lose the one thing in the world that gives your life any meaning.
And the thing that bonds you together, the thing that holds the group in one piece is the fact that the members are absolutely incapable of speaking to one another.
Sorry. I...
Rattle on.
How'd you lose your wife?
I can't speak about it.
Well, of course you can't speak about it.
You're a member of the brotherhood.
Ha ha ha ha ha.
Howard: The day came that I told him everything.
It all spilled out of me.
You know, I knew the war was over and Germany was going to lose, and here I was an American spy...
My parents, my boyhood in Germany, about Helga and her nation of 2, my blue fairy godmother, the speeches, the code, my capture, and my banishment to purgatory.
I didn't have anything to live for.
I lost my wife.
I lost my nation of 2...
George kraft, my only living friend, took it all in stride.
But why doesn't the government come forward and say this man you're spitting on is a hero?
George...
Nobody spits on me.
Nobody even knows I'm alive.
Life continued unchanged...
For a while.
"Howard w. Campbell, Jr., a great writer and fearless American patriot
"now lives in poverty and in loneliness
"in a one-bedroom apartment
"at 61 bethune street in New York City.
"Such is the fate of thinking men brave enough to tell the truth
"about the conspiracy of international
Jewish bankers and communists
"who will not rest until the body of every American is hopelessly polluted with negro and/or oriental blood."
Maybe it was the lady downstairs...
Epstein's mother.
Why wouldn't she just call the authorities?
Why would she send my address to some racist newsletter?
Why don't you put pen to paper and set the record straight?
It's about time you started writing again anyway.
I'm afraid dead men don't write very well.
That's not true.
All the best writers are dead.
That's the most truthful thing you've said today.
Listen to me.
It's because while you're dead, you have nothing to lose.
You can be completely courageous.
Find yourself a woman, start writing again.
- A woman?
- A woman.
George, you better stop drinking or my portrait's gonna look like a Picasso.
Don't change the subject.
I'm not changing the subject.
Sit up.
I am sitting up.
All right, I tell you what.
You get a woman, then I'll get one.
I don't need a woman.
I'm on fire for my muse.
You, however, you're a mortal.
You need a woman.
I already got one.
No, you don't. Yes, I do.
Had a woman. Past tense.
She's dead.
I don't wanna talk about this.
I'm only telling you what you need to hear.
All right, look, you're gonna speak the truth... oh, God... did I hit a nerve?
No, you didn't hit a nerve.
Oh, I am so sorry.
I am perfectly fine.
No, don't be sorry.
Please, I... no, don't be humble, George.
I'm fine. I'm abject.
No, you're not abject.
I feel really...
Go ahead, talk.
I can't hear you.
God, I just... I just shoot my mouth off, and I... I don't know...
 Da da da da da da...  bleeah! Bleeah!
1, 2, 3, rest...
1, 2, 3, rest...
1, 2, 3, rest...
1, 2, 3, rest...
1, 2, 3, rest...
Who is it?
Howard w. Campbell, Jr.?
Who is it?
It's the reverend Dr. Lionel
Jones, d.D.S., d.D.
I presume you received our complimentary issue of the white Christian minuteman.
It's all right, Howard.
I'm with friends.
Howard w. Campbell.
What an honor.
I feel as if my whole life was leading up to this moment.
How do you do?
Please, allow me to introduce you to my bodyguard,
August krapptauer... weissbundesfuhrer emeritus of the German-American bund.
A great, great pleasure,
Mr. Campbell.
And my secretary, father Patrick keeley, former chaplain of the Detroit gun club.
Words fail me, herr Campbell.
Likewise, I'm sure.
Could we get some water?
Yeah. Of course, of course.
Uh, the climb up your stairs was quite an effort for our Mr. Krapptauer.
Might we, uh, bother you for a glass of water?
All right.
Come on in.
Oh, this is my good friend and neighbor,
George kraft.
How do you do?
Yours?
Uh, yes.
What a marvelous likeness of our Mr. Campbell.
You've done a masterful job capturing the jaw line.
Have you a background in dentistry?
Dentistry? No.
Well, as one who has devoted his life to dental medicine, allow me to say that you have perfectly duplicated.
Mr. Campbell's Aryan jaw line.
Oh, I'm thrilled that you noticed.
How could I miss it?
Are you familiar with my book,
Christ was not a Jew?
I...Could never find a copy.
Oh, that's too bad.
Father keeley, make a note that we must send Mr. Kraft an autographed copy.
In it, I reproduce 50 famous paintings of Christ and point out that not one of them shows Jewish jaws or teeth.
I don't know what to say.
Well, I had to publish the book myself, but what can you expect when the publishing industry is run by Jews?
Ahem.
Oh, of course. Forgive me.
I've been talking so much,
I almost forgot what brought us here.
What does bring you here, Jones?
A surprise for you,
Mr. Campbell, waiting downstairs.
Why don't you just tell me what this is about?
Forgive me, Mr. Campbell, but I have promised not to spoil the surprise.
Now, I give my word, if you're displeased, we'll take it away with us and leave you in peace.
Where is it?
At the bottom of the stairwell.
You can't miss it.
All right.
Want me to go with you?
No... I'll be right back.
Helga!
If there is no room in your life for me...
I will say good-bye, and I will never bother you again.
Helga...
No room in my life?
My life here is nothing but room for you.
Howard: My God, you're alive!
How can it be?
Oh, look at you.
You haven't changed.
Helga: There is so much to tell.
Yes. Helga...
I always knew you'd come back.
I always knew that.
I just didn't know...
When or how.
There's somebody
I want you to meet.
I want you to meet
George kraft. George?
George, this is Helga.
Hello, hello. Welcome.
I presume you weren't disappointed.
How did you do this?
How did you bring my wife back to me?
A subscriber in west
Germany wired me that Mrs. Campbell had just arrived as a refugee.
One day, I learn that you're alive, a month later, that your wife is alive.
What can I call a coincident like that but the hand of God?
Why don't we let them have a few minutes alone?
Yes, of course.
Our chauffeur will bring up Mrs. Campbell's bags.
No need, no need.
Fool! What are you doing?
I'm fine. I'm perfectly fine.
You're risking your life, exerting yourself like that.
It's an honor to risk my life for a man who served
Adolf Hitler as well as
Howard w. Campbell, Jr.
Ohh!
He's gone.
Maybe we should call an ambulance.
Yes, yes.
That's terrible, just terrible.
Keeley: Lord, dear lord...
Who's going to carry the torch now?
Excuse me.
Everything all right up here?
No, as a matter of fact.
August just died.
Oh, no. That's a shame.
Now that's a real shame.
Mr. Campbell,
Robert sterling Wilson, the black fuehrer of Harlem.
Howard Campbell.
I heard about you, but I ain't never listened to you.
That's all right.
Yes. We was on different sides.
See, I was on the side of the colored folks...
I was with the Japanese.
I hear you say you didn't think colored folks was so good.
Now, now, Robert, let's not squabble amongst ourselves.
Let's all work to pull together.
Now, I'm just tellin' him like I tell you and the reverend every mornin', colored people gonna have a hydrogen bomb all they own, and pretty soon, they gonna give Japan the honor of droppin' the first one.
Where?
China, I guess.
On other colored people?
Now, who ever told you a chinaman was colored?
Helga: Gunther, father, and resi...
Are all dead.
Yes, yes, I... I know.
But I...
I am alive.
Helga... How?
Oh, I...
No, no, no. It's all right.
It doesn't matter.
Our life starts tonight.
We'll check into a hotel.
Tomorrow, we'll find a new place to live.
I found an old store that has our bed in it.
Do you remember our old bed?
Yes.
Ja.
We'll start again right where we left off... our nation of 2.
Das...
Das reich zu zwei.
Yes.
But...
We do not have to check into a hotel.
Helga...
It's been so long.
I'm no longer a young man.
Howard: She had been captured and raped in the crimea, and then shipped to the Ukraine and put to work on a labor gang.
Nobody told her the war was over.
After her repatriation, she was sent to dresden in east Germany and put to work in a cigarette factory.
Eventually, she escaped to west Berlin, and days later, she was flying back to my embrace.
All that mattered now was that our nation of 2 was whole again.
Hello.
Hello.
Welcome home.
Now, here... here it is.
Excuse us.
Here, Helga, right here.
Here's the bed.
Oh, it's locked.
Veteran's day.
Veteran's day! Damn it!
Oh! God damn it!
Howard, you have changed.
Oh, Helga, forgive me.
I'm sorry.
Yes, I've changed, but people should be changed by world wars.
Otherwise what are world wars for?
But maybe you have changed so much that you do not love me anymore.
No, no, Helga. How could you say that after last night, huh?
Really, we have not talked anything over.
But, Helga, what was there to talk about?
No words could change the way I feel.
Do you mean it?
Yes. Of course I mean it.
Nothing I could say could spoil it?
No, Helga, no.
Nothing you could ever say could spoil it.
Never, never.
I'm not Helga.
I'm resi... Her little sister.
What?
You said you loved me.
How could you do this to me?
I love you.
You love me? How could you love me?
You don't even know who I am!
When I got to west Berlin, they gave me papers to fill out:
Name, occupation, nearest living relative.
I had a choice.
I could stay resi noth, cigarette machine operator with no family anywhere, or I could be Helga noth, famous actress and wife of a brilliant, handsome playwright living in America... a man I love deeply.
Who should I have been?
Howard, for 10 years in that factory, the only thing that kept me alive were daydreams of being my sister Helga.
So resi disappeared.
I don't know what to say.
You picked a hell of a person to be.
That is who I am.
I am Helga.
You believed it.
Was I or was I not
Helga to you last night?
That's a hell of a question to ask a gentleman.
Am I entitled to an answer?
Howard...
Would you sometime write a play for me?
I don't think
I can write anymore.
Did Helga inspire you to write?
Not to write, but to write the way I wrote.
We used to say that
I wrote parts for her that let her play the quintessence of Helga.
I want you to do that for me one day.
The qu... the quintess... quintessence.
Quin... quin... qui... the quintessence of resi.
Resi. Mmm.
Maybe I will.
Howard: Resi was growing younger by the second.
Although she had bleached her hair white to appear older, it now spoke to me of peroxide and girls who run away to Hollywood.
Finally, I have a home.
It takes a heap and a million to make a house a home.
Who did that?
Who did what?
That.
Howard Campbell?
You know him?
No.
No? It's funny. You look just like him.
Don't that look like the gentleman you're with?
Well, let me see.
Uhh! Aah!
Howard!
Before the Jews put you in the zoo,
I'm gonna have a little fun with you myself.
You felt that one, huh?
That was for private
Irving Buchanan.
Is that you?
No. He was my best friend.
5 Miles in from Omaha beach, the Germans cut his nuts off and hung 'em from a telephone pole.
And this, this is for ansel brewer!
Ohh! No!
He got run over by a tiger tank in aachen.
And this is for Eddie mccarty!
He got hit in the head by a schmeizer in the ardennes.
And this, this is for... resi: No!
Helga...
Shh. Do not speak, liebling.
Where are we?
We are safe.
You have been asleep.
They will not find us here.
Who... who won't find us here?
The Jews, sweetheart.
What's on my chest?
You had your ribs taped up.
By whom?
The doctor who lives in your building.
Oh. Epstein.
Ja. That was him.
He was very nice.
I used his phone to call Dr. Jones, and he brought us here.
Well, nice to have friends.
Ja. Come in.
Wilson: How's he doin'?
He has just woken up.
How's your head?
Splitting.
You ought to take an aspirin.
Thanks for the advice.
Well, you see, most things in this world don't work, but aspirin do.
Resi, the newspapers.
Is it true the Israelis want to put me on trial?
Dr. Jones says the American government will not let you go, but the Jews will send men to kidnap you like they did herr eichmann.
It ain't like havin' a Jew here and a Jew there after you.
They got everything after you but the Jewish hydrogen bomb.
Heh heh heh.
What the hell was that?
That was your friend.
Jones?
No. George kraft.
What's George doing here?
He is coming with us.
We are all leaving the country.
Dr. Jones has made the arrangements.
Howard! Look who's up and around.
How do you feel?
I'd stand a better chance if it weren't for the racket you're making.
Oh, I'm sorry. I'm just killing a little time.
God, you scared me half to death, Howard.
I was worried sick about you.
Well, George, you know, it was bound to happen sooner or later.
Well, it's all for the best.
You'll see. You'll have a new identity, get a new place, new country.
You'll start writing again.
I might even be a better painter in Mexico.
Mexico?
Well, look who's back on his feet.
Well, I guess you can't keep a good man down.
That's the spirit.
Howard, Wednesday night is the weekly meeting of the iron guard of the white sons of the American constitution.
Father keeley and I want to stay to a memorial service for August krapptauer.
We thought that perhaps you, being krapptauer's mentor, might say a few words.
I've thought of a general theme, if that helps.
I'm sure I could use one.
I think the theme should be
"his truth goes marching on."
Hmm.
Hmm.
What can I possibly say to a bunch of junior storm troopers?
You know, I knew their fearless leader for all of 20 seconds before he dropped dead on my stairway.
You will find the right words.
You always do.
When we get to Mexico,
I'm going to write again.
Did I have something to do with this miracle?
Mm-hmm. Everything.
No.
Very little.
But some.
Yes.
It's a real miracle.
It's the talent you were born with.
No, no, no, no.
The real miracle...
Is your ability to raise the dead.
The love does that.
Yes, yes.
It raised me, too.
Today, the mayor admitted his embarrassment that a notorious war criminal had been living an anonymous life in New York for at least some of that time.
He also noted that neither he nor the United States government have any authority to hand Campbell over to the Israeli government for trial.
However, it all may be a moot point.
Howard w. Campbell has once again escaped without a trace.
This is Campbell's last known residence.
A modest apartment in greenwich village has been vandalized by locals, angered by Campbell's latest escape from justice.
The United States government has promised to make a full review of Campbell's citizenship status and find out why he was never brought to trial previously.
In the meantime, Israel has stepped up its demands for Campbell, encouraged by the idea that he may not be a citizen of the U.S.
That he may in fact be a citizen of nowhere at all.
We must never forget that a propagandist of Campbell's sort is every bit as much of a mass murderer as eichmann, himmler, and even Hitler.
How many millions of people lost their lives because of the lies he spread during the war?
We will find Campbell just as we found eichmann.
A man can't hide forever when his hands are covered with the blood of 6 million human beings.
Howard w. Campbell Jr.
Wanted to be here tonight to tell you of his long and fulfilling association with your fallen hero, but he's asked me to make this brief statement to you on his behalf.
"The truth of your leader
August krapptauer
"and those like him
"will be with mankind forever
"as long as there are men and women who listen to their guts instead of their minds."
And now for a special treat.
A subscriber to the white
Christian minuteman in Vermont has made us a loan of some very rare material, which I'm sure you'll find most inspiring.
Robert.
Campbell on film: Good evening, ladies and gentlemen.
This is Howard w. Campbell
Jr., the last free American.
Tonight, I would like to ask a common question.
Why are we enemies of the Jew?
The answer is simple.
The Jew is the cause and the beneficiary of our slavery.
He is made two halves off the fatherland.
The Jew has no interest in the solution of Germany's problems.
He can't have. He wants them to remain unsolved.
You see, he has a better trump in his hand when a nation lives in slavery than when it is free.
The Jew is the cause of our misery, and today he lives on our truths.
And that is why as nationalist socialists we are enemies of the Jew.
He has ruined our race, rotted our morals, corrupted our traditions, and broken our power.
As long as we are true to our Aryan heritage, he is a leper among us.
If we ignore our destiny, he will triumph over us and our future.
The Jew is the plastic demon of the fall of mankind.
He thrives in filth and garbage.
He spreads disease.
He steals our possessions and lusts after our women.
He pretends to be a friend of this victim, and before the unfortunate one knows it, his neck is broken.
We are Jew-haters because we are proud to be aryans.
It isn't true that we eat a
Jew with every breakfast, but it is true that the Jew is slowly eating away at our future.
That is going to change as surely as we are aryans, as surely as world supremacy is the birthright of the Aryan race.
This has been
Howard w. Campbell Jr., the last free American.
Thank you for listening.
Heil Hitler.
I gotta admit, Howard.
Act III had me on the edge of my seat.
A blue fairy godmother.
I was beginning to wonder if you really existed.
Oh, I exist all right.
I'm just retired, 8 years now.
Imagine my surprise when they called me out of retirement 2 months ago.
For me?
Why all this sudden interest in me?
That's what I was supposed to find out.
Well, you know, it's no mystery why the
Israelis would want me.
No, the mystery is why the Russians think you're such a fat prize.
The Russians?
What Russians?
Well, at least
2 in this country.
One is your friend colonel ilora poropov.
Poropov? No...
I'm sorry.
You know him as George kraft.
He's been operating in the U.S.
As a Russian spy since '35.
No. Heh heh.
George kraft's not a spy.
I mean...
G-George's told me about his wife, his... a wife in Indianapolis who died 4 years ago?
No such person.
He's got a wife, all right, still living in proskurov.
He just hasn't seen her for 25 years.
I don't imagine he's mentioned the
3 children or 9 grandchildren.
No, but... ah, kraft, he was... poropov.
Whatever. He was living in the building for 3 years.
I mean, he didn't introduce himself to me.
I went downstairs. I introduced myself to him.
From what I can tell, you weren't part of his original agenda, just sort of an unexpected perk.
Everything was nice and quiet until he sent an anonymous letter to your protege Dr. Jones telling him where you were.
Then the excrement really hit the air conditioner.
It was kraft?
If it makes you feel any better, he really is a painter.
I don't think much of his work, but what do I know about art?
Maybe it's ok.
Maybe that's the one thing you can't fake.
Maybe you're the exception to that, too.
What was kraft's plan for me?
Ahh.
Well...
When he tipped off Jones, he knew you'd become news again.
He figured he could get you out of the country easier than staying by your side.
Then you could be kidnapped with fewer international complications.
I see. Good.
Well...
You said there's
2 Russian spies.
Who's the other, Jones?
Nah. Jones is the one true friend you got.
Seems he's the only one with your best interests at heart.
Well, then who's the other?
No. Not resi.
No, God damn you!
Not resi!
God damn you!
Not resi!
Relax, Howard.
I'm only the messenger.
You're a goddamn liar!
I'm sure she had you thinking about your new life and how nice it was gonna be, but it wouldn't have gone that way.
When you got to the airport in Mexico city, there'd be a second plane waiting for you, and off you'd go on a one-way trip to moscow, all expenses paid.
What could the Russians possibly want with such a burned-out piece of world war ii surplus?
They can exhibit you as a prime example of the fascist war criminals that this country shelters.
They also hope you'll confess to all sorts of collusion between the Nazis and the Americans before and after the war.
Eichmann: Well...
I think that's a record.
Eichmann?
You've been typing for almost 15 hours straight.
Me, I've barely written
5 pages in as many days.
When do you eat?
I don't know.
Hmm.
I hear your trial starts in a couple of days.
Where's your lawyer?
He's trying to find the one person who will corroborate my defense.
So far I'm told he doesn't exist.
Listen, Campbell, can
I give you some advice?
Certainly.
Spend some time in the exercise yard or have them bring in a radio or television.
You've got to learn to relax.
It is important to learn how to relax.
That's how I got here.
Hey, eichmann, can I ask you a personal question?
Certainly.
Do you believe you're guilty of murdering 6 million Jews?
Absolutely not.
Oh, you were simply a soldier, were you, huh?
Taking order from higher-ups?
Is that right, eichmann, like any good soldier?
Campbell.
Yes?
About those 6 million...
Yes?
I don't need credit for all of them.
I'm sure I could spare you a few.
Howard, where were you?
We were worried about you, old boy.
You are cold.
Yeah. Well, I just stepped outside for some air.
Well, that was a bit of a risk, wasn't it?
Ah, it was a bit of a risk, but you know what Jones says.
"I'll sacrifice anything for the truth."
This is torture, having to stay in this cramped room for the fear of our lives.
How can people treat us like this?
Oh, I don't know, resi, but you know in spite of everything,
I still believe people are really good at heart.
Tomorrow we will start our new lives, and then you will be able to relax.
Oh, yes, to relax.
Ohh.
Ahh.
You know, I was thinking.
What? Tell me.
I was thinking that maybe
Mexico isn't what we want.
Well, we can just go right on from there.
Yeah. Maybe right at the Mexico city airport we could just get right on another jet.
On to, uh...
I don't know.
Caribbean. We'd go...
Moscow, maybe, huh?
Moscow?
That's a novel idea.
You don't like it?
I would have to think about it.
Oh.
Resi...
Resi...
I want you to think about it, too, ok?
Well, if you want to.
Yeah.
You know, the more
I think about it, you know, the better it sounds.
Well, what could you possibly find interesting about moscow?
Well, I don't know.
I'd like to visit an old friend.
You never told me you had a friend in moscow.
Gee, George, I guess it just never came up in a conversation.
What's his name?
Ahh.
Colonel ilora poropov.
Don't know him.
Don't know him, huh?
Well, it doesn't matter.
He's just a spy that's trying to get me to Mexico city so I can be kidnapped and flown to Russia to stand trial.
No, that is not... don't even think about it.
God, Howard, this is ridiculous.
Cowboys and Indians.
Yeah.
All right, George.
Howard, this is not who I am.
This is the way things are.
Nobody should know that better than you.
Yeah.
Yeah.
Sweetheart...
That dream.
Yeah.
About Mexico.
It was really true.
Oh.
Tomorrow we were all going to escape.
I-it was our mission to get you to moscow, but then I was not going to go through with it...
Because I love you.
Oh.
I told you I was not going to go through with it, did I not?
Yes, you did. She told me.
Yeah, and he agreed with me.
He came up with the dream of Mexico, where we would all get out of this trap together.
How did you find out?
American agents.
Ah.
They're gonna be raiding our happy little home any minute now.
Oh, that's unfortunate.
Well, then we must leave right now, liebling, while we still can.
No. It's too late, darling.
We're already surrounded.
Then we will fight them.
No. Resi, you don't understand.
I said we are surrounded.
Does that matter?
Yes. Of course that matters.
We... you mean, why don't
I die for love like a hero in a
Howard w. Campbell play?
Yeah.
Yeah. That is exactly what I mean.
Well...
Let us die together here and now.
No. Resi, you have a full life ahead of you.
No. I have a full life behind me, all in those few sweet hours with you.
All in those few sweet hours with me.
Sounds like a line I might have written as a young man.
No, it is a line you wrote as a young man.
Oh. Well...
Foolish young man.
Well, I adore that man.
Ohh.
Well, I'm sorry, resi.
I can't congratulate you on your taste in men.
You no longer...
You no longer believe that love is the only thing to live for?
Well...
No.
Then tell me what to live for.
Tell me anything.
It does not have to be love, anything at all.
I will live for that chair, or... or that picture on the wall, or that crack over... over there.
Just tell me.
Tell me what you live for, and I will live for that, too.
Resi, what I live for is...
I'm an old man.
I will show you what to live for.
I will show you a woman who dies for love.
No, resi.
No. No, my God.
Resi, no.
No, resi.
Oh, my God.
Resi.
No.
Resi.
Don't move a muscle.
Howard: The morning after the raid on Jones' basement
I was released, thanks, I suppose, to my blue fairy godmother.
I was deposited onto the streets of New York, restored to the mainstream of life.
I took several steps down the sidewalk, when something happened.
It was not guilt that froze me.
I had taught myself never to feel guilt.
It wasn't the fear of death.
I had taught myself to think of death as a friend.
It was not the thought of being unloved that froze me.
I had taught myself to do without love.
What froze me was the fact that
I had absolutely no reason to move in any direction.
Are you all right?
Yes.
Been standing there a long time.
Waiting for somebody?
No.
You lost?
No.
No.
Move on then, don't you think?
Yeah.
Yeah.
Epstein: Who is it?
It's Howard Campbell.
Could I come in?
You're going to have to tell me what this is about.
I want to go to Israel to stand trial.
What?
I want to be tried for my crimes against humanity.
What do you want from me?
I want to surrender to an auschwitzer.
Then find one who thinks of Auschwitz all the time.
Epstein: I know, but you want to bring him back.
Ain't nobody gonna bring back papa.
I know this. No one.
And don't speak yiddish.
We are in America now.
Woman: If you can't remember,
I will remember for both of us.
You still want revenge, is that it?
Yes.
Then go on with your plan, because it proves nothing.
Mr. Campbell...
I think I can help you.
Thank you.
Campbell.
Auf wiedersehen.
Yes.
Auf wiedersehen.
 Leichentrager Tor wache 
Howard: "Dear Howard,
"the discipline of a lifetime
"now collapses like the walls of Jericho.
"What is the tune that Joshua's trumpet plays?
"Is that the music of my conscience?
"I doubt it.
"I've done you no wrong.
"I think the music must be
"an old soldier's itch for just a little treason.
"If treason this letter raises...
Frank: "I hereby violate my direct and explicit orders,
"and I identify myself as the man you knew as Frank wirtanen.
"I affirm and will affirm under oath
"that I recruited you as an American agent
"and that you, at great personal sacrifice
"became one of the most effective agents of the second world war.
"If there must be a trial of Howard w. Campbell Jr.,
"let it be one hell of a contest,
"and may justice be served.
"Yours truly,
Frank."
Howard: May justice be served.
I like the sound of that.
They say that a hanging man hears glorious music.
I wonder what it sounds like.
Bing Crosby:
 ...Of a white Christmas 
 just like the ones
I used to know 
 where the treetops glisten 
 and children listen 
 to hear 
 sleigh bells in the snow 
 I'm dreaming 
 of a white Christmas  fading:  with every
Christmas card I write 
 may your days be merry and bright... 
[TITLE]
[AUTHOR]
[SOURCE]mm
[PRG]
[FILEPATH]
[DELAY]0
[CD TRACK]0
[COMMENT]
[END INFORMATION]
[SUBTITLE]
[COLF]&HFFFFFF,[STYLE]bd,[SIZE]22,[FONT]Arial
They'll fight a delaying action.
Twenty-five, thirty warriors, maybe.
Hundred women and children.
That's it.
The warriors will turn and fight.
-No avoiding that.[br]-No.
It'll give the women and children[br]time to take cover.
One thing for damn sure,[br]they already know we're here.
-Captain Ragsdale![br]-Sir.
Troopers on the flat, form a line!
Company!
-Mr. Ragsdale![br]-Sir!
Advance carbines.
Company! Advance carbines!
-Sound the march.[br]-Bugler!
The Chiricahua Apache[br]from the American Southwest...
...were the last of the great tribes[br]to defy the United States government...
...and its effort to impose[br]the reservation system.
The Army, under the command[br]of Brigadier General George Crook...
...was entrusted with the responsibility[br]of breaking this resistance.
His campaign ended the Chiricahua[br]strongholds below the Mexican border.
Brought to a conclusion the conflict...
...that had raged through the Southwest[br]for nearly two decades.
Tell old Nan and the others[br]we're not going to hurt them.
We're not going anywhere.
We don't want to fight.
We came here to bring you[br]to our reservation.
Tell your men that.
Nantan Lupan only wants peace[br]with the Chiricahua.
Live on the reservation.
Only one Chiricahua warrior[br]and his band of renegades held out.
Then, even he sent word that he would[br]give himself up in two months time.
He was called Goyakla.
But years before, the Mexicans[br]had given him another name:
Geronimo.
One month before my 22nd birthday...
...l reported for duty[br]in the Arizona territory.
It was my first post into garrison life.
In looking back, it is now clear to me[br]that I was as much a stranger to myself...
...as I was to the great western desert.
My name is Britton Davis.
I was a participant in what the Army[br]later called the Geronimo Campaign.
It is my wish to throw some light upon[br]the extraordinary events that I witnessed...
...and on the men that lived them.
The beginning of my life[br]as a frontier soldier was at hand...
...and no amount of military training[br]could disguise the excitement I felt.
-Howdy.[br]-Welcome. It's good to see an army fellow.
Whiskey?
No, thank you, sir.
You don't have to 'sir' me, son.
I ain't no officer.
-Looks like you are, though.[br]-Second Lieutenant Britton Davis.
-At your service.[br]-Proud to know you.
Where you from, Lieutenant?
Born in Texas, near Brownsville.
Texas? Why, hell, son,[br]I thought you was from back east!
Kind of got that manner about you.
Well, I been the last four years[br]at West Point.
-Senor.[br]-Yeah?
Soldados vienen.
My initial impression[br]of First Lieutenant Charles Gatewood...
...remains distinct in my memory.
His brusqueness was entirely military,[br]balanced by unfailing good manners.
In his most matter-of-fact way,[br]he gave me my first order...
...as an officer[br]of the United States Cavalry.
I was to accompany him south.
We were going to bring in Geronimo.
He's due in a few days.
We'Il go on down to the border[br]and escort him to San Carlos.
About 75 miles to the border[br]from here, Mr. Davis.
Plenty of time to get acquainted[br]with your new mount.
-Sir?[br]-Yes?
Just you and me?
The General figured that if we had[br]Geronimo we didn't need much protection.
Yes, sir.
A small detachment means[br]we're not threatening the hostiles.
You wouldn't want to pose a threat[br]to Geronimo, would you?
No, sir.
The Lieutenant was a man of confidence[br]and experience in the Apache wars.
In time I came to realise[br]he was much admired by his peers...
...much respected by his superiors.
That's the border, Mr. Davis.
-How will he find us?[br]-Easy. We're the only ones out here.
Lieutenant?
Apache medicine man.
Probably on a pilgrimage.
The Apaches, they believe in that power.[br]It's a kind of...
...spirit they carry inside them.
Sir, Geronimo's just going to come on in[br]and give himself up?
That's what he promised.
Chiricahua doesn't give his word much,[br]but when he does, he keeps it.
As long as you keep yours.
When the medicine man joined our camp,[br]I was filled with curiosity.
By personal inclination, Lieutenant[br]Gatewood kept his own counsel.
He met questions from an inexperienced[br]officer with patience and courtesy.
What fascinated me most...
...was his sympathy and knowledge[br]of all things pertaining to the Apache.
You don't talk to them much, do you?
To an Apache, stillness is a pleasure.
It's something they're taught[br]while they're young.
Helps someone who may have to[br]hide and wait.
What's he singing about?
Trying to locate Geronimo.
Says he'Il be here tomorrow.
On a white horse.
Superstitious, aren't they?
$5 says he rides in here on a white horse.
Just because the medicine man says so?
You've got a bet, Lieutenant.
Question?
These scouts that we have with us,[br]they're Apache.
Why would they work for the Army?[br]Fight their own kind?
There are lots of different Apache tribes[br]that don't much like each other.
Most of all,[br]Apache go where the best fight is.
It's a morality, once you understand it.
All right, l'Il see your $2...
...and l'Il raise you $1 .
Lieutenant, just curious:[br]are you a family man?
I have a son and a daughter.
They and my wife are back in Virginia.
-You must miss them.[br]-Every hour of every day.
Goyakla is coming.
Rides a white horse.
You owe me $5, Mr. Davis.
I heard you were wearing the blue coat.
I did not believe it.
Now I know your heart.
First Lieutenant Charles P. Gatewood.
It is good to see the great warrior.
You speak pretty good Apache.
Second Lieutenant Britton Davis,[br]Sixth Cavalry.
You are now under the protection[br]of the United States Army.
We will escort you[br]to General Crook at San Carlos.
Nantan Lupan waits for you[br]with an open heart.
They are something.
Chiricahua are special.
Even amongst the Apache.
The second night of our trek to San Carlos,[br]we put up at the Overland way station...
...at the foot of the Dragoon Mountains.
The following morning[br]I had my first opportunity to write home...
...being careful to include in the letter[br]an offhand reference to my participation...
...in the capture of Geronimo.
Two men are coming.[br]Man with white hat carries shotgun.
I'm looking for the officer in charge.
Lieutenant Charles Gatewood[br]at your service.
Heard the Army was travelling through[br]with hostiles.
Especially one hostile in particular.
City Marshal Joe Hawkins, Tombstone.
Apaches over yonder are under arrest.
I'm deputizing you to hold[br]these criminals until we get back...
...with a posse and a warrant.
These Apache are in our custody.
The warrant's going to specify[br]murder of white citizens...
...horse thievery and hostile lndianism.[br]Now, is that good enough for you?
We want to do what's right,[br]which is hang them.
I have orders to turn these Apache in[br]to General Crook.
The United States Army[br]doesn't need your help.
Lieutenant....
Don't sass me, blue coat.
Great Geronimo.
I think you're nothing[br]but a murdering red bastard.
I'd ride on if I were you, sir.
You seem to have provoked the hostiles.
And I don't think you want to get[br]into a contest with the Sixth Cavalry.
Let me tell you something.
Even the Sixth Cavalry is subject[br]to a Federal warrant.
Justice will be served...
...one way or the other.
Toothy.
Get the Apaches going, Mr. Davis.
Now.
Sir.
We moved north with all possible speed...
...but our pack mules prevented us[br]from making good progress.
Around 4:00 in the afternoon,[br]we caught sight of the Tombstone Posse.
Faced with the potential enemy[br]that possessed superior numbers...
...Lieutenant Gatewood hit upon[br]an unusual tactic.
He divided his forces.
He sent me ahead with the others,[br]while he and Geronimo remained behind.
The lieutenant had two objectives.
First, to attempt[br]a rear-guard protective action.
Second, and most important,[br]never to lose sight of Geronimo.
Easy, steady!
What you seeing, Davy?
Looks like some of them split off.
Six or seven of them headed[br]to San Carlos...
...other two up yonder.
That's more of a lynch mob than a posse.
But if they serve those warrants,[br]l'm going to have to give you up.
You have a good long glass, Gatewood.
If I scare them off...
...we trade.
I can't let you kill any of those men.
That was a great shot.
Not so great, I aimed for his head.
We best catch up to Mr. Davis[br]and the others now.
This your name?
Gatewood?
Yes.
A gift from my troops.
They must think you're a fine chief.
No.
Not a chief, just a soldier.
Your glass much better than mine.
Blue stone is valuable to Apache.
Well, thank you.
The following afternoon,[br]we arrived at the military base...
...of operations at San Carlos.
This afforded me my first glimpse[br]of General Crook...
...who the Apache called Nantan Lupan,[br]Grey Wolf Chief.
Our arrival was laid out[br]with great military ceremony.
The surrender of Geronimo[br]was no small event.
General.
My compliments, Lieutenant.
Nantan Lupan.
It does my heart good[br]to see you, Geronimo.
I accept your surrender.
I accept the surrender of a great warrior.
Now, let's have a cup of coffee[br]and smoke a cigar.
Got a lot to talk about.
It's old Geronimo.
Good to see you, ain't it?
You know my friend, AI Sieber.
Yeah. I was always hoping[br]to catch up to you myself, but...
...l guess l'Il never get that chance now.
-Mr. Sieber.[br]-Lieutenant.
I see you have your cigar and coffee.
Lieutenant Gatewood told me[br]of your trip up from the border.
Sounds like quite a story.
I'm glad to see that Geronimo's[br]a man of his word.
Washington's ordered me[br]to detain you here for a short period...
...and then send you and your band[br]of Chiricahua on to Turkey Creek.
We keep our rifles for hunting.
Yes, but only on the reservation.
I'Il put one of my officers in charge there.
Gatewood.
No, l'm sorry, Lieutenant Gatewood[br]is a company officer.
He has his responsibilities here.
Then we take Davis.
I like Davis.
I'm sure Mr. Davis will be a fine officer...
...but I had somebody[br]more experienced in mind.
I like Davis.
-What do you think, Lieutenant?[br]-I'm sure it will be his privilege...
...as well as his duty.
Mr. Davis, it is.
To be accompanied[br]by a small detachment of soldiers.
The Apache will be under the protection[br]of the United States Army.
Mr. Davis is young.
Young Apache, young White-Eye,[br]the hope of the West.
Gatewood.
You come visit me.
I would like that.
I hope the wars are over, my friend.
Nantan Lupan wants the Chiricahua[br]to learn to be farmers.
It's their only chance.
They must change.
The old days are gone.
Nantan Lupan says there must be[br]no leaving this reservation...
...even for a few hours without permission.
There must be no drinking[br]of whiskey or Tizwin.
Any violations of these rules...
...will result in confinement in an Army[br]prison stockade.
He want to know why these rules.
Why they be punished?
What you care if Apache drink?[br]Soldier drink.
Nantan Lupan says[br]if Apache drink, Apache fight.
Apache get into trouble.
It's bad for everyone.
It's bad for the Apache,[br]it's bad for soldiers...
...bad for all the White-Eyes.
Say, why, if some Apache do bad things,[br]all are punished?
That will not happen.
All Apache should not be punished[br]for the mistakes of only a few.
We will determine who is responsible[br]and only those few will be punished.
Six weeks after I took up residence[br]at Turkey Creek, Lieutenant Gatewood...
...and AI Sieber came to visit.
Sieber, as Chief of Scouts, was in charge[br]of recruiting Apache for the Army.
Hello there, Mangas.[br]Just the fellow I want to see.
I want you to join the Army, all right?
Wolves with blue coats,[br]scouts to help us fight the renegades.
You'Il be a sergeant, wear a blue coat,[br]stripes on your coat, with Army pay.
I don't know, Sieber.
Well, you are a warrior. You hunt men.
You'Il make your woman,[br]make your children proud of you.
Mexicans, they took my wife, my little boy.
Maybe the Army could help get them back.
I think maybe I stay here.
If I was asking you out on a raiding party,[br]I expect you'd be a lot more willing.
Federal government had forced[br]over 500 Chiricahua...
...to take up residence[br]within Turkey Creek's narrow borders.
Corn was the main crop, but the land[br]was not fertile enough to be self-sufficient.
The Chiricahua became dependent on[br]government supplies for their well-being.
Gatewood. You come to visit me.
Makes my heart glad to see Geronimo.
How's the life of a farmer?
Some Apaches are good farmer.
Others miss the old way.
I'm not good farmer, Gatewood.
I have come here to visit my friend...
...but I have some questions[br]I need to ask you.
There are rumours that a medicine man[br]is speaking against the White-Eye.
That he is calling for a return[br]to the war trail.
It was told by a medicine man...
...many more Apache would die[br]fighting White-Eye.
And in the end...
...we will win because we will die[br]free of them.
Is the only way for an Apache to be free...
...to die?
Well, which medicine man is this?[br]I should talk to him.
Find out what he's saying.
There are many.
Some have the power.
Some just talk.
He's a warrior.
Every bit born in battle.
Fighting a lost cause.
I'm familiar with the type.
My two older brothers and my father[br]fought for the Army of Northern Virginia.
My oldest brother was killed.
My father was wounded, crippled.
After the war, he took me aside and said,[br]'You'Il carry the new flag.'
Sent me off to the Academy.
First of my family[br]north of the Mason-Dixon line.
So, like our friend,[br]I know what it's like to hate the blue coat.
Before the White-Eye came[br]we had a good life.
Now we are forced to stay[br]on this tiny piece of land.
The White-Eye do not understand[br]the way of the Apache.
The medicine man at Cibecue[br]is called the Dreamer.
He says the dead chiefs will rise.
He says the Apache[br]are the true keepers of the land.
I will go to him.
I want to hear his words.
Today while Gatewood talked with me,[br]I looked into my power.
I saw a white horse running.
I saw signs of war.
Nothing so concentrated[br]the bureaucratic mind...
...in dealing with the lndians as rumours[br]of a troublesome medicine man.
When a religious leader[br]showed up among the tribes...
...preaching doctrines perceived to be[br]dangerous, the government policy...
...was to have the Army[br]deal with it immediately.
I am here by order of General Crook.
Nantan Lupan.
The dead chiefs[br]will not rise if you are here.
The White-Eye must leave.[br]I pray this will happen.
This dance is a demonstration[br]hostile to the citizens of the United States.
And this demonstration[br]is unlawfully assembled.
I order you to stop at this instant!
Stop that!
Stop him! Arrest him!
Watch it!
You didn't have to shoot him, goddamn it![br]I can handle this myself!
-What's he got there?[br]-He had a rock!
He has not done nothing!
We're not bothering no one!
You leave here!
You leave us alone!
Arrest him! Arrest Geronimo!
Where is your heart?
Arrest Geronimo! Arrest him!
-David never really--[br]-General Crook. Telegram, sir.
Pardon me.
Get a staff officer to me immediately.
Captain Ragsdale. Now!
General?
Geronimo's jumped Turkey Creek.
The Apache are out.
It all blew up at Cibecue.
Whole damn thing is a shambles.
Geronimo has taken[br]half of the reservation with him.
Men, women and children.
Spread the word.[br]All officers to their commands.
Yes, sir.
Geronimo had quickly divided[br]his forces into small bands...
...each headed for Mexico.
By the day after Cibecue,[br]Crook had five columns in the field.
The Geronimo Campaign had begun.
On the point!
Circle back!
Sir?
Yes, I see them, Mr. Davis.
Steady in the rank.
Go slow.
Beg your pardon, sir.
Do we attack?
Hold the column.
Sergeant!
Steady in the rank!
Steady!
-Sergeant.[br]-Column halt!
Whatever happens,[br]the Apache will take off.
Don't let the column pursue at speed.
Whenever you can,[br]you choose your ground to fight on.
Chato?
What the hell is going on?
Raiding party, split off from Goyakla.
Apache challenge Gatewood[br]to come out and fight.
Want to show off power[br]to other Chiricahua.
Chato.
Is there anything that should be done?
Geronimo's band had gone east[br]into the copper mining country...
...of the low hills.
His tactics were resupply[br]at the expense of the civilians...
...who had settled on Chiricahua land.
This is Apache land.
This has always been Apache land!
We ain't never done nothing to you.[br]I mean, it ain't right.
Stop crying, damn it!
He's going to kill you anyway.
We make things out of this country!
There was nothing here before us,[br]there'd be nothing if we left it to you.
You are a fool...
...but at least you are brave.
Get off Apache land.
The next time, I will kill you.
Detail halt!
-Troops, right, straight![br]-Left, right, face.
'The Apache known as[br]Dandy Jim and Skip-Hey...
'...have been found guilty by the[br]Military Court, Department of Arizona...
'...of insurrection at Cibecue Creek.
'The Apache Dead Shot...
'...Sergeant, Military Scouts,[br]Sixth Cavalry...
'...been found guilty of treason.
'The sentence of the court[br]for the three prisoners...
'...is death by hanging.'
Do any of you have anything[br]to say to me as Chaplain?
Are any of you Christians?
Nantan Lupan...
...l give you my hat.
Maybe you think my wife, my baby.
Don't trust the White-Eye.
With them there is no right way.
I am not afraid of their preacher.
The One God will welcome me.
There's three of them.
The driver should be nearby.
They didn't have to kill them[br]just to get their horses.
No, they didn't.
AI Sieber had had his wound[br]from Cibecue cauterised with a hot poker...
...and was back in the saddle[br]the following day.
All told, he had suffered[br]17 gunshot and arrow wounds...
...in his many years of fighting Apache.
The General wants to deploy me[br]and Dutchy to your column.
How's that wound, Mr. Sieber?
Which one?
Down here, here, here, here?
Hell, l'm in real good.[br]Ain't slowing me down none.
We came across an overland.[br]Four dead, horses gone.
If they've burned[br]two spreads off to the west...
...they've picked up horses,[br]food, a lot of ammunition.
I figure l'Il just keep tracking off[br]to those hills there.
All right.
Mr. Davis, you and Sergeant Mulrey[br]stick with Mr. Sieber.
Be sure that he gets back[br]to the column by sundown.
Yes, sir.
That raiding party is real close.
Yup.
I want you to ride for the column.
Bring them back to pick up this trail.
On the double, pronto, go on,[br]get out of here!
You take him!
The hostile Apache that Dutchy and I[br]had been pursuing had gotten away.
Needless to say, at the time,[br]I was humiliated.
But much later I decided the incident[br]had come out for the best.
I'm quite content to go to my grave[br]knowing that l've never killed an Apache.
You all right, Mr. Sieber?
Caught up with three bucks[br]and some stolen ponies.
Gave one of them to Mr. Davis.[br]Seems he got away.
Sergeant Mulrey,[br]check the area for a dead hostile!
Sir!
Now, we crossing to Mexico tomorrow?
That's right.
We ought to send some[br]of the scouts back.
I don't trust them south of the border.
Geronimo's got a few of them spooked.[br]They're wondering...
...if they're on the wrong side.
I don't think so, Mr. Sieber.
Besides, we need every scout we have.
Yes, sir.
I guess you weren't there then,[br]when Dead Shot and the others...
...turned on us at Cibecue.
If I had been at Cibecue,[br]they wouldn't have turned.
Whole thing wouldn't have happened, Al.
I know you don't like me much[br]and I don't really care.
I know l'm rough in some of my ways,[br]I guess.
I ain't the gentleman type.
But, I think...
...compared to you, I am somewhat honest.
No offence intended, Lieutenant.[br]Speaking off the record, sir.
I just figure you're a real sad case.
You don't love who you're fighting for...
...and you don't hate[br]who you're fighting against.
Perhaps I could learn to hate[br]with the proper vigour from you, Al.
Well, maybe you could, Lieutenant.
Though I never managed to become[br]a close friend of AI Sieber...
...in the next few weeks of campaigning,[br]I did learn to get along with him.
Only a fool would fail[br]to profit from his vast experience.
In his own way,[br]he was as taken by the Apache...
...as was Lieutenant Gatewood.
Well, sir...
...your Apache rides a horse to death[br]and eats him and steals another.
I mean, the horse is just mobile food.
I've chased them when they made[br]50 miles a day on horse and foot.
Hell, they can live on cactus,[br]go 48 hours without water.
I mean, one week of that would kill[br]your average trooper.
I hear you can track[br]as good as any Apache.
That's right, but there's only one of me[br]and 1,000 square miles of Apache country.
General Crook figured that out, 'cause[br]it takes an Apache to catch an Apache.
White-Eyes can't catch them alone, no sir.
If you ever fight an Apache and things[br]go bad, save the last bullet for yourself.
You don't want to get taken alive, no sir.
They got lots of ways to kill you.
One of their favourites is to strip you,[br]tie you upside down to a wagon wheel.
They pour pitch on you, light you on fire.
I know you are angry about this war.
The White-Eye...
...gave me no choice.
I ask your blessing.
You ask my blessing[br]after this thing is done.
What I did is right.
Now we are fighting[br]Mexicans and White-Eye.
The reservation is bad,[br]but at least we can stay alive.
We have fought the Mexicans for years...
...and the White-Eye will never catch us.
Many Apache will die.[br]I must send for Nantan Lupan.
We will talk with him.[br]I ask that you do this.
General Crook and a small detachment[br]of Apache scouts...
...came across the border[br]into the Canyon de los Embudos.
Crook had agreed to negotiate terms,[br]but he intended a hard bargain.
For the rest of his life, he never forgave[br]Geronimo forjumping Turkey Creek.
Crook maintained his sympathy[br]for the Apache...
...but between he and Geronimo[br]all trust had vanished.
There is one God looking down on us all.
We are all children of one God.
I didn't come here to listen to religion.
You broke your word.
You left Turkey Creek.
You killed many White-Eye.[br]You come back.
Washington wants you to go to Florida.
You do it or l'Il come back[br]with my army and fight.
Nantan Lupan does not understand.
The White-Eye try to change Apache way.
The Apache were doing fine farming corn.
The problem was Geronimo.
I knew Cochise, he was a king.
He was a wise ruler of his people.
I knew Vittorio, he was a proud leader.
And I know Geronimo.
He doesn't want to lead or rule or be wise.
He just wants to fight.
I didn't start this trouble.
The Army killed the Dreamer.
He was calling for war.
If the medicine man had come in[br]peaceably, he'd be alive.
There's no excuse for taking up arms[br]against the United States Army.
The Army's the best friend[br]the Chiricahua ever had.
You know it and I know it.
With all this land,[br]why is there no room for the Apache?
Why does the White-Eye want all land?
How long in Florida?
Maybe two years, with your families.
I think I can get that.
That's not a bad deal.
A lot of White-Eyes want to see[br]Geronimo hanged for murder.
Not murder.
War.
Many bad things happen in war.
How many White-Eye did you kill[br]since you left Turkey Creek?
Maybe 50.
Maybe more.[br]How many Apaches do you kill?
You killed women and children.
So did you.
We gain nothing by fighting.
We can live on the reservation.
I go there.
You, Nantan Lupan...
...are like a brother to me.
Many of my people want to surrender.
When I was young...
...the White-Eye came[br]and wanted the land of my people.
When their soldiers burnt our villages,[br]we moved to the mountains.
When they took our food...
...we ate thorns.
When they killed our children...
...we had more.
We killed all White-Eye that we could.
We starved and we killed...
...but in our hearts...
...we never surrendered.
C.S. Fly, a photographer from Tombstone...
...requested permission[br]to accompany General Crook to Mexico...
...and record the negotiations.
Much to everyone's surprise, Crook agreed.
Even more surprising, Geronimo[br]and the other Chiricahua also agreed.
In some mysterious way, they seemed[br]to understand these pictures...
...would make them immortal.
They are the only known photos[br]ever taken of the American lndian...
...as an enemy in the field.
Old Nana and his people... will return to Turkey Creek.
Many of his people are too old to fight.
Nantan Lupan[br]will make all of you a prisoner.
We have to trust him.
There is no other way.
I called him my brother.
Go if you must. I have made my decision.
I will not surrender to the White-Eye.
I will stay with you and fight.
But now we will be very few.
'Thereby I tender my resignation[br]as commander of this department.
'I have served you well in the past, but my[br]judgment has been called into question.
'Without doubt, I made an error[br]in trusting the word of Geronimo...
'...that he would surrender.
'Perhaps others will be more correct[br]or more fortunate.
'The real tragedy[br]I know you do not understand:
'That is, to the Apache people.
'They have lost in me a true friend...
'...and they have few.
'George Crook,[br]Brigadier General, United States Army.'
I was forced to send this[br]to Washington a day ago.
They've accepted my resignation...
...with regrets.
General Nelson Miles will replace me.
There's nothing to be done, General?
Nothing.
Graceful retirement for a general[br]who could not catch Geronimo.
Settlers, prospectors,[br]land speculators, they won't admit it...
...but the truth is they'd all like to see[br]the lndian dead.
They see the Army as their weapon.
The Army that fight the Apache is[br]the only hope of keeping the Apache alive.
Only the Army can protect them.
Yes, sir.
I fought them a long time, General...
...and I figure if I was one of them,[br]l'd be standing next to Geronimo...
...shooting at the blue coats.
But God made me who I am[br]and between them or us...
...l figure it's us.
Well, damn it, Al.[br]Is that the only way we could win?
Well, I can't answer that question.[br]I'm just a hired hand.
I just want to say,[br]I didn't always agree with you...
...but you had my respect.
And while you was in charge...
...the Army was a proper piece of work.
Sir.
So, l'm going to quit this damn fool job.[br]I'm going to go on down to Tucson and...
...l'm going to get drunk.
Take it easy, Al.
Yes, sir.
Al.
General Miles brought with him[br]an entirely new staff of line officers.
Lieutenant Gatewood,[br]myself and many others...
...had to taste the humiliation[br]of being dismissed from the field.
I'm honoured to be here[br]with you men of the Sixth Cavalry.
Honoured to be here by the order[br]of the President of the United States.
We are charged with bringing in[br]the renegade Apache, Geronimo.
We will accomplish this task.[br]We will succeed.
But we're abandoning[br]certain practices of the past:
Over reliance on Apache scouts.
Men of divided loyalties.
I will keep troops in the field[br]until the enemy is fully subjugated...
...fully pacified.
There will be no compromise[br]with the honour of our nation.
There will be no compromise[br]with the honour of the United States Army.
Captain.
As he had promised,[br]General Miles sent troops forward...
...without the Apache scouts.
For the next five months,[br]they relentlessly searched...
...but the results were predictable.
Geronimo and his tiny band of Chiricahua...
...had vanished deep[br]into the mountains of Mexico.
It seemed they were chasing a spirit[br]more than a man.
Lieutenant.
I doubt if you're enjoying[br]your current assignment.
Nothing personal,[br]I understand you're a fine officer.
Do you know why[br]I called you here, Gatewood?
No, sir.
Tomorrow a new policy change[br]will be announced.
As punishment for Geronimo's resistance.
All Chiricahua living on reservation land[br]are to be rounded up and sent to Florida.
They will stay there[br]until Geronimo is captured or killed.
That's a harsh penalty[br]that he's drawn on his own people.
I hear you and Geronimo were friendly.
Any relationship l've had has never[br]compromised my effectiveness in the field.
I need you to speak freely with me.
Can you find Geronimo, talk to him?
I thought so once.
There's no way to be sure now.
The signs are that he's starving,[br]or close to it.
Living on cactus and rabbits.
I know this because l've got[br]observation points...
...and 5,000 troops[br]stretched from here to Sonora...
...searching for--
Thirty-five Apache, sir.
That's what I believe he'Il be down to[br]in a month's time.
Thirty-five starving Apache.
Begging the General's pardon, sir,[br]but why not leave him to the Mexicans?
He can't continue to keep raiding[br]across the border.
He can't afford to lose any more warriors,[br]can't replace them.
The present political situation[br]demands results.
I want you to find Geronimo[br]and make him this proposal.
I have the authority to hunt him[br]all the way to South America if I have to...
...but I want this nonsense to end.
Now, l'm willing to give you[br]all the scouts you need...
...hundred-man detail, regular cavalry,[br]mule pack team.
A hundred men won't do.
How many do you want?
Three.
I'd like to pick them myself.
Whatever happens, Lieutenant...
...this conversation that you and I[br]are having never took place.
Any negotiations with Geronimo[br]are to be strictly confidential.
Is that understood?
Two years in Florida.
Two years in Florida, with their families.
And when they return to reservation land[br]here in Arizona territory...
...every warrior gets 40 acres of land...
...two mules.
I don't think you or the government[br]intend to keep this promise.
You just offer it.[br]None of the rest is your concern.
Do you know your scripture, sir?
'What does it profit a man[br]to gain the whole world...
'...and lose his soul?'
Lieutenant.
You have your orders.
Lieutenant Gatewood chose the Apache[br]scout, Chato, to accompany him...
...as well as myself and AI Sieber,[br]who became bored with his retirement.
After four weeks of tracking Geronimo[br]through the mountains of Sonora...
...we came across a burning lndian village.
What we found there was unspeakable.
There's two dead women there.
Two little kids.
Scalped them all, all four of them.
Bounty hunters.
Government down here pays[br]200 pesos a head for the men.
100 for the women...
...and 50 for those kids.
Kill any lndian, then claim they're Apache.
I don't see how any man can sink that low.
Must be Texans,[br]lowest form of white man there is.
Who are these people?
They are Yaqui, not Apache.
The dying Yaqui told me[br]five White-Eye and a Comanche...
They attacked before dawn.
Most of the men got away.
They go up into the hills...
...and come back one day, maybe two.
And come back for their families.
And build big fire and burn the bodies.
And they go join up[br]with other Yaqui tribe...
...maybe find new wives.
They go off that way into the hills.
After they hunt Yaqui men[br]they go to Soyapos...
...get their money.
You and Sieber, I want you to track[br]the bounty hunters that did this.
Geronimo is here.
You want me to ride? l'm ready--
You need more rest...
The women have gathered medicine.
Do we leave at dawn?
Don't worry.
We will not fight tomorrow.
Sleep.
I have just seen my power.[br]An iron horse comes over the desert.
I have seen a vision.[br]An iron horse for the Apache.
Been down here...
...almost 20 years.
I was in the war.
Confederate officer.
After the hostilities ended...
...l went to Texas.
Got into a little scrape with the law.
Come down here, got a new name.
New start.
Wife.
Family.
But in my heart...
...well, hell...
...l'm still a Tennessee man.
My wife and her sisters...
...they trade with Apache women.
They come down from the mountains.
They've done it for years.
Few days back,[br]some Chiricahua showed up near here.
Where?
Straight up Montana Avarripe.
I didn't expect to see[br]many Americans down here.
-Where you fellows from?[br]-Texas.
I keep a house in Brewster county.
Awful far from home, ain't you?
Well, we just came down here[br]to try to make ourselves a living.
And what about you, friend?
It seems like you've got[br]a real curious nature.
-You the law?[br]-Me? Hell, no.
I'm just hunting[br]that son of a bitch Geronimo.
Thought you might've come across[br]something to help me out.
I'm sorry, amigo.
We ain't seen nothing.
Apache!
Why don't you sit down there,[br]while we have us a drink.
We'Il take real good care of you.
Cover my back.
Anything happens, fire.
And keep firing.
Sir.
That Apache is with us.
Don't look like it to me.
He's a Sergeant of Scouts...
...in the United States Army.
Who the hell are you?
Charles Gatewood.
Lieutenant, Sixth Cavalry.
You boys are out of uniform.
Maybe he ought to wear one.
Somebody down here[br]take that scalp of his...
...make themselves a little money.
Ten days ago,[br]we came across a Yaqui village.
All the lndians slaughtered.
We come across[br]the same type of thing a while back.
I tell you, this is a crazy country.
...buys that scalp back.
Nice doing business with you,[br]Mr. Gatewood.
But...
...l changed my mind.
You rotten son of a bitch.
Amigo.
Move it, Dixie boy.
Goddamn.
I never thought l'd get killed[br]trying to help save an Apache.
We got them, Mr. Sieber.
We got them all.
I've been gun-shot, arrow-shot 17 times.
Twenty years chasing old Geronimo.
I'd love nothing better[br]than being there to...
...finish.
You don't have to[br]account yourself to me, Al.
You're a brave man.
I never did have no kind of luck.
Never did.
I'm going to catch me[br]a little sleep here for...
...a minute or two.
Rotten sons of bitches.
Gatewood!
No more burro!
Can't go higher!
Chato and l...
...are going on here alone.
You stay with the supplies.
Sir.
Are you giving me a choice?
That's an order, Lieutenant.
I know it's hard to come this far then stop,[br]and l'm sorry.
But somebody's got to go back[br]and tell the truth.
Britton...
...you're a fine officer.
Stay noble.
We're trying to make a country here.
It's hard.
Why did you bring him?
He is an enemy to his people!
He thinks you are.
He is a brave man to come here.[br]Enough Chiricahua are dead.
They are dead[br]because the White-Eye killed them.
Have they taught you to lie, Gatewood?
I don't lie.
But the truth is, General Miles[br]will hunt you for 50 years.
He's already sent your families to Florida,[br]which is far, far away.
Look around.
See how few warriors you have left.
If I kill White-Eyes forever...
...l am still Geronimo, an Apache.
Who are you, Gatewood?
Just a man like you.
And I want to go home.
I want to see my family.
My God....
My God is a God of peace.
A God of life, not death.
What does your God say?
Yosin is not here with us on the mountain.
Tell me, what is in your heart?
The war is over.
I offer this...
...because it has power for me.
Our fight must end here.
When I was young, I took a wife.
We lived in these mountains.
We have our family.
The Mexican soldiers came[br]and they killed her.
They killed her and my two little girls.
They killed them because we are Apache.
I remember when I found their bodies.
I stood until much time had passed,[br]not knowing what to do.
I had no weapon...
...but I did not want to fight.
I did not pray.
I did not do anything.
I had no purpose left.
After a year had passed...
...my power showed me[br]how to get revenge.
And always, since then, I get revenge.
But no matter how many I kill...
...l could not bring back my family.
Yosin...
...the Apache God, is a God of peace.
I gave you the blue stone.
You give me this.
It will be peace.
On September 4, 1886...
...Geronimo and 34 Chiricahua men,[br]women and children...
...surrendered to General Nelson Miles.
As he handed over his weapons,[br]Geronimo simply said:
'Once I moved about like the wind.[br]Now I surrender and that is all. '
He refused any further conversation[br]with the General.
After arranging Geronimo's[br]final surrender...
...Lieutenant Gatewood was transferred[br]to a remote garrison in Northern Wyoming.
His continued presence would have been[br]an embarrassing reminder...
...that the United States Army had failed[br]to defeat a band of 35 Apache.
Instead of being rewarded with a medal[br]for his heroic efforts...
...Lieutenant Charles Gatewood[br]was sentenced to obscurity.
Sir, formation is ready.
Attention!
-Prepare to mount![br]-Present arms!
Mount!
Detail, arms, halt!
'By order of the office[br]of the President of the United States...
'...all Chiricahua scouts are under arrest...
'...and will be transported[br]to Fort Marion Prison...
'...Saint Augustine, Florida...
'...with the outlaw Apaches,[br]led by Goyakla, known as Geronimo!
'The Apache scouts[br]from the White Mountain...
'...Coyotero and Mescalero tribes[br]are to return at once...
'...to their reservations.
'They will remain within these boundaries[br]unless given express permission to travel.
'Their duties for the United States Army[br]are at an end.
'We thank them for their services.'
Detail!
Collect arms!
I'm a good Apache, it's not right.
I'm Sergeant Chato, a scout.
Later that afternoon,[br]Geronimo, his band of renegades...
...and all the Chiricahua[br]that had served the Army so faithfully...
...were loaded into wagons and transported[br]to the railhead at Holbrook.
There, they were to begin theirjourney[br]to Florida and imprisonment.
Halt!
Morning report, sir.
Mr. Glenville, l'd like to see the General.
On what business?
It's about Mr. Gatewood.
Sir.
I thought the US Army kept its word.
I thought maybe[br]we were the only ones left who did.
What's going on out there is a disgrace.
Lieutenant.
You're more worried[br]about keeping your word to a savage...
...than you are fulfilling your duties[br]to the citizens of this country.
We won. That's what matters.
It's over, Lieutenant.
Geronimo, the Apache, the whole history[br]of the West, except being a farmer.
Mr. Gatewood wouldn't want me[br]to be a part of any of this.
I hate an idealist.
There's always something messy[br]about them.
I'm ashamed.
And you have my resignation.
To the disappointment[br]of family and friends...
...l had ended my military career.
Over the years, the events[br]surrounding the Geronimo Campaign...
...have continued to haunt me.
I carry the memory of those days...
...days of bravery and cruelty...
...of heroism and deceit.
And I am still faced with[br]an undeniable truth:
A way of life that endured[br]a thousand years was gone.
This desert...
...this land that we look out on...
...would never be the same.
You were right to fight the White-Eye.
Everything they said to me was a lie.
You helped them...
I will hate you forever.
There are so few of us left...
We should not hate each other.
She has the coughing sickness.
She will die soon.
Maybe the baby, too.
No one knows why the One God[br]let the White-Eye take our land.
Why did there have to be[br]so many of them?
Why did they have so many guns,[br]so many horses?
For many years,[br]the One God made me a warrior.
No gun, no bullets, could ever kill me.
That was my power...
Now my time is over.
Now, maybe, the time[br]of our people is over.
Geronimo lived for another 22 years...
...as a prisoner of war.
Despite its promise...
...the federal government[br]never let him return home.
Hello, sir.
Taxi or a fly, sir?
I don't think we ought to make too hasty a decision, do you?
I believe I'll take... that one.
- I'm dropping.
- The kettle's on.
We're fending for ourselves this weekend.
The servants are off till Monday.
Oh, dear.
- We put you in the front bedroom.
- There's a fire in the sitting room.
- I'll get you a cup of tea.
- Please.
- I brought you my ration cards.
- Thanks.
Yes?
Who on earth is that ravishing boy?
I take it you're not referring to either of my sons.
No.
Him.
Good God.
- Someone I want you to meet.
- Coming.
This is Lytton Strachey.
Hello.
I'll fetch the tea.
So you're Carrington.
- Mark Gertler's friend.
- I know him.
They'll be bringing in conscription in a matter of weeks.
We'll all be dragged in front of some appalling tribunal.
We'll have to be conscientious objectors.
I'd rather go to prison.
Or down the mines. It would be warmer.
You'd meet a much nicer class of person, I'm sure.
Ottoline says she'll be able to help.
There must be some compensation for having friends in high places.
- Don't you like Ottoline?
- I'm devoted to Ottoline.
She's like the Eiffel Tower.
She's very silly, but she affords excellent views.
Do you think knitting scarves for the troops... would be classified as essential war work?
One's so busy nowadays.
I've been learning German as well.
I must say it's a most disagreeable language.
Then why learn it?
My dear, I mean, suppose they win?
Ye gods!
Can you imagine what the war must be like?
As Vanessa and Clive are both having affairs with cousins of mine...
I can't help thinking theirs is a peculiarly civilized marriage.
Do you really like to be called Carrington?
- Why?
- My first name is Dora.
I see.
Can you hear them?
- What?
- The guns.
I have three brothers over there.
I can't tell you how angry it makes me feel.
- I'd have joined up if I'd been a man.
- Surely you don't believe...
Of course not! Of course I don't believe in it, but I'd still have joined up.
I wish I'd been born a boy.
You have such lovely ears.
Don't! Stop it! Would you mind not?
Sorry.
- Have you brought my breakfast?
- No, I haven't.
I was going to cut your beard off.
- Why?
- To punish you.
I see.
Don't you still want to punish me?
I don't.
That's enough!
- Why?
- I'll have to go soon anyway.
Why don't you stay the night?
- Look, let's not go through all this again.
- I'm only asking.
It makes me think that you're only interested in me sexually.
God, you make me so angry!
Of course I'm interested in you sexually.
Doesn't mean I'm only interested in you sexually! I can get that anywhere!
I'm interested in you!
In your opinions, what you think of me!
Naturally, I'm interested in you sexually also.
What do you expect?
I asked you to marry me!
I know, Mark, but...
I'd understand if you thought I was ugly.
You wouldn't like me, and you say you do.
Of course I do!
Then.
It's you I like.
Not your body.
Is that what I am, my body?
Good night.
You can't expect to stay a virgin all your life!
What's the matter?
I was just thinking... about that disgusting old man with the beard.
I really shouldn't brood about it if I were you.
After all, he is a bugger.
- What?
- Lytton.
He's a bugger.
- I never know what that means.
- He's a homosexual.
Call Mr. Strachey.
Giles Lytton Strachey!
- Mr. Strachey?
- No. Phillip Morrell.
MP for Burnley.
I believe Mr. Strachey is marshaling his documents.
Mr. Strachey....
One moment.
I'm a martyr to the piles.
You are a writer by profession.
Is that correct?
It is. I am.
Now, according to this report from the advisory committee... you've made a statement to the effect that you have a conscientious objection... to taking part in the war.
- Did you make such a statement?
- Yes.
Are we to understand that you have a conscientious objection to all wars?
Not at all. Only this one.
Then would you care to tell us what you would do... if you saw a German soldier raping your sister?
I believe I should attempt to come between them.
I will not assist by any deliberate action of mine in carrying on this war.
My objection is based not upon religious belief... but upon moral considerations.
I will not act against those convictions, whatever the consequences may be.
After all that, the prospect of jail seems positively soothing.
They'll never send you to jail, too many of them went to school with you.
I only hope you're right.
Any luck with the famous Carrington conundrum?
It's only ignorance, fear and ignorance.
As it's been going on for four years,
I'm at my wits' end.
It's no use asking my opinion.
When it comes to a creature with a cunt,
I'm always infinitely desorient.
All the same, I've decided if anyone can help me, you can.
I? How?
I don't know exactly.
I just mean, if you'd just... be with her a little.
A man like you.... She has no older friends, you see. She's bound to learn.
Keats' letters, of course, are very poignant on the subject of virginity.
- And my work.
- What?
Take this, for example.
This is a radical painting.
This is my statement on the soulless mechanisms of war.
She won't understand that.
The harmonies, for example.
I mean, they're like Bach.
Don't you agree?
But the critics. I mean, surely the papers are full of nothing but Gertler nowadays.
That's no good to her.
Someone must explain to her, someone that she respects... that I'm an important artist.
- And you think if she realizes that...
- I'm sure of it.
"To begin with,
I'm still compelled at my advanced age...
"to live in my mother's house, because I'm more or less sans le sou.
"You probably think of me as a man of letters?
"All I've ever managed to publish...
"is a few reviews and a slim volume of criticism.
"Can't write half the things I want to write.
"If I did, I wouldn't dare publish them for fear of killing my mother.
"Furthermore, I now find myself, despite my great age and notorious health...
"being harassed by the government to go off...
"and take part in some ridiculous war they seem quite unable to grasp...
"is resulting in large numbers of people dying.
"So I'm now reduced to the degrading task of writing pamphlets...
"for the no-conscription fellowship, which may very possibly land me in prison.
"In other words, I'm obscure, decrepit...
"terrified, ill-favored, penniless, and fond of adjectives."
Surely it's not that bad.
No, you're quite right.
Looked at another way...
I'm a perfectly respectable elderly bugger of modest means.
I suppose you ought to be going soon before it gets dark.
No, I adore the blackout.
The most thrilling encounters.
You mustn't deny us our few simple pleasures.
We've not much else to look forward to except old age.
Dear God, can you imagine it?
The rain, the loneliness, the regret.
No, I can't imagine it.
You just wait till it's staring you in the face.
How old are you anyway?
I'm 36 next birthday.
Ottoline's invited me up to Garsington next weekend.
Me, too.
I'll go if you'll go.
Last time I was there, everyone was either deaf or French.
How is the campaign proceeding?
- Campaign?
- The Carrington matter.
I take it you're still working on her.
Really, Ottoline.
Must you put things quite so boldly?
I prefer to think of myself as an educator, rather than as a....
What?
- As a pimp.
- Now, don't be silly.
You know as well as I do it's a sickness with Carrington.
A girl of that age still a virgin.
It's absurd.
I was still a virgin at her age.
But that's my whole point.
Don't you see? So was I.
Is there to be no progress?
Now I must have a serious talk with you before Mark arrives.
I know how difficult it is, my dear... to reconcile puritanism with a love of beauty.
It's a consideration that's never far from my thoughts when I'm in Burnley.
I mean, take this garden for example.
Surely it wouldn't be right to plant nothing but cabbages and cauliflowers.
Or do you think it's wicked and wanton of us to love the bastard tulip... or the Turk's-head lily?
Of course not.
One can't have it all ways.
Remember that.
And I firmly believe it's high time you took the bull by the horns.
We can't always live under glass like a cucumber.
We have to engage with life.
There you are.
I was hoping to find an opportunity to talk to you in private before Mark's arrival.
And then, would you believe it?
Pipsey harangued me for half an hour on the perils of virginity.
He got more and more breathy, and the hairs in his nostrils... became horribly agitated.
Finally he told me it was someone like me had driven his brother Hugh to suicide.
Semen.
What is it about that ridiculous white secretion... that pulls down the corners of an Englishman's mouth?
You see, I'm not against it in theory.
It's just the thought of Mark somehow.
I can't, of course, agree with you, but there we are.
I love being with you.
You're so cold and wise.
These last few months, whenever I know
I'll see you, I get so excited inside.
If you were to kiss me again,
I don't think I'd mind at all.
You know, it's a strange thing, but I'd rather like to.
Your skin is like ivory.
That day I came in, you remember... to cut your beard off, I knew then.
I don't think this is what Mark had in mind at all.
- He's not to know.
- I can't help feeling rather shifty.
What I knew was, was that I was in love with you.
I heard from the military doctors' board this morning.
They've rejected me.
"Medically unfit for any kind of service."
- That's wonderful.
- Wonderful for me.
Thousands of boys are dying every day to preserve this.
Did you know?
Goddamn, blast, confound and fuck the upper classes.
Let's see if we can't avoid all this, shall we?
Go and read some Rimbaud.
You're the lady.
I'm the Jew-boy from the East End.
That's it, isn't it?
Of course not.
- I don't know why you don't admit it.
- Because it's not true!
You don't understand. I need my freedom.
Freedom.
How can you have freedom when you're frightened to use your own body?
You must have patience.
What do you mean patience?
It is killing me, all this.
- It is killing me.
- I'm sorry.
Think how much your body's deteriorated in the past four years.
All that time, just wasted.
- Keats' letters...
- Don't talk to me about Keats' letters!
What the hell use is Keats to me?
I have a suggestion.
What?
I'm planning a couple of weeks' holiday in Wales.
Why don't I take her with me?
I've been teaching her French.
We're about to get to the French poets.
I have a feeling they may prove decisive.
I've come to the sad conclusion... there's no such thing as a beautiful Welsh boy.
At any rate, I've seen nothing but the most unparalleled frumps.
Wouldn't it be lovely to live in the country? I'm sick of towns.
Perhaps we should set up house together.
Do you really mean that?
Yes, I did.
I don't think so.
Probably just as well anyway.
I couldn't afford it.
I see.
Look, I'm sorry. I tend to be rather impulsive in these matters.
Like the time
I asked Virginia Woolf to marry me.
- She turned you down?
- No, she accepted. It was ghastly.
And if I'd accepted,
I suppose that would have been ghastly.
I don't think it would.
What's that you're taking?
Dr. Gregory's rhubarb pills.
I find them sovereign.
One bed is warmer than two.
Anything you like.
Anything.
It's all very well.
It doesn't matter. Really, it doesn't.
Mark's borrowed Dilbert Cannon's place at Cholesbury.
He wants me to spend a few days with him.
Then you must go.
I'm not sure I want to.
Then you mustn't go.
Can't you see? I'm asking you to help me.
My dear, as we both know,
I'm supposed to be bringing you together.
But in these matters above all...
you must make your own decisions.
- Ready?
- It's too big.
I can't get it in. I've tried, but I can't.
Don't come in!
What you said about us living together in the country....
Did you really mean it?
Yes.
Yes. But 1 a week,
I don't see how I can manage it.
Our own Roman bath. Look.
Most hygienic.
And this will be your room.
- An electric light in every room. Look.
- Yes. That is a blessing.
Now, don't worry.
By the time I've finished with it, you won't recognize it.
Are you going to live with him?
I just felt I had to tell him
I was in love with him.
- What did he say?
- He said he was sorry.
Is that all?
It's not his fault. What else could he say?
Good God.
I never want to see you again.
So would you mind if I left you directly after dinner?
No.
No.
I've always said life was a crooked business.
To think, after all these years... to fall in love with a man like Strachey, twice your age!
I thought I'd better tell Mark because it was so difficult going on.
- Tell him what?
- That it couldn't go on.
So I told him...
I was in love with you.
Aren't you being rather romantic?
Are you certain?
There's nothing romantic about it.
- What did Mark say?
- He was terribly upset.
It's all too incongruous.
I'm so old and diseased.
I mean, I wish I was more able.
It doesn't matter.
What do you think we ought to do about the physical?
I don't mind about that.
- But you should.
- All this is quite deliberate, you know.
I wish I was rich.
- Then I'd keep you as my mistress.
- What difference would that make?
Will you stay?
Won't you spoil me? Just this once?
Tonight?
I come bearing gifts.
- Globes!
- Looted from Mother's.
What a hero!
If I were bigger,
I'd carry you over the threshold.
Well done.
Don't go in there.
The pipes seized up. Then they burst.
- Good God.
- Come upstairs.
It's remarkable.
It seems that Eminent Victorians... is about to be burst upon an astonished world.
- That's marvelously good.
- And not before time.
Chatto and Windus claim to find it enchanting.
It's not absolutely the adjective I had in mind.
My God!
Come on!
You're living with him.
How could you lie to me like that?
Did you think I wouldn't find out?
I didn't want to hurt you.
Do you know, when I found out... just thinking about you and that half-dead eunuch... that I vomited all night?
You have poisoned my life.
Haven't you any self-respect?
Not much.
But he's just a disgusting pervert!
You always have to put up with something.
It's very bright tonight.
Do you think there will be a raid?
Have you managed it yet? Have you?
Get off!
I'll kill him!
- Get off me!
- That was all rather thrilling.
I'll kill him!
Anything more cinematographic could scarcely be imagined.
Rex Partridge, the young man I was telling you about...
is coming down to see us on Friday.
After the war, he plans to sail a schooner...
to the Mediterranean islands and trade in wine...
and dress like a brigand.
- You mean that you enjoy it?
- No, it's not that I enjoy it.
Of course not.
It does seem a good deal more real over there.
It's a relief to get out of range of those bolsheviks and malingerers... who always are complaining about subjects... they don't know the first thing about.
- If you mean conscientious objectors.
- I do. That's exactly what I mean.
Only I call them skulkers.
A lot of them are prepared to suffer for their beliefs, you know.
- Bertie Russell's in jail.
- Best place for him, I daresay.
Anyway, he's better off there than in the trenches, isn't he?
- That's not the point.
- Of course it is.
What are you supposed to do if you're a pacifist? What?
What would you suggest?
What would I suggest?
I'd suggest they were put up against a wall and shot.
That's what I'd suggest.
I'm so sorry.
- What for?
- I thought you'd like him.
- What do you mean?
- I'm sorry he was so awful.
But I thought he was wonderful.
"Thanks to the brilliancy of his style,
Eminent Victorians is a fascinating book."
I suppose this is what's meant by the phrase, "To wake up famous."
Chatto say the book is selling so well, they're forced to consider a reprint.
That's bad luck, isn't it?
There.
I can't claim it was my intention to destroy Victorian values... but if that's what I've done,
I'm not in the least sorry.
It seems I am in distinct danger of becoming a man of means.
Terrible review by Gosse.
There.
I can't tell you what a relief it is to be denounced at last.
It hasn't been easy remaining calm... in the face of hysterical praise from the Daily Telegraph.
The curse of it all is...
I can't see how to get out of writing another book, can you?
I don't know why you're so good to me.
It's a constant mystery.
That's how I feel.
You must always remember that.
I'm your pen wiper.
I know it was an obscene and ridiculous war... but I suppose it's quite convenient to have won.
Now we shall see some real progress.
We're on the threshold of a golden age.
You know, given the circumstances...
I really think we ought to dance.
Very well.
I wish he'd worn his pullover.
To look at him you wouldn't think he could have written that book.
Why not?
I read it the other day, couldn't see what all the fuss was about.
"Cardinal: 'I'll leave you.'
Ferdinand: 'Nay, I have done.
"'I am confident, had I been damned in hell and should have heard of this...
"'...it would have put me into a cold sweat.
"'In, in, I'll go sleep.
"'Till I know who leaps, my sister,
I'll not stir.
"'That known,
I'll find scorpions to string my whips...
"'...and fix her in a general eclipse.'
Exeunt."
I've been meaning to tell you,
I can't say I really approve of Rex.
- What do you mean?
- As a name.
That's not my real name.
My real name is Reginald.
Myself, I'm very much in favor of Ralph.
Ralph Partridge.
Sounds very fine, don't you agree?
What's the matter?
Don't know.
I seem to be in rather a flux.
It's really not fair.
Why aren't I a rowing blue with eyes to match?
It's all very well, but his conversation is so dull.
He's like a Norwegian dentist.
I suppose your privileges give you the right to judge.
I don't know what the world's coming to.
Women in love with buggers... and buggers in love with womanizers.
And what of the price of coal?
Do you think your major would stay more often... if you had a more comfortable bed?
The bed's all right.
Let me put it another way.
I wish he would stay more often.
When you go up to London....
Who do you see?
Nobody you know.
Yes, but who?
I like to keep a bit of privacy in my life, you know?
If you're going to cross-examine me all the time... that seems very much like jealousy, and I don't believe in that.
If you don't believe in it... why should you mind telling me who you see when you go to London?
B ut will I like him?
Gerald? I don't see why not.
As long as you don't frighten him.
- I can't imagine what you mean.
- He's shy.
I used to take him to the brothel in Amiens.
He always used to wait downstairs or slope off to look at the cathedral.
You must be Gerald Brenan.
Rex, that is to say,
Ralph tells me you're a bolshevik.
He tells me you're an idealist.
I'm going to look for a house in Spain.
- Why?
- To educate myself.
Unlikely reason.
I'm too old to go to university now.
I must do something to repair my ignorance.
So I'm eloping with 2,000 books.
Why Spain?
- Because it's hot and cheap.
- True.
- And the women are beautiful.
- Sounds worse and worse.
Oh, my God.
Here. Help me.
You mustn't believe everything Ralph tells you about me.
- Why do you say that?
- He invents everyone he meets.
You must have noticed.
He gives them a character and a set of opinions so he can argue with them.
I suppose you're right.
I don't mean to attack Ralph.
He's my closest friend.
But he lives entirely by his instincts, and I can't do that.
I wish I could.
Isn't going off to live in Spain following your instincts?
Not really.
I'd say it was very calculated.
It has to be.
You mean money?
I'm told you can rent a house there for 5 a year.
Whereabouts in Spain are you going?
I've no idea.
I have a map.
- I hope you'll write to me.
- Of course. I'll write to both of you.
Separately.
How do you spell "intangible"?
I-n-t-a-n-g-i-b-I-e.
Never mind.
Won't you be just some glorified typesetter?
- No, and that's not really the point, is it?
- What is the point?
The point is, I shall have to live in London.
And I want Carrington to come with me.
I see.
We'll come back every weekend... and the servants will look after you during the week.
It's not the same.
- I shall miss you terribly.
- It won't be so very different.
All your gallivanting, you know yourself you're only here about half the time.
Except when you're working.
Then it will be an advantage to be on your own.
Suppose she doesn't agree?
Then I think it would be best for me to make a complete break.
My darling, I don't think
I could face that.
Why do you think I moved away from London in the first place?
- I hate London.
- That's rather a selfish attitude.
- I can't just abandon Lytton.
- He doesn't quite see it in that light.
What do you mean?
There are times when I feel like a character in a farce by Molire.
Le Bougre Mari.
I do wish you weren't quite so single-minded, dearest.
I mean, I have tried.
I can't help it.
Women's bodies I find somehow subtly offensive.
Or reproachful, would it be?
- Lytton said a strange thing last night.
- What?
He told me he thought women's bodies were disgusting.
- Can I come in?
- Of course.
Two indispensable items you've forgotten.
These.
Very handy for boy watching in Italy.
And....
You are wonderful. You think of everything. I shall give you a kiss.
What am I going to do?
He's very determined, my dear.
He tells me if you don't marry him, he's resolved to go and live abroad.
If only I wasn't so plural.
Especially when people seem to want me so conclusively.
I'm sure you'll do the right thing.
I can't see what difference getting married would make.
- A great deal of difference.
- It's just a piece of paper!
For one thing, think how much easier it would be traveling abroad and....
And what?
If that's the way you feel, there's only one thing for it!
I shall go to Bolivia.
What?
A man I know in Oxford wants me to run a sheep farm in Bolivia.
I'm quite serious. I can't go on like this.
- Don't be ridiculous.
- I will not be treated like a child!
If I go, he won't let you live with him anymore.
You know that, don't you?
He's never said that.
I don't think he wants to see you again when he gets back from Italy.
My dearest Lytton...
there is a great deal to say...
and I feel very incompetent to write it today.
You see, I knew there was nothing really to hope for from you...
ever since the beginning.
All these years, I have known all along that my life with you was limited.
You are the only person who I ever had an all-absorbing passion for.
I shall never have another. I couldn't now.
I had one of the most self-abasing loves that a person can have.
It's too much of a strain to be quite alone here, waiting to see you.
Or craning my nose and eyes out of the top window at 44 Gordon Square...
to see if you were coming down the street.
Ralph said you were nervous lest I'd feel
I had some sort of claim on you...
and that all your friends wondered how you stood me so long...
as I didn't understand a word of literature.
That was wrong.
For nobody, I think, could have loved the ballades...
Donne and Macaulay's essays, and best of all, Lytton's essays...
as much as I.
You never knew or never will know...
the very big and devastating love
I had for you.
How I adored every hair, every curl of your beard.
Just thinking of you now makes me cry so I can't see this paper.
Once you said to me...
that Wednesday afternoon in the sitting room...
you loved me as a friend.
Could you tell it to me again?
Yours, Carrington.
My dearest and best...
do you know how difficult I find it to express my feelings...
either in letters or talk?
Do you really want me to tell you that I love you as a friend?
B ut of course, that is absurd.
You do know very well that I love you as something more than a friend...
you angelic creature, whose goodness to me has made me happy for years.
Your letter made me cry.
I feel a poor, old, miserable creature.
If there was a chance that your decision meant that I should somehow lose you...
I don't think I could bear it.
You and Ralph and our life at Tidmarsh...
are what I care for most in the world.
I think I shall spend all my honeymoons here.
Shouldn't you be wearing a ring?
I lost it somewhere in the Italian Alps.
Do you ever get terrified of dying?
When you've been married for as long as six weeks... you've no idea how pleasant it is to get away on your own.
I sometimes wish I had met you before Ralph did.
I don't suppose I'd have made much impression on you.
What's the matter?
I don't know.
You know something, you're mad.
Why go back to Spain so soon?
Why don't you come and join us on holiday?
I couldn't.
Ready?
This is going very well.
- Do you mind awfully?
- Not at all.
I must tell Ralph.
- What?
- I must. I can't bear this deceit.
After all, he is one of my oldest friends.
I think I ought to go and tell him I love you... and that he has nothing to worry about, that it's like brother and sister.
- I shouldn't.
- Why not?
You'd upset him.
You would. Really, you would. I know.
He's such a dear.
It wouldn't be fair.
I feel shittish enough about it as it is.
I want you to come back to Spain with me... now, today and live with me.
- I can't.
- Why not?
I feel as if I'm drowning.
Old chap, I think this is the parting of the ways.
- Take care of yourself.
- I will.
I think the lady and gentleman might be permitted a kiss, don't you?
You know, I really don't understand you.
- A bit of effort.
- What do you mean?
If you tried to persuade him...
I'm sure he'd have stayed another couple of days.
Do you know if Ralph's coming back this evening?
He said he had work to do in London.
I don't know who it is.
I've had three letters already this week.
I miss him terribly.
When's he coming back to England?
He says he can't afford the fare.
It's lovely.
I shall always treasure it.
This is silly.
Ralph has mistresses, you know.
I'm sure he's with one of them now.
So I can't see the sense in it.
Now will you come back to Spain with me?
You mustn't spoil things.
You want to stay in England with Ralph.
Not with Ralph.
With Lytton.
- Where's Brenan?
- He's not here.
- I said, where is he?
- I told you, he's not here!
- I'll kill him!
- Has somebody told you something? Who?
None of your business! Out of the way!
- He's with his parents.
- Will you get out of the way?
I'm going to pull his arms off!
Where is he?
So... you were in love with her.
And you're telling me you haven't been fucking her.
Do you expect me to believe that?
I know you're pretty feeble, but what exactly is the meaning... of this heroic self-restraint?
I was always very aware that you're my friend and she's my wife.
I mean, your wife.
All right.
Let's go through this step by step, shall we?
Presumably, you kissed her.
I mean, you must have kissed her.
I suppose so, yes.
And did you, for example, did you ever put your hand down the front of her dress?
I don't think so.
You don't think so?
I'm asking you if you ever touched her tits!
What's the point of all this?
The point of it is this is all important information... because I have to decide whether
I want to see either of you again!
That's the point of it!
Another thing.
You realize I can't possibly allow you to see... or communicate with her ever again.
Having to lie to him, that's what I couldn't bear.
We know that, but you must understand it was essential.
I suppose so. I don't know.
I don't approve of jealousy any more than you do.
But no doubt, if one's afflicted with it, there's little one can do about it.
Yes, but he's so irrational.
We must proceed with extreme caution.
Let me see what I can do.
- What's this, visitors?
- No. It's by way of a present.
Who for?
Since neither Carrington nor I drive....
I didn't expect you so early.
What's all this?
I thought we'd be going out.
- I thought...
- Caviar?
- You can't afford this.
- I know.
I thought I might induce you to stay the night.
You know very well how careful we have to be.
- Otherwise it seems so sordid.
- Don't let's quarrel.
There isn't time to quarrel.
Come on.
He keeps wanting me to go and live with him.
Why is he so demanding?
No doubt, because he hasn't understood... that people in love should never live together.
When they do, the inevitable result is that they either fall out of love... or drive one another insane.
Tell him.
He wouldn't believe me.
Idealists are nothing but trouble.
You can never convince them there's no such thing as the ideal.
I can't see what's going to happen.
It's frightening me.
Whatever happens, my dear, you're safe here.
I shall have to go in about five minutes.
Aren't you coming back to the flat?
I'd rather not tonight, if you don't mind very much.
Then I shall just have to walk the streets until I find a whore.
I expect you will.
Should we have another picnic on the White Horse Hill?
A sentimental pilgrimage?
Come at 10:00 on Sunday.
I'll meet you there.
I can't bear the thought of leaving this house... the orchard, the millrace... my wonderful room.
The Garden of Eden.
But the rheumatism, the lumbago... the rising damp and the falling plaster... the rats in the wainscot.
Very true.
I keep thinking I've forgotten something.
You know the feeling?
This is Roger Senhouse, my young friend from Oxford.
Ralph Partridge, and this is his friend, Frances Marshall.
This is Carrington.
I'm sure there's a brush here for you somewhere.
Do you think so? I'm horribly bad at it.
Of course you are.
Come. I'll show you the garden.
Good to be on our own again.
I must say, I find these new young people wonderfully refreshing.
They have no morals and they never speak.
It's an enchanting combination.
I was standing outside a door trying to pluck up courage to knock... when suddenly it... swung open.
I can scarcely believe it's happened.
I thought you were looking rather sprightly.
It's more than that.
Like being let into Paradise.
You wait until Lytton... virtually bankrupts himself, then you announce you won't live here!
I didn't say that.
I said my life would have to be in London with Frances!
Why didn't you tell us before?
It's only just happened.
We've only just decided!
How can you be so thoughtless?
It's just not fair on Lytton!
It's not fair on anyone...
to put our future in the hands of an outsider!
How kind of you to come.
I thought, of the four of us, you and I were most likely... to be able to discuss this sensibly.
Do sit down.
The fact of the matter is... if you and Ralph really do plan to set up permanently in London... then I shall be forced to resell Ham Spray.
I understand.
You see, Ralph has become quite indispensable to us.
We rely upon him for every practical decision.
I certainly have no intention of stopping Ralph from seeing Carrington... or interfering in any way.
- It's just that we're....
- I know.
Ralph told me, when they first got married... they lived in London during the week...
It's a question of making a quite formal arrangement.
Couldn't we do the same, come down every weekend?
I mean, the last thing I want to do is...
I knew you were the right person to talk to.
Can I get you some tea?
He likes to be called B eacus.
He's not in the least curious.
In fact, rather remote.
In other words, just what I need.
And so beautiful, Lytton.
The brass buckle on his belt.
Why don't you wear black stockings?
Or dark brown?
They show off a leg much better than these things.
And suspenders I like.
Why don't you wear suspenders?
It's me.
I shan't be coming back tonight.
I've done something rather impulsive.
I've taken some rooms...
in Gordon Square.
It won't make the slightest difference to our arrangements. Don't worry.
It's just a way of circumventing these impossible difficulties.
It means I shan't have to keep depending on friends...
taking hotel rooms, skulking about.
Sounds a very good idea.
Your key.
You know me. I'd only lose it.
You keep it.
What can you be thinking of going out in this weather?
- There's a reason for it.
- What can it possibly be?
Je suis perdue.
Are you sure?
- And you're sure you don't want it?
- I could never have a child.
Unless it was yours.
- Have you told Beacus?
- It's no good telling him.
It would make him angry.
I don't know why he puts up with me.
I don't know why you put up with him.
Because he's the most exciting man
I've ever slept with, and I'm getting old.
- Now you know what it feels like.
- I always did.
Here's the address of a very good man in London.
- This makes a change.
- A very different pair of boots.
- How are you feeling?
- Rotten.
- There.
- Thank you.
I know you don't like him or approve of him.
It's not that.
I'm sure he's as dim as a blind owl in a holly tree... but he never says anything, so you can't really tell.
Do you suppose they're going to play that wretched game all night?
What's the matter?
Nothing.
I've had a letter from Roger.
He's not coming down next week.
He says I've let him mean too much to me.
He says I've oppressed him.
He's right, of course.
One doesn't intend to let it get out of hand, and then it does.
Then there's this blackness.
Sometimes I think you don't like me very much.
It's not that.
I'm devoted to you. You know that.
It's just that....
Go on.
It's just that you don't really attract me sexually, to be honest.
That man from the London group who keeps offering you an exhibition... why don't you take him up on it?
I've told you before
I don't want an exhibition.
That isn't why I do it.
I paint when I feel well.
It makes me feel even better.
I'm not interested in selling them.
They're for us.
So you're all right now.
Yes, I am.
At least it's been a great mercy not being in the wrong this time.
I've been thinking of giving you a little pension.
Just 100 a year or so.
Do keep still. You're causing havoc.
- I'd better leave you to get on.
- Oh, God, no.
Please stay awhile.
I have heard rumors to the effect... that there are people who actually enjoy writing.
Can this be true?
I loathe it.
All that work and at the end of it some slim volume.
- "What is the point?" I ask myself.
- Think of posterity.
Why? What's posterity ever done for me?
I've done my best to keep it quiet, but I'm an ambitious man.
I thought if I could cut through all that atrocious fog of superstition... that poisons so many people's lives,
I might... be able to do some good in the world.
But the truth is,
I've always been better at living... than I ever was at writing.
What's wrong with that?
I don't think you have any idea how happy you've made me.
Anyway, I was about to speak to this black-haired tart in gumboots... when I suddenly noticed a much prettier tart, blond, in the gallery next door.
So, I abandoned the gumboots and began to sidle up to the blond.
Very fetching, he was, pink and chubby.
I was about to murmur something seductive into his delicious ear... when suddenly the light fell on him and I realized who he was.
The Prince of Wales.
Oh, my God.
- I'll fetch a cloth.
- I'm terribly sorry.
Come on. Don't be so gloomy.
There's nothing to worry about.
My dears... shall we go to Mlaga in the spring?
Where's Carrington?
I'm here.
Why isn't she here?
- I want her.
- Here I am.
Where is she?
I love her.
I always wanted to marry Carrington.
And I never did.
Is there any chance he'll live?
I don't think so. Not now.
Go away!
Now, Mrs. Partridge.
How could you do it?
If this is dying, I don't think much of it.
You're so cold.
It's a wedding present.
From Carrington.
Only two years late.
Do you suppose that's a record?
Strange.
Dear Ottoline...
it is to you I owe the happiness, probably, of my life with Lytton.
I thank you for those days at Garsington, when I grew to love him.
Yours, Carrington.
What's she doing?
Planting bulbs.
That's surely a good sign, isn't it?
Yes, it is.
- What are you doing with that?
- I borrowed it from Brian.
- Look here!
- It's for the rabbits!
- It's no good going on like this.
- I can't leave you.
You know I'm going to France next week.
- The tickets are bought, it's all arranged.
- I know.
Now I just need to be on my own for a bit.
I can't stand the strain of worrying about you worrying about me.
- Listen...
- I must be on my own.
Don't worry.
I'll be all right.
Yes.
I want you to be very happy.
No one Will ever know the utter happiness of our life together.
It is impossible...
to think that every day of my life, you will be away.
I write in an empty book.
I cry in an empty room.
My very darling Lytton.
[ Man ] Once upon a time in a village in ancient India, there was a little goat and a priest.
The priest wanted to sacrifice the goat to the gods.
He raised his arm to cut the goat's throat, when suddenly the goat began to laugh.
The priest stopped, amazed, and asked the goat,
"Why do you laugh? Don't you know
I'm about to cut your throat?"
"Oh, yes," said the goat.
"After 499 times dying... and being reborn as a goat,
I will be reborn as a human being."
Then the little goat began to cry.
The high priest said,
"Why now are you crying?"
And the goat replied,
"For you, poor priest.
500 lives ago,
I too was a high priest... and sacrificed goats to the gods."
The priest dropped to his knees, saying,
"Forgive me, I beg you.
From now on, I will be the guardian and protector of every goat in the land."
[ Children Laughing ]
Now, then, what does this ancient tale teach us?
[ Together ]
That no living creature... must ever be sacrificed.
What happened to-- to the goat?
Ah, yes, the goat.
Mmm. The goat had many, many lives as a human being, until one day he turned into someone... very strange indeed.
- Champa!
- [ Children Laugh ]
Show us something of your previous life, huh?
- [ Bleating ]
- [ Laughing ]
Telegram for Lama Norbu.
I've been waiting for nine years... to receive this.
[ Bell Ringing ]
[ Children Yelling,
Laughing ]
- Is it about Lama Dorje?
- Yes.
- Have they found him?
- Perhaps!
We shall all pray for the success of your mission.
[ Praying in Tibetan ]
And, uh, remember to take your medicine.
~~ [ Monks Singing ]
Wait.
[ Man's Voice ]
This is Lama Dorje's bowl.
You will need it for your search.
[ Children Laughing,
Yelling ]
[ Laughing, Yelling
Continue ]
[ Country Folk ]
Everybody is a-wonderin'!
What and where they all came from!
- Everybody is a-worryin' 'bout where they're gonna go!
- Seattle!
When the whole thing's done!
But no one knows for certain!
- So it's all the same to me.
- [ Monk ] It's so wonderful to see you again,
- [ Song Continues ]
- but you must be very tired after such a long flight.
- [ Lama Norbu ] Yes, a little tired.
- [ Truck Horn Honking ]
Tell me again about your dreams.
My dreams began about a month after Lama Dorje passed away.
They were so intense, and they always led me to the same place.
- The empty site.
- Yes.
Lama Dorje was walking in front of me, on a hill.
He was pointing to this empty spot, but there was nothing there.
And then I found the site... quite by chance a few months after, just as it was in the dreams.
I saw they had started to build a house.
I discovered that it belonged to the family of an engineer... with a small boy called Jesse, an only child.
He was born a year after
Lama Dorje passed away.
[ Song Continues, Faintly ]
Lama Dorje was wearing jeans?
Oh, yes.
It was quite startling, because in life, he always wore robes.
Of course, I felt very shy about approaching them, but then I was lucky.
Three weeks ago...
- [ Whistle Blows ]
- [ Coach ] Line up again!
A beautiful day.
Yes, it is.
I'm a Buddhist monk from Tibet.
My name is Kenpo Tenzin.
Oh. Oh.
Nice to meet you.
Now I teach here in Seattle.
Oh, really?
I'm a teacher too. I teach math.
Oh! Like me!
[ Laughs ]
Also I teach astrology.
Mostly astrology.
How unusual.
We Tibetans have a very advanced system of astrology.
- Excuse me.
- [ Coach ] Go! Play! Go!
[ Whistle Blows ]
Jesse!
May I ask, uh, what day-- on what day your son was born?
- On March 1st.
- Wonderful!
And at what hour?
In the morning.
Very early. 6:30.
Oh, wonderful, wonderful!
6:30! Very special!
Very special!
[ Laughing ]
- Oh. Well, I don't know about that, but--
- Oh, yes!
Oh, yes. Oh, yes.
May I give you this card, please?
Thank you.
Jesse!
[ Kenpo ]
I wrote her last week.
I mentioned that an important lama wanted to see her.
[ Doorbell Ringing ]
It's okay, Maria,
I'll get it.
- I can get it!
- It's all right.
- Mrs. Conrad, you remember me?
We met at--
- Yes, of course.
At Jesse's school.
The Tibetan astrologer.
Kenzo Te--
[ Chuckling ]
Kenpo Tenzin.
Kenpo Tenzin. Yes.
I-I got your invitation that you sent me... to the Dharma Center, and, uh,
I've... been meaning to go.
I just haven't had the time, but, uh--
But I will.
I'm looking forward to it.
My friend Lama Norbu has just arrived from Bhutan... and has never been in America before.
He's a very important lama.
He's come on a very special mission.
Oh, really? Well, would you like to come inside?
Yes. Yes, that would be very kind.
It will be very interesting for him.
This is Mrs. Conrad.
This is Lama Norbu.
Please come inside.
It's a bit of a mess.
My husband built this house.
He's an engineer.
As you can see, we're still living out of boxes, but at least the kitchen's done.
We only just moved in a few weeks ago.
- Very empty.
- [ Lama Norbu ] Very beautiful.
-  Yes.
- Mrs. Conrad?
Is it okay if I go?
- Yes, It's fine, Maria. It's fine.
Thank you. I'll see you tomorrow.
Very exciting.
It's very exciting to me.
- Really?
- Yes.
Can I get you some--
[ Chuckling ] something to drink?
- Oh, no. Thank you.
- Thank you.
All right.
Please sit down.
- Are you sure, Mrs. Conrad?
Is it okay if I go now?
- It's okay, Maria.
- Really. It's fine.
- Okay.
Please make yourselves comfortable.
[ Laughing ]
Lama Norbu is also my teacher... in our monastery in Bhutan.
Oh. I see.
And he's come on a very important mission for all of us.
He will stay at the Dharma Center we've started here in Seattle.
- Of course, of course.
- [ Man ] Lisa!
Oh. It's my husband.
Excuse me.
Hey, honey. Hey, what's the matter?
You look done in.
I am.
- Come on. I have a little distraction for you.
- What's going on, honey?
[ Chuckling ]
You'll see.
Who are these people?
Tibetan monks.
They just appeared.
- The round one's a teacher of astrology.
- And the square one?
Teacher's teacher.
- Where's Jesse?
- He's finishing his homework.
Shall we?
- This is, um--
- Lama Norbu.
- Kenpo Tenzin.
- This is my husband Dean.
Hi.
- Uh, they were just admiring the emptiness of the room, sweetheart.
- Uh-huh.
No room will be empty if your mind is full.
You learn that in a prison cell.
[ Chuckling ]
We are Buddhists from Tibet.
For many years we have been living in exile, the guests of our brothers in Bhutan, Nepal and India.
Since the occupation in 1959.
[ Lama Norbu ]
In Tibetan Buddhism, we believe that everybody is reborn, again and again.
But there are a few... very special beings... who come back as spiritual guides, particular people whom we can identify.
That is why we are here.
So you're here in Seattle to find someone.
Yes. My old teacher,
Lama Dorje.
The man who once found me.
We are looking for his reincarnation.
Jesse, is that you?
Come on. Come out.
Come say hello.
[ Lisa ]
Come on.
Come here.
This is Jesse.
This is Lama Norbu.
And do you remember
Kenpo Tenzin from school?
Why don't you wear shoes?
It's an old
Tibetan habit.
Do you like my mask?
- In our country, we love masks.
- I made it.
- It's a red rat.
- Oh.
[ Lama Norbu Laughing ]
- Honey, I need a scotch.
- Mmm.
[ Whispering ]
So do I.
You see, my teacher,
Lama Dorje, who was even a teacher of the Dalai Lama, towards the end of his life... he felt he was needed in the West to teach the Dharma, the path of Buddha.
So he came to America, to Seattle, where he passed away nine years ago.
We have been searching for his reincarnation in many places, but now we think he might have been reborn right here, as your son.
- As Jesse?
- Yes.
- [ Kenpo ] Lama Dorje had a great sense of humor.
- [ Both Chuckling ]
This is Champa, and this is Punzo.
[ Lama Norbu ]
Champa, so you have woken up.
Please excuse us.
It was a great honor to visit you, but now we must leave.
[ Jesse ] You should see the monorail.
I'll show you the monorail.
[ Lama Norbu ]
Uh, Champa.
This book is for you.
So, you will be my guide,
Jesse?
Yeah.
- Good-bye.
- Good night.
Good night.
[ Jesse ] "Little Buddha,
The Story of Prince Siddhartha."
Okay, now your toes.
Ah.
Careful of your book.
Mom, where did those men come from?
Well, they're Tibetans, honey.
They come from Bhutan, which is a country in the Himalayas.
What are the Himalayas?
The Himalayas are the highest mountains in the world.
Mom, good-bye!
Good-bye!
Let's see.
Okay.
"Buddha was born
2,500 years ago... in a small kingdom... in ancient Nepal.
- [ Elephant Snorts ]
- [ Speaking Nepali ]
[ Lisa Reading ]
As was the custom in those days, his mother, Queen Maya, was returning to her parents' home... for the birth of her child.
It was a long journey for the Queen to make, so, on the way, the royal caravan stopped for a rest... by the edge of a great forest.
[ Singing ]
As the Queen entered the trees, she fell into a kind of trance... and remembered a strange dream she had had... the day she conceived her child.
[ Singing Continues ]
[ Lisa Reading ]
In the dream...
- a baby elephant had appeared at her side...
- [ Kissing ] and blessed her with its trunk.
Queen Maya was deep inside the wood... when suddenly her birth pains began.
And then, it is said, a tree, understanding this great moment, bent slowly down to protect her, offering its branches for her support.
[ Singing ]
[ Singing Continues ]
[ Groans ]
[ Singing Continues,
Weakly ]
[ Baby Crying ]
[ Crying Continues ]
[ Lisa Reading ]
The child was born with almost no pain, with shining, golden skin.
He was fully conscious, his eyes wide open.
And he was strong enough to stand on his own legs.
I have been born to reach Enlightenment... and free all creatures from suffering.
[ Lisa Reading ]
And, it is said, lotus blossoms grew in his footsteps."
[ Cajun, Distant ]
[ Dean ]
Hey, where's our reincarnation?
Where's Lama Dorje?
[ Chuckling ]
Reading his book.
Wow. Like the Three Kings from the east, huh? Hmm.
Yeah. Amazing.
Well, at least they didn't try to tell us that Jesse was the result... of an immaculate conception.
[ Chuckling ]
I don't know, I like the idea: reincarnation.
I wouldn't mind coming back, visiting the places I like again and the people I love.
Suppose you come back as an ant.
So, what's wrong with an ant?
Lots of group activity and picnics and things.
You can get squished.
People get squished too.
Yeah, that's a fact.
[ Continues, Distant ]
I can't believe you'd be this upset over four harmless, little Tibetan monks.
- What's bothering you, Dean?
- It's Evan.
He's bankrupt.
What?
Evan's bankrupt?
He's been hiding from everybody even me.
But, how? How can that happen?
You are his best friend.
Everything you've ever done, you've done together
"King Suddhodhana, the baby's father, named the child Siddhartha, which means,
'He who brings good.'
[ Indian Music ]
And then he gave a great reception to present his son to the people.
[ Continues ]
[ Chanting ]
[ Lisa Reading ] Suddenly, in the midst of the ceremony, and to everyone's surprise, an unexpected guest arrived.
He was the revered hermit and astrologer Asita, whom nobody had seen for years.
[ Music, Chanting
Continue ]
As Asita looked at her son,
Queen Maya saw tears come to his eyes.
Do not be alarmed,
O Queen.
Mine are only the tears of an old man... who knows that he will not live long enough... to learn from the teachings of your son.
Will he be a great king?
He'll be the master of the world.
Or its redeemer.
When he grows older, Siddhartha can become a teacher, like you, if he wants, but first of all he must follow me...
- and be a king.
- It may be as you wish, but the gods often betray the wishes of mortal men.
[ Siddhartha Crying ]
He will be a king.
[ Speaking Nepali ]
[ Crying Continues ]
- He will be a king!
- [ Crowd Cheering ]
Queen Maya was filled with a strange foreboding, as if she knew that she too would not live to see her son's destiny fulfilled.
He will be a great king!
A week later she died of a terrible illness...
[ Jesse ]
I know why you're here.
- You're looking for your teacher, aren't you?
- Yes.
And red rats have very long ears.
What was your teacher's name?
- Lama Dorje, which means
"thunderbolt" in Tibetan.
- Lama Thunderbolt?
[ Horn Blows ]
I think you should go to the police, if you want to find him.
No, the police can't help us.
You see, Lama Dorje is dead.
But how can you find him if he's dead?
It's very difficult to explain, but we believe he's been reborn.
- Like a ghost, you mean?
- No.
- As a child.
- Could I be Lama Dorje?
You could be, yes.
I think I am.
I am Lama Thunderbolt.
We'll have to see about that.
Then why did you come to our house?
You ask a lot of questions, huh?
[ Whispering ]
- Yes, Maria, yes!
- [ Laughing ]
I can show you
Buddha!
- [ Children Chattering ]
- Jesse, show them the building your father built.
Yeah! Come on.
My father built that building.
See? The one with the green dome.
He made it for his friend Evan, but it's always empty.
Was Buddha a god?
No, he was a real person.
- Like Jesus?
- Yes.
Quite a bit like Jesus, though he was born long before.
What happened to Buddha when he grew up?
Oh, he wasn't called
Buddha yet.
He was still young Prince Siddhartha,
Ahh!
[ Lama Norbu Continuing ] and he married the beautiful
Princess Yasodhara.
He became a great horseman, a great archer, and he often played with his friends... the ancient game called "Kabadi."
- [ Yelling, Groaning ]
- [ Cheering ]
You mean, all he was doing was having a great time?
Yes.
[ Chanting Repeatedly ]
Haddadu, haddadu, haddadu, haddadu, haddadu, haddadu--
- [ Repetitive Chanting Continues ]
- Ha!
- Wendikali!
- [ Crowd ] Wendikali!
[ Chuckling ]
- Siddhartha!
- [ Crowd Chanting ] Siddhartha!
[ Chanting Repeatedly ]
Wendikali, wendikali!
[ Siddhartha
Continues Chanting ]
[ Chanting Continues ]
- Wendikali!
- [ Crowd ] Wendikali!
[ Crowd, Players Cheering ]
Siddhartha!
[ Lama Norbu Narrating ] The King had given Siddhartha three palaces.
One for winter, one for the rainy season and one for summer.
In this way he hoped to shield his son... from all knowledge of pain and worry.
- [ Music, Faint ]
- But then, one day,
Siddhartha heard a mysterious song of haunting beauty.
[ Women Talking ]
- [ Continues ]
- At first he couldn't understand where it was coming from.
The song was in a language he had never heard before.
What was it saying?
What did it mean?
[ Singing ]
[ Singing Continues ]
[ Singing Continues ]
What is this song?
[ Yasodhara ]
It is from a faraway land, my Lord.
It evokes the beauties of the country she knew as a child, the mountains and the lakes... that she can never forget.
- How strange.
- [ Singing Continues ]
Do such places exist, places as beautiful as here?
I've heard that only suffering lies beyond these walls.
What do you mean,
"suffering"?
Your father loves you very much.
He has given us everything we could want.
There's no need to go anywhere else when you've such beauty around you.
[ Singing Continues ]
It is true; we have everything, and everything is perfect.
So... what is this feeling
I have?
If the world is so beautiful, why have I never seen it?
I've not even seen my own city!
I must see the world,
Yasodhara!
With my own eyes.
[ Singing Continues ]
[ Lisa ]
Well, this must be the Dharma Center.
[ Jesse ]
It looks like a church.
[ Men Chanting ]
Jesse!
[ Chanting Continues ]
Hi, Champa.
Hi, Punzo.
[ Continues Chanting in Tibetan ]
That's beautiful.
But I'm afraid
I have to go.
Jesse, come say good-bye.
Hey. So, your dad's going to come by and pick you up at 4:00.
- Okay.
- Okay, sweetie. Good-bye.
[ Chanting Continues,
Grows Louder ]
Excuse me, Lama.
I was worried.
One day, Champa, but not yet.
Hey!
That's Lama Thunderbolt.
Yes.
Is this his bowl?
Look.
It's dusty.
What's this?
It is a trumpet made from a human bone.
Honest?
A human bone?
Now, where did we get to?
Oh. Siddhartha wanted to see the world.
Ah, yes. He wanted to see the world.
- [ Ceremonial Drumming ]
- Secretly, however, his father prepared everything in advance...
- so that nothing Siddhartha might see in the city...
- [ Man Yelling ]
- would upset or disturb him.
- [ Drumming Continues ]
"Everyone should be young and healthy."
- [ Drumming Grows Louder ]
- [ Crowd Chattering ]
[ Shouts ]
[ Grunting ]
[ Elephant Trumpets ]
[ Shouts ]
[ Crowd Cheering ]
Siddhartha! Siddhartha!
Siddhartha! Siddhartha!
[ Crowd Continues
Chanting, Cheering ]
[ Chanting in Nepali ]
Siddhartha!
Siddhartha!
[ Lama Norbu Narrating ]
Suddenly, however, through the crowd, the young Prince saw something he had never seen before.
Channa! Channa!
Who are those men?
- [ Muttering ]
- [ Siddhartha ]
Tell me, who are those men?
They are men like the rest of us, my Lord,
- who once sucked milk from their mother's breast.
- Why do they look like that?
- [ Channa ] They are old, my Lord.
- What do you mean, old?
Old age destroys memory, beauty and strength.
- In the end, it happens to us all, my Lord.
- To everyone?
To you and to me?
It is better not to concern yourself with these things, my Lord.
But where are they taking them?
Channa!
[ Channa ] No, my Lord, don't go there! Please! You mustn't!
No, my Lord!
My Lord!
- My Lord Siddhartha!
- [ People Talking ]
[ Man Shouting ]
[ Woman Screaming ]
[ Screaming Continues ]
[ Panting, Groaning ]
[ Groaning Continues ]
[ Moaning ]
[ Siddhartha ]
What is the matter with those people?
Why is she crying like that?
She is in pain, my Lord.
- She is very sick.
- Sick?
[ Siddhartha ]
What is that?
No one reaches the moment of death... without falling sick at least once.
Even kings?
And death-- what moment is that?
Show me death.
This is death, my Lord.
- [ Bell Tolls ]
- [ Man Chanting ]
[ Chanting Continues ]
[ Chanting Continues ]
Here the ashes are given to the river, my Lord.
[ Men Weeping ]
Death is the moment of separation... which comes to every person in every family.
When a body grows cold and stiff like wood, it has to be burned like wood.
[ Lama Norbu Narrating ]
It was on this day, from this fire, with these people, that Siddhartha learned about suffering... and discovered compassion.
They were him, and he was them.
- Dad.
- Am I interrupting?
Of course not.
Please come in.
- Look! It's human bone.
- Wow.
Spooky, huh?
Jesse, I need to talk to Lama Norbu alone for a minute.
Okay, Dad.
Come. I'll show you around the center.
I was just telling Jesse the story of Siddhartha.
That's a beautiful story.
A beautiful... myth.
It is one way of telling the truth, and children seem to love it.
Lama Norbu, I have a great respect for your culture... and your religion, and I know about the invasion of Tibet... and the tragedies that happened, but I don't believe in reincarnation, and neither does my wife.
Why should you?
In Tibet, we think of the mind and the body... as the contents and the container.
Now the cup is no longer a cup.
But what is the tea?
- Still tea.
- Exactly.
In the cup, on the table, or on the floor, it moves from one container to another, but it's still tea.
Like the mind after death, it moves from one body to another, but it is still mind.
Even in the towel, it's still tea.
The same tea.
- None for me, thanks.
- [ Laughing ]
Once we're certain about the reincarnation, the child would receive a special education.
He could become a very powerful figure in our society, a spiritual leader.
Even if he's an American?
I mean, what, you're offering Jesse life in a Buddhist monastery?
- Is that it?
- Of course.
If he wanted it.
Or he could go on with his life here and decide when he's older.
But first, to be sure of the reincarnation, we will take Jesse to Bhutan, consult the Abbot of the monastery... and all the experts.
Now you look angry.
I am. To take a child away from his family,
- in this country, we call kidnapping.
- [ Jesse Yelling ]
Vroom!
- Special delivery for Lama Norbu!
- Oh. Thank you.
- Vroom!
- We hoped you and your wife... would come with him.
- To Bhutan?
- Yes.
It's a very beautiful country.
Well, well. It seems there's another candidate... for the reincarnation of Lama Dorje.
A little boy from Kathmandu.
Are there a lot of us? How many are there? I want to meet them.
Come on, let's go.
Come on.
This has gone too far.
We're outta here.
- Jesse. Jesse.
- Lama Norbu!
- Lama!
- Say good-bye, Jesse.
- Don't forget your book,
Jesse Long-Ears.
- Good-bye, Lama Norbu.
Lama Norbu!
[ Siddhartha ]
Oh, my father, why have you hidden the truth from me for so long?
Why have you lied to me about the existence of suffering, sickness, poverty, old age and death?
If I've lied to you, Siddhartha, it has been because I love you.
Your love has become a prison.
How can I live here as I lived before... when so many are suffering outside?
You never wanted to go outside.
- Father.
- Mm-hmm.
I must find an answer to suffering.
Even if you betray me,
Siddhartha, have you no pity for the wife you leave, and for your own son?
My... child is born?
Born this very evening.
Think of them, Siddhartha.
You too are a father.
You too have a duty.
You cannot leave now.
Even my love for Yasodhara... and my son... cannot remove the pain I feel.
For I know that they too will have to suffer, grow old... and die.
Like you, like me, like us all.
Yes.
We must all die... and be reborn... and die again, and be reborn and die, and be reborn and die again.
No man can ever escape that curse.
Then that... is my task.
I... will lift that curse.
[ King Suddhodhana ]
Lock the gate.
Double the guard.
If the Prince tries to escape, he must be stopped by force.
[ Ringing ]
Hello.
Evan?
I can't believe it.
When?
How did it happen?
It's-- Oh, God.
In San Francisco.
I'll try to get a flight out tonight.
What happened to Evan?
Evan had an accident.
Is he dead?
Just a minute, Jesse.
"As soon... as he left his father,
Siddhartha went to see his wife and his newborn son.
[ Jesse Reading ]
His heart was torn, but his mind was made up.
[ Baby Cooing ]
[ Whispering ]
Channa.
Channa.
Channa.
- [ Jesse Reading ] A magic mist had descended over everything.
- Channa.
The whole court had fallen into a deep sleep.
Channa.
Channa.
Channa.
Channa.
Channa. Channa,
- wake up. Get Kantaka.
- What?
Get Kantaka. Mind no one sees you and meet me at the old gate.
- Go now.
- Yes, my Lord.
Only the great elephants are awake, my Lord.
The whole world is dreaming, Channa.
[ Jesse Reading ] But for Siddhartha the dream was ending.
His long journey of awakening had begun.
[ Kantaka Whinnying ]
[ Elephant
Trumpeting ]
[ Chanting ln Nepali ]
[ Chanting Continues ]
[ Chanting
Continues ]
Who are they, Channa?
Are they robbers?
No, my Lord.
They're ascetics.
[ Siddhartha ] Ascetics?
Why are they so thin and naked?
They have given up all the comforts of life, my Lord.
They have sworn never to leave the forest...
- until they have reached Enlightenment.
- Enlightenment?
These are for you.
Channa,
I am doing this for everyone.
I am looking for freedom.
[ Flies Buzzing ]
[ Thunder Rumbling ]
[ Speaking Nepali ]
[ Speaking Nepali ]
[ Loud Thunderclap ]
[ Thunderclap ]
[ Speaking Nepali ]
[ Ascetics Laughing ]
[ Jesse Reading ]
The five ascetics... witnessed these miracles and were filled with wonder.
They became Siddhartha's first disciples."
[ Slowly Inhaling
And Exhaling ]
[ Car Door Slams ]
[ Front Door Opens ]
- I'm... so sorry about
Mr. Evan, Mr. Conrad. I--
- Thanks, Maria.
- I know.
- Is Jesse all right?
Yeah. He's--
He read in his room all afternoon.
He's asleep now.
Thank you, Maria, for staying and everything.
Do you want me to fix you something to eat?
No, thanks.
Cab's waiting outside to take you home.
Okay, thank you.
Good night.
Good night.
[ Heavy Breathing ]
[ Dean Whispering ]
Come on.
[ Grunts ]
Too hungry.
Lisa, I think Jesse should go to Bhutan.
- What?
- I think Jesse should go to Bhutan.
You're joking, right?
No. I've just changed my mind.
About a lot of things these last two days.
What are you saying? That you've suddenly started to believe...
Jesse is this Tibetan lama?
I thought you were the one that was open to the idea.
Come on, Dean. This is crazy.
What's going on?
Nothin's goin' on.
Just think of it as a career opportunity for Jesse.
He can... get a little robe...
- and sit on the floor and do meditation...
- It's not funny.
- and hang out with the other monks and--
- It's not funny, Dean!
Jesse can't go to Bhutan.
It's just for a couple of weeks.
No, he can't go.
[ Sighs ]
He's got school.
And I'm in the middle of the semester and I can't take him.
I thought I could go with him.
- Just the two of you?
- Yeah.
While I stay here?
But you've never looked after Jesse before.
He's never been away from me.
There's nothing I can do here now except wait... for lawyers to talk to lawyers to talk to lawyers.
Maybe it's the time I need to think about what to do with the rest of my life.
Without me?
I love you, Lisa.
You'd better.
It's just for a couple of weeks.
It'll be all right.
- What if they decide
Jesse is this reincarnation?
- They never will.
They already have another candidate, a little boy in Kathmandu.
[ Sniffles ]
I'm sorry, Dean.
I'm sorry. I'm just upset with myself being upset.
I'm just--
For not encouraging you and for... not being able to be with you and Jesse.
And because you're taking the adventure away from me.
[ Whispers ]
Dad.
Dad!
Good morning,
Jesse Long-Ears.
Were you sleeping,
Lama?
No, I was meditating.
What's meditating?
It is being totally quiet and relaxed, separating yourself from everything around you, setting your mind free like a bird.
And you can then see your faults... as if they were passing clouds.
Look.
If we can learn to meditate in the right way, we can all reach
Enlightenment.
[ Lama Norbu Narrating ]
For six years,
Siddhartha and his followers... lived in silence and never left the forest.
For drink, they had rain.
For food, they had a grain of rice... or a broth of mud, or the droppings of a passing bird.
They were trying to master suffering... by making their minds so strong... they would forget about their bodies.
Then, one day...
Siddhartha heard an old musician... from a passing boat speaking to his pupil.
If you tighten the string too much, it will snap.
And if you leave it too slack, it won't play.
[ Lama Norbu Narrating ]
Suddenly, Siddhartha realized... that these simple words held a great truth... and that in all these years he had been following... the wrong path.
[ Whispering ]
If you tighten the string too much, it will snap.
And if you leave it too slack, it will not play.
[ Water Buffalo
Grunting ]
[ Sighing ]
[ Lama Norbu Narrating ]
The village girl offered
Siddhartha her bowl of rice.
And for the first time in years, he tasted proper food.
But when the ascetics saw their master... bathing and eating like an ordinary person, they felt betrayed, as if Siddhartha had given up the great search for Enlightenment.
Come...
- and eat with me.
- You have betrayed your vows, Siddhartha.
- You have given up the search.
- We can no longer follow you.
- We can no longer learn from you.
- To learn is to change.
The path to Enlightenment is in the Middle Way.
It is the line between all opposite extremes.
[ Siddhartha Whispering ]
If I can reach Enlightenment, may this bowl... float upstream.
[ Lama Norbu Narrating ]
The Middle Way was the great truth Siddhartha had found, the path he would teach to the world.
[ Grunting ]
[ Shouting, Speaking in Nepali ]
[ Drums, Wind Instruments ]
- Thank you.
- Dad, look!
[ Continues ]
[ Lama Norbu ] Are you sure the other boy will be here today, Sangay?
[ Sangay ] Of course, of course.
He's always here.
Wow, Dad, isn't it great?
Yeah, it's lookin' at us.
It's a dome, like the one on your building.
Lama, can I go around and touch those things?
The prayer wheels?
Of course.
But remember, you should always walk around clockwise.
- Okay, Dad?
- He will be completely safe here.
Okay, Jesse.
I'll see you later.
I'll be watching you!
Hey, Dad! Hey!
Hey, buddy!
[ Cymbals,
Wind Instruments ]
[ Singing in Nepali ]
[ Singing Continues ]
[ Singing Continues ]
[ Singing Continues ]
- That's... the boy.
- Yes, that is Raju.
[ Lama Norbu ]
Look, Champa, the other candidate.
Amongst all these people, the two of them... have found each other.
[ Singing Continues ]
How much you give?
Ten rupee?
Five rupee?
- One rupee?
- I don't have any money.
What's in your pocket?
- It's my Gameboy. You want to try?
- Oh!
Yeah. I'm champion of Kathmandu.
[ Beeping ]
[ Continues Beeping ]
[ Beeping ]
- You're good.
- [ Beeping Continues ]
Hey!
I am champion of Kathmandu!
- What is he doing?
- I'll get it back!
Come back!
Hey! Dad?
Hey!
Mantu!
Mantu, come back!
Hey!
[ Cymbals Ringing ]
[ Girl Shouting ]
[ Speaking Nepali ]
- [ Bell Ringing ]
- [ Giggling ]
Hey! American boy!
Hey!
My brother is very naughty, but great singer.
- Thanks. My name's Jesse.
- I'm Raju. Come!
- Hey, up here, buddy.
- Dad! Hey, Dad!
- Champa, can I ask you something?
- Of course.
Is Lama Norbu sick?
I see him taking those pills.
He's... not completely well, but very strong.
Dad! Dad, this is my new friend.
- He found me when I was lost.
- We know, Jesse. We know.
We've been waiting for you both.
We are very pleased to meet you, Raju.
Sangay has told us much about you.
It is good that two of the candidates... have found each other in this way.
Now we must visit a third candidate... whom I've only just heard about.
It will be a very long drive.
So let us hope it is
Lama Dorje's... last joke.
Lama Dorje always made jokes about impermanence.
Lama, what's
"impermanence"?
You see these people?
All of us... and all the people alive in the world today--
A hundred years from now we'll all be dead.
That is impermanence.
[ Indian Raga ]
Jesse?
Hey.
Hey, Jesse.
- You wanna call Mom?
- Yeah.
Come on.
I send help, sahib.
- Car broken, sahib?
- Yeah.
Very bad karma.
Oh.
I hope your journey was not too tiring, Lama.
Thank you.
Thank you.
- Now I want to meet the child.
- Here is my precious.
Gita. Come and meet Lama Norbu.
Gita, this is Jesse and Raju.
I am the real Lama Dorje, and you are both fakes.
Lama Dorje wasn't a woman.
He was the abbess of a convent.
How would you know?
I'm sorry, you don't go to school.
And you're a foreigner.
I have a secret garden.
Come. Come,
O ignorant boys.
Me?
Right here in this garden, my grandfather, who was a raja and a great saint, was eaten by a tiger.
- Yeah, right!
- There was a terrible famine, and the tiger was looking for food to feed her babies.
So my grandfather offered himself.
He must've been pretty stupid to do something like that.
[ Spits ] Only a great being can do something like that.
- [ Raju Yelling ]
- Eat me, O poor tiger!
Eat me!
- [ Yelling ]
- You're so hungry!
- Eat me!
- [ Both Shouting ]
- [ Growling ]
- Oh, no! Aah!
- [ Jesse ] Don't eat me!
- This tooth belonged to the tiger that ate my grandfather.
Cool.
You can't fool me.
I heard this story a thousand times, but he don't know that.
My late husband, a man of great faith, made a donation every year to Lama Dorje's monastery.
Then one day,
Lama Dorje came here.
Unannounced. Just appearing at the door like a miracle.
He stayed for two days.
And just as he was leaving, he placed his hand... on my stomach... like this.
For a long time,
I didn't know what it meant.
But immediately after
Lama Dorje died,
I became pregnant.
Something which my husband and I had thought... was impossible.
A month ago, she wrote to me to come right away... because a most amazing thing had happened.
- One night, the child--
- Gita was... chanting prayers in Tibetan, saying things I couldn't understand.
She was speaking Tibetan in her sleep?
The Heart sutra. A little miracle.
How could she know that?
She was speaking Sanskrit.
[ Reciting in Sanskrit ]
[ Continues Reciting ]
[ Reciting in Sanskrit ]
[ Continues Reciting ]
[ Continues Reciting ]
- [ Monkey Chattering ]
- [ Jesse ] Wow, look at that monkey!
- [ Raju ] He look like my monkey.
- [ Gita ] They are all my monkeys.
[ Jesse ]
What's that one called over there?
[ Gita ] Don't laugh.
You'll scare them. Do you know...
Siddhartha reached Enlightenment under this tree?
- Yeah?
- Anyhow, a tree just like this one.
Lama! Lama, is it true?
Is this really, like,
Siddhartha's tree?
Well, probably something very similar.
It was outside a little village called Bodgaya.
Siddhartha sat under a great tree, just like this one.
He had found the Middle Way... and restored his body to health.
- [ Chattering ]
- [ Lama Norbu Narrating ]
And then five girls appeared.
They looked like innocent village girls, but in fact they were the five daughters of Mara,
Lord of Darkness.
They were the spirits of Pride,
- [ Girls Speaking Nepali ]
- Greed, Fear,
Ignorance and Desire.
- [ Chattering Continues, Singing ]
- And Mara had sent them... to tempt Siddhartha away from his search.
[ Singing Continues ]
[ Chattering ]
- [ Girls Laughing, Chattering ]
- [ Singing Continues ]
[ Chattering, Singing
Continue ]
[ Chattering Continues ]
[ Lama Norbu Narrating ]
Mara had tried to tempt Siddhartha... in the cleverest of ways: by disguising the temptations of life... in the simplest forms.
But Siddhartha was looking beyond form, beyond the present.
And now
Mara was enraged.
[ All Gasping ]
[ Growling ]
- [ Laughing ]
- [ Growling Continues ]
[ Roaring ]
[ Roar Echoing ]
[ Girls Gasping, Shouting ]
- [ Wind Howling ]
- [ Shouting Continues ]
[ Thunderclap ]
[ Thunder Rumbling ]
[ Footsteps ]
[ Lama Norbu Narrating ]
It seemed as if Mara had been defeated, but in fact he had not yet given up the battle.
Now he attacked again.
You who go where no one else will dare, will you be my god?
Architect, finally I have met you.
You will not rebuild your house again.
But I am your house, and you live in me.
O lord of my own ego, you are pure illusion.
You do not exist.
The earth is my witness.
[ Lama Norbu ] Siddhartha won the battle against an army of demons, just through the force of his love... and the great compassion he had found.
[ Lama Norbu ]
And he achieved... the great calm that precedes... detachment from illusions.
He had reached beyond himself.
He was beyond joy or pain, separate from judgment.
Able to remember that he had been... a girl, a dolphin, a tree, a monkey.
[ Chuckles ]
He remembered his first birth... and the millions after that.
He could see beyond the universe.
- Siddhartha...
- [ Monkeys Squealing ] had seen the ultimate reality of all things.
He had understood... that every movement in the universe... is an effect provoked by a cause.
He knew there was no salvation... without compassion for every other being.
From that moment on,
Siddhartha was called the Buddha, the Awakened One.
[ Horns Blowing ]
[ Horns Blowing ]
[ Children Cheering,
Shouting ]
Welcome to our home.
[ Cheering, Shouting
Continue ]
Go on, join them, if you dare.
[ Shouting ]
[ Shouting
Continues ]
[ Shouting Continues ]
[ Shouting Stops,
Laughing ]
[ Laughter Continues,
Chattering in Tibetan ]
They began making this mandala the day I left the monastery.
And now it is almost complete.
[ Dean ] It's beautiful.
Why is it made of sand?
[ Lama Norbu ] To show the impermanence of all within the universe.
So when it is completed, it'll be destroyed with one gesture.
Like that.
[ Lama Norbu ]
It is very mysterious, Your Holiness.
All three children show the same signs.
Then we must ask the oracle, Lama Norbu.
Though in the end, only you can decide.
[ Children Shouting ]
[ Drums, Cymbals ]
[ Moaning ]
- [ Continues ]
- [ Moaning Continues ]
[ Moaning Intensifies ]
[ Moaning Continues ]
[ Moaning, Panting ]
[ Speaking Tibetan ]
[ Drums, Cymbals Continue ]
[ Chattering ]
[ Speaking Tibetan ]
[ Champa Whispering ]
Raju! Raju!
Oh, my teacher,
I'm so happy to have found you again.
Raju, come here!
Raju!
[ Monks Chanting ]
[ Chanting Continues ]
[ Monks Chanting,
Singing ]
Oh, my teacher,
I'm so happy to have found you again.
[ Singing Continues ]
[ Singing Continues ]
My teacher,
I'm so happy to have found you... at last.
Perhaps one day, you will find me.
I am truly happy, three times happy.
But how can we all be Lama Dorje?
[ Singing Continues ]
[ Singing Stops ]
It is very rare, but it has happened before.
Separate manifestations... of the body, the speech and the mind.
None of these three exists without the others.
All of us are attached... like the world to the universe.
But remember this:
The most important thing of all... is to feel compassion for all beings, to give of oneself, and above all, to pass on knowledge, like the Buddha.
[ Whip Cracks ]
[ Chattering in Tibetan ]
Jesse! Jesse!
- You all right?
- Uh, yes, thank you.
A little overcome, that's all.
- [ Sighs ]
- It's been a kind of emotional time for all of us.
I'm afraid... I'm not a very good example... of Buddhist detachment.
Children.
We are all children.
Um... the bowl is for Jesse.
And, uh, this is for you.
My work is done.
Now I can rest.
I can go back to... Tibet, to the place
I was born.
[ Chuckling ]
You still don't believe in reincarnation, do you?
[ Chuckling ]
[ Continues
Chuckling ]
[ Coughs, Gasps ]
[ Pants ]
Yesterday, he talked about going back to Tibet.
He must have meant something different.
Someone like Lama Norbu can remain like this... for ten days... or even more.
He can sit like a mountain, serene and unmovable.
And he can meditate deep and vast as ocean.
And then, smoothly, while doing meditation, he can enter into the state of death... with his own will.
- He's dying.
- We're all dying every minute.
Death is a big part of life.
Every breath that we breathe... we die.
What about his passion for life?
What about the people he's leaving behind?
He will come back.
I don't know if I believe it, but I'd like to.
[ Drumming, Chanting ]
[ Drumming,
Chanting Continue ]
- Lama Norbu passed away.
- [ All Chanting ]
[ Chanting Continues ]
[ Lama Norbu's Voice ]
Raju!
Jesse! Gita!
They are chanting the Heart Sutra.
The beautiful prayer.
Keep it with you in your hearts, always.
[ Chanting ]
Form is empty.
Emptiness is form.
No eye, ear, nose, tongue, body, mind.
No color, sound, smell, taste, touch, existing thing.
[ Chuckling Quietly ]
Lama Norbu just said:
No eye, no ear, no nose.
No Jesse, no Lama!
No you!
No death and no fear!
[ Lama Norbu ]
No old age in death.
No end to old age in death.
No suffering.
No "cause of"... or "end to"... suffering.
No path.
No wisdom.
And no gain.
No gain.
Thus bodhisattvas lived... in perfect understanding with no hindrance of mind.
No hindrance, therefore, no fear.
Far beyond deluded thoughts.
This is Nirvana.
- I can't get it open.
- I'll show you.
This is
Lama Norbu's kata.
This is Lama Norbu.
[ Dean ]
Come on, buddy! Give me a hand here.
Come on, Lisa.
Everybody goes!
Okay, I'm coming!
I only wish we had a crane to get me on board.
I can hear him kicking!
Or her.
Hey, Jesse.
Is it time?
Yes.
I think it's time.
You're cheating, Carlo.
He always cheated.
He can't stand to lose.
Neither can I.
But I don't cheat.
I taught you how to sing, Carlo Broschi.
Don't forget that I was your teacher.
Don't add ingratitude... to your insolence.
Say something.
What is he thinking?
He's decided to humiliate us with his scorn.
We're wasting our time.
Tonight the Broschis have decided to remain silent.
I hardly knew my father.
It was I who asked to hang his portraits throughout the house.
My mother was afraid she'd suffer.
But actually, it helped us.
I no longer have a father.
And you will never have children, right?
It's the greatest sorrow of my life.
Marry my mother!
Let us choose each other.
You'll be my father,
I'll really be your son.
I know the Church forbids castrati to marry.
But my mother is not a Catholic.
I know that she's really very lonely.
I'm very touched by your suggestion, Benedict.
I thank God for the love you bear me.
God has nothing to do with it.
It's a private gift.
Let's not stay here.
- What are you doing here?
- Let's go, please.
- Were you following me?
- It's not the first time.
What I just did put us in grave danger. 
Here, read it later.
How did you get this copy?
It's no copy.
It's Handel's original score.
I stole it for you.
My legs are still trembling.
You're insane!
Yes.
You've been singing Broschi for too long, haven't you?
You're starving for music worthy of your voice.
Now it's in your hands.
You need your brother even for a kiss?
Where were you, Carlo?
I'm talking to you!
You shouldn't be out in the cold.
It hurts your voice.
Why is she here?
We've been waiting for you, Carlo, with great impatience.
You're disheveled, young lady.
Did my brother give you what you expected?
You didn't answer my question.
Calm down. A night with her will do us both good.
I don't want to.
Have her taken home.
Let me have her.
Don't break our pact.
Let me. I need her.
I wouldn't advise it, Carlo.
You're good at two things,
Carlo Broschi.
Betrayal and loneliness!
We no longer need each other, castrato!
Castrato!
I beg you to stay.
I'm sorry.
Without him, it's no good.
To your health!
My dear Margaret!
Will you marry me?
I'm afraid you didn't hear my request.
I heard it perfectly, my friend... and I thank you for it.
Forgive my laughter.
It was a stupid defensive reflex.
It's a mistake, Carlo.
I will never marry again.
I owe Benedict's father that last fidelity.
You need no further excuse than the horror I inspire in you.
Oh, no!
But I am too aware to share your blindness.
Probably because
I often play God on stage...
I dared to think I could be a man.
Forgive me, both of you.
It's impossible.
I cannot.
Come, Benedict.
You're tearing me apart, Carlo.
To protect my love,
I must crush my feelings.
To hell with those rats!
I'm so tired.
I am so tired!
Too much pride.
Don't despise your music, Maestro.
Who let you in?
Don't resist.
Follow the thread of my voice, like a musical progression.
I only want to talk.
- Where did you get that?
- It doesn't matter.
I came to offer you this music.
How dare you?
I'll sing it for you.
Sing it for me?
It's time we made peace.
We both had the mystery revealed to us.
Music belongs to me just as it belongs to you.
What music?
Good enough to squeeze cheap tears from females who swoon over your voice?
Is that how you presume to move me?
With your music, I will.
Because of you, and to save this theater...
I exhaust myself composing works unworthy of my talent.
You're causing my music to deviate from its course.
I'll never forgive you for that, Farinelli.
A castrato's voice is an example of nature abused... rerouted from its goal, in order to deceive.
You've subverted your voice to virtuosity without soul... devoted only to artifice!
Let it stay there!
Give me back my score.
You know, Maestro... some people say that my singing... has power over people.
Don't turn my voice into an instrument of death.
You don't frighten me.
Everyone knows that Farinelli promotes his own legend.
Keep on splitting their ears... with stupid operas full of idiotic characters!
Is that him?
Yes, it is.
You see, Carlo?
I'm happy.
My body doesn't refuse to grow.
Are you in pain, child?
It's not really pain.
Just a feeling of utter fragility.
Like a snail without its shell.
Alexandra has the world's softest hands.
But I won't share them with anyone else.
Delightful!
Quick, cover it up.
We're helpless, Alexandra.
But one thing is certain.
You love me, don't you?
Where is my score?
Where does your brother hide the opera he stole from me?
Tell me... and I'll leave you in peace, like a rat in your attic.
Thieves!
You've stolen my brother from me, Maestro.
Your music... separated us more than any ocean could have.
Who composed this?
Play it. Go ahead!
Neither excessive... nor unnecessary flourishes.
It doesn't seem like you.
This is an entreaty.
The harmony should be changed.
Take this supplication into the dominant.
Move over!
After the major third... repeat the theme up a fourth.
Your brother is a monster.
Play! Go ahead!
This is weak.
Not enough violence!
Wait.
Expand the chord... and dare a chromatic move to D-fat.
Not bad. Not bad at all!
Who does he think he is?
God?
He's destroying you... and wants to destroy me, too.
Bring me the rest.
Some ink, pens, wine.
What are you waiting for?
When did you plan to finish it?
When did you start this?
When?
The day when--
The day my brother was castrated.
That day, I promised him... it would be... our joint masterpiece.
You'll never finish this opera.
Never!
You no longer have any reason to finish it.
He doesn't need you anymore.
It is you who needs him.
You've been deprived of your instrument, 
Signor Broschi.
You're like Narcissus without his reflection. 
Like Orpheus without his lute.
You're right, Maestro.
Without him, your music no longer exists.
Without him... you are nothing but silence.
At 17...
I composed my first melody.
I wrote it for Carlo.
You may be the only one who can understand.
His voice--
His voice was sublime.
And my music flowed from my brother's throat.
When did he fall off that horse?
He never fell off.
When Father died...
Carlo became seriously ill.
My father had entrusted him to me.
He was delirious.
I was afraid of losing him.
I soothed him with some opium... and by telling him the story of an opera... that I invented day after day to help him dream.
He loved to sing, Maestro.
He loved to sing.
His face--
His face was transfigured when he sang.
That angelic voice had to be preserved.
It had to be done quickly.
Opium eventually wears off.
His voice had to be kept from being ruined... by the repulsive alchemy... that time inflicts on the body.
My music unified us, Maestro... closer than lovers.
Do you realize the scandal we will create?
A Handel opera performed at the Nobles theater!
It's unheard of!
Incredible!
How could I have let all this happen?
Finally, Farinelli... what rendered us enemies for so many years... will be resolved tonight.
It's time to settle our account before God.
Do you remember the opera... that your brother promised you when you were boys?
Do you remember, Farinelli, with what emotion he spoke of it?
Did you ever ask yourself... whether it was to soothe the pain of your castration... or to still his howling conscience?
It's time you faced the truth... that has haunted you since childhood.
Why do you refuse to hear what you've known all along?
It's to this brother who had you castrated... that you dedicated all your talent.
And to perpetuate this brotherly pact... you spat in the face of Handel.
You managed to turn me into what you've always been.
You castrated... my imagination.
Starting now, I'll never compose another opera again. Never again!
You are the first to know... and the only one to blame.
Ask God for the strength to continue... and to sing, without wavering, the music you stole from me...
Farinelli.
Come on!
Carlo! Come outside!
Let's see you, Carlo!
You've no right to reject me!
I've looked for you for three years!
Come out!
I've looked for you everywhere!
Carlo!
Carlo!
Answer me!
You're a Broschi, Carlo, just like me!
You can't have forgotten.
That's impossible!
Carlo, come on!
Our opera!
I've finished it!
Carlo, I've finished it!
I composed it for you!
"Orpheus"!
"Orpheus"!
Here it is!
Come on, Carlo!
Carlo, come out!
Do something.
I know you're there, Alexandra!
Don't take him away from me!
Don't take him away from me!
Do you want to kill me?
Is that what you want?
Without me, you'd be nothing.
I created you.
Farinelli!
I created you!
Castrato!
Castrato!
Castrato!
Carlo, please!
He'll go crazy!
Tell him you love him.
Go ahead. Go.
I can't.
Your brother needs you, and so do I.
I need you, too.
Do you hear me?
I sacrificed everything for this love.
I know it's senseless... but I love you.
I don't want to lose you.
I don't want to lose you.
Three years, Carlo!
Three years!
I knew it was you.
It's very beautiful.
Really?
You really think so?
It's your most beautiful composition!
It's what I always waited for.
We could work on it together.
Perform "Orpheus" here in Madrid.
Everyone will love it if you sing it.
Your brother no longer sings, Riccardo... except for the King.
And maybe for you?
It's strange.
There's something in your face when you suffer... that's poignantly reminiscent of your brother.
That must be why
I can't really hate you.
Do you know how much I've suffered, writing our opera?
You're telling me about suffering, 
Riccardo? You?
Can't you see, 
I'm asking for your forgiveness?
Haven't I atoned for enough?
I don't think so.
Never enough!
Is the earth simply a tomb?
Bring back the sun, Farinelli.
Riccardo!
Riccardo!
My beloved brother...
It is without much hope that I'll search in distant lands...
amidst the clashes of war...
for emotions as intense...
as those I derived from music.
At this moment, Carlo...
with my heart heavy from leaving you...
I'm giving you back what I had taken from you.
Your share of humanity.
I've burned our opera.
That music and the past...
are irrelevant today.
But what I am leaving with you, Carlo...
is that not also...
our joint creation?
Greetings, my friend.
You are interested in the unknown, the mysterious, the unexplainable.
That is why you are here.
And now, for the first time, we are bringing you the full story of what happened.
We are giving you all the evidence based only on the secret testimony of the miserable souls who survived this terrifying ordeal.
The incidents, places.
My friend, we cannot keep this a secret any longer.
Can your heart stand the shocking facts of the true story of Edward D. Wood, Jr?
It's 8:15.
We can't hold the curtain any longer.
Cripes, what am I gonna tell the cast?
It's press night and there's no press!
- Do you believe in ghosts?
- Nah, Tommy.
That's just kiddie spook stories.
Once you're dead, you stay dead.
I don't know, Bill.
Out on that battlefield today,
I saw this woman dressed in white floating above the dunes.
Maybe it was just fatigue or maybe it's the indignities of war.
Or maybe it's somethin' else.
Hey, I think I see somethin'.
I offer you mortals the bird of peace so that you may change your ways and end this destruction.
What a show! Everyone was terrific.
Paul, your second act monologue actually gave me the chills.
Oh, thanks, Eddie.
I got the early edition, hot off the presses!
This is the big moment.
Oh, what does that old queen know?
She didn't even show.
Sent her copy boy to do the dirty work.
- Screw you, Miss Crowley.
- Do I really have a face like a horse?
What does "ostentatious" mean?
Hey, it's not that bad.
You can't concentrate on the negative.
Look, he's got some nice things to say here.
"The soldiers' costumes are very realistic."
That's positive!
- Rave of the century.
- Well, I've seen a lot worse reviews.
I've seen reviews where they didn't even mention the costumes.
Like that last Francis the Mule picture.
It got terrible notices.
- Huge hit!
- Lines around the block.
That's right. Don't take it too seriously.
We're all doing great work.
- Do you really think so?
- Absolutely.
Honey, what if I'm wrong?
- What if I just don't got it?
- Ed, it was only one review.
Orson Welles was only 26 when he made Citizen Kane.
I'm already 30.
Ed, you're still young.
This is the time in your life when you're supposed to be struggling.
I know. But I'm scared it's not going to get any better than this.
Oh, I hate having to wake up this early.
Gosh, where's my pink sweater?
I can never seem to find my clothes anymore.
Hey, big shot! Get off your ass and get this over to the executive building.
- Sure thing, Mr. Kravitz.
- Hey, Charlie, come here.
What did I tell ya about watering these plants, eh?
I want some water on 'em!
Don't sprinkle the damn things!
Soak 'em!
Hi.
All right, people, settle.
And action!
Wow! Look at these camels!
These are real camels!
- Gosh, where'd they get real camels?
- Hey, you!
Move it outta here, huh?
Hey, Eddie! Come in here.
I got some great new stuff to show you.
This is fantastic.
What are you gonna do with it?
Probably file it away and never see it again.
Ah, it's such a waste.
Why, if I had half the chance,
I could make an entire movie using this stock footage.
The story opens on these mysterious explosions.
Nobody knows what's causing them, but it's upsetting all the buffalo.
So the military are called in to solve the mystery.
You forgot the octopus.
No, no. I'm saving that for my big underwater climax.
Hello.
They say he was a girl trapped in a man's body.
I bet it hurt when they cut his thing off.
What are you ladies gabbin' about?
You know that Christine Jorgensen freak?
- It's...
- He... She... in Variety.
Some producer's makin' a biopic.
Really? I didn't read that story.
Yes, I've got Mr. Edward Wood on the line.
Could you please hold?
Mr. Weiss? Ed Wood here.
Listen, I heard about your new project and I was curious if you'd signed a director yet.
Oh, you haven't!
Well, if we could get together,
I could explain to you why I'm more qualified to direct this than anyone else in town.
Well, I'd rather not go into that over the phone.
All right. Great!
I'll see you then. Bye!
Eddie, I don't understand.
Why are you the most qualified director for the Christine Jorgensen story?
Oh, it's just hogwash, hon.
I had to get into the door somehow.
No, I love you like a brother.
No, no, no. No, no, no.
That's a falsehood!
Come in!
Look, when I said you could have the western territories,
I didn't mean all 11 states!
I meant California, Oregon, and what's that one on top?
Washington, yeah, yeah!
Oh, really?
Well, screw you!
Hi. Can I help you?
Yes. I'm Ed Wood.
I'm here about directing the Christine Jorgensen picture.
Well, a couple of things have changed.
It ain't gonna be the Christine Jorgensen story no more.
Goddamn Variety had to print the story before I got the rights.
- Now that bitch is asking for the sky.
- Ah, you're not gonna make the movie.
No, of course I'm gonna make the picture.
I already presold Alabama and Oklahoma.
Those repressed Okies, they go for that twisted, perverted stuff.
We'll just do it without the she-male.
We'll fictionalize it.
- Is there a script?
- Fuck no. But, there's a poster.
It opens in nine weeks in Tulsa.
Well, Mr. Weiss, look no further.
I'm your man.
I work fast and I'm a deal.
I write and direct. And I'm good.
I just did a play in Hollywood and Victor Crowley himself praised its realism.
There's about 500 guys in this town that can say the same thing.
On the phone you said you had some special qualifications?
Mr. Weiss
I have never told anyone what I'm about to tell you.
But I really want this job.
I like to dress in women's clothing.
You're a fruit?
No, not at all. I love women.
Wearing their clothes makes me feel closer to them.
- You're not a fruit.
- No, I'm all man. I even fought in WWII.
Of course, I was wearing women's undergarments under my uniform.
Ya got to be kidding me.
Confidentially, I even paratrooped wearing a brassiere and panties.
I tell ya, I wasn't scared of being killed, but I was terrified of getting wounded and having the medics discover my secret.
So you think this qualifies you to make my movie?
Yes!
I know what it's like to live with a secret and worry about what people are gonna think of ya.
My girlfriend still doesn't know why her sweaters are always stretched out.
Ed, you seem like a nice kid.
Look around you.
I don't hire directors with burning desires to tell their stories.
I make movies like Chained Girls.
I need someone with experience who can shoot a film in four days and make me a profit.
I'm sorry. That's all that matters.
Can I get you anything else, kid?
Too constrictive!
I can't even fold my arms.
Gee, Mr. Lugosi,
I've never had any complaints.
This is the most uncomfortable coffin
I've ever been in.
Your selection is quite shoddy.
You're wasting my time!
Mr. Lugosi?
I told you I don't want any of your goddamn coffins!
No, no! I don't work here.
- Then who are you? What do you want?
- I don't want anything.
I'm just a really big, big fan.
I've seen all your movies.
Mr. Lugosi, why are you buying a coffin?
I'm planning on dying soon.
- No!
- Yes!
I'm embarking on another bus and truck tour of Dracula.
Twelve cities in 10 days, if that's conceivable.
Do you know that I saw you perform Dracula in Poughkeepsie in 1938?
That was a terrible production.
- Renfield was a drunk!
- I thought it was great.
You know, you're much scarier in real life than you are in the movie.
Thank you.
I even waited outside to get your autograph, but you never came out.
Well, I apologize. When I play Dracula,
I put myself into a trance.
It takes me much time to reemerge.
Oh, there's my bus.
Shit, where is my transfer?
- Say, don't you have a car?
- I refuse to drive in this country.
Too many madmen.
I've got a car.
Boy, Mr. Lugosi, you must lead such an exciting life.
- When is your next picture coming out?
- I have no next picture.
You gotta be jokin'.
A great star like you, you must have dozens of 'em lined up.
Back in the old days, yes.
But now, no one gives two fucks for Bela.
- But you're a big star.
- No more.
I haven't worked in four years.
This business, this town, it chews you up, then spits you out.
I'm just an ex-bogeyman.
Make a right.
They don't want the classic horror films anymore.
Today, it's all giant bugs.
Giant spiders, giant grasshoppers.
Who would believe such nonsense?
The old ones were much spookier, they had castles and full moons.
They were mythic.
- They had a poetry to them.
- Yes.
And you know what else? The women...
The women prefer the traditional monsters.
The women. Huh.
The pure horror, it both repels and attracts them.
Because in their collective unconsciousness, they have the agony of childbirth.
The blood... The blood is horror.
You know, I never thought of that.
Take my word for it.
If you want to make out with a young lady you take her to see Dracula.
Eh, what a mess.
My wife of 20 years left me last month.
I'm not much of a housekeeper.
All right, I'm coming.
I'll feed you, my darlings.
I'd better get going.
But perhaps we could get together again some time, Mr. Lugosi.
Certainly.
But now, the children of the night are calling me.
Uh...
- Good day.
- Good day.
Sweetie, you won't believe it.
I've got incredible news.
- You got the job!
- No, I didn't get the job.
- But something better happened.
- Better than not getting the job.
Yes! I met a movie star.
- Somebody really big.
- Who? Robert Taylor?
No. A horror movie star.
- Boris Karloff?
- Close.
The other one.
You met Basil Rathbone!
Oh, to heck with you.
I met Bela Lugosi.
- Why, I thought he was dead.
- No, he's very much alive.
Well, sort of.
He's old and frail, but he's still Bela Lugosi and he's really nice.
I can't even remember the last time
I saw him in a picture.
It's a shame.
He's such a great actor and no one uses him anymore.
- So, did you get his autograph?
- No, it wasn't like that at all.
It was just the two of us and we were talking.
He treated me like a friend.
- Yeah, well, he's a bum.
- No, he's not.
Do you have any idea how much money he made for this studio?
Dracula, The Black Cat, The Raven.
Yeah? Well, now he's a junkie.
He don't deserve to work.
- That is not true!
- He's so great, you hire him.
Yeah, well, I would if I could.
Trick or treat!
The house looks like they have lots of kids.
Oh, those eyes.
He gives me the willies.
Uh, I hate it when she interrupts the picture.
She doesn't show 'em the proper respect.
I think she's a honey.
Look at those jugs.
But he stood me up at the restaurant.
I guess I shouldn't have picked a steak house.
And then I went out with the Wolf Man.
What an evening. 
I didn't know whether to kiss him good night...
Vampira, you will come under my spell.
You will be my slave of love.
My gosh, Bela! How do you do that?
You must be double-jointed.
And you must be Hungarian.
Vampira, look at me.
Look into my eyes.
You're watching our Halloween movie,
White Zombie
starring Bela Lugosi,
John Harron, Madge Bellamy,
and a bunch of other people
I've never heard of.
I'm very tired.
I need to take my medicine.
- Do you want me to get it for you?
- No.
Thank you, Eddie.
I'll be all right.
Oh, shit.
I feel much better!
Children! I love children!
Trick or treat!
Aren't you scared, little boy?
I'm going to drink your blood.
You're not a real vampire.
Those teeth don't frighten me.
How about these?
Hey, how'd you do that?
Dentures. Lost my pearlies in the war.
So, what was the important news you couldn't tell me on the phone, again?
I started thinking about what you were saying about how your movies need to make a profit.
What is the one thing, if you put it in a movie, it'll be successful?
- Tits.
- No, better than that. A star.
Kid, you must have me confused with David Selznick.
I don't make major motion pictures,
I make crap.
Yes! But if you take that crap and put a star in it, then you've got something.
- Yeah. Crap with a star.
- No, something better!
Something impressive.
Maybe the biggest money-maker you've ever had.
Fine, all right.
You may be right, but it doesn't frickin' matter.
I can't afford a star, so what are we even talkin' about?
All right. What if I told you you could have a star for $1,000?
Who?
- Lugosi?
- Yes! Lugosi!
Isn't he dead?
No, he's not dead.
He lives in Baldwin Hills.
I met him recently and he really wants to be in our movie.
Why would Lugosi want to do a sex change flick?
Because he's my friend!
All right, fine!
You can direct it.
I want a script in three days.
We start shooting a week from Monday.
Mr. Weiss, thank you so much.
You won't regret it. I won't let you down.
But, Bunny, you're perfect for this job.
You know these people.
I need all the transsexuals and transvestites I can get.
No, I don't care if they're not actors.
I want realism!
I want this film to tell the truth.
Coming!
I've waited all my life for this shot, and I'm not gonna blow it.
- Eddie, you got a new movie for me, eh?
- Yes!
It's gonna be a great picture and you'll love your character. Have a seat.
Listen, Bunny? Bela's here.
I gotta go.
Listen, hit the bars, work some parties, and get me transvestites!
I need transvestites!
All right. Bye.
Eddie, what kind of a movie is this?
Well, it's about how people have two personalities:
The side they show to the world, and then the secret person they hide inside.
Like Jekyll and Hyde.
I've always wanted to play Jekyll and Hyde.
I'm looking forward to this production.
Well, your part's a little different.
You're like the god that looks over all the characters and oversees everything.
I don't understand.
You control everyone's fate.
You're like the puppet master.
- Ah, so I pull the strings!
- Yes, you pull the strings.
"Pull the strings." I like that!
Honey!
I got a little surprise for you.
Wipe off your hands.
- I finished my script.
- Oh!
Ed, I'm so proud of you!
I'll read it as soon as I get home.
Well, I'd really like to know what you think.
Why don't you go in the bedroom and take a look? I'll wait.
Go ahead.
Take your time.
So that's where my sweater's been.
How long have you been doing this?
Since I was a kid.
My mom wanted a girl, so she used to dress me in girlie clothing.
Just became a habit.
Jesus Christ!
And you never told me?
Well, this is my way of telling you.
What, by putting it in a fucking script for everyone to see?
What kind of sick mind operates like that?
And what about this, this so-called Barbara character that's obviously me?
I mean, this is our life.
It's so embarrassing!
Of course it is.
That's why you should play the part.
Oh, you got nerve, buddy.
- It's a darn good role.
- That's not the issue!
God, how can you act so casual when you're dressed like that?
It makes me feel comfortable.
Oh, just like in the script.
Exactly.
So, what do you say?
Do we break up?
Or do you want to make the movie with me?
They make you tall, and you're flashy.
They want that.
Okay. But they want professionalism, so nix on the Nelly without losing naivet, okay?
Now, the good news is you're probably going to get hired because you look like Peggy Lee.
But I don't want anybody else to resent that, okay? Please?
'Cause there's enough for everybody, exotics, too.
All right, because if you're not going to smile, please don't bother.
You'll embarrass me.
This is George Weiss.
He's done some very important things, he's a nice person to know.
I thought you were gonna make a sex change film!
- It's still a sex change film.
- Yeah! Five pages before it ends!
The rest is about some schmuck who likes angora sweaters!
I don't think he's a schmuck.
What about this title? My poster says,
I Changed My Sex.
So change the poster.
Trust me, you'll be better off.
This story's gonna grab people.
It's about this guy, he's crazy about this girl, but he likes to wear dresses.
Should he tell her? Should he not tell her?
He's torn. This is drama!
Fine! Shoot whatever baloney you want.
Just make sure it's seven reels long.
Testing.
Excuse me.
Can I get everyone's attention, please?
Could you gather around?
I've got something to say.
Everybody, we're about to embark on quite a journey: four days of hard work.
But when it's over, we'll have a picture that'll entertain, enlighten and maybe even move millions of people.
Excuse me, Eddie. I don't mean to interrupt.
I'm worried about the light.
Good thinking. All right, we'll talk about days three and four later.
Let's get that first shot off.
Scene 17, Glenda looking in the window.
And action!
And cut!
Print that! Let's move on!
Don't you want a second take for protection?
What's to protect?
It was perfect! Come on!
Hey! Cops!
We don't have a permit. Run!
Come on. Let's go.
What's going on with these revised pages?
Mr. Lugosi's here.
Oh, my God!
Mr. Lugosi's here!
Everyone! Everyone!
Everyone, come on.
Come in here.
Listen.
When he walks onto the stage, treat him normal.
I know Bela Lugosi's a world-famous star and you're all very excited but look, we are professionals.
So, just treat him with respect.
Everything will be all right.
Bela!
Great to see ya!
8:00 on the dot. Right on time.
- I'm always on time.
- Of course you are.
We've got a big day planned for you.
But first we're gonna start out kinda easy with you in that armchair over there.
Then once you're up to speed and cookin', we'll reset and bring in the lab equipment.
- Eddie?
- Huh?
- What about my money?
- Huh? Oh.
What are you people doing?
Get back to work!
All right, people.
Let's get ready.
Mr. Lugosi, I know you're very busy but, can I have your autograph?
Certainly.
You know which movie of yours I love, Mr. Lugosi?
The Invisible Ray.
You were great as Karloff's sidekick.
Karloff?
Sidekick?
Fuck you!
Karloff does not deserve to smell my shit!
That limey cocksucker can rot in hell for all I care!
What happened?
How dare that asshole bring up Karloff?
You think it takes talent to play Frankenstein?
It's all make-up and grunting.
I agree. Bela, I agree 100%.
Now, Dracula, that's a role that requires talent.
Of course!
Dracula requires presence.
It's all in the eyes and the voice
- and the hand.
- That's right. That's right.
You seem a little agitated.
You wanna go outside and get some air?
Bullshit! I'm ready now.
Roll the camera!
We're rolling.
- Sound. Speed.
- Scene 97, take one. Mark.
Action.
Beware.
Beware.
Beware of the big, green dragon that sits on your doorstep.
He eats little boys, puppy dog tails, and big, fat snails.
Beware.
Take care.
Beware.
Wait!
Pull the string! Pull the string!
Cut.
Perfect.
But Georgie, I'm proud.
I wrote, directed and starred in it just like Orson Welles did in Citizen Kane.
Yeah, well, Orson Welles didn't wear angora sweaters, did he?
How can you just walk around like that in front of all these people?
Well, hon, nobody's bothered but you.
Look around.
Ed, this isn't the real world!
You've surrounded yourself with a bunch of weirdoes.
Oh, say it a little louder.
I don't think Bela heard you.
Dolores.
I need your help.
My mind's in a muddle, like in a thick fog.
I thought I could stop wearing these things.
I tried. Honestly, I tried.
Glen.
I don't fully understand but maybe together we can work this out.
Music swells. Cut and print!
It's a wrap.
How do you do?
I'm here to see Mr. Feldman.
What's your name?
Edward D. Wood, Jr.
He's in the executive building.
- You can park in the reserved section.
- Thanks very much.
- Please, sit down.
- Thanks.
So, what are you bringing me?
Looks like you got some film cans.
Well, some people bring their resumes.
I've brought my own movie.
Really. Well, good for you.
I just shot this baby for Screen Classics.
It opens next week.
Screen Classics?
No, I don't know them.
There's something you should know.
Nobody in town has seen this picture, so I'm giving you first crack at my talents.
Thank you.
And I'm anxious to see it.
So, what's up next for you?
I don't believe in thinking small, so I've got a whole slate of pictures for you.
You ready? Okay.
The Vampire's Tomb.
The Ghoul Goes West.
And
Doctor Acula.
Doctor Acula? I don't get it.
Doctor
Racula.
Oh, I get it.
I don't like it.
But it'll star Bela Lugosi.
Bela Lugosi? Lugosi's all washed-up.
What else you got?
Well, I do have another project.
I wasn't going to tell you about it.
Lugosi's in it, but it's a small part.
The lead is an ingnue.
A sterling, young actress,
Dolores Fuller.
The title of the film:
Bride Of The Atom!
Atomic age stuff, huh?
I like it. I like it.
I tell you what, Mr. Ward.
Why don't you leave your film cans with me.
And my associates and I will take a look at your little opus and maybe we can do some business together.
Take care. Beware.
Pull the string! Pull the string!
What the hell is this?
- Is this an actual movie?
- It can't be!
Give this man satin undies, a dress, sweater and skirt,
or even the lounging outfit he has on
and he's the happiest human being in the world.
Wait a minute.
Wait a minute.
That guy in the dress.
That's the guy I met today.
Oh, this has got to be a put-on.
These things are his comfort.
This is probably another one of Billy Wellman's practical jokes.
He just entered the street dressed
in the clothes he so much desires to wear.
But, only if he really appears female:
Long hair, make-up, clothing, the actual contours of a girl.
Oh, God!
Most transvestites do not want to change their life, their bodies.
This is funny. This is funny.
Thank you.
Georgie, I thought Glen Or Glenda? was opening this week.
Where's the ads?
Where's the ads?
The ads are in Alabama, Indiana, Missouri, you schmuck!
It ain't gonna play in L.A.!
- Why not?
- Nobody wants to see this piece of shit!
Hey, you can't talk that way about my movie!
Your movie?
I wish it was your movie!
I wish I hadn't blown every dime I ever made into making this stink bomb!
And if I ever see ya again,
I'll kill ya!
Hello?
Georgie?
- Guess where I'm going next week?
- I don't know. Where?
Mexico.
- Guess what I'm doing when I get there.
- I don't know. Lie on a beach.
Wrong. I'm getting my first series of hormone injections.
When those girls kick in they're gonna take out my organs and make me a woman.
Are you serious?
It's something I've wanted to do for a long time.
But it wasn't until I saw your movie that I realized I have to take action!
- Goodbye, penis!
- Would you please keep it down.
The "Super Swedish Angel,"
Tor Johnson!
My gosh, look at that guy.
He's a mountain!
And after I'm a woman,
Jean-Claude and I are going to be married.
- I'm going to be a June bride.
- He's a monster.
Can you imagine what that guy would look like in a movie?
Yeah, yeah! Yeah!
More neck.
Mr. Johnson, congratulations on your victory.
Thank you.
- Did you bring my water?
- No, I'm not the water boy.
I'm a movie director.
- Movies? Like the Mickey Mouse?
- Sure.
- I'll get you next week!
- Yeah, right. In your dreams!
Tor... Uh, Mr. Johnson.
You ever fancy the notion of becoming an actor?
Not good-looking enough.
Well, I think you're quite handsome.
Do my toes.
So, anyway, I've got this new script,
Bride Of The Atom.
And there's a part
I believe you're ideal for.
Lobo. He's tough, he's a brute.
But he's got a good heart.
At the end of the picture, he saves the girl.
I like! When do movie shoot?
Hopefully, very soon.
I'm just waiting for the final okay from my good pal at Warners, Mr. Feldman.
- Wood Productions.
- Eddie, help me.
- Bela?
- Eddie, please come over.
Bela?
Bela?
Bela!
Bela!
Bela? What happened?
Eddie.
I didn't feel well.
Come on, let me get you to the hospital.
No hospital.
Just take me to the couch.
- Should I call a doctor?
- No.
This happens all the time.
Is there anything I can get for you?
Water or a blanket?
Goulash.
I don't know how to make goulash.
Bela, what's in the needle?
Morphine.
With a Demerol chaser.
Oh, Eddie. Eddie, I'm so broke.
I don't know what I'm going to do.
Don't worry, Bela.
I won't let you down.
Mr. Feldman? Ed Wood.
Yeah, listen, I haven't been able to get through, so I just showed up.
Yeah! Right out front.
So, we gonna be working together?
Really? Worst film you ever saw.
Well, my next one will be better.
Hello. Hello.
I'm no good.
Oh, Ed, it was just one man's opinion.
Bela needs a job.
I can't even get a film going.
Of course I can't.
I made the worst movie of all time.
Oh, that's ridiculous.
All I wanna do is tell stories.
The things that I find interesting.
Well, maybe you're not studio kind of material.
Maybe you just need to raise the money yourself.
The movie is called Bride Of The Atom.
It will star Bela Lugosi.
There are quarter shares available at $15,000 each.
Yes, that's right.
The Bela Lugosi.
He's still alive.
Huh? Is he available Friday night?
Well, gee, I suppose so. Why?
"Greetings, I am the Count."
"Greetings, I am Slick Slomopavitz,
Seeker of Adventure.
"Audience laughs, applauds.
'Say, that's a kooky place to sleep.'"
- "It is my home."
- "Oh, tract housing, huh? Laugh."
"You need a new real estate agent."
"I beg to differ.
"This casket incap... incarpertate..."
No, Bela, that's "incorporates."
Look, why don't you just say,
"This casket has..."
How do they expect a Hungarian to pronounce this dialogue?
This live television is madness!
Furthermore, I predict by April 19, 1970,
I predict men will have colonized Mars.
Millions of people will live there.
Wow! Ain't that somethin'?
And now we take you to a castle in Transylvania.
Watch out.
The landlord's a real pain in the neck.
Greetings! I am the Count!
Greetings, pal!
I'm Slick Slomopavitz, Seeker of Adventure!
Hey, what a kooky place to sleep.
Kind of reminds me of my house.
What a dump!
Some places got a Murphy bed, this place got a Murphy shower.
I still don't know where to hang the towels.
I beg to differ.
Beg to differ? A bloodsucker, right?
I'm talkin' about my towels.
Greetings! I am the Count.
Damn!
A bum is what he is.
I told you we should've got Karloff!
Ah, don't worry about it, Bela.
You're better than all this.
I never said I could ad-lib.
Forget it! We'll make our own movie and you'll be a big star again.
Mr. Lugosi, it is an unparalleled privilege to meet you, sir.
Allow me to introduce myself.
I am Criswell.
It's a pleasure.
Ah, cheer up. Don't lose heart over what happened tonight.
I predict your next project will be an outstanding success!
Wow!
And who may you be?
Edward D. Wood, Jr.
- The director of Glen Or Glenda?
- How'd you know?
I am Criswell. I know all.
And bingo!
Thank you, thank you, thank you.
Whoa, whoa, whoa, whoa.
Bring me two more Beefeater martinis.
Ed, another whiskey.
Dagmar, a rum and coke?
Moustapha and King are Chablis.
Bela, would you like a wine?
No. I never drink wine.
Say, Cris, how'd you know we'd be living on Mars by 1970?
- I guessed.
- Really?
I made it up.
It's horse shit.
Eddie, there's no such thing as a psychic.
People believe my folderol because I wear a black tuxedo.
- It's that easy?
- Eddie, we're in show biz.
It's all about razzle-dazzle, appearances.
If you look good and you talk well, people will swallow anything.
We are going to have the most terrifying monster ever seen on film.
A ghastly creature created from an atomic mutation!
I don't like scary movies.
I like the ones with love stories.
That's just what this movie is: a heartbreaking romance.
You're quite a specimen.
- And you're going to be in the picture?
- Yeah. I play Lobo.
I predict Bride Of The Atom will be the biggest moneymaker of all time.
And this is lovely starlet Dolores Fuller, who will play Janet Lawton.
My pleasure, ma'am.
Now, how much will this picture cost?
Well, in a normal studio it'd be about a million bucks with all their wasteful overhead and fancy offices.
But we're more efficient, so we could bring it in at about 70 grand.
Oh. Well, I shall certainly consider it.
- Well, goodbye.
- Good night, Ed. Keep in touch.
Goodbye.
Well, Eddie, how'd we do?
We didn't make a nickel.
I cannot believe I'm in Hollywood.
You know, Daddy didn't want me to move out here.
Ma'am, your bill comes to $2.20.
Oh. Uh, okay. I hope you don't mind but all I have is a fifty.
I just came from my banker's.
- That's all right.
- Thank you.
Excuse me. You just moved here?
Yes. Hollywood is, oh, so exciting.
Isn't it?
Pleased to make your acquaintance.
I'm Loretta King.
Edward D. Wood, Jr.
Hi. Would you like some water?
No!
No water. No liquids.
I'm terribly allergic to them.
You know, I work in Hollywood.
I'm a producer.
Really? Wow!
I would love to be involved in that.
Is that right?
Well, maybe I can help you out.
Have you ever thought about investing in a motion picture?
Perhaps a small amount of money.
How much do your motion pictures cost?
Well, my new one, I think, would be about $60,000.
That's all? That seems very reasonable for an entire picture.
Would you like to
- have a look at the photoplay?
- Oh, sure.
Oh, my.
This is very interesting.
Say, do you think it would be possible for me to maybe play one of these parts?
Oh, you want to be an actress, too.
Well, of course.
There's a couple of parts I can think of right now that you might be perfect for.
There's the secretary in the newspaper office, the file clerk...
Hmm. Those sound kind of small.
Here's one that looks good, Janet Lawton.
I'd sure like to play her.
- Janet Lawton.
- Yes.
Janet Lawton is clearly the part to play.
Can't you just see me in the part?
Yes!
You'd be perfect.
You bastard!
You two-timing, dress-wearing son of a bitch!
Honey, it was the only way
I could get the movie made!
Who do you think's been paying the rent?
Who's been helping you type your scripts and do all your grunt work?
I am sorry!
What did you want me to say?
You were supposed to say,
"No. I wrote that part for my girlfriend Dolores!"
Snowball, there are plenty of other parts.
Like what?
The secretary, the file clerk.
You asshole!
This is gonna be Bela's laboratory, so it should be real impressive just like one of those
"Mad Scientist" movies.
I want test tubes, beakers and one of those electrical things that buzzes.
- You mean a Tesla coil?
- Fine. Whatever. Hop to it!
Right! Right.
- Eddie?
- Yes?
- Which dress do you like better?
- Hmm. I don't know.
Say, Bill, which dress works better for you, the red one or the green one?
- Which one is the red one?
- What do you mean?
I mean, I can't see the difference,
I'm color blind.
But I kinda like the dark gray one.
At Universal, we used to shoot one or two scenes a day.
But Eddie can knock off 20, 30.
- He's incredible!
- And action!
Okay, you're Dr. Eric Vornoff and you're upset.
You've worked very hard on this experiment and you don't want to see it fail.
No, you're not that upset.
You wanna keep moving.
You wanna go through that door.
And cut! Beautiful.
Print it.
Let's move immediately to scene 52.
- Tor, you in place?
- Yeah.
- Great. Roll camera!
- Rolling. Slate.
Cue rainstorm.
And action, Tor.
Okay. You're Lobo.
You're upset.
You've worked very hard helping Dr. Vornoff with this experiment.
You don't wanna see it fail.
No, no. You're not that upset.
You wanna keep moving.
You've got to get through that door.
And cut! Perfect!
- Print it. Let's move on.
- Don't you wanna do another take, Ed?
Looks like big baldy had a little trouble gettin' through the door.
No, it's fine. It's real.
You know, in actuality, Lobo would have to struggle with that problem every day.
All right, people, let's get ready.
Actors! I must have my actors!
There you are.
Loretta, Tor, I wanna explain this scene, it's a little complicated, but...
Bela, you'll be sitting there. Okay?
I'm not getting near that goddamn thing.
One of them burned me on The Return Of Chandu.
All right.
- Then you'll be sitting there.
- Good.
Great. All right, gang, here's the scene.
Loretta, you're in a trance, you glide in and get on the operating table.
Now, Tor, you're supposed to tie her down, but you have an angora fetish and when you rub that swatch of angora, it makes you refuse.
So then Bela has to discipline you.
All right? Great! Let's do it!
Action!
Strap her to the table.
Do as I command you!
I'll teach you to disobey me!
You will obey!
Strap her in!
Strap her in! I command you!
- Wood! Your check bounced.
- I'll get you the money later.
- No, I need it now.
- I'll teach you to disobey me!
Cut!
I am terribly sorry to bother you while you're shooting but the guy that owns the stage needs his money.
Well, then, you should pay him, shouldn't you?
Yes. Exactly.
I kind of need it now.
What are you looking at me like that for?
I already gave you my three hundred.
Right.
And now I need the other sixty thousand.
What other sixty thousand?
The other sixty thousand you said you'd give to me.
You misunderstood, Eddie.
I gave you everything I have in the world, three hundred dollars.
Well, here we go again.
Let me tell ya, ya can't lose.
It's scary. And if you don't like that, it's romantic.
Bela Lugosi will portray Dr. Eric Vornoff.
And lovely, lovely, lovely ingnue Loretta King is reporter Janet Lawton.
- I don't know. Lugosi looks pretty old.
- Huh?
Which role does Vampira play?
Vampira? Why do you ask?
She's standing right over there.
Well, she plays...
Excuse me one minute.
Pardon me. Miss Vampira?
- Yes?
- You don't know me, but I'm Ed Wood.
I'm a film producer and I'm currently in production on a science fiction piece with Bela Lugosi and Swedish wrestler Tor Johnson.
I don't understand.
Do you want my autograph?
No.
No, I think my film is perfect for you.
You want me to show it on my TV programme.
I have nothing to do with that.
You should call the station manager at Channel 7.
No, no. No, no, no, no.
I don't want you to show the movie,
I want you to be in it. Let me explain.
We started shooting, but after three days we got shut down.
Now we're having a backers party to raise some more money.
So I thought perhaps you'd like to come over just to say "howdy" to some of the backers.
Look, I'm with some friends and we're about to eat.
Please! It would just take one second.
Come over and meet the backers.
There is a really nice dentist from Oxnard.
Look, buddy, I've got real offers from real studios.
I don't need to blow some dentist for a part.
Forget it.
Miss Vampira!
- Please.
- Oh! Let's go.
I'm getting a bad feeling about this.
Let's get out of here.
Yeah, I think you're right.
Thank you, folks, for comin' tonight, but we better go.
And then Dr. Vornoff falls into the pit and his own octopus attacks and eats him.
The end.
- Well, that's quite a story.
- Yes.
So, uh, you made the movie and now you wanna make it again?
No.
We shot 10 minutes of the movie, and now we're looking for completion funds.
Oh, son, you're too vague.
Billy Bob!
You're cuttin' 'em too lean.
Mr. McCoy.
How can I make you happy?
Okay.
Two things.
Number one: I want the movie to end with a big explosion.
Sky full of smoke.
Yes.
But it ends with Dr. Vornoff falling into the pit.
Not anymore.
Number two:
I got a son.
He's a little slow, but a good boy.
And somethin' tells me he'd make a helluva leadin' man.
Sounds perfect.
This is unbelievable.
I woulda bet a million bucks that Ed wouldn't finish this picture.
Yeah, well, it ain't finished yet, kid.
Anything can happen.
Stay out of scratching distance.
Poodle, you made it.
I wasn't sure you got my message.
Well, of course I made it.
- Today's the file clerk's big scene.
- That's right.
I see the usual gang of misfits and dope addicts are here.
- Janet, I want you...
- Say, who's the lug?
I want you staying away from the old Willows place.
Why, that's Tony McCoy.
He will be portraying Lieutenant Dick Craig.
Really.
- How much money did he put up?
- None. But his dad gave me 50 grand.
Hmm. Wood Productions, the mark of quality.
Listen, the movie's getting made, that's all that matters.
- Hello, Harry.
- Oh, hi, Dolores.
Oh! You're Dolores.
I've heard so much about you.
I'm Loretta King.
Oh, here, take the chair.
Oh, don't be silly.
Let Harry finish.
You still need some more work.
No. I'm finished.
- All I needed was a touch-up.
- Hmm. That mole still shows.
Uh, ladies! You both look fine.
Why don't we talk about the scene?
Okay, Janet Lawton has just discovered that Dr. Vornoff bought the old Willows estate so now she wants to prove that all the monster stories are true.
Well, Eddie, what's my motivation?
You're the file clerk. You're running into the next room and bump into Janet.
What is our relationship?
Are we good friends, or is she just a casual acquaintance?
Dolores, I have five days to complete this picture.
Don't get goofy on me.
Action!
- Hi, Janet.
- Oh, hi, Marge.
- Janet, still on the monster hunt?
- What do you think?
I think the boss has been looking for you all day.
Something about the police wanting those monster stories 86'd.
- You've got the whole town in a panic.
- I can't hear you.
I said, you've got the who...
I know what you said, but I can't hear you.
I get it. See ya later.
And cut! That was perfect.
Of course it was.
Bravo! Bravo!
- Magnifico.
- Cris, you made it. Thanks a lot.
Naturally. Always happy to help with a little larceny.
All right, everybody, that's it for today.
The prop crew has a little errand to run.
Paul. Connie.
Darn. I thought they kept this open.
Lobo will fix.
Good boy.
- Wow!
- This place gives me the creeps.
- Let's get the hell outta here.
- Not so fast. Not 'til we get it down.
There it is. Paul, go unhook it.
Right.
Fantastic.
It's beautiful.
- You sure this is gonna work?
- Yes.
You sure?
Yes, hurry. Do it.
My God!
We killed him.
Tor?
Better than wrestling.
Lights!
"Now, Janet, I want you stayin' away
"from that old Willows place. I want...
"Now, Janet, I..."
- Great.
- "I want you..."
- Connie!
- "I want you staying away..."
- The octopus has to live in the lake.
- This is kind of a stream.
No! It has to be underwater.
Let me look at this. Okay.
Go set up by the lake.
Eddie. I'm so tired.
I don't know if I can handle a night shoot.
Nonsense. You look great.
All right, look.
Why don't you have a nice nap and we'll shoot around you for a little while.
- Thanks, buddy.
- You're welcome.
All right, you kids.
Hey, this is looking fantastic!
Paul, where's the octopus motor?
- What octopus motor?
- To make his legs move.
Don't blame me!
You didn't say anything about a motor when I was on the ceiling!
What's he talking...
Paul lost the octopus motor.
All right, let's shoot this fucker.
Great.
Where do I go?
- You'll be fighting with the octopus.
- Out there?
- Yes.
- What happened to the stream?
Well, this is gonna look a lot better.
We have to match it to the stock footage of the octopus underwater.
Aw, for Christ's sake.
- Goddamn, it's cold!
- It'll warm up once you're in it.
Fuck you! You come out here!
Hey! Throw me that whiskey!
How do you turn this on?
Well, somebody misplaced the octopus motor so when you get in there and fight with him, shake his legs around.
Looks like he's killin' ya. Okay.
You know I turned down Frankenstein?
- What?
- After I did Dracula the studio offered me Frankenstein, but I turned it down.
Part wasn't sexy enough.
Too degrading for a big star like me.
Bela, I have 25 scenes to shoot tonight.
Oh. Sorry.
Don't let me slow you down.
Okay. All right.
All right.
All right, let's put it on film!
- Camera!
- We're rolling!
- Sound!
- Ed, we don't have sound.
And action!
And cut!
That was perfect!
Come on! Come on, troops!
Have a nice cup o' joe, you'll feel much better.
All right. All right, Harry.
Mr. Wood?
I only got one hour of sleep last night.
Yeah, well, I got no sleep, and I feel great.
Go get' em, kid, go get 'em.
- I'm gettin' too old for this.
- Great work, Bill.
Go ahead. Go get 'em.
Be careful. Don't hurt him.
Don't scratch the tentacles.
Bela,
I wanna thank you again for last night.
That's fine, Eddie.
All in the line of duty.
No, no, I want you to know how much
I appreciate all you've done for me.
A great man like yourself shouldn't have to be wandering through the muck at 4:00 a.m.
Well, there are not a lot of fellas
I'd do it for.
Say, I wrote something special for ya.
I got to thinkin' about all the sacrifices you've made and I...
Well, I wrote you a...
A new final speech.
Well, this is quite a scene, Eddie.
I know it's a lot to give you at the last minute, Bela, but...
These lines...
I'll have no problem remembering.
Great.
All right, kids, let's knock 'em dead.
My dear Professor Strowski, twenty years ago I was banned from my homeland.
I was classed as a madman, a charlatan.
Outlawed in the world of science which previously honored me as a genius.
Now here in this forsaken jungle hell,
I have proven that I am all right!
Yes!
The authorities have learned how correct your findings were.
So I am here to bring you home.
Home?
I have no home.
Hunted.
Despised.
Living like an animal.
The jungle is my home.
But I shall show the world that I can be its master!
I shall perfect my own race of people, a race of atomic supermen that will conquer the world!
Cut.
That's a wrap.
Glen Or Glenda?
Now, that was a hell of a picture.
Yeah, but this new one is gonna be a million times better.
Is that possible?
Mr. Bunny, what's wrong?
I heard you were becoming a lady.
Oh, that.
Mexico was a nightmare.
We got into a car accident, he was killed.
Our luggage was stolen.
The surgeon turned out to be a quack.
If it hadn't been for these men,
I don't know how I would've survived.
Oh, wow!
You people are insane!
You're wasting your lives making shit!
Nobody cares!
These movies are terrible!
Dolores!
Ed, it's over.
I need a normal life.
- Did you really mean those things you...
- I'm tired of living like this.
But, Poodle...
I just stuck it out so you could finish your movie and now that it's done, so am I.
Oh, that was so scary, it gave me goose bumps.
No, dummy, I didn't say "goose,"
I said "goose bumps."
Well, be sure to join me next week for The Mummy's Curse.
Until then, pleasant nightmares.
Okay, folks, we're off the air.
That was a good show.
God, this show needs better jokes.
- You got a phone call.
- Who is it?
I don't know.
- Hello.
- Vampira? Ed Wood here.
- Who?
- Ed Wood.
Remember, I met you at the Brown Derby?
Oh, yeah, you.
Listen, I was wondering if you'd like to go out sometime, grab some dinner maybe.
You mean a date?
I thought you were a fag.
No, I'm just a transvestite.
So, how's about Friday night?
Look, you seem like a nice guy, but you're just not my type.
But keep in touch.
Let me know when your movie opens.
Hello?
Eddie, help me.
Bela?
Bela.
Bela!
What do you want?
You called me. Remember?
What are you doing, Bela?
I'm going to kill myself.
My gosh, what happened?
Eddie.
I got a letter from the government.
They're canceling my unemployment.
It's all I've got.
Without it, I can't pay the rent.
Don't you have any savings?
Eddie, I'm obsolete.
I have nothing to live for.
Tonight, I shall die.
Eddie!
You should come with me.
- I don't think that's such a good idea.
- It's a wonderful idea.
It'll be wonderful!
We'll be at peace!
In the afterlife, you don't have to worry about finding work.
Bela,
I'm on your side.
Gimme the gun.
If you give me the gun
I'll make you a drink.
What are you drinking, Bela?
Formaldehyde.
Straight up, or on the rocks?
Eddie.
I'm sorry.
I'm so sorry.
Don't worry, Bela.
- I'm sorry, Eddie.
- Everything will be okay.
Oh, my goodness, you gave me the willies!
You look like that Dracula guy.
My name is Bela Lugosi and I wish to commit myself.
For what reason?
I have been a drug addict for 20 years.
I need help.
Is that angora?
Um, yes.
Don't you think angora has a tactile sensuality lacking in all other clothing?
Yeah, I suppose.
It is awfully expensive.
Well, it's made from specially-bred rabbits that live in the Himalayas.
Say, what are you, an angora wholesaler?
No.
I'm in pictures.
I'm a director, writer, actor and producer.
Aw, come on.
Nobody does all that.
Oh, yes, they do.
Two people.
Orson Welles and me.
Wow.
- Whatcha makin'?
- Booties. For my father.
Gets cold in the hospital.
- Has he been here long?
- This is my thirteenth pair.
Excuse me.
Excuse me, Doctor.
I'm with Mr. Lugosi.
How is he?
Well, there's a lot of junk in his system for such an old man.
Apparently he was addicted to morphine.
He tried to kick that and he got readdicted to methadone.
- Is he gonna be okay?
- We'll do our best.
- Hi, Lillian.
- Hi, Ed. He's got a lot of visitors today.
He does?
Smile. That's it!
- Hey! Hey!
- One more picture, sir?
Do the doctors say you're gonna get outta here?
Freaks!
Get outta here! Get outta here!
What is wrong with you people?
Come on, trash barrel!
Hey!
Bela, what happened?
Eddie, why did you chase them?
After all these years, the press is finally interested again in Bela Lugosi.
Bela, those people are parasites, they just wanna exploit you.
Fine. Let them.
There is no such thing as bad press, Eddie.
Man from New York even said he's putting me on the front page.
First celebrity ever to check into rehab.
When I get out of here
I will be healthy, strong, primed for my comeback...
Hello again.
- Hi.
- You look beat.
No, I'm fine. How's your father?
Better. Thank you for asking.
And your friend?
Not good.
Well, I made him some booties to cheer him up.
They're black, to match his cape.
Say, have you always lived in Los Angeles?
No, I'm from back east.
Poughkeepsie.
You know, all-American small town, everybody knows everybody, my dad worked for the post office,
I was a Boy Scout.
- Did you find it boring?
- No, not at all.
I had my comic books and pulp magazines.
Used to listen to radio dramas constantly.
I love those shows.
- The Shadow, Inner Sanctum.
- Yes.
And The Mercury Theater with Orson Welles.
Boy, you know, every Saturday afternoon me and my dad marched down the street in our uniform to the little movie theater.
Oh, the spook house!
You're not gonna believe the first picture I ever saw.
It was your friend's... Dracula.
That's incredible, that's the first picture I ever saw.
That is incredible.
You know, I had to sleep with the lights on for a week.
I had to for a month.
But I never missed a Lugosi picture after that one.
A few years ago I actually saw him do Dracula live.
It was much scarier in person.
Oh. We're stuck.
Kathy,
I'm about to tell you something that
I never told any girl on a first date.
But I think it's important that you know
I like to wear women's clothes.
- Huh?
- I like to wear women's clothes.
Panties, brassieres, sweaters, pumps.
It's just something I do.
Yes, I can't believe I'm telling you this, but I really like you and I don't want it getting in the way down the road.
Does this mean you don't like sex with girls?
No, I love sex with girls.
Okay.
Okay?
Okay.
You see, we thought that Mr. Lugosi was insured through his union.
Isn't he?
No, they say his eligibility ran out years ago.
Look, Doctor, he doesn't have any money.
But I'll give you everything I've got, a few hundred dollars.
That won't even begin to cover it.
He's gonna have to leave.
Bela? Bela, wake up.
I've got some great news.
The doctor says you're all better, you can go home now.
Really?
I don't feel so great.
No? Well, you look just peachy.
And, uh, the tests came back fine.
Come on, let's get up.
Here we go.
Attaboy. Good.
Eddie,
I want to make another picture.
When are we going to make another picture?
Oh... Soon, Bela. Very soon.
This is so exciting.
Another production.
Isn't it?
So, Eddie, shouldn't we have a sound crew?
Uh, no, no, because this is just second unit stuff.
We're gonna do the main footage later.
All right?
So, what's this scene about?
Um...
You're a very important and respected man.
And you're leaving your house, you're in a hurry.
You're on your way to a big social brouhaha. Okay?
Eddie. What if I'm not in so big a hurry?
What if I take a moment to slow down, to savor the beauty of life, to smell a budding flower?
That's great. That is great.
Let's do a take. Okay?
Ed, I'm really busy.
What do you want now?
I was calling to see if you'd like to attend the world premiere of my new movie,
Bride Of The Monster.
Didn't you just make one called Bride Of The Atom?
Yes, it's the same film.
But the distributor wanted a punchier title.
Come on, it's gonna be a big event,
Bela, Tor and Cris are coming.
You'll have fun!
I can't see.
These contact lenses are hurting.
My eyes are killin' me.
Don't worry. We're almost there.
Hi.
Right in there. Thank God you're here.
They're tearing up the place.
Come on, come on.
Come on, this way.
Come on!
Come on!
I've never been to a movie premiere before!
Well, go knock 'em dead.
At the stroke of midnight,
the witching hour,
the ghouls arise
from the dead!
- Hey, Vampira, how 'bout a little love!
- Fuck off!
One of them stole my wallet!
- I can't see!
- Get off me!
Let's go!
I gotta save 'em!
Get your heads down!
Come on, let's go!
We're getting the heck outta here!
Can't see!
I can't see anymore!
Hey, come on! Let's split!
Taxi!
Stop!
Get in! Come on!
Go on, get in!
Now, that was a premiere.
Eddie, last night was quite a romp.
Did you see that kid grab Vampira's boobies?
I envied him.
Hell, I envied you, too.
A girlfriend who would jump in front of a car like that.
Yes, she is quite something.
None of my wives would have.
Eddie, I want to thank you.
These last few days have been a good time.
You know, I just...
I just wish you coulda seen the movie.
No problem.
I know it by heart.
"Home.
"I have no home.
"Hunted.
"Despised.
"Living like an animal.
"The jungle is my home.
"But I shall show the world
"that I can be its master!
"I shall perfect my own race of people.
"A race of atomic supermen
"that will conquer the world!"
Uh, Mr. Lugosi, could I have your autograph, please?
- Certainly.
- Why, that was incredible.
I mean, you're just as great as you ever were.
Better.
I am 74, but I don't know it.
When the brain is young the spirit is still vigorous.
Like a young man.
"And left the planet Mars
"never to return again."
"The end."
Wood Productions.
Hey, whose crazy idea was it to bury him in the cape?
I heard it was in the will, it was how he wanted to be remembered.
Could you run it again?
- Mr. Wood.
- Huh?
Mr. Wood, this is Mr. Reynolds, your landlord.
Could you please open up?
One minute.
Yes?
Uh, Mr. Wood, you have bounced your third and final rent check.
I'm terribly sorry.
My stockbroker must've transferred the wrong account.
Come on in.
I'll write you another check.
I see you're in the picture business.
- Yes.
- I'm interested in the picture business.
My associates and I, we wish to produce a series of uplifting religious films about the apostles.
But unfortunately, we don't have enough money.
Well, raising money's tough.
No, our church has enough money for one film.
We just don't have enough for all 12.
Well, you know what you do?
You produce a film in a commercially-proven genre and then after it's a hit, you take the profits from that and make the 12 apostles movies.
- Would that work?
- Absolutely.
Let me show you something.
You see this script?
Grave Robbers From Outer Space.
Money in the bank.
Grave robbers from what?
From outer space. It's science fiction.
Very big with the kids.
If you make this picture, you'll have enough money to finance 100 religious films and pay my back rent with the profits.
I don't know.
This is all a lot to absorb.
It's a guaranteed blockbuster.
I understand this science fiction is very popular, but, don't the big hits always have big stars?
- Well, we have a big star, Bela Lugosi.
- Bela Lugosi...
Oh, I thought he passed on.
Yes. Yes, he did.
But...
- I've got the last footage he ever shot.
- Doesn't look like very much.
Mr. Reynolds, this is the acorn that will grow a great oak.
I'll just get a double to finish his scenes and we'll release it as Bela Lugosi's final film.
Bunny? We're makin' another movie.
Yes, I got the Baptist Church of Beverly Hills to put up the cash.
Ed, I got the Lugosi doubles outside.
Bunny, I gotta go.
He's too short.
He's too tall.
He's just not going to work.
Well, Ed, I was thinkin' like when Bela played Fu Manchu.
- Paul, that was Karloff.
- Oh.
- You're gonna have to try harder.
- Okay.
- Try to be a cut above. Go get 'em.
- Okay. Right.
Keep Sunday open,
- the producers want us to get baptized.
- Okay.
You know, hon, when you rewrite a script, it just gets better and better.
This is the ultimate Ed Wood movie.
No compromises.
Oh, my.
- Eddie, look at this.
- Hmm?
What?
Poor girl's out of a job.
I brought the script.
You'll be portraying the ghoul's wife.
- The ghoul's wife?
- Yes.
You should feel lucky.
Eddie's the only fella in town who doesn't pass judgment on people.
That's right. If I did,
I wouldn't have any friends.
Look, would it be possible to make the ghoul's wife a little less prominent so people wouldn't really notice me in the movie?
You don't want to be noticed?
Yeah. How about this? What if I don't have any lines? I'll play the part mute.
- Mute?
- Hey, it's Dr. Tom.
- Dr. Tom! Hiya!
- Who's Dr. Tom?
- He's my chiropractor.
- Hey, Kathy. How are you?
- Fine, thanks.
- Well, look at you.
You're looking in alignment today.
Well, actually, my neck is a little funny.
Now, here, let me fix that.
My gosh!
Don't move.
It's uncanny.
Look at his head! It's uncanny!
Lift up your voice
And let us sing
Alleluia, alleluia
He look nothin' like Bela.
He's kinda got his ears.
Oh, look. Cover your face with this.
Oh. Now I can see it.
I want to suck your blood.
I want to suck your blood!
Let's hear you call
Boris Karloff a cocksucker.
We want these Baptists to like us. Please.
Alleluia
Brothers and sisters, we reach now in the service a joyous point because we are going to bear witness to the baptism of our new members.
Why couldn't we do this in the church?
Because Brother Tor couldn't fit in the sacred tub.
Welcome to the fold, brother.
Do you accept Jesus Christ as your personal savior?
Yes!
In the name of the Father, the Son and the Holy Ghost.
Amen.
Welcome to the fold, brother. Welcome.
Praise the Lord, brother.
Do you reject Satan and all his evils?
Sure.
In the name of the Father, the Son and the Holy Ghost.
Praise the Lord, friends!
- Do you repent for all your sins?
- I do.
How do you do it? How do you get all your friends to get baptized just so you can make a monster movie?
It's not a monster movie.
- It's a supernatural thriller.
- Come to Jesus, brother!
I can't believe this.
- Ed, what am I gonna do here?
- What do you mean?
He has no hair.
Gee, I never noticed that.
Put a wig on him!
Before we start shooting, Mr. Wood, we have a few questions.
Yes. The script contains numerous references to grave robbing.
Now, we find the concept of digging up consecrated ground to be highly offensive.
It is blasphemy.
What are you talking about?
It's the premise of the movie.
It's the title of the movie, for Christ's sakes!
Mr. Wood!
Yes, about that title.
It strikes us as very inflammatory.
Why don't we change it to
Plan 9 From Outer Space?
That's ridiculous.
All right. And, action!
Medical examiner been around yet?
Just left. The morgue wagon oughta be along most any time.
- You get their statement?
- Yeah, but they're pretty scared.
Fine mess like this will frighten anyone.
You have one of the boys take the guy and the girl back to town, you take charge.
What'd you give him all the lines for?
He's unintelligible.
Lugosi's dead and Vampira won't talk,
I had to give somebody the dialogue!
That is no answer!
What about glitter?
When I was a headliner in Paris, audiences always liked it when I sparkled.
No!
- Cat's eyes!
- No!
Well, I'm going to need some antennae.
No!
You're the ruler of the galaxy!
Show a little taste!
See? No talking. Isn't he good?
- Cue Dr. Tom.
- Now?
Yes, now. Lurk him.
Be sure and keep your face covered.
Isn't it wonderful? Bela lives.
Doesn't it strike you as a bit morbid?
No. He would've loved it.
Bela's returned from the grave.
Just like Dracula. Cue Vampira.
Cut!
Let's go down and find out whose grave it is.
Oh, why do I always get hooked up with these spook details?
Monsters, graves, bodies!
Cue flying saucer.
And cut! Print. We're moving on.
- That was perfect.
- Perfect? Mr. Wood, do you know anything about the art of film production?
Well, I like to think so.
That cardboard headstone tipped over.
This graveyard is obviously phony.
Nobody will ever notice that.
Filmmaking is not about the tiny details.
It's about the big picture.
- The big picture?
- Yes.
How about when the policemen arrived in daylight, but now it's suddenly night?
What do you know?
Haven't you heard of suspension of disbelief?
Reverend, I'm here.
Who is he?
This is our choir director.
He's gonna play the young hero.
Are you people insane?
I'm the director!
I make the casting decisions around here!
I thought this was a group effort.
No!
No?
They're driving me crazy!
These Baptists are stupid, stupid, stupid!
Okay. I gotta calm down.
Gotta calm down.
Gotta calm down.
Take a deep breath.
Relax.
All right, everybody.
Let's get set up for scene 112.
Move the crypt stage left, and let's get Tor's make-up effect ready.
Mr. Wood!
- What do you think you're doing?
- I'm directing.
Not like that you're not!
Remove that get-up immediately!
You shame our Lord.
That's it! I can't take it!
Take me to the nearest bar, and make it snappy!
Imperial Whiskey.
Oh, my gosh.
Orson Welles.
- Excuse me, sir?
- Yes?
Um, well, I'm a young filmmaker and a real big fan.
I just wanted to meet you.
My pleasure. I'm Orson Welles.
I'm, uh, Edward D. Wood, Jr.
What you working on?
Well, the financing just fell through for the third time on Don Quixote.
You know, I can't believe it.
That sounds just exactly like my problems.
It's the damn money men.
They never know who's a windbag and who's got the goods.
Then they all think they're directors.
Ain't that the truth?
Do you know that I've even had producers re-cut my movies?
I hate when that happens.
And they're always trying to cast their buddies.
It doesn't even matter if they're right for the part.
Tell me about it.
I'm supposed to do a thriller at Universal but they want Charlton Heston to play a Mexican.
Mr. Welles. Is it all worth it?
It is when it works.
You know, the one film of mine where I had total control, Kane?
The studio hated it but they didn't get to touch a frame.
- Ed.
- Yes?
Visions are worth fighting for.
Why spend your life making someone else's dreams?
Thank you, Orson.
- Mr. Reynolds.
- Yes.
We are gonna finish this picture just the way I want it because you cannot compromise an artist's vision.
- But it's our money.
- And you're gonna make a bundle but only if you shut up and let me do things my way.
All right, gang. Actors in positions.
Let's finish this picture.
Action.
Wanna give him a hand?
Keep rolling.
Now that's an alien.
Action.
- What plan will you follow now?
- Plan 9.
Plan 9? Ah, yes.
Plan 9 deals with the resurrection of the dead.
Long-distance electrodes shot into the pineal and pituitary glands of the recent dead.
You know, maybe you guys were right.
"Plan 9" is a good title.
I want that lightning,
I want those two explosions and I've got to have more shots of the military!
Right.
And cut.
All right, friends.
Prepare for scene 32.
- Mr. Wood?
- Yeah?
- Where's the cockpit set?
- You're standing in it. Places!
But what if we develop this solenite bomb?
Then we'd be a stronger nation, too.
"Stronger." You see?
You see? Your stupid minds.
Stupid. Stupid!
- That's all I'm gonna take outta you!
- Oh!
Cut!
Action.
Greetings, my friend.
We are all interested in the future for that is where you and I are going to spend the rest of our lives.
And remember, my friend, future events such as these will affect you in the future.
And cut!
That's a wrap.
Oh!
I can't get it up. It's stuck.
Eddie, you're gonna be late for your own premiere.
All right, forget it.
Ladies and gentlemen,
you are about to see an extraordinary motion picture.
But before it begins,
I think we should all give a hand to the man
without whom we wouldn't be here tonight.
Eddie, take a bow!
Thank you.
I just wanna say that this film
is for Bela.
The grief of his wife's death
became greater and greater agony.
The home they had so long shared together
became a tomb.
A sweet memory of her joyous living.
The sky to which he had once looked
was now only a covering for her dead body.
The ever-beautiful flowers she had planted
with her own hands
became nothing more than the lost roses of her cheeks.
Confused by his great loss,
the old man left that home
never to return again.
This is the one.
This is the one I'll be remembered for.
Aw, gee, honey, I'm so happy for ya!
Say, let's get married.
- Huh?
- Right now. Let's go to Vegas.
But, Eddie, it's pouring, and the car top is stuck.
Phooey! It's only a five-hour drive and it'll probably stop by the time we get to the desert.
Heck, it'll probably stop by the time we get around the corner. Let's go.
Oh!
Good morning.
Good morning, Sylvester.
Morning, Mama.
Good morning, Gertie.
Good morning, Aunt Sarah.
Don't run... with them eggs, Arnett.
Big Baby?
Big Baby?
Madam, Miss White?
Big Baby, come... over here, please.
Morning, Miss White.
Morning. Would you run this over to Mr Wright at the store?
Yes, madam, Miss White.
Big Baby...
Madam?
The name is Wright.
Yes, madam.
Mr Wright, got your breakfast.
Mr Wright.
Oh, Mr Wright.
Oh, Mr Wright.
Mr Wright, I got your breakfast.
Mr Wright, I got your breakfast.
Stay where you are, Big Baby.
Stay where you are.
I'm coming.
Mr Wright. Mr Wright, I got your... breakfast.
A nice day, ain't it?
You all get on now.
That'll be two pennies, please.
Thank you.
Girl, you better... go away from here.
How's the family?
Morning, Miss Sarah.
Morning, Mr Bryce.
Lovely day, ain't it?
Ooh, that it is.
You got that egg for me, boy?
Yes, sir.
There you are.
Thank you.
You're welcome.
- Here you go, Mama.
- All right.
All aboard.
Shoot.
Shoot, for Christ sake.
You little mullet.
What, are you an Audubon fella? You a bird-watcher?
Come on.
This is going to be the first boar you smoked yourself.
You know what them
Seminole injuns say?
You don't?
They say you only supposed to kill what you gonna eat.
They say it's a sin if you don't.
Damn Seminole.
Listen here.
Don't want you around that coloured boy no more.
Arnett?
Don't look right, my boy trailing around after a nigger.
But he Arnett. He's my friend.
That hurt?
No.
Why you crying?
I ain't crying.
You'll be a man soon.
I'll get you there.
Hey, Duke.
Seen any niggers out here?
No, sir.
Well, one escaped off the chain gang near State Road.
Name's Jesse Hunter.
He might have headed for Rosewood.
You keep an eye out.
You see him, don't shoot him.
Bring him to me.
All right. Yes, sir.
I say shoot him.
Drive.
Aunt Sarah.
Sheriff.
Morning.
Morning.
I got a surprise for you.
- I wonder what it is.
- Don't move.
Come on, baby. Stop it.
James, come on now.
Don't act like a child.
Fanny. Fanny.
Stop it now.
Stop it.
Stop it.
Oh, Fanny.
I said stop it. Go to work.
Damn.
Morning, Sarah.
Morning, Mr Taylor.
Floors need scrubbing, Aunt Sarah.
Relax, child. We already done scrubbed all the cypress... out of these old boards.
Watch out.
Excuse me, Mr Taylor.
Goddamn.
So he won't come around here, huh?
Earl, put the gun away.
Hell, that boy ain't no more off a chain gang... than I'm governor of Florida.
Sit on down.
Bye, Emmett.
All right, settle down.
I'm gonna tell you a story, ok? Pay attention.
"Once upon a time, "there was a pony named Dark...
"who every night took little people to Sleepy Town.
"One night, as Dark
Pony started off,
"he met a little boy named
Naughty who called out...
"Please let me go.
"So Dark Pony whoaed...
"and Naughty hopped on his back...
"and away they went.
"They went galloping..."
- Who's that?
- I don't know.
Hey, Cousin Scrappie.
Mr Carter.
You got yourself a customer.
Hey, mister, why ain't you got a car?
I like a horse.
Car's faster.
I ain't in no hurry.
You got a name, boy?
Yes, sir. Name's Arnett.
Booker T., meet Arnett.
Arnett, this here Booker T.
Why ain't you in school, boy?
I'm working for Miss Fanny Taylor.
She paying you to follow me around?
Can I help you, mister?
Horse threw a shoe.
Need all four done.
Hell, can't get to it till tomorrow.
Closing early tonight.
Why so?
It's New Year's Eve, sir.
Dance tonight, 8:00, Mason Hall.
Put that horse in the stable.
I'll take care of him for you.
That's a pretty horse, sir.
Thank you.
Now, Lemuel, you know me, I'm fair.
I charge a dollar a jug.
But since you're into me for $12 already,
I'm going to have to put you down for three.
Three dollars?
Oh, now, Mr Wright, that ain't fair.
I know I owes you a lots, but I'm a regular customer.
One dollar.
Thank you, Mr Wright.
You better stop drinking, Lemuel, before I own... your house.
Free of charge.
Go see after your father.
Thank you, Mr Wright.
Future customer.
Sorry, I don't extend credit to strangers.
You own that plot of land across the way?
I will... this time tomorrow.
Look at this, all these melons, no good.
Spoiled. Hog food now.
Jewel, darling, you got to throw these out.
You got some .45 shells?
Clean out.
Be going to Gainesville first thing in the morning.
I'll pick some up. You still be around then?
Might be.
What's wrong with you two today?
Every time I try to tell you to do something, you won't listen.
You know, I will smack you. I'll smack you.
No more playtime for you, none. Not today.
Morning, teacher, madam.
I wonder if you can tell me... where a man can find hisself a good meal?
You all go inside.
Well, my name ain't "teacher, madam." It's Beulah.
Folks I know call me Scrappie.
Well, folks I know call me Mann...
Miss Scrappie.
Nice to meet you, Mr Mann.
Likewise.
Now, this here Rattler, Mr Mann.
He a deer dog.
He help me hunt, because he can get real quiet, know what I mean?
All right, come on, boy.
This way now. This way.
So, what, what you selling now, Mr Mann?
What makes you think I'm selling something, Mr Carrier?
Well, I figure a coloured fellow with nowhere particular to be, that man be selling something... or he running.
Well... you figure wrong... friend.
Come on inside.
Hey, Gertie, got some good news.
Mr Mann here ain't selling nothing.
Turn that music down.
My husband got a suspicious mind.
Oh, yes, I do.
He's sweet on you.
Scrappie, come over here and help me with this bird.
Must be New Year's.
Yes, sir. Come on in, Mr Mann.
Evening, Mr Mann.
Madam.
Thank you.
This is my brother James, his wife Emma, and their daughter Jewel.
Be quiet.
Scrappie, show the man a seat.
You can sit here.
Thank you.
Scrappie.
Now, I had a talk with Mr Andrews... on your behalf today.
What about Mr Andrews?
Mama, that old cracker... caught hisself whistling at Scrappie and all that.
What?
Yeah, that's right.
I went over there and gave him some words.
Sylvester, what you say to them people now?
Mr Andrews, I come to have a word with you about my cousin.
Now, I expect you to show her some respect.
You expect, boy?
I don't like Scrappie feeling scared around nobody.
That a threat?
Ain't no threat needed.
I'm just saying I don't mess with your peoples,
I don't want you messing with mines.
Now, I thank you very kindly, sir.
Sylvester, you can't talk to white folks like that... and not expect a rope around your neck.
Look, times is changing, Mama.
Now, I ain't no sharecropper.
I'm a music teacher.
Times ain't never changed for no crackers, boy.
Don't you forget they burned a coloured man... over in Wylie last summer for winking at a white woman.
Sure did.
I know that, Mama, but it's all right for them to whistle at Scrappie?
No, that ain't right.
What do you think about all this business, Mr Mann?
Oh, that man ready to eat.
Would you like to say the blessing, Mr Mann?
No, madam.
I'll do it, Mama. I'll do it.
Thank you for the bounty of our lives... and the blessings you've bestowed on us... at home and family.
Can I have my yams now?
Who wants ham?
I want some yams.
Scrappie, come eat a part of the bird... that went over the fence last.
Well, at least ask him... all right, all right.
Madam, I ain't had a supper like that in a long time.
Thank you kindly.
You're welcome.
You been drifting long, Mr Mann?
Seem like forever.
That ain't no kind of life for a man.
You get yourself a good piece of land, the right woman... a man can make a new start around here, make something of hisself.
Ain't that right, Scrappie?
Well, Aunt Sarah think Rosewood coloured folks' heaven on earth.
Best place these old eyes ever seen.
Coloured folks own all the land around here.
All the businesses, too, except for Mr Johnny Wright's store, and he a halfway decent white man, if there ever was such a thing.
Most of us doing better than them folks over in Sumner.
You ever seen a place like Rosewood, Mr Mann?
No, madam.
"Well, we know how to get money when we need some," said Pecos.
"All right," nodded Essex.
"That's fine.
"But don't tell anybody I told you...
"or I'll cut off your ears."
He's a tough character, Essex.
"Well, cross my heart and hope you die," replied Lightning fervently.
"Well, that's fine," replied Essex.
"Now, go home and shut up."
"Or lose your ears," added Thunder.
And that's it. Next chapter next week.
I'm going up Sumner, buying a drink for some of the boys.
John, I was thinking we might read aloud... from the Good Book tonight.
It'll still be good tomorrow.
All right, boys, up to bed.
Dad, come on.
Dad, could we please stay up just a few more minutes?
Best do what your ma says.
She ain't my ma.
Timothy.
What'd you say?
What'd you say, Timothy?
What was that for?
That's so you don't get to thinking like your brother.
Get on to bed now.
Get on to bed.
Sorry about that, Mary, love.
I guess the boys still miss her.
You do, too, I reckon.
You're damn right I miss her. Pardon me.
Only natural. Only been gone 7 months... 7 months, 3 days.
I'm going to that auction tomorrow.
Get that plot of land.
Does that mean we're staying, then?
Ain't no sense of moving away.
I get Bradley's 5 acres, build some bins out back, sell feed.
Make enough money, in a few years, we'll move to Gainesville, open a bigger store, biggest they ever seen in Florida.
Did you ever consider how I feel living here?
Why don't you go on and have that drink?
You be all right alone here New Year's?
I got Jesus with me.
Go ahead.
There he is.
Gertie looks good.
Watch yourself, there, Carter.
Watch yourself there.
I'm gonna cut a rug.
Cut a rug.
Go on, cut that rug, but don't cut it too deep.
Come on.
Dance like he's riding Booker T.
Twirl that man, Scrappie.
Listen here, now. You all take notes, all right?
I don't want to have to do this more than once.
Come on, man, show him how to do it.
Sylvester can't do no dancing.
Africa.
Africa.
Nigerian.
My arm. My arm. My arm. My arm.
I got you. I got you.
I brung you some coffee.
I'm sorry.
It's all right.
I shouldn't have snuck up on you.
You riding out today?
I might be here a couple more days anyway.
Thinking about looking in on that piece of land over there.
Bye.
Morning, Mr Mann.
Morning, boy.
Tomorrow's my birthday. You gonna come to my party?
You gonna have cake?
Yes, sir, chocolate.
Why is she skipping?
Good coffee.
Morning, Mr Mann.
Small town, people talk.
Old hangover remedy.
My granddaddy taught me.
Here's to the new year.
I'm sober now.
I'm sober now.
You got some peaches?
Story going around is you was over there in the big one.
How long you fight?
Few months? A year?
I'm a veteran myself, Navy.
Spanish-American War.
Of course, the ass we kicked only took one day.
Steamed into Manila
Bay May 1, 1898, aboard the gunboat Concord under old George Dewey.
Set them 8-inch guns a-blazing till smoke blotted out the sun.
Sunk the Spanish fleet, steamed out May 2.
Only eight Americans got wounded.
I had the audacity to be one of them.
Where were you? France?
Put my foots in Germany, too.
Germany?
I'd like to see the
Kaiser's face... when you come running out of the Black Forest.
We didn't have no coloureds on the Concord.
Whole ship full of good old boys.
Wouldn't have took to it.
Maybe.
The mortars start flying, the gas start blowing, there ain't much colour in them trenches.
Is that right?
You got them .45s?
.45s. Funny thing about the draft.
I can't understand it. Pull a coloured boy out of his home, send him over there, tell him dig trenches, kill white folks.
That seem right to you?
I wouldn't know much about that, sir.
I volunteered.
You been double-timing me.
Seeing that married Miz
Connelly over in Wylie.
I know.
Where you going?
Back to work.
Don't you turn your back on me... when I talk.
Damn swamp tramp.
What you crying about?
What you think you're doing, hitting me?
You little swamp tramp.
You little swamp tramp.
Huh? You little chigger.
You don't hit me.
You don't hit me.
You don't hit me.
Girl...
Get out. Get out.
Get out.
Philomena.
Miz Taylor?
Is you all right, madam?
Go away, Philomena.
But...
Get out.
Get out.
So you fight in the war?
Kill anybody over there?
I mostly dug trenches.
Still, it must've been grand seeing Chicago... and New York.
Shoot, I ain't been nowhere but
Rosewood, Sumner, Cedar Key, three times to Gainesville.
Why you come back south?
Maybe...
I was looking for Rosewood.
Thank you.
Well, how come you ain't never settled down before now?
I was married... once.
My Aunt Sarah, she say I ask too many questions.
I'm sorry if...
How old you be, Scrappie?
I'm 17.
No man?
- No young ones?
- No.
I just take care of my little cousins, though.
Come on.
Come on.
Where you going?
What you think about this land here?
Well, I likes it fine.
Mr Wright...
He going to buy it, though.
He buying up everything.
Maybe.
Hey, anybody.
Hey, boy.
Yes, sir.
You a travelling man?
Who asking, sir?
We got to help him.
He ain't our problem.
He a Mason, took the oath, same as us.
He's a white Mason.
Do you think he'd help you?
Aaron, boy, I swear, sometimes you ain't got more sense than some of these horses.
Now, I'm telling you... that man... he ain't nothing but trouble.
Yeah, well, let me tell you something.
See, I ain't no boy.
See, I's a man.
I's a Mason.
What you be, Sam?
Everybody sit down.
Let's get this done.
Bradley, you got the deed?
Yes, sir, I do, Mr Andrews.
No, no, boy, I haven't paid for it yet.
We got to sell it first.
Here. Give it here.
Give it here, boy.
We got here 5 acres in Rosewood... adjacent to Mr Johnny
Wright's store... sold as is, cash only.
Let's open up at $52 an acre.
52, 52. Who'll give me 52 down front?
53, 53, 53 from Monroe.
Who'll give me 54?
John Wright again.
Thank you, John.
55, anybody? Monroe, 55?
Going once, going twice...
Boy, you know that's
$55 for each acre?
That's damn near $300.
Yes, sir, I do.
Thank you kindly.
Cash?
Where's that nigger going to get that kind of money?
I have $55.
Get back to work.
Afternoon, Miss Fanny.
Help.
Help me.
Somebody please help me.
Somebody.
Help me.
Help.
Help.
Please.
Help me.
What's the matter, now?
Please help me.
Help me.
What's going on?
Fanny, what happened?
Nigger.
It was a nigger.
What?
He broke in my house, and he beat me up.
It was a nigger. It was.
Sheriff. Sheriff.
Here comes that boy again.
That would be Emmett.
Sheriff.
Take a breath, boy.
What's the matter?
Your daddy's still caught on fire again?
Fanny Taylor got herself beat by a nigra.
Oh, shit.
Damn.
Earl, that scatter gun loaded?
No.
Where the hell's my... my shells?
Can't find my damn shells.
Here.
Go to the mill. Get James.
Hold on.
Keep this quiet before I get the whole story. Go.
- What's going on?
- Mind your own damn business.
Come on, boy.
When I want you to do something... and I tell you to do it...
Fanny Taylor's been raped by a nigger.
Go on out there and do that.
Hey, James, I need to talk to you.
Your wife's been beat and raped by a coloured man.
What the hell you talking about?
Boy, how you planning on paying $300?
You got a bagful of gold?
Could be, sir.
Henry... can't you see what this boy's doing?
He ain't going to buy nothing.
He's just driving up the price for old Bradley.
Mr Andrews, sir, I don't know that man.
With all due respect, Mr Wright... if that what you believe, maybe you should stop bidding.
You gonna let that nigger beat you, Johnny?
60 goddamn 50.
A nigger raped Fanny Taylor.
Listen up.
We got to call this off for now.
What? I ain't going nowhere. I got a bid in.
We'll pick it up tomorrow at $60.50.
Let's get this done now.
John, Fanny Taylor's been raped by a nigger.
My deed.
I'll lock up the deed.
Boy, your name Jesse Hunter?
No, sir.
I suppose you can prove that?
Got my discharge, sir.
Just who do you think you are, boy?
With all due respect, Mr Wright, long around this time tomorrow,
I expects to be your neighbour, sir.
Welcome to Levy County, Mr Mann.
Get out of the way.
Come on, back off, now.
Come on, come on, come on.
Jesus, Fanny.
Who raped you?
No, jeez, Ellis, I sure wasn't raped.
I just got beat.
I was beat badly.
Badly.
He was so big.
He's so black, that boy.
She says she was raped.
Raped and beat.
Shut up, you all. Everybody go on out of here.
Show's over. You heard me.
Go on home.
Go on.
Come on.
Let's go in the house.
It's ok.
It's all right.
It's ok. Come on. Give her some breathing space.
Damn.
Listen to me.
We've known each other a long time, huh?
I want you to think about this, now.
You tell me.
This is Ellis. You tell me the truth.
Was it truly a coloured that done this to you?
Be sure, darling, that is all I'm saying.
Yes, he was coloured.
He was a nigger, nigger, nigger.
Jesus, angel, what happened?
You seen this boy, Sarah?
Ain't got to mess around. We got to do something about this.
No, Mr Ellis.
I ain't seen nothing.
All right.
Hey, what you all doing?
Miss Fanny... Miss Fanny
Taylor, she got raped.
- And beat.
- And she got beat, and she said it was a coloured man.
But it was a cracker. I seen him.
Well, I guess now we're looking for a nigger convict, escaped yesterday off the chain gang near Wylie.
Name is Jesse Hunter.
Oh, good. Here are the hounds.
Take them all around back, pick up a scent.
Go on.
You acting like you the leader of this here mob.
I am the leader, and this ain't no mob.
We got him, boys.
See where they're headed?
You all see where they're headed?
Come on, boy.
Shut up, you all.
They got a scent.
Hush.
Go have a look. You all go that way.
He ain't done nothing.
What did the boy do?
You all be quiet. Be quiet.
Poly. Poly.
Put that gun away.
- This is serious business.
- Yes, sir.
You got to tell me the truth, boy.
Did you rape Fanny Taylor?
- Rape?
- No, sir. No.
Do you know who did?
I don't know nothing, Mr Walker.
You know who did.
Go.
My boy ain't done nothing.
Hey. Here comes old Johnny Wright.
Hello, Johnny.
Hey, Bobby.
John.
How's that new wife of yours working out?
She's coming right along.
Sorry about that auction,
John. The boy bid.
Yeah, a hell of a thing.
What you got here?
Now we got a good one.
That boy raped Fanny Taylor.
Is that right?
We got us Aaron Carrier, John.
Aaron Carrier?
Watch that gun, boy.
How you doing, Johnny?
You got the wrong boy.
Hate to tell you, Aaron
Carrier wouldn't rape a fly.
Dogs led us straight to his house.
You know the boy that did?
Nigger won't talk, either, John.
I know his family.
Let me talk to him.
Yeah, hell, maybe you can get something out of him.
I sure as hell can't.
Aaron, this is Mr Wright.
You know something about all this?
Duke, how's he supposed to talk when you're choking him like that?
Well, he don't need to talk, Johnny.
He need to hang from one of them trees over there.
You all think this is real funny?
Hey, you would, too, if you was the one that sold me this rope.
Good point, John.
He's a good boy.
He ain't done nothing.
Duke, don't hurt him.
Emmett, come on over here, boy. Hold onto this rope.
There's a boy.
You know this boy's family as well as I.
That's right. I do. I know.
And you know he's a good boy.
They're good people.
They're good people, but we got a dilemma here, John.
We got a dilemma. I'm going to tell you what it is.
Hounds don't lie.
Be a man, now.
You got to take that rope and snap, crack.
Can't lynch that boy,
Ellis. Can't lynch him.
I ain't going to let nobody get hanged.
I ain't going to let it happen. It won't happen.
Now grab that rope.
Come on, grab it.
About 4 summers ago, I went over to Chiefland.
A coloured boy over there was looking in the window... at a white girl watching her take a bath.
Did he say something?
No, he didn't.
Maybe he don't know nothing if he didn't say nothing.
You should have seen them go crazy on that boy.
Beat him about half to death.
Boy wouldn't stop screaming.
We helped him to the railroad track. Number 7 come along... cut his head clean off.
Niggers don't run around like a chicken.
Once that head's off, he's dead.
Sam Carter.
Sam Carter?
What about Sam Carter?
What about Sam?
Sam the blacksmith?
Sam Carter raped Fanny Taylor?
No.
A man. A Mason.
What man? Who you talking about?
Sam took him in the waggon.
We was holding the oath.
What are you talking about?
String him up.
This boy's under arrest.
I'm taking him to jail.
We're going to string this boy up.
Oh, no, you ain't.
All right, take the boy, but don't you let him go.
Hey, don't you worry about what
I am or ain't going to do.
You hear me, Poly?
- We're going to get Sam.
- You get on out of here.
Do you understand? You go do it.
Hey, listen to me.
You go with them.
Don't let them do nothing until
I get there, you hear me?
You go, too. Ellis, you go.
I'll take old Aaron in.
Them boys is all riled.
Aaron, this is all your damn fault.
You should've said something earlier.
Damn.
Carter. Carter.
Hey, Booker T.
Up, boy. Up.
Thank you, Mr Wright.
Sam, what you know about this Jesse Hunter, boy?
I don't know nothing, Mr Andrews.
All niggers don't know nothing. Where's Jesse Hunter?
Mr Purdy. Mr Purdy.
You a Mason. You got to believe me.
I don't know no Jesse Hunter.
Yeah, you do, you damn nigger.
Come on, let him go.
Come on. Hold it. Come on.
He's not against you.
Stop it. Stop it.
You shut up and get away.
Sam. Get up.
Talk now.
Talk to me, Sam.
Talk to me.
Better say something.
As... as God is my witness,
I don't know...
Jesse Hunter.
It was that drifter. That rich nigger from the auction.
That big buck with the black horse, is that him?
Come on, let him talk.
Damn you.
Look at me.
Aaron told us you gave him a ride.
Now you show me where you put him out.
Show me, Sam. I can get you out of here.
Show me, boy.
You going to show me?
We going to string you up.
Let's go. Get up.
Let's go. Get up.
If we don't pick up his trail where you say, you one dead black son of a bitch.
What you got, Earl?
Nothing, Ellis.
Nothing?
You can kill me... but you all... you can't eat me.
You ain't no Seminole, boy.
Duke.
Get back. Get back.
Damn it, Duke.
What'd you do that for?
Goddamn, Duke.
Dumb son of a bitch.
You could've killed me.
He's sure dead.
He ain't dead.
Well, let's clean this mess up.
Hang him up in this tree over here.
Ok, men, I've had enough of this.
I'm the law here, you hear me?
Let me in here.
Back off now.
Let me in there.
Stop it, you all. Stop it.
A white woman was beat and raped... by a coloured boy.
Now, you want to tell her husband, her children, that this boy don't have to pay for that?
I'm supposed to uphold the law.
Aw, law.
Whose law, nigger law?
You wasn't nothing but a damn chicken farmer... till they gave you that stupid badge.
You want to get re-elected?
You want to get re-elected?
- Leave me alone.
- Then leave it be.
I got your watch, Sam Carter.
I got your watch.
You're always so gentle.
Soft touch.
You treat me like I'm some kind of angel.
You are an angel to me.
I'm just a woman, James.
I'm just a woman.
Things are getting crazy out there, Fanny.
They're likely to get worse.
Sam Carter's lynched already.
The blacksmith?
What'd he do?
He give that nigger a ride.
A ride?
Sam Carter?
I didn't know.
There's things that I ought to tell you.
Evening, Mr Taylor.
With all that's going on and everything, we thought you all could use some hot cooking.
Thank you kindly, ladies, but my wife ain't feeling too well.
It's all right, James.
Evening, Miss Walker.
Oh, Fanny... you poor child.
Oh, I brought you a quilt, too.
I brought you sweetbread.
Don't you worry. That nigger going to be dead... before you finish your pie, ok?
Get a waggon.
Now, me and Mr Mann just cut
Sam Carter out a damn tree.
You all hear me?
Dirty, low-down bastards... took my boy.
They got my cousin
Aaron over in jail.
There's Sumner behind this business.
They say it's for his own protection.
Now how that sound?
What we need to do, we need to pray. Now, dear Lord...
I ain't in no praying mood, preacher.
Now, what I want to know is right now, what you all men prepared to do if they run back here?
Not if, Sylvester. When.
I'm going to shoot.
Come on, sit down now, Big Baby.
You by yourself there, Mr Wright?
I am, Sylvester.
Sylvester, them crackers so riled up, we don't know what they going to do.
They don't know what they going to do.
That's how a lynch mob be.
Now, I say we send the women and children... to Gainesville right now.
John, we can't go nowhere and leave that boy in jail.
No. Them dirty bastards... can take my boy out of that jail... and hang him whenever they take a notion.
Don't worry about it, Uncle.
We ain't going nowhere.
We ain't going nowhere, Bradley.
Now, we own this here land.
We pay taxes on it.
Now, we don't bother nobody around here.
We keep to ourselves.
Now, coloured folk just can't be running all the time.
There comes a time when you got to stand up... and defend your rights.
Sylvester. Sylvester. Listen to me. And you listen.
Hold on there for a minute.
We got to think about these here children.
Oh, I am thinking about the children, preacher.
Now, you suppose they thinking about our children?
Mr Mann.
If there be some trouble around here, sir, we could sure use your help.
I just came from one war, friend.
I ain't looking for another one.
Let him go, Sylvester.
For all we know, he could have been... the one that done this thing.
They said it was... they said it was a stranger anyhow.
You're talking crazy now, preacher.
I wish you all luck.
He ain't done nothing.
What was that, Aunt Sarah?
Mr Wright, would you kindly excuse us, sir?
I seen his face.
He was white as butter.
What?
This what they teach you in the Army?
Pack up and run when things get hot?
Thank God the Navy don't let in...
What? Go on and say it, Mr Wright.
Thank God the Navy don't let in niggers.
I was going to say cowards.
That's right. I got you figured, Mann.
You one of them loud boys, big talk.
Figure you can say anything to a white man... as long as you start out saying,
"With all due respect."
First sign of trouble, you ducking your head running.
What you going to do... when that mob come down the road?
You going to grab up your rifle, defend coloured folk?
What you care?
Man does what he has to. Ain't that right?
Just like a coloured boy back from the war... with a pocketful of money.
Ain't that right?
You the Massa of Rosewood, huh?
Say, boy... these people know me.
They trust me.
How long you live here, Mr Wright?
Nine years.
I been in Rosewood one night... they asking me to stay.
Now, you pack up your truck... see who tries to stop you from leaving.
You wasn't going to say nothing.
You was just going to leave me?
Three, four weeks, this all blow over.
Then I come back.
But I thought we...
Why, I didn't think you was just going to run off, is all.
Ain't you a soldier?
Scrappie.
Them boys looking for a coloured man... ain't nobody seen around here before.
Now, ain't no way in the world... one man got enough bullets for all them crackers.
Your own preacher ready to serve me up.
But if I stay, I'm asking to be hung.
Look here.
They give me this for saving lives.
Most important thing anybody ever give to me.
You keep it for me.
Hold on to it till I get back.
Now, can you do that for me, darling?
Morning, Judge.
Multiple gunshot wounds.
Missing ear... fingers... various other parts.
By Jesus, your boys really got to this one, huh, Ellis?
Yes, they did, sir.
Levy County is growing.
We need us a sheriff up here... who can handle these nigger problems.
Is that you, Ellis?
Now hold on, Judge.
Oh, I think I got everything under control now, Judge.
I hope so.
We ain't talking about... breaking up fights on Saturday night.
You can't control your coloured, we're going to replace you with someone who can.
Cause of death:
"Mischief at hands unknown..."
Write that down, Earl.
All right now. Get on in here.
Fall in here, everybody.
Now, hush up.
Everybody, come on, now. Don't lollygag.
I want to give you a day off.
What's that, Boots?
He says you got the day off.
All right.
That coloured boy what assaulted Fanny Taylor, he's still out there somewhere.
So I'm gonna give you the day off... so you can go help with the search.
All I expect is... if you find him... well, you know what to do.
Oh, Lord, Auntie, they're likely to come in here and kill us all.
You got to tell them that man was white.
Child, you don't think... they going to listen to old Aunt Sarah?
They'd just as soon as string me up... like they done Sam Carter.
You ain't never seen crackers act the way I know.
When I was a little girl, about 7, still on the Willowbrook plantation... old Massa's son stole $20 out of the family chest... for a cockfight.
Massa knew he took it.
As blue as Jesus' eyes, he knew.
But just the same... he whipped my daddy half to death.
It don't matter what man was beating on Fanny Taylor.
Nigger.
It's just another word for guilty.
Here you go.
Thank you, Mr Bryce.
You're welcome.
You're a nice gentleman.
Look, why don't you get your peoples on board, Aunt Sarah?
Take them up to
Gainesville for a while.
Don't much like the looks of things around here.
Things been looking the same... as long as I can remember, Mr Bryce.
You take care of yourself.
Take that.
Put it on the side there.
Board.
Sylvester?
- Go inside the depot, Mama.
- Sylvester.
Mama, it's all right.
Mama, go on.
Johnny.
Sylvester.
Do you know the whereabouts of this Jesse Hunter?
I do not.
You arrest that man who kill Sam Carter yet?
Don't you get uppity with me.
I've come to warn you.
There are some boys over there in Sumner... let on if they was you, they wouldn't let sundown catch them around here.
Well, they ain't me... sir.
Why don't you be a good boy... and go visit some of your other relatives... for a little while, huh?
I am trying to help you here.
They're all over there right now getting all full of liquor... and making nooses.
You hear me. Huh?
Sheriff...
If you really want to help...
I appreciate it if you wouldn't allow... them boys to come around here.
Now, I was born and raised in Rosewood.
This here is my home.
And I'll be damned if I let anybody run me off it.
Now, you can tell them boys that.
Tell them your damn self.
Damn coloured fool.
Go home, Mama.
You're gonna have to settle your account... before I can sell you the shells.
Want me to settle the account?
That's right.
All right.
Go home, Jewel.
Girl, you best get out of this store.
She belongs here. She belongs right here.
Do you see how you do my cousin?
Get out this store right now, Jewel. Get.
Can't you listen to nobody?
Sheriff give you good advice.
Why ain't you leaving?
I thought you a smart boy, Sylvester.
I thought you a smart boy.
Here is your money, Mr Wright.
That should settle my account.
Sylvester...
Dumb...
Hurry up.
Here come them boys.
They ain't got nothing.
What'd you find?
Snakes and ticks.
Them coloured folks got to be hiding that nigger.
What time is it, anyway?
Well, let's see... by old Sam Carter.
Bourbon time.
I'll tell you, boys.
If anybody's hiding Jesse Hunter, my money's on Sylvester Carrier.
That nigger, he hates us white folk.
He does.
You know, he's got a piano.
A nigger with a goddamn piano.
I've been working all my life, I ain't got a piano.
You don't know how to play one.
That ain't the point.
Old man Cummer, up in that house of his, he's got a piano.
That nigger's got one, and I don't.
Now, how does that look?
Yeah, and he's married to that white woman.
Gertrude ain't white.
Hell, she look white.
Well, she ain't.
She's half Negress, half-Seminole Indian.
He says.
It wouldn't surprise me if he was hiding that bastard.
Hey, Judge.
I tell you, Duke.
Can I get that bottle?
Go ahead now, make a wish.
Blow the candles out.
Open this one first,
Arnett. Open that one.
Oh, yeah, that's nice, Mama.
Yeah, that's real nice.
You're a man now. You need a suit of clothes.
Arnett, open this one here and that one, too.
Sylvester got that one.
Simmer down. Be quiet.
Sylvester, come on out here now, boy.
We want to talk to you.
Bring that Jesse Hunter on out here with you.
Yeah, that's right. Bring that boy with you.
Jesse and Sylvester are probably sitting up in there.
Shut up that damn dog.
Sitting up there now eating pork chops.
Laughing at us all.
Goddamn, Duke.
Son of a...
You had no call to do that.
It's just a damn dog, Ellis.
I'll have no more shooting.
How you expect the boy to come out here... if you're going to shoot his hound?
Hell of a shot.
Sylvester. You'd better get out here now.
Wait, Mama. Mama, hold on.
Get out the window, Mama.
All right. I'm gonna go get the guns, Mama.
You stay out the window.
No, Sylvester.
Mama, just stay out the window.
You all children get down right now.
Get down under the table right now.
Scrappie, Gertie, you keep these kids down.
Big Baby, get down. Get down.
We don't want to talk to you.
We want to talk to your boy.
Boys, why don't you all go on home?
Miz Sarah, we want to talk to Sylvester.
You get him out here. Right now.
Mr Walker, my boy don't know nothing about this business.
You let him tell us that.
Let Jesse Hunter tell us something.
Boys, I know you all.
I was midwife to more than half of you... and some of your young ones.
Bring that boy out here now.
I done seen you come up from babies to now.
Ain't nothing going to come of this.
It don't make sense.
My Sylvester ain't had nothing to do with this mess.
We ain't never known no Jesse Hunter.
I was there with Miss Fanny.
I seen the man's face as plain as day.
And most of you men know that that man was white.
Who fired that shot?
You tell me right now.
I told you no more shooting.
Didn't I tell you that?
Aunt Sarah.
Poly, get back here.
Shut up, Walker.
Quit squealing like a stuck pig.
I'll take this boy out myself.
Damn you, get back here.
Pledge your souls to hell.
Get back under there.
Stay there. Stay down.
Get inside, son. Go on inside.
Hold your fire.
Hold your fire.
Think we got him?
I don't know.
We gonna need more bullets.
You go and tell, tell the judge what happened here.
Go.
Rest of you all men, get back. Go on. Stay low.
I'm right here.
I'm right here, Mama.
Hold on.
Hold on, ok, Mama? I'm right here.
Don't try to talk, Mama, don't try to talk.
Don't...
Don't let them surround you, baby.
It's all right. I won't, Mama.
You just hold on, ok?
Mama, no, hold on.
Mama, hold on.
Mama, hold on.
You all take what you need and no more.
You hear me?
You all hear me?
How am I going to be paid for all this?
You just keep track, that's all.
You all shoot Sylvester, Ellis?
Don't know.
They shot Aunt
Sarah, though, John.
Aunt Sarah.
What the hell's the matter with you, Ellis?
You let them come here and shoot an old woman?
I didn't let them do that.
You call that upholding the law?
What kind of sheriff are you?
Henry and Poly are dead.
Shot by them damn nigras.
Where'd Sylvester get his ammunition, John?
All right, come on.
Come on. Hurry up. Hurry up.
Come on. Come on.
Take those babies, go hide in the woods.
You all babies going to get in the woods now.
Go on. Go hide in the woods.
Go on. Hurry up. Go hide in the woods.
Sylvester, I ain't leaving you.
Gertie, they gonna come back here... and try to kill all of us.
You and Scrappie got to go hide these children in the swamp.
We can't take the babies out there. It's freezing.
There ain't no place else.
Go on and get out of here.
What about Aunt Sarah?
Just go on and get, girl.
Come on. Let's go.
Gertie. I'll be there.
You got to go. You got to go.
Come on, Big Baby, get.
I can shoot, Sylvester.
Big Baby gonna shoot.
All right.
All right. Come on.
How many are there in the house?
Sylvester, Jesse
Hunter, James Carrier.
Probably that drifter.
Yeah, Rodney. Listen.
You get together all the men you can find... and you hightail it to Sumner.
Now, you make sure they bring rifles.
What happened?
Three dead white men is all.
We done got ourselves a goddamn nigger revolt up here.
Hold your fire.
There he is.
I think I got him.
Hold your fire.
Goddamn you.
Burn.
Light 'em up.
Some of you all pick
Henry and Poly up.
That Sylvester?
You son of a bitch.
You want me to burn her, too?
Couple you all men, come over here.
I want you all to carry her down to the nigger graveyard.
Go on.
I'll do it if you make me deputy.
You're deputy now.
Go on, pick her up.
Hey, boys, I'm a deputy.
Hold on to that now.
Grab the other side.
Hold on, Bobby. Hold on.
This wasn't supposed to happen.
She worked in my damn house, Ellis.
Then give her a decent
Christian burial, James.
You men, grab that end.
Damn, what did this old crow eat?
Come on, lift it up.
Look out now. Look out.
Aunt Sarah come in the morning.
She clean up.
Aunt Sarah ain't coming.
No. You right.
It's Sunday.
Aunt Sarah ain't coming no more.
No more, no never.
She's dead.
Sylvester, too, dead as hell.
Sam Carter.
Half of Rosewood's dead, and they ain't caught your nigger yet.
Sarah...
Sarah...
Why they hurt that old woman?
She never done nothing to nobody.
You all need to come on down here.
We're gonna need some help.
Some coloured beat and raped a white girl.
Yeah, them niggers need to be put in their place.
Hell, they done forgot who they are.
I'm gonna get me one.
We're gonna string up all them darkies.
 Yes, we'll gather at the river 
 The beautiful, the beautiful river 
 Gather with the saints at the river that flows 
You all hear what happened in Rosewood?
A coloured boy killed four white men... and raped three white women.
 Soon we'll reach the shining river 
 Soon our pilgrimage will cease 
 Soon our happy hearts will quiver 
 With the melody of peace 
 Yes, we'll gather at the river 
 The beautiful, the beautiful river 
Right over there.
There he is. Get him.
On that horse. Give me my gun.
Jesse. You were better off on that chain gang, boy.
There he is.
Let's go, boys. Come on. Get him.
Move it.
Let's get out of here.
Drop that gun.
Get them horses out of here.
Hey, you hold that horse down.
Now, get him on over there.
Go on.
Oh, Ellis, let 'em run.
Let 'em run. Howdy-do.
Ooh, here come the parade.
Hey, listen up. Come on. Come on over here.
Come on.
15 niggers jumped us in the woods.
They was armed to the teeth.
What? They bump you in the head?
Sure enough did.
You go on and get them, then.
Let's all get 'em.
- Was it back there?
- Back yonder.
Go now.
Hey, Ellis, you got a phone call, Ellis.
Not now, Earl.
It's the governor, Ellis.
Pretty exciting stuff, huh, Ellis?
Go right inside, Timothy.
See the nigger? They got him.
No. You've got to look and see.
You've got to remember this.
It's something you've got to remember. Look.
What? What?
Mr Wright, you have to hide me.
You are crazy.
I can't run.
Mr Wright, I don't know where my boys are, and my baby girl is somewhere... in the woods.
Mr Wright... they killed my Virginia.
They find you here, they'll burn my store.
You best run hide in the woods.
I can't run.
I got shot through my side.
I can pay you.
We'll put you in the back storeroom.
Thank you.
We'll talk about that deed later, Bradley.
God bless you, John Wright.
Get some clean white rags, blanket.
Here they come.
What are you fellas doing in the road?
Hold steady, boys.
You can back up right now.
Move them trucks out.
Come on.
You know what to do now.
We got business to take care of.
Ok, now...
Get them trucks out the road.
- Turn around.
- What are you boys doing?
You need to get on out the road.
We got business to take care of over there.
Turn around.
You ain't bringing all this into our town.
Oh, yeah, we are.
We're looking for a coloured fugitive name of Jesse Hunter.
Our coloureds are law-abiding folk.
Bronson don't want you.
Now turn around.
What are you all going down on us for?
You all gonna protect niggers?
That ain't no way to treat a white man.
Oh, hell, he ain't here.
I'm gonna remember this.
Now, go on in there with them.
Ready?
Hey, Bobby.
Hey, we're going back over. You coming?
Yeah. I'll be along in a bit.
You save me some.
Them niggers, they running like chicken, boy.
They in the swamp now.
We're gonna get 'em.
Them's church bells.
My daddy's ringing 'em.
Them crackers be ringing them bells.
Now, you stay put, you hear?
No. That's my daddy in his church.
He telling us it's safe to come home.
No, Denny, Lee Ruth...
Maybelle.
Denny, come back here.
Denny, no. Come back here.
Bust it up, boys.
Bust it all up, now.
Bust it all up.
Niggers.
Come on. Git.
That's a fire, now, ain't it?
Well, look, this come out perfect here.
Then you pull that through there, see?
Now, you pull on one of those.
That's perfect. That's good.
There you go. Pull tight.
There you go. That's good.
Now you've got it, boy.
There's your noose.
Now you make one.
Just like this one.
Oh, that's a good one.
That's a good one.
Good boy.
Here. Use these and cover yourself up.
It's all right. You're all right.
Scrappie, I'm freezing.
Scrappie, I'm hungry.
Quiet, you all.
They're gonna hear us.
They done killed everybody.
Aunt Sarah, Big Baby, Sylvester.
Scrappie.
Look.
It's more than 50 children hiding around in the swamp, and they been out here all night... with nothing to eat, and they're crying, and they're freezing.
What we gonna do?
What we gonna do?
You all be quiet now.
Now, hush.
Hush. Just hush.
Stop fighting.
Arnett...
Front and centre.
Quit crying, Arnett.
You ain't a little boy no more. You a man.
Now, you see any tears in these eyes?
I need you to be strong.
You're my lieutenant, understand?
Yes, sir.
Now, you gather up these women and children.
You're gonna move deep into the swamp.
All right.
We got to move.
Get up.
Come on. Get up.
Come on. Move.
Let's go. Move.
I knew you'd be back.
It's gonna be all right.
Let's move it. Get him up.
Oh, he's bad.
He ain't gonna last out here.
Emma, there ain't nothing the matter with me.
- I can walk.
- Daddy.
There ain't no place to go.
You come too late.
All right, Timothy.
Upstairs with the Turners.
Put him upstairs, too, in the front.
That's enough. That's enough.
Let's go. Upstairs.
Everyone upstairs.
And clean this place up. Look at this.
Clean this up.
Oh, my God. This is not happening.
What's the matter with you?
I know you don't...
I know you don't like having coloured folks in the house, but this is a serious time.
Is that what you think, that I don't like living here because of the coloured folks?
Is that what you think?
Well, what is it, Mary?
I am caring for the coloured folks in my home.
It's my home, too.
I know. Yes, it's your home.
You all treat me like a guest in my own house.
I got news for you, John Wright.
Carol is dead.
She's dead. She ain't coming back, and I ain't leaving.
Oh, God.
Put me down.
Put me down.
Emma.
Emma.
Put me down.
I hear you're hiding folk, Mr Wright.
I need you to put away old James here.
You're misinformed.
You best take him. Go hide in the woods.
No. I don't want to go in there.
Take him, and go hide in the swamp.
I ain't gonna go in that house.
- John Wright?
- What?
I know what you been doing with my daughter.
What?
- Hush now.
- I can run like you.
No, you can't.
Now, you gonna get us killed. Just hush.
Come on, Mr Wright.
You the Massa around here.
I ain't a Massa of nothing.
You best git while you can.
- What's the matter, Mr Wright?
- Git.
Don't he owe you enough to save his life?
You son of a bitch.
How much it take for you to hide this man?
How about 60, goddamn 50?
I'm gonna blow your head off.
This man's life worth one acre of land?
Hide the man, John, for God's sake.
Let him in.
Come on.
Come on.
No, Mama.
Come on, baby.
No, Mama. It's all right. You go on.
Go, Mama. I'm all right.
I can't go in there,
Mama. Take care of Papa.
Come on.
Come on, now. Git.
Go.
I'll be all right, Mama.
What's the problem, boys?
What's the matter?
We want James Carrier.
Right now.
Well, I ain't seen him.
Hell, I ain't seen nobody.
Damn it, John.
We caught his daughter.
We know he's here.
What did you all peckerwoods do to her?
Where's she at, damn it?
Where's she at, Ellis?
Come on now. It's her daddy we after.
Explain to me why you want to lynch a cripple.
We ain't lynching nobody don't need to be lynched, John.
I just don't see no sense in it.
John, James Carrier was in that house... with Sylvester and Jesse Hunter.
Yeah. We just want to ask him a few questions, John.
That's all.
Well, that's all fine, but I ain't got him.
All right, boys.
Stay back.
You get off my porch. Get off my...
Don't you come near.
Simmer down.
Johnny, you want these boys... to go through your wife and children?
Is that what you want?
Come on. Bring him out.
We will. That's what we're gonna do.
You give me your word, all you want to do is question him? Yes?
That's more like it.
You all wait here.
Get that nigger out here.
He was in the house the whole time.
Get that damn nigger.
John.
John, where are you going?
You're not going to let those people have him?
Mary, please.
If I don't, they'll come in here and shoot us all.
They just want to ask him some questions.
I'll be with him to make sure they don't do more than that.
I'll be with him.
Now, James...
We got old Sarah over here, resting her soul.
If you don't tell us where this Jesse boy is, we're gonna have to put you in there with her.
It's a big box.
Why ain't my sister buried?
Because you ain't buried her yet.
Dig a hole, nigger.
I ain't got but one good arm.
We ain't got but one good shovel.
Come on. Get up here, you old crow, and dig your own hole.
Come on.
Show us what you're made of.
Come on. Let's go.
Grab that shovel. Let me see what you can do.
Get him going.
Whoa. He's eager, ain't he?
James, stop it.
Just trying to help him put that shovel in the ground.
James, listen here.
I want you to tell these boys where Jesse Hunter is.
He was in that house with you, wasn't he?
Now, tell me, hear me? Listen up.
James, you tell them something?
James, look at me.
You tell them something, for God's sake.
I'm pleading to you.
Sheriff, I can't lie to you.
I ain't never met the man.
Fair enough.
Stop. Duke.
God. What's the matter with you, Duke?
What the hell is the matter with you?
Oh, hush up, John.
You done went and turned nigger lover on us.
Ever since your wife passed away, you ain't been the same.
I'm going home, you all.
Nigger lover, my ass.
You stupid piece of white trash.
What did you call me?
Don't you nigger lover me, you white trash.
Come on.
Think of who you are.
Think of who you are.
Think of what you're saying.
Don't do this.
Nigger lover.
Nigger lover.
Whose side you on, Johnny Wright?
Don't even care a white man got shot.
You forgetting who you are, Johnny?
Go home, Johnny.
You go home right now.
You got the money that man owes me?
You all gonna pay me for all the money I'm losing?
Hell, no.
Killing all of my customers, running 'em off.
You watch who you call white trash, boy.
That's right.
Just because you rich off nigger money, you think you better than all the rest of us?
That's right.
You get all the money in
Florida, Johnny Wright, you still ain't nothing... but a dirt-floor cracker.
Shopkeeper.
Hey, now, wake up.
Come on.
Come on. We got to go. Time to wake up.
We're going to go this way.
Gertie, where are we going?
Keep quiet.
We're going to go this way.
I ain't got no bullets.
Share.
Hey, you all be quiet.
You all be quiet.
Want them crackers to hear you?
Bring the train to the old road near Kelly's pond.
Get there, listen for the engine whistle.
That's on the other side of Sumner, Mr Wright.
How we gonna do that?
You're asking us to take these children... through all them crackers?
Can't stop near Rosewood.
It's Kelly's pond or nowhere.
No men on the train.
That's the plan.
How we know we can trust you, Mr Wright?
Got no choice.
In the trenches now.
8:00. That's three hours.
Get these folks there.
I'll bring the train.
If you're lying,
I'm coming for ya.
Soldier, if I'm lying, you're dead.
Yes, sir.
We agreed about the men?
Yes, sir.
That includes you.
Johnny, we just went through there this morning.
It ain't nothing but ashes and smoke.
Town's in purgatory.
Billy, it's a real simple thing, we do it right.
They got boys on all the bridges, all the main roads looking for coloured men.
We go in at night, round back to Sumner, pick up the women and children, sweep them off to Gainesville.
He's talking about Sumner.
That's where the whole damn thing started.
You're asking us to risk our engine, Johnny.
Who are you Bryce brothers, a couple of rich boys playing on your train?
To hell with you.
You boys puffing around the countryside... waving and tooting your whistle?
To hell with you.
These are real folks dying, women and children ain't done nothing wrong to no soul.
That ain't fair, Johnny.
Don't talk to me about fair, Billy.
They shot Sarah Carrier down like a dog on her own porch.
I ain't asking you to risk your train.
I'm asking you to risk your asses.
Think they gonna let the women and children through?
I don't know.
Wait, wait.
Stay here.
Damn.
Let's go. We gotta move.
How far out are we?
About 40 minutes.
Can't we move this thing any faster?
Push that throttle, J.B.
Don't you be telling us how to run our train, Johnny.
We gotta take it easy on her.
She ain't been acting right.
Oh, she ain't?
You boys been treating this train like a little sister... since I known you. Get her moving.
She can't handle it.
Get this son of a bitch moving.
J.B., give her a little.
Feel better?
Yeah.
I feel better.
I'm tired.
I don't feel like going.
Hush up.
Hush up, be quiet.
That truck coming, boys.
Watch out, now.
Watch yourself.
Get on up.
Come on.
Wait, wait.
Might as well come look.
Make room for my boy here.
Why you crying, boy?
There's babies in there.
A nigger is a nigger, boy. None of us like it.
God made the world the way it is, and we just got to live in it.
You get as old as I am, you become a man... you're gonna learn a lot of things.
A nigger is a nigger, boy.
That's the way.
You understand me, Emmett?
You understand me?
She's overheating.
Damn it.
Damn it, I told you.
We're stopping, we're stopping.
We can't stop. No, no.
Don't you get it?
Don't you get it?
We are stopped.
We can't go anywhere.
It's your fault.
Your fault.
Goddamn counterbalance pin.
Damn it.
J.B., leave him alone. You gotta check the engine.
Don't you heathens touch my porch.
Step aside.
We hear you're hiding niggers in here.
Turn around, Earl, before I send us both to damnation.
Jesus Christ, Mary.
That damn thing ain't loaded anyway.
Oh, yes, it is.
You got any niggers in there, Mary?
Willing to kill a white woman to find out, Bobby?
Now turn around and get home.
Get on, get.
Come on, Earl. Ain't no niggers around here.
Come on, you all.
Come on, now.
You men best hope the Lord feels merciful come Judgement Day.
Hush.
Everybody front and centre.
Lieutenant.
Where's Arnett?
He gone.
Where's Minnie?
Stay put.
What you all boys need to get this engine running again?
Something we ain't got.
Counterbalance pin.
What is a counterbalance pin?
Oh, it ain't nothing.
Piece of metal about this long.
Be quiet. Minnie, be quiet.
All right, you all men, listen up. Let's call it a night.
Bobby, Earl, give me a hand.
Get these men out of here.
You all go home.
Get these men out of here. Go on.
No more camping out in my town. You hear me?
Hush, you all, hush.
All right, I see you in there.
What you up to, Duke?
What do you see?
Hold still, now. Right up against that tree, you all.
Go get him.
Minnie. Minnie's back.
Where you been?
What...
He gonna get killed looking for you.
Show you to rape my wife.
Put him up.
Simmer down, you all.
I had a nice quiet town here, but you put an end to that, didn't you, boy?
Wasn't no coloured boy... had nothing do to with what happened there.
Shut up.
Shut up, Jesse.
That ain't my name.
Clear a path.
Get back, get back.
Run the nigger up.
Ha, damn you.
Come on, you stupid horse.
Just shoot the damn horse.
Booker T., go.
Goddamn.
That is one strong buck.
Why won't he die?
He gonna die, he gonna die.
His neck ain't that thick.
Oh, he'll die, only he probably didn't have nothing to do with it.
Well, truth be told, none of 'em did.
What the hell does that mean, Ellis?
It means, James, that you know as well as I do... what Fanny'd been doing lunch times.
Some of you all know better than others.
That's right.
Should have never listened to her.
That woman's a wildcat.
Booker T.
Shoot him.
Sorry I had to say it that way, James, but this thing's gone far enough.
Fanny lied... to you, to me, the whole damn town.
Deep down, I don't think I believed her from the start.
If that's how you feel, why'd you take her word for this, Ellis?
What choice I got, huh?
I am the sheriff.
Damn.
My badge.
What's gonna keep it in place?
Prayer.
Move it.
Come on, move.
Get on board, get on board, get on board.
Get 'em on, get 'em on.
Come on, move.
Get on, get on.
Come on. We ain't gonna sit on the track all night.
Move.
Get them on.
Quickly.
Let's go.
Let's go. Let's get the hell out of here.
You can't come on.
You can't come on.
Let me on this train.
I said get down.
If they find men on this train, they'll kill everyone.
Get off.
Please.
Stop the train.
Get back. If they find men on this train, they'll kill all the women and children.
You can't come on here.
No.
Get down, get down.
What the hell you doing?
This is a war. We're in the trenches.
Jesus Christ.
Come on, girl.
Child, stay down. Stay down.
You all can get up now.
You can't go, Mann.
You just can't.
Don't leave us, Mann.
Please don't leave us.
Hush now.
You all gonna be safe.
Scrappie in charge from here on in.
Arnett, you're a lieutenant.
You help her out.
Take these children inside.
You all gonna be all right.
That's Booker T.
Mr Mann, who is that riding your horse?
It's Sylvester.
Uncle Sylvester made it.
All right. He made it.
Sylvester, how you doing?
Uncle Sylvester's alive.
I ain't got all night, Mann.
Gertie, you all get to
Cousin Wilma in Gainesville.
Come on.
I'll be waiting for you in Gainesville.
Won't be waiting long.
How'd you get out?
They carried me... in my mama's coffin.
They were here.
A mob.
They tried to get in.
What happened?
Mum scared 'em off.
Boys.
Boys.
Come here. Get up. Get up.
Liar.
Damn you, woman.
Where you going, boy?
You little crab.
You eat my food, then you walk away sideways.
Emmett.
Emmett, come on back in the house, boy.
I'm sick.
My hands is hurting me bad.
I need your help, and my back...
Emmett, I don't mean to be hard on you, boy.
I just want what's best for you.
I want to learn you how to live in the world.
I hate you.
You ain't no man.
I don't know what you are, Daddy.
Emmett, you come back... Emmett.
Don't you walk away.
Come on here, boy.
Emmett, come on back in here.
Which way are you headed?
Same as you, friend. Going to catch that train.
- Did you bring it?
- l've got it in here.
Quickly. what you bring me?
Joseph Baker.
Matthew Hopkins.
Daniel Poole.
- Jacob Pope.
- william Bridges.
Jacob Poole.
Betty.
Ruth.
Make a spell on Joseph Baker, Tituba.
Make him love me.
- Make Daniel Poole my husband.
- Bring me Adam Town. l want Jacob Poole to love me forever.
- Abby, who do you want?
- She wants John Proctor.
Get her John Proctor again, Tituba.
No, Abby, that be a bad thing.
Abby, no! lt's the minister! come away!
He'll see us! l can't move! Help me!
Help me!
No, no! l can't move!
Help me, please! l can't move!
Help me! Help!
Dress the child and come to my study.
Betty.
Betty!
Betty?
Miss williams.
Mrs. Griggs, Reverend Parris asks that the doctor come at once.
- Betty's gone sick. She can't wake.
- can't she?
The doctor's gone to the Putnam's.
Their Ruth can't wake either. l fear there be no medicines for this. l have seen nothing like it before.
There be no fever...
...nor wound...
...and yet she sleeps. oh, dear Lord.
My Betty is the same.
- The same?
- only, her eyes are closed. lt's the devil, isn't it?
The devil is taking hold of them. oh, Goody Putnam- -
Doctor, l beg you. She is my last, my only. l cannot lose her. l shall do all l can, Goody Putnam.
But this may be a sickness beyond my art.
Thomas! l beg you, we cannot leap to witchcraft for the cause of this.
Don't you understand it, sir?
There are hurtful, vengeful spirits laying hands on these children.
Let you take hold here.
Let no one charge you.
Declare it yourself.
Not yet. l need time. l must think. l must pray.
Yes, l agree with Reverend Parris.
Good day to you, sir.
She still sleeps, then, doctor?
- She flies, you know.
- Flies? come now, man.
- George collins has seen her.
- Seen what?
The minister's daughter going over lngersoll's barn.
- Uncle, perhaps you should go tell them- -
- what should l tell them?
That my daughter and my niece...
...were discovered dancing like heathen in the forest? we did dance...
...and let me be whipped if l must be, but they are talking of witchcraft.
Betty's not witched! were you conjuring spirits in the forest?
- l want the truth now.
- we never conjured spirits.
Now, hear me, child.
You must know that there is a faction in this church sworn to drive me from my pulpit. l know.
And they will destroy me now if my own house...
...turns out to be the center of some obscene practice.
Now, l saw someone naked running through the trees.
- No one was- -
- Don't lie to me! l saw it!
- lt were only sport, uncle.
- You call this sport? She cannot wake!
Give me upright answer, now.
Your name in the town is entirely white, is it not?
There be no blush about my name, sir. why did Goody Proctor discharge you from her service?
Because l refused to be her slave. l have heard said that John Proctor....
John Proctor and you- -
My name is good in the village! Elizabeth
Proctor's an envious, gossiping liar!
Mr. Parris, they're asking for you.
You must come down, sir.
Betty, my sweet, wake up. wake up, Betty.
Betty! Now, stop this! l know you hear me. wake up now!
Betty!
John!
Giles and Martha are here.
All right.
Boys.
You've got to come with me to the village, John.
Mr. Parris, God help us, has summoned a meeting of the society. what for? what for? why has that man ever called a meeting except for his own benefit?
- l'm explaining it.
- Sorry not to have noticed.
They're saying his daughter, Betty, has been witched.
She sleeps and can't be waked.
And the Putnam girl too, they say.
- what do you know of this, Mary warren?
- Nothing. l smell mischief here.
You must come with me, John.
They will look to your judgment.
- How can they not wake up?
- God knows.
You go right ahead, l'll be along.
- l'll see you soon, Elizabeth.
- Goodbye, Martha.
There are still flowers in the field.
You might cut some.
- lt's winter in here yet.
- Aye, l'll cut some flowers.
Give a penny. Give a penny.
Annoy the devil.
Goody osborne, you have no permission to beg here.
- l'll wait for you. l fear this.
- Fear it? why?
Let us quiet our hearts.
You are all aware of the rumors...
...of that spirit come among us out of hell.
That hateful enemy of God and all christian people, the devil. l have invited the Reverend John Hale of Beverly to come to Salem.
He has delved deeply...
...into all demonic arts and will surely go to the bottom of this.
You may recall in Beverly last year they believed they had a witch...
...until Mr. Hale examined her...
...and decided she was innocent to witchcraft.
But it may well be that in Salem he will find signs of Lucifer...
...and if so, you may be sure...
...he will hunt him down.
Let us turn our hearts...
...to Psalm 73...
...''Sure God ls Good To lsrael.''
Sure God is good to Israel
You will stop this now! Betty!
- what'll we do? They're talking witchcraft!
- She means to tell. we've got to tell or they'll be calling us witches. witchery's a hanging error.
Like they done in Boston two year ago.
You'll only be whipped for trying to conjure the boys and the dancing.
Now, listen to me, Betty, dear. l've talked to your papa and l've told him everything.
So there's nothing to be feared anymore. l want my mama.
Your mama's dead and buried! l'll fly to her!
- Let me fly!
- Stop it!
- Betty, come here!
- Mama! Mama! No! Mama! why are you doing this? l've told him. He knows now.
You drank blood, Abby!
You didn't tell him that!
You never say that again!
You drank a charm to kill John Proctor's wife!
- No, Abby.
- You drank a charm to kill Goody Proctor!
Now, shut it!
- She's going to die!
- Now, look, you!
All of you. we danced. That is all.
And mark this...
...let anyone breathe a word...
...or the edge of a word about the other things...
...and l will come to you...
...in the black of the night and l'll bring a pointy reckoning...
...that will shutter you.
And you know l can do it. l saw lndians smash my parents' head on the pillow next to mine...
...and l have seen some reddish work done at night.
And l can make you wish you never saw the sun go down.
- Mama!
- No, Betty!
- Mama! Mama!
- Keep still, you little devil!
- Betty!
- The devil is here! when she heard the psalm, she ran straight for the window.
Mark it for a sign, Mr. Parris.
My mother told me that.
There is hard sickness here,
Giles corey, so please to keep the quiet. l've not said a word.
Nobody can testify l've said a word.
Rebecca, l fear we're lost.
She cannot bear to hear the Lord's name!
That's a notorious sign of witchcraft afoot, Rebecca. what have you done?
Goody Nurse, will you go to our
Ruth and see if you can wake her? l think she'll wake when she tires of it. l am 26 times a grandma.
They can run you bowlegged in their silly seasons.
So you've sent for
Reverend Hale of Beverly? only to satisfy all that the devil's not among us.
- Mr. Proctor.
- John, come help us. we are all at sea. why not meet before you decided to look for devils?
A man cannot pick his teeth without some sort of meeting in this society.
Society will not be a bag to swing around your head.
Mr. Proctor, you must know by now that the better half of Salem village- -
Dear friends.
Mr. Parris, l think you'd best send
Reverend Hale back as soon as he come.
This will set us all to arguing again in the society.
Let us rather blame ourselves than the devil.
Blame ourselves?
How can we blame ourselves? l'm one of nine sons.
The Putnams have peopled this province.
And we have but one child left of eight.
Goody Ann, we can only go to God for the cause of that.
God?! You think it be God's work...
...that you have never lost a child or grandchild and l bury all but one? who or what lets us decide what is God's work, Goody Putnam, and what is not?
God never spoke in my ear. l can't think of anyone else he done the favor.
Your pardon, Rebecca. ls this your mischief? l hear the child goes flying through the air. oh, she never flew. we were dancing in the woods. My uncle leaped in on us. She took fright, is all.
You'll be clapped in the stocks before you're 20. oh, John, give me a soft word.
- No, Abby, that's done with.
- l am waiting for you every night.
You cannot. l never gave you hope to wait for me. l have something better than hope, l think. child.
- How do you call me child?
- wipe it out of mind, you must. l'll not be coming for you more.
You're surely sporting with me.
You know me better. l know how you sweated like a stallion whenever l'd come near you. l saw your face when she put me out.
You loved me then...
...and you do now.
Abby, l may think of you softly from time to time.
But l will cut off my hand before l reach for you again. we never touched.
Aye.
But we did. l marvel how a strong man may let such a sickly wife- -
- Speak nothing of Elizabeth.
- She is blackening my name in the village!
Telling lies about me!
- She's a cold woman and you bend to her!
- Do you look for whipping? l look for John Proctor, who put knowledge in my heart. l never knew what pretense Salem was. christian women and their covenanted men!
And all of them boiling in lust!
And now you bid me go dead to all you taught me? l know you, John Proctor!
You loved me. whatever sin it is, you love me yet!
Dr. Hale.
How can the devil be here? we love God.
- lt's Mr. Hale, John.
- l know who it is. can l help you? l thank you.
Heavy books. well, they must be.
They're weighted with authority. l'm John Proctor, Mr. Hale.
You have afflicted children?
My children's healthy as bull calves, sir.
Like all the other children in this village. where is my wood? My contract provides l be supplied with all of my firewood.
There are wheels within wheels here, Mr. Hale.
- l hope you'll not forget that.
- That 6 pound is part of my salary!
Salary's 60 pound....
- l am a graduate of Harvard college.
- l am well- instructed in arithmetic! l cannot fathom you people! l can never offer one proposition but l face a howling riot of argument! l've wondered if the devil be in it somewhere. welcome to Salem.
Mr. Hale!
Good to see you. well, l see you've come well- prepared.
- This is Thomas Putnam.
- How do you do?
Allow me, sir.
This is my wife, Goody Ann. will you come to our Ruth? Her soul seems flown away. will you come to her?
Aye, l'll come directly.
And you must be Rebecca Nurse.
And Mr. Nurse?
You know me?
No, but you look as such a good soul should.
All of us in Beverly have heard of your great charities.
There is prodigious danger in seeking loose spirits. l fear it.
- Francis.
- Mr. Hale. l go to God for you, sir. l hope you do not mean that we go to Satan here. l wish l knew. l hear you be a sensible man,
Mr. Hale. l hope you'll leave some of it in Salem. our child cannot wake, sir.
She lies as though dead.
And this one cannot bear the Lord's name. lt's a sure sign of witchcraft.
No, no, Mr. Putnam. we must not look to superstition in this.
The marks of the devil are as definite as stone. what book is that? what's there, sir?
Here is all the invisible world. ln these books the devil stands stripped of all his brute disguises.
Here are all your familiar spirits, your incubi and succubi.
Your witches that go by land, by air and by sea.
Have no fear now. we shall find him out if he's among us.
And l mean to crush him utterly if he has shown his face.
Here is my niece, Abigail. l'd like to examine your Ruth before l say more.
Mr. Hale, l've always wanted to ask a learned man...
...what signifies the reading of strange books?
Many a night l've found her in a corner reading of a book. Not the Bible, either.
- who?
- Martha, my wife. l'm not saying the devil's touched her, but mark this:
Last night l tried and tried but could not say my prayers.
Then she closed her book and walked out of the house.
And suddenly, mark this, l could pray again.
The stoppage of prayer. we'll discuss that.
Mr. Hale, this way. was there no warning of this affliction?
Do you recall any disturbance before it struck?
Any unusual behavior?
Mr. Hale.
Mr. Parris. l did discover my niece...
...with a number of her friends, dancing in the forest.
- You permit dancing?
- No, no. lt was secret.
- Mr. Parris' slave has knowledge of conjuring.
- Now, that may not be true.
Abigail, you must tell me about this dancing.
- common dancing is all it is, sir.
- when you are dancing, is there a fire? why?
There was a fire.
They were boiling something.
- Lentils and beans!
- was anything moving?
- That jumped in. we never put that in.
- what jumped in? l must see these other girls. who are they? l want their names.
Someone called the devil in that forest. who was it led you to dance around the fire?
You can save yourselves if you tell me who it was. was there one among you who drank from the kettle? was there perhaps a casting of spells? was there?!
Not l! lt wasn't me, l swear it!
These two children may be dying! who?!
- Tituba.
- l knew it!
- Tituba!
- come out now!
She made me do it!
She made Betty do it!
- Tituba no do bad thing!
- She made me drink blood!
- You drank blood?
- My baby's blood! who murdered my babies? l want their names! who are they?! why can the girls not wake? Did you send your spirit out to silence them? l love me Betty.
- Hang that bitch!
- No! Not Tituba!
You've conjured her to be silent, have you not?
She beg me conjure.
She begged me make charm.
She lies!
She sends her spirit into me in church!
She makes me laugh at prayer!
- She's often laughed at prayer.
- She comes into me when l sleep.
- She makes me dream corruptions!
- why you say bad thing, Abby?
Some nights l wake...
...and l find myself...
...standing naked in the open doorway without a stitch on my body!
And she makes me do that...
...singing her damn Barbados songs, tempting me!
Tituba, when did you compact with the devil? Tell me! l don't. l don't compact with the devil.
Tell or l will beat you to your death! l tell! l tell him! l tell him. l tell him. l don't desire- - l don't desire to work for him.
Then you saw him.
You poor woman.
He has you by the throat this very moment, doesn't he?
Tituba, l'm going to break his grip on both of you. l'm going to pry open the hands of Lucifer.
- You would be a good christian once again?
- Aye, sir, a good christian.
You love God?
- l love him with all my being.
- ln God's holy name...
- ...and to his glory...
- To his glory.
...open yourself, receive his cleansing light within you. You want that?
- l want that light. Save me, Mr. Hale.
- l will, if you open your heart to me. when the devil comes to you, does he bring other people?
- Sarah Good? Does he bring Goody Good?
- Are they men or women?
- l couldn't see, it was dark!
- You saw him, why not others?
They was talking and running around!
- Are they Salem witches?
- l believe so. Yes, sir! l will protect you.
- The devil can never overcome a minister.
- l know that, sir.
Tituba, God put you in our hands to help cleanse this village.
You are God's eyes.
Now, face God and speak utterly. who came to you with the devil?
Two? Three? Four?
- was Sarah Good with him, or osborne?
- Their names, their names!
- How many times he bid me kill you!
- Kill me?
''Rise up, Tituba, and cut that man's throat!''
That's what him tell me. l said, ''No, devil. l don't hate that man.''
Him say, ''Tituba, you work for me. l make you free. l give you pretty dress to wear...
...and l put you way up high in the air...
...and you going flying back home to Barbados.''
And l say, ''No, devil, you lie!''
And then...
...him come to me...
...one stormy night and him say,
''Tituba, look! l has white people belong to me.''
And l look. l look.
And there was Sarah Good! l knew it! Bless you, Tituba!
- Aye! And Goody osborne!
- l knew it!
They were midwives to me three times and my babies shriveled in their hands! l want to open myself! l want the light of God! l want the sweet love of Jesus! l did dance for the devil! l saw him! l wrote in his book! l go back to Jesus! l kiss his hand! l saw Sarah Good with the devil! l saw Goody osborne with the devil! l saw Bridget Bishop with the devil!
- l saw Goody Howe with the devil!
- She speaks! l saw Goody Good! l saw Goody osborne! l saw Goody Barrow with the devil!
Hallelujah!
Glory be to God! lt is broken, they are free! where's the marshal?
Arrest Sarah osborne!
Sarah Good in a jail. would you believe a court would ever bother to jail that silly old turtle?
John! Giles! News from the village.
There were six more accused today.
- More mischief here, Giles.
- The town's gone wild, l think.
They've sent to Boston for the deputy governor to come and take charge.
That's Danforth. He'll bring some sense to it. That's good news.
Judge Hathorne condemned 1 4 more to the jail last night.
And promised hanging if they don't confess.
- confess? To what?
- Bewitching the children.
Abigail williams suffers most of all, he says.
Save my cider. l'll go home now and tell Martha. l'm thinking if the crop comes good...
...l'll buy Joseph ward's heifer.
- How would that please you?
- Aye, it would. l mean to please you, Elizabeth. lt would be well if you went to Salem.
Abigail told you it had naught to do with witchcraft, did she not?
They say Ezekiel cheever's clerk of the court now. can you not tell him?
God forbid you keep that from the court, John.
- A wonder they do believe her.
- But they do.
Mary warren...
...says that where Abigail walks the crowds part like the sea for lsrael. l think you must go at once. l would go tonight, John.
- will you?
- l will think on it.
- You cannot keep it.
- l say l will think on it.
How will l prove what she told me, Elizabeth? we were alone together. l've no proof of what she said.
You were alone with her?
For a moment, alone, aye.
Then it is not as you told me.
A moment. There were others close by.
- Do as you wish, then.
- l'll not have your suspicion anymore.
No, John, if it were not Abigail that you must go to hurt, would you falter now?
- l think not.
- You'll not judge me more. l forgot Abigail.
- And l.
- Spare me. You forget and forgive nothing. ln this seven months since she has gone, l've not moved without l think to please you.
But a funeral still marches around your heart.
You're not open with me.
You saw her with a crowd, you said- - l'll plead my honesty no more.
No more! l should've roared you down when first you told me your suspicion...
...but like a christian, l confessed.
But you're not God, Elizabeth!
Let you look for some goodness in me.
And judge me not.
The magistrate sits in your heart that judges you. l never thought you but a good man, John. only somewhat bewildered. oh, Elizabeth.
Your justice would freeze beer.
- Judge Hathorne.
- Judge Danforth.
- Judge Sewall.
- Sir.
- Mr. Parris.
- Your Honor.
- Mr. Hale.
- Judge.
The selectmen.
Thomas Putnam.
The afflicted girls, sir. l assure you, gentlemen...
...that His Majesty's Government is now determined...
...that the devil shall not rule over one single inch of Massachusetts!
And if indeed he has come...
...here in Salem is where we shall dig him out.
Provided every precaution be taken...
...to guard against the testimony of distracted persons...
...and, of course, the mad. lndeed, Judge Sewall.
Bring in Sarah Osborne!
Now, Sarah osborne, here is Sarah Good...
...who has confessed to witchcraft and will not hang. l bid you follow her example.
She testifies that when the devil came to her, you were in his company.
There they stood, big as life.
Him and her.
And osborne writing her name in his book with her own red blood!
Your Honors, l never see the devil in my life.
But l can dance as fast backwards...
...as he can forward!
Sit down, l tell you!
- Sit her down!
- Let go of me!
You must stop your funning.
You must give up your stories!
You bring me to harm!
Do you hear me? You bring me to harm!
Stop hurting me, Goody osborne!
Help me, Judge Danforth!
- what are you doing to these girls?
- what do you mumble to make them so sick? l was only saying my commandments. l hope l may say my commandments!
Let her recite her commandments.
Your Grace, l may only say my commandments outdoor.
There are 1 0 commandments.
Do you know any?
Help me!
You have lied to the court. l say, you have lied to the court.
Have you not? l'm innocent to witch.
The devil knows that!
''Then Nebuchadnezzar the king was astonished...
...and rose up in haste and spake and...
...said unto his counselors:
'Did not we cast three men bound into the midst of the fire?'''
She's been to the court.
Get out of my garden, you filthy beast! whose goat is this?
Take your hands off my goat!
And curb your wicked tongue!
Take your goat and get out!
The devil take you all!
All of you be damned!
You are arrested on suspicion of witchcraft.
Any compact you have made with the devil....
This man is full of spite! l am no witch!
His goats were eating my food!
These girls are mad! l warned you once before, Proctor.
That's my lumber. You're in my bounds!
My land's always run up through the forest and l haven't sold any. lt is clear in my grandfather's will.
Your grandfather damn near willed away my north pasture!
But he knew l'd bite his arm if he tried it.
Good morning!
Morning, Mr. Putnam. order!
Now, Ruth Putnam, when did you last see Mr. Jacobs?
He come to me two night past when l was abed.
But, Ruth, you are mistaken.
You know me. l am Mr. Jacobs, your neighbor. l have 600 acres next to theirs.
She has known me all her life.
He come through my window.
Then he lay down upon me. l could not take breath.
His body crush heavy upon me.
And he say in my ear:
''Ruth Putnam, l will have your life if you testify against me in court.'' what say you to this charge, Mr. Jacobs?
But, Your Honor...
...l must have these sticks to walk with.
How may l come through a window?
But you could have sent out your spirit through a window, could you not?
But how may my spirit go out of my body?
There's a black man whispering at his shoulder.
Ruth Putnam has informed me...
...that there is a black man whispering in your ear at this very instant.
He's there!
He's whispering, l see him!
- l see him. l see him.
- Do you see him?
A black man!
The devil is here!
- How dare you mock them, Martha corey?
- what else are fools good for?
How do you dare go to Salem again, when l forbade you?
No! Don't hurt me! l am sick, pray, hurt me not!
Get in the house! Go on! l made a gift for you today,
Goody Proctor.
Thank you. lt is a fair poppet. we must all love each other now.
Go on in. what ails you, child? oh, Mr. Jacobs will hang!
- Hang?
- Aye.
And Goody osborne too.
- The deputy governor will permit it?
- He must.
But not Sarah Good.
She will only sit in jail some time, for Sarah Good confessed, you see. l am amazed you do not see the weighty work we do.
The devil is loose in Salem, Mr. Proctor. we must discover where he's hiding.
So l'll be gone every day for some time.
- l am an official of the court now.
- l'll thrash the devil out of you! l saved her life tonight! l am accused?
You were somewhat mentioned.
But l told the court...
...l never seen no sign you ever sent your spirit out to hurt no one...
- ...and they dismissed it.
- who accused me? l am bound by law. l cannot tell.
Go to bed, Mary. l'll not be ordered to bed no more, Mr. Proctor. l am 1 8 and a woman, however single.
Do you wish to sit up?
Then sit up. l wish to go to bed.
Good night, then.
Good night.
The noose is up.
There'll be no noose.
Abigail wants me dead, John.
You know it.
Thank you, my dear.
God bless you, child. l come to tell you to think on what to do to save yourself.
You'll say you cannot see spirits anymore.
And you will never cry witchery again. l know you must speak so, John. l understand.
But my spirit's changed entirely. l suffer now. lt's the truth, John! Look!
The bite your wife gave me is not yet healed.
- My wife?
- Saturday...
...she come to my bed in the night and bite my breast.
My wife has not left the house this month. why must she leave the house to send her spirit on me?
Don't George Jacobs come jabbing at me with his walking sticks?
Feel the lumps he give me only last night.
George Jacobs is locked up in the jail.
And thank God he is!
They'll hang him.
- And he prays! He prays in jail!
- May he not pray?
And torture me at night while he's praying! Hypocrite!
They all are. Thank God l have the power to cleanse the town of them!
Hear me. lf ever you cry witch against my wife, it will be the end of you. l will not have her condemned. l am but God's finger, John. lf he would condemn Elizabeth, she will be condemned.
You know me. lf she is condemned, it will be the end of you.
Samuel, l believe you are sometimes not entirely content with us.
Am l correct? l must tell you, Thomas. l had not expected so much of our evidence to come from children.
- Had you?
- l had not.
But you cannot doubt the children are painfully attacked.
No, l see that plainly.
Recall the Gospel, Samuel:
''From the mouths of babes shall come the truth.''
But it is also this Putnam woman. l wonder if losing her children has not distracted her mind.
And Mr. Putnam is in constant disputation with his neighbors over his boundaries.
Some tell me he's not honest.
Dear friend...
...no court can wait for saints to provide evidence. l shall be scrupulously just.
Surely you will rest on that. l never doubted that, Thomas.
- Mr. Hale.
- Proctor.
Good evening to you, sir.
- You are Goodwife Proctor?
- Aye, sir, Elizabeth.
Are you aware your wife's name is mentioned in the court? our Mary warren told us. we're entirely amazed. l am a stranger here. l find it hard to draw a clear opinion of them that are accused.
So l go tonight from house to house. l come now from Rebecca Nurse's house.
Rebecca is charged?
God forbid that such a one be charged.
But she is mentioned somewhat.
Mr. Hale...
...l hope you'll never believe that Rebecca trafficked with the devil.
Goody Proctor, this is a strange time.
None can any longer doubt the powers of darkness are attacking this village. we have no knowledge in that line, Mr. Hale. l thought, sir, to put some questions as to the christian character of this house...
...if you'll permit me. we have no fear of questions, sir. come in.
In the book of record Mr. Parris keeps...
...l note that you are come to Sabbath meeting but 26 time in 1 7 month.
Sit down, Mr. Hale. l'll be straight with you.
No minister before Parris ever demanded the deed to the house we lend him.
The meetinghouse had pewter candlesticks upon the pulpit. when Mr. Paris came, he preached nothing but golden ones until he had them. when l look to heaven and see my money glaring at his elbows, it hurt my prayer, sir. lt hurt my prayer.
And your children.
How comes it the last is not baptized?
Mr. Parris won't lay his hand upon my baby. l see no light of God in that man.
But the man's ordained.
Therefore, the light of God is in him. what is your suspicion? l hung the door of the church!
- That's a good sign.
- Maybe we are too hard on Parris.
But sure we never loved the devil here.
Do you know your commandments, Elizabeth? l surely do. l'm covenanted, sir. There be no mark upon my christian life.
And you, mister?
Aye, l'm sure l do.
Let you repeat them.
- My commandments?
- Aye.
Thou shalt not kill.
Thou shalt not steal.
Thou shalt not covet thy neighbor's goods nor make graven images.
Shalt not take the name of the Lord in vain.
Thou shalt have no other gods before me.
Thou shalt keep the Sabbath day holy.
Thou shalt honor thy father and mother.
Thou shalt not bear false witness.
- No graven- -
- You said that twice. l know.
- Adultery, John.
- Aye.
You see, between the two of us, we do know them all. l think it be a small fault.
Theology, sir...
...is a fortress.
No crack in a fortress may be accounted small. l bid you both good night, then.
Mr. Hale?
Mr. Hale. l know the children's sickness had naught to do with witchcraft. what?
Parris discovered them sporting in the woods.
- They were startled and took sick.
- who told you this?
Abigail williams.
Abigail told you it had naught to do with witchcraft?
- She told me the night you came.
- why did you keep this? l never knew till tonight the world has gone mad with nonsense. l have myself examined Tituba,
Sarah Good and 26 others...
...who have confessed to dealing with the devil. why not, when they must hang for denying it? You ever thought of that? l have a rumor you do not believe there are witches in the world. ls that true?
The Bible speaks of witches, so- -
Sir, l am a good woman. l know it. lf you believe that l may only do good work and yet be secretly bound to Satan...
...then l must tell you l do not believe it.
You bewilder him.
- But you do believe there are witches?
- lf l am thought one, then no.
You surely do not fly against the Gospels?
Question Abigail williams about the Gospels, not myself!
They've taken Martha and Rebecca! on what charge?
The supernatural murder of Putnam's babies!
Rebecca murdered children?
Are you still believing this?
Remember, until an hour before the devil fell, God thought him beautiful in heaven!
These subtitles were adjusted for the twentyforty encoding.
The twentyforty encoding has some glitches.
Therefore, these subtitles will not match other encodings!
So this is the 300.
The forward look.
1958 is here today.
That's the ermine white.
Seventeen coats, hand-sanded.
- I'm sure it's the 17th coat that does it.
- Power steering. Power windows.
Power brakes.
Power mirrors.
The new auto-pilot will make you virtually superfluous.
I'm not sure I need a car for that.
Torque Flite transmission.
The standard that sets the standard.
And the top operates by just the touch of a button.
I can feel the wind in my hair already.
- Let me see. You just out of school?
- Harvard Law School.
That degree sells itself.
Do you live here in Washington?
- I've been working for the government.
- Oh.
- Not that it's permanent.
- Oh.
Care to get behind the wheel,
Mr Goodman?
Goodwin.
Just be careful with the cigar.
Used to be the man drove the car.
Now the car drives the man.
Go on. Turn it over.
- Here.
- Go on!
- Is it, uh--
- It's in neutral.
- Listen to that power.
- This is the town for it.
And with the new Bendix Electrojector, we can rate this honey up to--
- 390 horsepower.
- Correct to the hoof.
If my wife knew I was here, she'd kill me.
- What a way to go.
- Yeah.
I see you're admiring the seats.
That's pigskin and calfskin.
Hand rubbed.
Nicest piece of furniture I own would be in the garage.
Try the radio. The only thing that sounds better than the engine is the radio.
The Russians have beaten us into outer space.
You are listening to the sound of Sputnik...
a satellite launched this morning via rocket...
in orbit right now, directly over our heads.
A sound that says...
all is not well with America.
America doesn't own the 300.
Oh, the shark, babe
Has such teeth, dear
And it shows them
Pearly white
Just a jackknife
Has old Macheath, babe
And he keeps it out of sight
You know when that shark bites
With his teeth, babe
Scarlet billows
Start to spread
Fancy gloves, oh
Wears old Macheath, babe
So there's never
Never a trace of red
Now on the sidewalk uh-huh, uh-huh
Ooh, Sunday mornin'uh-huh
Lies a body
-Just oozin'life, eek
- About time. It's almost starting.
And someone's sneakin'
'Round the corner
Could that someone
Be Mack the Knife
Now did you hear about Louie Miller
He disappeared, babe
After drawin'out
All his hard-earned cash
And now Macheath spends
Just like a sailor
Could it be our boy's done somethin'rash
Ah, Jenny Diver
Hey, Suki Tawdry
Ooh, Miss Lotte Lenya
And old Lucy Brown
Oh, the line forms
On the right, babe
Now that Mackie's
Back in town
- How's this?
- Get this thing outta here.
- It's not my station.
- Yeah, yeah.
- Let's go.
- We're still hot on the right.
- Watch it! Watch it!
Oh, it's very exciting.
You know, my, my mother said--
Hey, hey, there they are.
Yeah, those are the questions.
Ah, he's got the questions there.
Like walking on the bottom of the sea... as if I had drowned long ago.
- As if--
- Five minutes, Mr Barry.
You ready, America?
- One minute.
- All right, move a little to your left.
- Hey, video...
- That's good.
- you done with the test patterns?
- Camera one.
- Okay, clear the floor, folks.
- Marty, you're still very hot.
- Light it up, lighting.
- Stand by.
- Pan to his opening shots, please.
- 30 seconds!
- 30 seconds to air.
- Bobby, I'm gettin' a flare on camera one.
Do you think you can adjust the barn door on Jack's backlight?
- Yeah, if you can.
- 20 seconds.
My light okay?
My nose doesn't look big?
- You look great,Jack.
- Last week I looked like a sundial.
-Jack, we're on countdown.
- Coming to air in ten...
- Stand by, timpani.
- nine, eight,
- Stand by, opening film.
- seven, six,
- Stand by, music.
Stand by, announcer. five, four, three...
- two,
- Cue the timpani.
- one.
And fade up.
Announce.
Geritol.
America's #1 tonic.
Geritol, the fast-acting, high-potency tonic...
that helps you feel stronger fast...
presents the exciting quiz programme, Twenty-One.
Brought to you by NBC, the
National Broadcasting Company...
broadcasting nationally coast to coast...
from New York to Los Angeles...
from Seattle to St Petersburg...
via a vast network of affiliates crisscrossing the country.
Coming up next,
Twenty-One...
starring master of ceremonies
Jack Barry!
Two players racing to score twenty-one points...
each in a soundproof television studio, not knowing the other one's score...
- with $500...
- Damn it!
- riding on each point...
as they both play
Twenty-One!
And here's your host,
Jack Barry!
Good evening.
I'm Jack Barry.
Due to a series of ties,
Herbert Stempel, our 29-year-old ex-G.I. college student... must play at
$3,000 a point... which means that in a few brief minutes, he can either win... as much as $ 1 00,000, the most money won on television to date... or lose everything he's won in the last eight weeks.
- You nervous?
- As our regular viewers already know, our rules are similar...
- to the card game, Twenty-one.
- It's only money.
Isolated in their soundproof studios...
neither player is aware of the other's score.
I've been assured by our friends at the Encyclopedia... that they've concocted some real brain-breakers this week... so we'll find out in the next
30 minutes if the unstumpable...
Herbert Stempel can be stumped.
Could I have the questions, please?
Thank you, gentlemen. Remember, the questions on Twenty-One are secured... each week in a Manhattan bank vault till just before show time.
So right now, let's meet Herbert
Stempel and his challenger...
as Geritol, America's #1 tonic, presents Twenty-One.
Welcome back to the show, gentlemen.
Mr Peloubet, a very cordial welcome to you, sir.
How are you, Herb?
How's everything in Queens?
- Fine, Mr Barry.
- It's a nervous strain on the family, I bet.
- How's your wife holding out?
- She's fine, thank you.
Thank you, Mr Barry, for asking.
As you know, Herb, the questions are graded for difficulty by the Encyclopedia Britannica.
I might add that my wife no longer suffers from tired blood... now that I've got her on Geritol.
That's fine.
Graded on a scale from one--
I personally vouch that it's a fine product.
I'm sure our sponsor will be pleased to know that, Herb.
Now, to get on with the show--
I'd like to take this opportunity to thank Geritol...
for giving a poor ex-G.I. this amazing opportunity...
to realize his dream of a college education.
Now there's a face for radio.
Dick Peloubet back again from sunny
Miami, Florida, and Herb Stempel.
- Yeah.
- This Stempel is giving me a headache.
- Well, he sells Geritol.
- Have you seen the ratings?
- Well, they've evened out.
- I don't think he works any more.
Stempel is an underdog. You know, people root for that. It's a New York thing.
Queens is not New York.
Let's play Twenty-One.
Mr kintner's office, please.
Office of the president. Could you hold, please? Mr kintner's office.
Once inside the isolation booth, neither player can see the other, nor can they hear anything until I turn their studios on, which I'm gonna do right now.
- All right, gentlemen.
- He's not hurting sales, is he?
- He just doesn't think he works.
- Why?
Look, I don't know. I guess the sponsor wants a guy on Twenty-One... who looks like he could get a table at Twenty One.
You just tell him I said
Stempel has an everyman quality.
You know that whole American dream thing? You, too, can be rich?
- If the ratings stay high.
- Very funny.
I'm just passing it along, sir.
Every schoolboy knows about the midnight ride of Paul Revere.
For eleven points, how many lanterns were hung in the Old North Church?
Who rode with Paul Revere? Who lent him his horse? Was it a mare or a stallion?
And what was the horse's name?
- Stand by,Joe, on Herbie.
- kill the air.
Tommy, air off.
Uh--
A little tighter.
Tell him to put the sign up.
Control booth.
Uh, yeah. Hold on, sir.
Dan, it's for you.
It's kintner.
Would you mind, Mr Barry? Could
I take the third part last?
That's fine.
The code was, uh,
''One if by land, two if by sea. ''
Therefore, it would have to be two lanterns in the Old North Church.
That's right. And, the second part. Who rode with him?
- Dawes and Prescott.
- Dawes and Prescott.
What these books have conclusively proven... is that the difference between men and women is exactly 38 pages.
- Can I quote you, Mark?
- Not before I quote me.
His own quotes are his greatest pleasure.
Did you hear the market dropped 30 points today?
- There's a rumour Eisenhower died.
- How would they tell?
Oh, please, don't get Dorothy started on politics. There'll be a raid.
- Good night.
- Good night, Dorothy. Sorry I'm late.
It's impossible out there.
You can't get a cab without a dragnet.
- Eisenhower died.
- What?
Professor Van Doren,
I took your course at Columbia.
''Hawthorne, Original Sin and the American Experience.''
- Nixon is President?
- Well, as silly as it sounds, it changed my life.
Was it the Hawthorne or the sin?
Perhaps you'd like to meet my son, the unmarried Van Doren.
- Oh, where is Charlie?
- You're right again, Herb.
You've got the first two parts correct.
Just three more for 1 1 points.
Excuse me.
Are you the son?
- I'm Charlie. Pleasure.
- Elizabeth. The pleasure's all mine.
It was a mare,
Mr Barry.
- How did he know that?
- That's correct.
Oh, there you are!
We're making our getaway,
Charlie, if you want a ride.
Have you ever watched one of these, uh, quiz shows, Dad?
The $64,000 Question or, or Twenty-One?
For $64,000, I hope they ask you the meaning of life.
Okay, Herb. Finally...
name the man who loaned
Paul Revere his horse...
for that fateful midnight ride.
- Who loaned him the horse?
- Okay, Herb...
- I'm afraid I'm going to have to ask for your answer.
- Yes, Mr Barry.
Look, just give him what he wants. I don't want to talk to these agency guys.
So, what do you want me to do, Mr kintner?
You're a producer, Dan.
Produce.
-Would you like more time, Herb?
-Right.
If I may, Mr Barry, thank you.
Herbie's dead.
Larkin?
Deacon John Larkin?
That's correct for 1 1 points!
All right, Herb, take a deep breath and relax, will ya?
And we'll get back to the game after this word from our sponsor.
Now, friends, I was just wondering.
What kind of a day did you have today?
Did you greet the sunrise with plenty of vim, vigour and vitality... only to feel the wind go out of your sails just after lunchtime?
Do you find you're not having as much fun as you used to?
This beats the subway, huh, Mr Stempel?
You said it!
- Hey, Dave!
- What do you say, Herbie?
What do you say, Herbie?
You were the greatest tonight, Herbie!
- All right, Herbie!
- Yea, Herbie!
- Great, Einstein!
- Hey, the audience really loves you!
Herbie, you remember me when!
Herbie, I remember you when.
- Hi, Ellen.
- Hey, Herbie, what colour was she?
Ah, but you looked so good on TV tonight, Herbie!
You should've gone for 1 1 on the movies, Herbie.
- You should win $ 1 00,000.
- Hey, you were really cookin' tonight, Stempel.
- Of course I watched it.
- Didn't go to the show?
The genius is home.
The rich genius is home!
I watched it on television like everybody else.
- Would you tell him that...
- You were great tonight, Herb.
- ev-everybody is watchin'that show?
- Come on. I wanna dance.
Dance with me.
Looking for the light
- Would you ask him for me, please, right now?
- Of a new love
My mother wants to know why you only went for eight on the movies.
Because my real expertise is pain-in-the-ass in-laws, all right?
- Now, would you get off the phone?
- No, I'm not gonna start with it.
- Tell him that ev-everybody...
- No, it was nothin'.
- is watchin'that show.
Steve Allen is gettin' a busy signal because my mother-in-law won't shut up.
- Look, Ma, I got--
- You're upset, and I don't wanna have to deal with it.
- I gotta go. I gotta go.
- Would you call--
- All right, goodbye.
Call me before you go to bed, that's all I'm saying.
What are you doin'?
My father paid good money for this suit.
- He wore it to his own funeral.
- You make it sound like it was the suit that killed him.
You wanna know why Enright makes me wear that suit? Because it makes me look like a schmuck.
- Yeah, well stop actin' like a schmuck then.
- You don't get it, do you?
- Look at this face.
- I go out on the street, and everybody knows me.
Me, Herb Stempel.
And they love me for the same reason they used to hate me.
Because I'm the guy who knows everything.
You should worship the ground I walk on, what my family's done for you.
You wanna be worshipped?
Go to India and moo.
Without my family, you'd be on that show in your underwear.
Things are gonna change around here, boy.
What does that mean, everything's gonna change?
You think I should get my teeth capped?
- What's gonna change, Herbert?
- Everything's gonna change.
For us.
Hey, what the hell were you thinkin'?
Toby, that box is the biggest thing... since Gutenberg invented the printing press.
And I'm the biggest thing on it.
We don't need your mother and her money any more.
Don't you wanna tell her where to get off after 2 8 years?
Now would you please dance with me?
Dancing in the dark
Until the tune ends
We're dancing in the dark
And it soon ends
We're waltzing in a wonder
Of why we're here
Because of a disagreement with his commanding general...
Ulysses S. Grant was virtually placed under arrest for a brief time early in 1 862.
Who was the commanding general of the Union Army at that time?
Oh, I know that. Uh, Halleck.
General H.W. Halleck.
That's correct.
Who was Sebastian Cabot...
- Hey, Terry.
- and what country was he in the service of?
Uh, he was, uh, an explorer from Spain.
That's correct.
Who founded the former hub...
- Terry, who's that guy in the corner?
- of the Byzantine Empire...
- of Constantinople?
- Constantine the First.
Charles Van Doren.
Charles Van Doren, like Van Doren Van Doren?
- He wants to be on Tic-Tac-Dough?
- I guess so.
- Meriwether Lewis.
- That's it.
Who was the editor of the socialist paper Avanti--
Oh, this is the guy.
This is the guy
I got the guy
I got the guy
I got the guy!
I got the guy.
So I turned to astrophysics.
But of course, as you know, all the great physicists were great before the age of 25.
It just wasn't in the cards.
So, I went to Paris and wrote my novel about a patricide.
- What?
- A boy who kills his father.
M-My dad liked it quite a lot, actually... although you could fill Yankee Stadium with the world's mediocre novelists.
And your father is Carl Van Doren.
My uncle. My father is Mark Van Doren, the poet.
He also teach-- I-I mean, I also teach, uh, at Columbia. Literature.
- Same as, uh, same as Dad.
- Oh, same as Dad, huh? That's nice.
Could I ask you a personal question, Professor?
Actually, I'm not a professor yet.
I'm just an instructor.
- How much do they pay instructors up at Columbia?
- Eighty-six dollars a week.
Do you have any idea how much Bozo the Clown makes?
Well, w-we, we can't all be
Bozo the Clown.
No, no. Not to question your choice of profession, not at all.
I'm questioning the values of a society that pays somebody like you-- What was it?
- Eighty-six dollars a week.
- Eighty-six dollars a week.
You plan on raising a family, right, Professor?
- Yes, I hope to. Very much.
- Can you imagine raising a family on $86 a week?
Eighty-six dollars a week. And meanwhile, look at the crisis of education in this country.
Well, well, yes. I, I agree.
It's, it's a national problem.
So I understand you came down to try out for Tic-Tac-Dough.
Well, my friends tell me I have a good mind for this sort of thing. They, they coaxed me.
How'd you like to be on Twenty-One?
- Twenty-One?
- Dan produces both shows.
You're young, you're clean-cut, you're from a prominent family. kids would run to do their homework to be like Charles Van Doren.
- What about, uh, Herbert Stempel?
- What about him?
- Herb? Oh, I lov-- I love him.
* (glitch in the encoding) *
Well, I wanted to be
Joe DiMaggio.
Oh, yeah? Me, too. Especially after he signed for the hundred grand.
Yeah, but Al-- But you see, that's what this country needs, is an intellectual Joe DiMaggio...
- with the women and the money and all of it, but...
- Whoa! but from his brain, instead of a bat and a ball. Well--
- Dan.
- No, I know. You're probably right. I--
Yeah, boy.
What are we gonna do here?
Well, I could take a whack at it.
Uh, see the problem, Professor, is the old college try ain't gonna do it.
And you've seen Stempel.
The guy's unbeatable.
Oh, I have to admit, uh, Tic-Tac-Dough seemed more feasible.
What if we were to put you on the show?
Put you on Twenty-One, and ask you questions that you know.
Say the questions that he answered correctly on the test this morning.
- I, I, I don't follow you.
-Just thinkin' out loud.
I, I thought the questions were in a bank vault.
- In a way, they are.
- You wanna win, don't ya?
W-Well, I think I'd really rather try to beat him honestly.
- What's dishonest?
- When Gregory Peck parachutes behind enemy lines... do you think that's really Gregory Peck?
That book that Eisenhower wrote, a ghost writer wrote it.
- Nobody cares.
- It's not like we'd be giving you the answers.
Just 'cause we know you know, you still know.
Right. It's not like you're putting me on the show, or Al... and pretending to be some sort of intellectual.
I mean, you have put in years of study and erudition.
I mean, I-- I-I'm just trying to imagine what, uh, kant would make of this.
I don't think he'd have a problem with it.
Think what this could mean for the cause of education.
Forty million people will watch you on Twenty-One.
It's not like anybody has to know.Just us three.
It just doesn't seem right.
Uh--
I'd, I'd have to say no.
Just an idea.
Was that part of the test?
- So, we're okay.
- You're gonna give it a try.
Well, I-- I just want to make sure it'll be... you know, not the way we discussed before.
- No, not at all.
- No, no.
- So pure, it floats.
Okay? So we'll see you
Monday night, then.
- You'll come by and see how the show works.
- Great.
- All right.
- Monday night.
- And we'll look forward to that.
- Okay.
- Nice meeting you.
- Goodbye.
- Take care.
- Bye, bye.
- Uh, reservations are for 9:00.
Is that right?
- Thanks. All right.
- Boys.
- Hi,Jack.
- Hi,Jack.
- Who's that?
- That's Charles Van Doren.
- As in Van Doren Van Doren?
- Van Doren. Yes.
- Hmm.
He wants to be on
Tic-Tac-Dough.
Uh, why would a guy like that wanna be on a quiz show?
Uh, Richard Goodwin.
I'm an investigator.
An investigator! Richard Goodwin with the Subcommittee on Legislative Oversight.
I'm calling because the rate schedules for the Baltimore and Ohio... for the first four months of 1 954 seem to be missing from the documents you just sent me.
Oh, go get 'em, Dickie.
They're sweatin' now.
Do they know you were first in your class at Harvard Law School?
Hey, don't talk to me like
I'm an idiot. I was first in my class at Harvard Law School.
Here we go.
What've you got?
- Forty-three seconds
- Not bad.
- Railroad regulation.
- Right.
- Now, that's, that's political dynamite he's playin' with.
- So it's just an oversight.
- We're an oversight committee.
- We're an oversight committee.
Right. The end of next week.
That'll be just fine.
And I'll, I'll send you a little helpful reminder, okay?
- You'll notice it 'cause it'll look very much like a subpoena.
- Ooh!
- Thank you.
- You know, Dick... you stick with this, I don't know, ten, fifteen years... you could bring the Interstate
Commerce Commission to its knees.
'Course by then, there may not be railroads.
- You'll still be sittin' right there, too, Alex.
- He's so sensitive.
- Truce.
- Ooh!
Herb, you've got ten points.
The category is explorers.
How many do you want to try for?
- I'll try for 1 1 points, Mr Barry.
- Hello!
- Gonna go all the way, huh?
- Mm-hmm.
- All right.
I'm gonna name four spots on the globe. You name the explorer who discovered them.
First, Newfoundland.
-John Cabot.
- Let's see, I--
Hi. I see you're really churnin' out the chapters today.
- Go away. No cigar in the bedroom.
- Uh, was it John Cabot?
- That's correct.
- Out.
- The Cape of Good Hope.
No cigar in the bedroom.
We allow a television in the bedroom... but no cigar in the bedroom.
Bartolomeu Dias.
He originally called it--
- You're right, Herb.
- So today, chairman calls me aside.
My big break, right?
He asked me to write him a speech to deliver to the kiwanis Club... of Arkadelphia,
Arkansas.
You're good at that.
Gee, do we get to go there?
Yeah. I'd just like to know where the challenge is.
You know, I feel like a racehorse whose gate won't open.
You didn't want the Wall Street job.
Yeah, I know.
Well, money isn't everything.
- Correct.
- I'm not the one who came home with the Chrysler catalogue.
Give me the name of the explorer who discovered Mozambique.
- Vasco da Gama.
- Vasco da Gama.
- Well--
- Maybe I should get on a quiz show.
I, I think it was a group of explorers.
At least I could get my own bedroom.
It's just a job, Dick.
It's not sex.
Vasco da Gama?
-Jack, wasn't Herb terrific today?
Wasn't he great?
- Can't you see I'm busy, Dan?
- Uh, oh, Herb...
- Okay.
I'd like you to meet next week's challenger, Charles Van Doren.
Hello.
I'm scared of you.
Boy, oh, boy, let me tell you.
Scared of me?
- More wine, Herb?
- Thank you, Dan. Why not?
You've earned it.
How's that steak?
Nothing like a fine piece of meat.
You know, Herb, it's a hell of a thing.
I'm lookin' at the thing today.
- You know, the Trendex rating?
- Yeah?
Well, it's the damndest thing, but you've plateaued.
Plateaued? What--
Wh-What kind of word is that?
- What, plateaued?
- Plateaued.
Plateaued? Uh, it's well--
It's like, uh, you--
- Like you--
- You mean, people don't like me any more?
No, no, no. It's not you per se. It's just--
- Maybe I should get my teeth capped.
- No, it's the nature of the show.
They've already seen you win, and they want something new.
So, what are you saying? Th--
You think they want me to lose?
Well, don't you think that's natural?
Joe Louis was the champ for 1 2 years.
Nobody ever wanted Joe Louis to lose.
- Think about the cause of education.
- The cause of education?
I waited 29 years for this.
Now I'm supposed to take a dive for the cause of education?
I didn't say ''take a dive.''
Now, I'm askin' you for your help.
Fine.Just let me play it honestly.
- And will you please keep your voice down?
- Give me a number.
Go, ahead, give me a number.
Give me a number.
- Excuse me, sir. Give me a number, a, a random number.
- I don't know. Twenty-three?
Beethoven was 23 when he composed his first piano sonata.
In 1 923,Jack Bentley set the record for average by a pitcher, batting .42 7.
- There are 23 chromosomes in the human egg.
- Herb, I want--
Also the human sperm. Twenty-third
President: Benjamin Harrison.
- Asian countries along the 23rd parallel--
- Look, don't start believing your own bullshit, all right?
You wouldn't know the name of Paul Revere's horse if he took a crap on your lawn.
- She.
- What?
-It was a mare, remember?
-Look, you lose when I tell you to lose.
- But why now?
- It's an arrangement.
It's always been an arrangement.
If you told me to lose before, if you told me to lose right from the beginning... that I'd understand, then that'd be the story of my life.
- But why now? What did I do?
- Look at the big picture.
It's not like television is gonna go away, you know?
I mean, think about the future.
You mean, like a panel show?
Yeah. Check. Look,
I'm gonna do what I can do, Herb.
But meanwhile, maybe you could use somebody to talk to.
I'm gonna give you the name of my analyst.Just send me the bills.
You know, I could be terrific on one of those panel shows.
Witty, off-the-cuff.
A Bill Cullen sort of thing, you know.
Now the last category is movies.
We're gonna ask you... what won the Academy Award for Best Picture in 1 955.
You don't know it.
You answer On the Waterfront.
Oh, no. Oh, no.
Don't, don't do that.
Not Marty.
I saw Marty three times.
The Best Picture from two years ago, and I don't know it?
Someone of your intellect, and it's such a simple question.
- Don't you see the drama of that?
- Drama?
Herb, don't do this to yourself.
Please, let me lose on a physics question, not Marty, Dan.
Don't do this to me.
It's too humiliating.
For 70 grand, Herb, you can afford to be humiliated.
- Who was the captain of the Mayflower?
- Christopher Jones.
- What year?
...the champ,
Mr Moto!
And we'll return to Mr Moto after this.
Will Herbert Stempel become the first man to win over $ 1 00,000 on television?
No, Herbert Stempel is not going to win over $ 1 00,000.
Herbert Stempel is going to take a dive.
Dad, the quiz is tomorrow.
If you're gonna talk to the TV--
All right, big shot. So who bought
Manhattan Island from the Indians?
- Peter Minuit.
- What year?
- How much?
- Twenty-four dollars.
This week on Twenty-One!
Now, back to our programme.
This week on Twenty-One, watch Herb
Stempel be fed to the Columbia lions.
Watch Charles Van Doren eat his first kosher meal on Twenty-One!
What are you doing?
Why aren't you dressed?
The child has to learn. The child has to learn the depths that humanity can sink to.
Tribes of the Iroquois League:
Mohawks...
- Twenty-four bucks for Manhattan.
- Cayugas, Oneidas...
- First the Indians, then us.
- What's eatin' you?
- Senecas...
- You know why they call them Indians?
- Mohawks...
- Because Columbus thought he was in India.
-Cayugas.
-They're Indians because some white guy got lost, that's why.
You're gonna give him your ulcer.
Let him grow up with his own ulcer.
He wouldn't let me practise my drums.
What won the Best Picture for 1 955?
- Marty.
- Marty.
- Thank you.
- Well, what's the problem?
- Lester, do me a favour.
Go in your own bedroom and do your homework, all right?
Hey, hey!
With your books.
Homework with your books.
They want me to take a dive.
What?
They're going to ask me what won the Best Picture for 1 955...
and I have to answer
On the Waterfront.
They have to utz me with a question any child knows.
How, how can they do that? I thought the questions were in a bank vault.
They just put me in an isolation booth and pump cyanide into it.
Herbie, they can't do that.
How can they do that?
Well, obviously, Toby, this particular question isn't in the bank vault.
- Why?
- How the hell do I know why?
Well then, the hell with them.
Just answer Marty, then.
- I already agreed.
- Well, screw them.
Let them ask you a question you really don't know. Ha, good luck!
You're Herbert Stempel. What are they gonna do to you? Huh?
-You're right. What could they do to me?
-Yeah.
- Screw 'em!
- Yeah.
Remember, call him Jack as often as possible.
-Jack.
- Fifteen seconds to channel.
Good evening.
I'm Jack Barry.
- Good evening. I'm Jack Barry.
- Five.
Good evening.
I'm Jack Barry.
- Coming to air in...
- Hello. Watch your headroom. Time.
- Ten,
- Ten.
- nine...
- I'm Jack Barry.
- eight, seven, six...
- Steady, one.
- five, four...
- Good evening. I'm Jack Barry.
- three, two, one.
- Fade up and cue him.
Good evening.
I'm Jack Barry.
So, let's meet our first two players as Geritol...
America's #1 tonic, presents Twenty-One.
From New York City,
Mr Charles Van Doren.
-And returning with $69,500 from Queens, New York...
- Van Doren?
- Mr Herbert Stempel.
- Think that's his son?
Are you related in any way to Mark Van Doren...
- I don't know. I guess so.
- over at Columbia University, the famous poet and author?
- Yes, he's my father.
- He is your father.
Yes. Both he and my Uncle Carl have won the Pulitzer Prize...
and Dorothy Van Doren, the author of the recent The Country Wife, is my mother.
-Okay, Herb, you know something about Mr Van Doren.
-Joey, punch the audio a little.
You have $69,500.
Do you want to take it and quit while you're ahead...
or risk it by playing against him.
It's a tough decision,
I know.
- What'll it be?
- I'll, I'll take a chance.
You will take a chance!
All right, then.
- Here we go, gentlemen.
- You sure Herbie's on board with this?
Could I take the third part last?
I guess, I guess that Atahualpa was the leader of the Incas at the time of the conquest.
- Correct.
- Wouldn't that be William Allen White?
- That is correct.
- I'd like to take the third part last.
His fourth wife was Anne of Cleves.
- He divorced Catherine of Aragon.
- Uh, he divorced her.
- He beheaded Anne Boleyn.
- Well, they all died.
Herb Stempel leads at this point by 1 8 to 1 0.
- Herb?
- Yes, Mr Barry.
The category is movies. How many points do you want to try for?
I'll try for three.
Three points.
Which motion picture won the Academy Award for 1 955?
Marty.
Best Picture.
- Marty.
- Best Pic--
Marty.
He doesn't know it?
All right, Herb. I'll tell you when your time is up.
I don't re-remember.
I don't remember.
Are you sure you wouldn't want to guess at it, Herb?
- Otherwise, I'll have to call it wrong.
- Wait.
Marty.
Your time is up, Herb.
I'll need your answer.
Best Picture... of 1955--
On the Waterfront?
No. I'm sorry.
The answer is Marty.
I don't believe it!
Marty. It was Marty that won the Academy Award... for Best Picture in 1 955.
- Marty was Ernest Borgnine.
- Geez, what an easy question.
Academy Award for 1 955.
You lose three points.
You go back to 1 5.
Better luck on the next round.
And now for you, Professor.
The category is... the Civil War.
How many points do you want to try for from one to eleven?
Civil War. That's a, that's an awful big subject.
Well, here goes nothing.
I'll, I'll try for eleven.
Eleven points will bring you to 2 1 , and you will be our new champion!
Because of a disagreement with his commanding general...
Ulysses S. Grant was virtually placed under arrest for a brief time early in 1 862.
Who was the commanding general of the Union Army at that time?
Tough question.
It's just so oddly familiar.
Would you like some more time?
- Whatever you can spare.
-All right.
Do you know the name?
Yes, I know his name.
Halleck. General H. W. Halleck.
You are our new champion with $ 20,000!
Well, come on out, Herb.
Come on out, Professor.
Wasn't that something, folks? Huh?
You feelin' all right?
Very good. Perhaps we can get an ice, an ice pack out here for the Professor.
- I suspect his grey matter is red-hot.
- I wonder if he's married.
Our congratulations for a wonderful victory. Professor Charles Van Doren.
You know, I'm constantly amazed at the facts these guys have at their fingertips.
- Tough questions tonight.
- Uh, yeah. Oh, well, not really.
- Wow, you were fantastic.
- Oh, yeah?
- Hey, you, you better unlist your phone number.
- Can you believe the pressure?
- Look at him. He's soaking wet.
- Is this guy a natural or what?
-He's a natural.
-Jesus!
-Do you think he's involved with anyone?
- This guy is a racehorse.
- I don't know.
- I'm gonna miss ya, Herb.
You know, I'm really gonna miss this guy.
- Hey, Dan, listen.
- Oh, hi.
- That guy is really terrific.
- We could easily beat out I Love Lucy with no problem at all.
- I know we can.
- Let's get a photo here.
Oh, George, here we go.
- Step in here.
- Charles Van Doren, Miles Bronfman.
- Hold it!
- An executive here at the network.
- Oh, there we go.
- So what do you think, Charlie?
You excited?
- Professor, can I interrupt you?
- Charlie, I just wanna--
- My son was in your father's class.
- Oh, really?
- He says he's a saint.
- Charlie, I want you to meet...
- Bill Henderson.
He pr-promotes the show.
- Congratulations.
- Thank you.
- Sensational.Just sensational.
Now we have a clean-cut intellectual instead of a freak with a sponge memory.
- Yeah.
- See you next week, Charlie.
Oh, I don't even want to think about that. I was just so nervous.
Dan! Dan!
''So pure, it floats,'' hmm?
Are you kidding?
It was great!
Go home and have a martini.
We'll talk in the morning.
I, I'm gonna take the stairs.
- How did you know he'd go for it?
- What would you do?
Meanwhile, it's okay if you know the answer. Yeah, so it's--
My God, it's not like I haven't worked hard. I deserve $20,000 as much as anybody.
My God! $20,000!
The highest navigable lake in the world is...
- Lake Titicaca.
- Lake Titicaca.
That would have to be
Lake Titicaca.
Correct for ten points!
Michel Montaigne.
Around his neck...
Montaigne wore a medallion which read: ''What do I know?''
- Hello, this is Herb Stempel calling for Mr Enright.
- I, I'm terribly sorry. He's not in.
Our current reigning champion from New York, New York...
- Hey, Professor! Professor!
- Mr Charles Van Doren.
...twenty-four hours,
Geritol liquid, or now, in new--
It's the only town house available in the Village.
Yeah, I'll take it.
Will do. It's just that he is out of the office right now. I have no idea--
This is, this is Herb Stempel.
This is about the 1 7th time I've called.
- I'll guess William Pitt the Elder.
- You have 2 1 !
Come to me, Charlie. Good.
Smile. Hold the bag right there.
Hold it right there. Good.
Here, Professor Van Doren turns in the evidence of his amazing popularity.:
thousands of letters a week for the egghead turned national hero.
Winnings to date.:
$50,000!
Hey, Charlie, the check's in the mail!
- Is Mr Enright in?
- I-I'm sorry, he's not right now.
Well, this is Herb Stempel.
You tell him that he promised that he would call me back.
And if he doesn't, something is going to happen. Do you understand that?
- I understand perfectly.
- That's right. Okay. Bye.
You just tell Mr Enright that if he doesn't want to talk to me... maybe the district attorney would like to talk to me.
- If he wants to play hardball,
I'll play hardball.
- Very well.
- Good morning, Mr Van Doren.
- Hello.
And returning with $83,000... our champion after seven weeks,
Charles Van Doren.
- Welcome to Twenty-One, gentlemen.
- Good evening, Jack.
Charlie--
Clear the--
Clear the street.
It was a totally humiliating experience for me.
All my friends knew that I loved Marty.
It's one of my favourite films.
I, I, I saw it three times.
It's about a boy in the Bronx--
Mr Enright will see you now.
Have a seat, Herb.
Thanks for comin' up. I feel we have some unfinished business we need to hash out.
I have some unfinished business with you, too.
This whole thing with the grand jury and the things you said, well, they hurt me.
I can't tell you how--
Well, they hurt me deeply.
- I told the truth.
- There you go again.
You promised me, Dan. Y-You promised that you'd help me out.
Don't you think that I wanna help you more than I already have?
But the point is, you've made it impossible.
- Look, you want me to, uh...
- I want you...
- apologize?
- to sign this statement.
- I apologize.
What kind of statement?
It clears me and the show of any wrongdoing.
- What about the panel show?
- See? That's a perfect example.
I told you I'd do what I could, and I did. I put your name on a list.
You put me on a list?
That's it?
NBC owns our company.
Everything goes through them.
NBC bought your company for two million bucks! What about me?
People, people watched me on that show.
Look. Look. Look at this.
- Oh, Herb, don't start--
- ''He has become a friend in over 50 million homes... whose weekly visits the whole family eagerly anticipates.''
I was a friend, too, in 50 million homes.
Look, what can I tell you, Herb?
Life is unfair.
Life is unfair to me. Life's not unfair to Charles Van Doren.
- Remember how he snubbed me after the show?
- There'll be other shows.
What other shows?
I need the money, Dan.
Wha-- What?
How could you need the money?
It's gone. I mean, it's invested.
It's tied up. I just--
- Well, can't you talk to your broker?
- He's not a broker.
He's more of a bookmaker.
It's seed money.
He's setting up in Florida right now.
He says it's the next growth area.
You gave your money to a bookie who skipped town?
I, I want what I have coming, Dan.
I have to get back on television.
- Herb, I'm gonna-- I'm--
- Show me this list. Where's this list?
I submitted a list of 45 names. They rejected three. You were one of them.
That big uncircumcised putz is on the cover of Time magazine... and I can't even make the top 42 for a panel show? Well--
Look, maybe, maybe, I-- Maybe, you could warm up the audience before the show.
I c-- I could throw you
50 bucks a week.
50 bucks a week?
That should be me on the cover of Time!
- Shit, Herb!Just sign this statement.
- Charles Van Doren!
He wouldn't know the answer to a doorbell if you didn't give it to him.
Sign this statement, and get on with your life!
Sign the statement, Herb. Sign the statement. Who cares if it's true?
- I'm giving you a chance.
- You promised me!
You get me that panel show, or I'm gonna bring you down with me, ya lousy, lyin' prick!
- You and Charles Van fuckin' Doren.
- No, you're not.
I'll just tell everyone that it's a fraud. That'll warm 'em up.
The fix is in this week on Twenty-One!
- When's my next appointment?
- The cover of Time?
His mug shot will be on the cover of Time!
What the hell happened?
Oy.
- Why am I the only one working this morning?
- What have you got over there, Mooie?
''Demonstrators stoned
Vice President Nixon's... motorcade as it proceeded through Caracas.''
Gee, Dick, what's the
New York Times say? Same thing?
- Generally.
- Most people who live in Washington...
- settle for the Washington papers.
- Yeah, well, the Times is the paper of record.
- Ahh!
- Ooh!
Dick hopes someday to be confused with an important person.
''Although the crowd was cordoned off at a distance of a hundred yards... an unidentified Venezuelan struck Nixon in the head with a thrown onion.''
- Wow.
- The Senators should sign this guy.
Did you guys know there was a grand jury in New York on the quiz shows?
Jim Lemon can't even hit the cutoff man. This guy throws a 300-foot strike with an onion.
- Have they come up with anything?
- They sealed the presentment.
- That's a no.
- Uh, why do you say that?
A presentment's a statement of findings.
If there were anything in it, they'd want to release it to the public, right?
If the purpose is to make findings public, then why keep it a secret?
Why seal the presentment?
It's illogical.
- It's a local matter.
- It's television.
- Whoa! TV.
- It's under our jurisdiction, right?
I mean, we have oversight over all the agencies. It includes the FCC.
You're gonna investigate a dead investigation?
We're gonna put television on trial. Television!
Everybody in the country'll know about it.
- What do you have?
- There's somethin' there.
Mr Chairman,
I'll find it.
The networks?
The pharmaceutical industry?
Cosmetics?
That's big game, son. You don't go huntin' in your underwear.
Sir, I smell somethin'. At least give me a chance to see what I can dig up.
Let me go up to New York.
This isn't some junket for you to stay in a hotel and see a Broadway show, you know.
I'm givin' you exactly one week to find something. You got that?
Unseal a presentment.
I don't know.
I don't know how you go about that. I've never--
Oh, here you go.
Look at this.
Hasn't been a presentment under seal in the state of New York since 1 869.
- That explains it.
- Mmm.
Counsellor, I've reviewed in detail the material submitted in your request.
A man's reputation is coin of the realm to him.
I sealed this presentment to protect the reputations of those unfairly implicated... by a certain mentally unstable finger pointer.
That interest, along with important issues of federalism... dictate that I reject your committee's request at this time.
Mr Enright's office.
Mr Enright?
It's Judge Schweitzer.
- Yes?
- Hi. Mrs Mitchell?
- Uh-huh.
- My name is Richard Goodwin.
I'm with the Congressional Subcommittee on Legislative Oversight.
Uh, we've been investigating the quiz shows recently, and--
- Um, I was wondering if I could ask you a quick question.
- Oh, I've got people.
- Could I just have a moment of your time?
- No. No.
I was, uh, curious how many episodes you, you appeared on.
- Not very many. No.
- How many?
- Three weeks.
Did anyone ever ask you not to talk to anyone?
The Today Show with Dave Garroway... and Dave's regular co-host,
Mr J. Fred Muggs.
Dave's guests this morning are: the Aga khan...
Lyle Goodhue, inventor of the aerosol spray can... and quiz champion
Charles Van Doren.
Take a look at that.
Look at that. See that?
Yes. Uh-huh.
Well, you have that conversation and I'm gonna begin the show.
I'll see you, Mr Muggs.
Good morning.
- And good morning, Charlie.
- Good morning, Dave.
- How are you this morning?
- I'm fine, thank you.
I see we have a, uh, an unusually large crowd outside there this morning.
- So, how long has it been now, Charlie?
- It's been nine weeks now.
- And you've won how much?
- Hmm. So that's, uh, $ 1 0,000 a week.
- That's right.
Although last week, I know you were preempted for another programme.
Well, that's the problem with television. The pay's good, but it's not that steady.
Don't remind me.
I'm up for renewal.
So tell us about the book you're working on.
Well, it's called
Lincoln's Commando... and I hope people will find it as interesting as I do.
How do you think Honest Abe would do on a quiz show?
- Honest Abe?
- Yeah.
Well, I-I think he'd do very well.
And, of course... on a show like this, he'd be, he'd be wonderful.
I'm sure he would.
- Here we are, Professor.
- Yeah, I-I'm just--
I just have to tie my shoe.
- Hi, Mr Van Doren.
- Hey, Mr Van Doren!
Hey!
- Oh!
- Hi.
- Good morning, Mr Van Doren.
- Good morning.
- Hello, Mr Van Doren.
- Professor, where's the monkey?
- We saw you on TV this morning.
- You did?
- Can I have your autograph?
- Is Thomas Merton
Episcopalian or Catholic?
Catholic.
Hello. Are you here for office hours?
No, no.
I-I'm Richard Goodwin.
- Uh, did Clark Byse call?
- Clark Byse? N-No, he didn't.
See, I'm up from Washington.
He suggested I-I might look you up.
- You're not a stockbroker, are you?
- A lawyer, which is bad enough.
- Professor Byse taught me Contracts.
- Oh, well, then we have something in common.
- He taught me my backhand.
- I'm with the House Subcommittee on Legislative Oversight.
I've been swarmed by stockbrokers lately. I feel like a girl with a bad reputation.
The Committee has, uh, jurisdiction over television.
I'm sorry.
Please, um, have a seat.
Thank you.
You must've done very well at Harvard.
Clark doesn't like anyone.
Yeah, I was, uh, actually first in my class.
Well, you make it sound like an affliction.
- Well, one doesn't like--
- Did you clerk?
- Uh, Frankfurter.
- Oh, really? Hmm.
- It's nothing.
Uh, I'll tell you, uh, what I love is what you do: literature.
Well, hell, if I was first in my class, I'd get a tattoo.
So what brings you to New York,
Dick? Uh, literature?
Let me ask ya. Did you ever notice anything out of the ordinary... about the quiz show you're on?
- What?
- Anything suspect? Anything at all?
You mean, besides its, uh, popularity?
Well, what I'm hoping is that you might be able to give me some kind of road map here.
-I feel like we speak the same language.
-Well, of course.
Anything I can do to help.
- Oh, um, Mr Van Doren.
- Yes? Yes, yes, yes.
- Oh, I'm sorry. Um, I'm in your class on the Romantics, and--
- Of course you are.
I, I-- Actually, I'm auditing it because you've been on television. Do you--
- Should I come back later?
- Oh, um-- If you don't mind--
- Well, I'll come back.
- I'll tell you what, Dick.
- It's all right.
- Why don't you meet me tomorrow?
I'll take you to lunch at the Athenaeum.
- What?
- I'm sorry. The Athenaeum Club at Forty-third and Fifth?
- Say, uh, tomorrow at noon?
- Lunch at the Athenaeum.
- At noon.
- Great.
- Great. See you then.
I wanted to talk to you about Ode On a Grecian Urn.
Ah! ''Beauty is truth; truth, beauty.
That is all ye know on earth and all ye need to know.''
-Does he really mean that about beauty and truth?
-Why a foster child? I don't understand.
Congress investigates communists.
Congress investigates mobsters.
That is not me!
Yeah, well, look on the bright side.
You'll be on national television.
- That's a joke, Charlie.
- Well, that's not funny.
- Charles Van Doren!
-It's just not funny.
-H-Hey! Charles Van Doren! How ya doin'?
- I'm worried about this.
- Yeah, well, look, I alred--
Wh-Who was that?
That's just, just, just some guy.
Well, look, I already know about this guy Goodwin, and I'm on top of it.
-So trust me.
-You callin' Information?
-Well, you don't-- You don't understand.
- What are you dialin' for?
For Information?
- They have a name!
Charles Van Doren, he's dialin' for, for Information.
Hey, Chuck, what do you do?
Chuckie! Answer this question.
- Answer this question.
- I-I-I'm sorry. I gotta go. I gotta go.
- What street do I live on in Brooklyn, huh?
- Did you tell him anything?
- No, no, no, I didn't--
- Charles, come out of there.
Come out. You got fans here.
- I, I gotta go.
- We wanna talk to you!
- I gotta go! I gotta go!
- Come on. Let's go.
Hey, Chuck, how ya doin'?
How ya holdin' up? All right?
Hey, can I get an autograph for my wife?
Give me an autograph for my wife!
Come on, Charles, don't be a snob.
Give me an autograph for my wife.
So Sandra says what's ever on her mind.
- And you've been married how long?
- Five years. You?
Oh, no.
I'm supposed to be fixed up with this girl on the cover of the new Harper's Bazaar, but--
- Well, you know how that is.
- Yeah.
- Waldorf salad for you, Mr Van Doren.
- Oh, thank you.
- And a Reuben sandwich.
- Thank you.
- So--
- Oh.
What do you know about this grand jury investigation, Charlie?
Oh, I remember Dan mentioned something about this... that it was all some, some wild-goose chase.
Uh, a political thing.
They talk so fast in that business that half of it goes right past me.
- Dan?
- En-Enright.
He's really the one to talk to.
- You know if he testified?
- Uh, uh, more water!
Uh, you can reach him at NBC.
Dan Enright.
So, how long have you been with this committee, Dick?
- Six months.
- Mm-hmm.
Seemed like a good way to postpone the inevitable.
Postpone the inevitable?
Uh, is there a spot for me?
- I mean Wall Street.
- Oh.
So, back to this, uh, grand jury business.
- I'm wondering.
- Oh.
Dad?
Charlie!
Excuse me, Frank.
This is a surprise.
How are you, son? We share an office, and I never see you any more.
Oh, I'm there, Dad. I'm just hiding behind your reputation.
No, I'm serious!
We all miss you at home.
Please join us. Dad, this is Dick
Goodwin. He's up from Washington.
- Narrow escape.
- Dad doesn't like Washington.
A swamp that traded malaria for politics.
- What's the special?
- It's the Reuben.
The Reuben sandwich is the only entirely invented sandwich.
Won the National Sandwich
Contest two years ago.
A salient point.
Who invented it?
Uh, Reuben kay, at a poker game in Omaha.
I knew there was a ''k'' in Nebraska.
U-Unfortunately they have the sandwich here, but, uh, they don't seem to have any Reubens.
- Touch.
- Dick's a protege of Clark Byse.
I just finished a, a clerkship with Justice Frankfurter.
Of course you did. Frankfurter collects brains the way other people collect stamps.
Uh, did you happen to see the show Monday, Dad?
Monday! Uh, we were with Bunny Wilson.
Oh, no, it's nothing.Just there was a question about Hawthorne.
Oh, well, you know how it is with Bunny once he gets going.
So, Dick, Charlie invite you to his poker game yet?
He's a hell of a poker player.
We have-- We have a regular game Thursday nights, just some friends I went to school with.
- You're welcome to come over next week.
- Are you a gambler, Dick?
I-I don't know if I'm a gambler.
I know which end of an ace is up.
Well, Dick, if you look around the table and you can't tell who the sucker is... it's you!
Yeah, Dan Enright, please.
Uh, Dick Goodwin.
Uh, no. Actually,
I'll just call back. Thanks.
''Name the three heavyweight champions who preceded Joe Lewis.''
- Oh, I know that! Uh,Jim Braddock...
- Mm-hmm.
Max Baer... and--
- Damn. No.
- Primo Carnera.
- Primo Carnera. Of course.
- Yeah, good ol' Primo. I was there that night at the Garden.
- Oh, really?
- The night Baer beat him. Yeah.
Hey, the big guinea. Twelve times Baer knocked him down.
Al, I've been thinking. Maybe you shouldn't give me the answers any more.
Now, what do you want to do that for, Professor?
Charlie, you're doin' the right thing, really.
- Everybody's makin' money.
- Well, what if you just gave me the questions... and I could look up the answers on my own?
I mean, don't you think that'd be--
Well, be less egregious?
Only in the balcony.
You know about that.
All right, now, your consequence--
Doesn't want the answers any more.
Just wants the questions.
- Who?
- Who? The Great White Hope.
That's right.
Now, the consequence is behind--
Dan, what the hell is ''egregious''?
He just wants the questions?
- Uh, excuse me. Uh, Mr Noland?
- Yeah?
My name is Richard Goodwin.
I'm with the Congressional
Subcommittee on Legislative Ov--
Get out.
No, no, I don't wanna say anything. No, can't help you.
I told them everything I had to say.
Everything I knew, I told them.
- Yeah?
- Mr Stempel. My name is Dick Goodwin.
I'm an investigator with the
Subcommittee on Legislative Oversight...
- of the United States Congress.
- Yeah?
- Did you recently testify before a grand jury?
- Yeah.
Well, if you have a minute,
I'd really like to talk to you about it.
Gee, fi-finally. I, I knew it was just a matter of time.
Come in.
- Didn't you go to City College?
- Uh, Harvard.
- Toby!
- Oh.
Oh, this is, this is my wife Toby. This is Mr Goodwin.
He's an investigator from the United States Congress.
W-Would you like a cup of coffee, Mr--
Uh, I, I already got the pot on.
I tell you, that sounds great, actually.
And bring some rugulach if there are any left.
I love my wife, but it's like livin' with a plague of locusts.
If Charles Van Doren told 'em what I told 'em... do you think this whole grand jury thing would be squashed?
- Quashed. It's not ''squashed.''
- Not in a million years. Quashed, okay?
- What exactly did you tell the grand jury?
- Have one.
- Uh, no, thanks.
- Lester, would you knock it off for ten minutes?
Come on, they're a Jewish delicacy. Before Toby eats it.
- I'm retainin' water for your information.
- You and the Grand Coulee Dam.
Come on, you don't know what you're missing.
I'm quite familiar with rugulach, thank you.
H-How'd a guy like you get into Harvard?
- Capped teeth.
- Lester!
Herb, what exactly did you tell the grand jury?
No, you can't ask me that.
It's, it's, it's sealed. It's illegal.
Well, uh, just between us.
They made me take a dive.
Marty. They made me lose on Marty just to humiliate me.
- Who made you take a dive?
- Dan Enright.
He told me I had plateaued, that the ratings had plateaued.
- A sinking ship and the rats stayed.
- Do you think in a million years I wouldn't know Marty?
And meanwhile, Charles Van Moron would be on the show 1 1 weeks in a row?
Why, I-I don't understand.
H-How could they make you take a dive?
- What?
- Why didn't you just answer
Marty if you knew it?
What? And throw away his future in television?
- Would you please go inside and tell Gene krupa to take five?
- Lester. Lester!
You're so naive. It's a fix.
It's all-- It's all a fix. A setup.
I made a study of it. They always follow a Jew with a Gentile.
And the Gentile wins more money.
What is that, a coincidence?
Herb, you're saying this whole grand jury thing was because of you.
You know what you have to do?
You have to nail Van Doren.
- Are you gonna nail Van Doren?
- Look, first of all,
I'm not here to nail anyone, okay?
- This isn't McCarthyism.
- Listen, think about what
McCarthyism did for McCarthy.
Let me ask you something.
Do you have any corroborative evidence to what you're saying?
Listen to me. Don't make necessarily the mistakes that I might have made in life.
Think about your career. You nail
Van Doren, it'll be bigger than Sputnik.
It'll be like a big, blond
Sputnik crashing right down on his, whew, friggin' head.
Charlie? Hi.
Dick Goodwin.
Uh, I hope you don't mind.
The English Department gave me your number up in Connecticut.
Yeah. Look, um, I-I met with Herbert Stempel yesterday.
And, uh, he told me a couple of things. I'm kinda curious--
What?
Sure. Well, what train was that?
Yeah, just, ho-hold on.
I got a pen right here.
Grand Central Station.
Housatonic.
Cornwall, Connecticut.
I will, uh-- I will, uh--
I'll get right on the way.
- Dick, I'm glad you could make it.
- Charlie.
That's some snappy-looking Mercedes.
Come around the back.
We're just about to eat.
- What is that, a 300?
- Yes. My father's birthday, so I bought myself a car.
- It's only got 1 1 0 miles on it.
- The show's treating you well, huh? It's good lookin'.
Dorothy, your tomato salad is fabulous!
- What's your secret?
- Manure.
Now look at Thomas. Thomas is aerodynamically designed to go directly to heaven.
- And who are you?
- Dick Goodwin.
- I'm a friend of Charlie's.
- Ah.
- You sound like you're from Boston.
- Brookline, actually.
The wrong girl for me.
- You know I didn't.
- Oh, yes, you did.
- We have the horseradish growing in the garden.
- Well, that's good.
- So, how long have you been married?
- Twenty years.
- Auntie Rita had an affair with Wendell Willkie.
- Yeah?
''Now see summer bloom upon this lea.
Three score rings around this tree.
Once green; now bare.
Once lush; now sere.
Consoled only that I am planted here.''
You certainly are.
- ''Roots thick...
- And old.
- and deep...
- And doddering.
- assuage my woes--''
- A termite nibbles at my toes.
- Et tu, Bunny?
- Charlie, is Jack Barry single?
- I think so.
Well, my roommate has a huge crush on him. She wants you to introduce her.
- What's Dave Garroway like?
- Cheap.
- Cheat?
- Wasn't I talking?
- You were, yes. Talking and talking and talking.
Charlie's famous, like Elvis Presley.
I've become like Leopold of Belgium, usurped by his son before his time.
I suppose that makes me king Baudouin.
No. Next birthday, you all get a dirty limerick.
I certainly hope so!
So, how's it feel,
Charlie?
Well, I can't even eat dinner in a restaurant any more.
And people follow me inside to discover what kind of brain food I eat.
In my day, it was flagpole-sitting and swallowing goldfish.
- Last week alone, I had
1 1 proposals of marriage.
- Perhaps you should accept one of them.
To think that they unleash you on those impressionable young minds.
Well, why not? He's 33 years old.Jesus
Christ had a girlfriend at 33 years old.
- Look how that turned out.
- And he shared an office with his father.
- I'm sure they're all very nice girls.
- In that case, perhaps
I should appear on a quiz show.
Oh, the money, meanwhile, no one knows what to do with it... though every stockbroker in New York seems eager to try.
Why don't you just put it in the bank? What I've always done with my prize money.
No, it's just-- You don't understand, Dad. It's, uh--
There are all sorts of tax implications.
You think I can't understand the concept of taxes?
- At this level, it's a bit more complicated.
- And at my level?
I never thought of myself having a level, Charlie.
What level might that be?
I mean, it's not as if the money fell into my lap. I worked for it.
- W-Work? Ah, ho, ho, ho.
- Millions of people watch the game shows, Dad.
Then I suppose we've become a nation of proctors.
- Mark.
- Help me out here, Harvard.
Uh, claim victory and depart the field.
- 'Course we don't have a television.
- Why on earth would we need a television?
How much money is it again?
Wha-- What?
- They don't have a television.
- You haven't seen the show?
We were supposed to watch it the other night at Thurber's--
Even Thurber has a television, and he's blind.
What? How, how much is it now, Charlie?
- What?
- Oh!
- I never!
- She heard that all right.
Well.
''Some rise by sin and some by virtue fall.''
Measure For Measure.
''To do a great right, do a little wrong.''
- Merchant of Venice.
- It's this game our family plays.
''Oh, what men dare do!
What men may do!
What men daily do, not knowing what they do.''
Much Ado About Nothing.
''Things without remedy should be without regard; what's done is done.''
''Things without all remedy.''
Macbeth.
''How ill white hairs become a fool and jester.''
- Now, Professor, open your presents.
- Yes!
- Well, what have we here?
- Aftershave.
Aw!
- He's opening it now.
- Ha-ha.
Oh, no!
Oh, oh, my God! How swell!
I guess I'm surrounded.
Thank you, Charlie.
I-I thought you might like it, Dad.
- Do you remember Herbert Stempel?
- Remember him? I still can't believe I beat him.
Stempel tells me that Dan Enright... made him take a dive from the show.
- What?
- He tells me that Dan Enright made him take a dive.
- That's ridiculous.
- Yeah?
A little odd, though, don't you think?
I mean, losing on such an easy question?
You know, frankly, Dick, if Stempel can just run around... and smear a man like Dan Enright to the United States Congress--
No, nobody's smearing anybody. I'm just trying to figure out the truth here.
Uh, could you just untie the bowline there and just shove us off?
All right.
Dick, could you raise the jib for us, please?
- What's the jib?
- It's the-- Yeah.
Do you remember what it was like for guys like us when we were in school?
When being smart was like being cross-eyed?
But you should see the letters I get. kids are excited about... about books and learning and general knowledge.
Dan Enright had a, had a lot to do with that.
Yeah, but don't you think he wanted you to win?
I mean, if, if you look at the ratings, they're staggering.
Well, what did he say,
''they made him take a dive''?
- Well?
- Well, how did they make him take a dive, anyway?
He didn't want to jeopardize any future he might have in television.
Yeah, well--
Anyway, how many people did you say testified in front of the grand jury?
Why?
What's your point?
Well, if what you're saying is true, then everybody lied.
- Hi. Al Freedman.
- Hi, I'm Dan.
- How are you doin'?
- Good to see you.
- I'm sorry for the delay. Come on in.
- We're very busy today. Have a seat.
- Would you like a cup of coffee or, uh...
- Anything?
- a soft drink?
- I'm fine, thanks.
- Are you sure?
- We're very well-stocked up here.
- Nothing?
- I'm fine!
- No trouble.
So, I understand you've spoken to Charles Van Doren.
- And Herbert Stempel.
- Oh, I was afraid of that.
He says, and I quote, that he was made to ''take a dive.''
Oh, believe me, I'm quite familiar with Herb's allegations.
You know, I think
I could recite them by rote.
Forty-six witnesses swore up and down
Herbie's a lying tub of shit.
- Al.
- I'm sorry.
- Why the big secret?
Well, to protect people's reputations.
I mean, frankly, you never know what the public is gonna believe, you see?
There's that, and um--
- And what?
- Look, Dick, I wa--
- Can I call you Dick?
- Sure, Dan.
After the loss, Herb came to visit me in an agitated--
Well, I, I suppose the clinical term would be, uh, what?
- The guy's nuts.
- Manic. He was in a manic...
- Manic.
- frame of mind.
And I took the precaution of tape recording that meeting.
Al, would you play the tape?
Listen to this.
You get me that panel show or I'm gonna bring you down, you lousy, lyin'prick!
You and
Charles Van fuckin'Doren!
What is this, Herb?
Are you blackmailing me?
I need that money, Dan. I need to get back on television.
You get me that panel show or
I'll tell everyone it's a fraud.
- You know that's not true.
- Who cares if it's true?
- ''The fix is in this week on Twenty-One.''
- Okay.
Herb, I can't believe--
So he needed mo-more money after all that money he won?
Gambling.
And that's the least of it.
I mean, if the judge was protecting anyone, he was protecting Herb.
Given, uh-- Well--
- His medical condition.
- His medical condition?
- Oh, yeah.
- Al, get the bills.
I mean, put yourself in his shoes.
He's no longer in the public eye.
He's remembered, if he's remembered at all, as ''the guy that lost to Van Doren.''
Television is like a monkey on his back... and we're not talking about someone who is necessarily stable to begin with.
- No.
- So you paid for his psychoanalysis?
- I felt responsible.
- Yeah, you're too nice.
- No, I'm not.
If it were up to me, I would've sent him to the skating rink the fast way.
- Five sessions a week?
- Five, and not a dent.
Herb is so angry with himself for losing, and it was on such a simple question too.
- Marty.
- Marty. His ego couldn't handle it.
He blames Charles Van Doren for his downfall.
And of course, the real downfall of Herbert Stempel has always been...
- Herbert Stempel.
- Herbert Stempel. Absolutely.
Well, you met him.
Does he seem stable to you?
Well, I definitely have an inkling of what you're talking about.
He told me this whole story about how when a Jew is on the show... he always loses to a Gentile, and then the Gentile wins more money. Right?
I mean, who could dream up a scheme like that?
A symptom of his
Van Doren fixation.
The thing of it is,
I looked it up. It's true.
We could check it.
- Herbie, I wanna go home.
- I took you to dinner, didn't I?
Just hold your horses.
This is ridiculous!
Wha--
Where have you been? Why don't you return my phone calls?
Did you talk to Van Doren, hmm?
- I'll tell you who I spoke to.
I spoke to Dan Enright.
- Well, forget Enright.
Ah, Goodwin, 1 535, please.
You threatened to blackmail him if he didn't get you on a panel show.
What? When?
I didn't blackmail him.
- He's got the whole thing on tape.
- What are you talking about?
H-He promised me that panel show.
What tape?
What are you talking about?
Listen, Goodwin, don't think
I don't see what you're doin'.
You're building this great case against me, a pile of evidence... an army of witnesses against me,
Herb Stempel.
And meanwhile, you and Van Doren are off giving each other the secret Ivy League handshake.
- Herb, you're making me look like a jerk.
- I know what they're doing to you. They did it to me.
Just because you went to
Harvard, you think you have some stake in the system, huh?
- He didn't pay for your psychiatrist bills?
- The point is Van Doren got the answers.
He did not get the answers.
If anything, he gave them the answers.
- I know he got the answers!
- Ah, bullshit, Herb.
How do you know he got the answers?
Because I got the answers!
- You got the answers? What do you mean, you got the answers?
- Well, not very many answers.
I just wanted to get out from under the financial thumb, as it were, of my in-laws.
I don't understand, Herb.
I thought you were a victim in all this.
I didn't hold myself up to be the crown prince of education.
I didn't preen myself on the cover of Time magazine with a face full of phoney humility--
Good night, Herb.
Toby.
- Hey, Toby, where do you think you're going without me?
- You never told me you got the answers.
I knew the answers to a good part of the questions anyhow.
The ones I didn't, they fed me.
- I-I'm sure I must've mentioned it.
- It's not a thing you mentioned.
- What else did you do that you didn't mention?
- Hey, Enright sat right in our kitchen... and said, ''How'd you like to make $25,000?''
I don't know any man in America who would turn that down.
- It's dishonest.
- Let me tell you about honest.
You know what my father used to tell me? ''Work hard and you'll get ahead.''
Was that honest?
Look at Geritol.
''Geritol cures tired blood.'' And I'm the one who's supposed to be ashamed.
You never said that you were getting the answers.
Let them believe whatever they want. What do I care? What do
I care if a bunch of saps--
I was one of those saps,
Herbert.
He got the answers.
Now, why would he admit that?
I mean, he's only implicating himself.
- Well, maybe it's the truth.
- Yeah, well, I have a hunch it is the truth.
Well, meanwhile, we'll have to have him testify in a straitjacket.
Van Doren isn't crazy. Maybe you should put him on the stand.
- What's Van Doren got to do with this?
- They gave Stempel the answers.
Why would Van Doren be any different?
Sandra, you have no idea what these people are like.
- It's all Thurber and Trilling and, and Bunny Wilson.
- Bunny?
Yeah, Edmund Wilson.
That's what they call him.
- Well, that doesn't mean you have to.
- Look, my point is... why would a guy like that jeopardize everything he has?
- Which is what?
- Sandra, the man is on the cover of Time magazine!
Well, he's not going to be on the cover of Time as Mark Van Doren's son, Dick.
- Boxing.
- Boxing.
- Boxing.
How many points would you like to risk?
Well, I'll risk eight points, Jack.
All right. For eight points, name the three heavyweight champions...
immediately preceding
Joe Louis.
Oh.
Well, my father would know that.
- That'd beJames J. Braddock.
- Correct.
Max Baer lost the belt to Braddock.
Yes, and the fellow
Baer beat?
Oh, now, I remember he knocked him down 1 2 times before he finally succumbed.
- Would you like to guess at it, Charlie?
- Yeah-- Primo Carnera!
Correct!
You have 2 1!
- Second base is Eddie Stanky.
- No, it's Red Schoendienst.
- Forget it!
- I hear that Pat Boone plays in his white shoes.
- No, that's Daniel Boone.
- Ace-king bets.
- Check.
- Check.
- Bet five.
- I'll raise that a dollar.
- I'm out.
- Why?
- You better watch out, Fred.
Dick's one of the brightest young lawyers down in Washington.
Great! All my money already goes to Washington.
- You and me both, pal.
- Taxes!
- It's nothing but organized theft.
- No, property.
- What?
- ''Property is theft,'' I believe.
- That's the locus classicus from Proudhon.
- Whoa!
- I warned you.
- Oh, great, another one.
Ace bets five.
- I'm out.
- I'll see that.
- What are you working on, Charlie?
- I raise five dollars.
- I'd love to know what you've got under there, Charlie.
- The truth has its price.
Well, everything has its price.
- So, where'd you prep, Dick?
- Dick's up here on a witch hunt.
He thinks Twenty-One is rigged.
- Oh, God.
- Is it?
Get out!
Hey, uh, which face cards are in profile, without looking?
Jack of spades, king of diamonds, jack of hearts.
Can we play cards? It's bad enough my wife makes me watch this crap.
Okay, you're writing a book on Lincoln. The night he was shot... who was the doctor at his deathbed?
-Joseph k. Barnes was the doctor.
- Whoa.
Who was the detective on the case?
The detective was Clarvoe.
John Alexander Clarvoe.
- Who embalmed him?
- Come on.
- Black or brown?
- Hmm.
- Charles D. Brown.
- Then he was murdered with estate taxes. Come on.
- Let's play, let's play, let's play.
- I'm impressed. You're not impressed?
Ace checks.
Check.
Um--
Whoa!
- Now I'm impressed.
- Go ahead, Dick, call 'em.
What do you say, Dick?
- I know you're lying.
- Whoa.
Bluffing.
The word is bluffing.
Too rich for my blood.
- Try Geritol.
- Sandwich time.
- You bet.
How 'bout a drink? This game could use a little juice, huh?
- Let's eat.
- Can you give me that ham...
- All right...
- in there.
- we're talking Stanky--
Charlie? Charlie? The only people who can implicate you directly are all in this room.
-Just think about that, okay?
- What, you think that nudzh is gonna get me to talk?
Well, he may be a nudzh, but he was also first in his class at Harvard Law School.
- Oh, Harvard!
- Oh, will you please stop that?
- Al, stop it.
- Sorry. Charlie, they could kill me, I wouldn't talk.
- They could subject me to any kind of torture, um, uh--
- The rack?
- Thank you. They could put me on the rack--
- The iron maiden?
- Whatever.
- The bastinado?
- Charlie, I'm not tellin' 'em a goddam thing.
- Correct me, Dan, if I'm wrong.
- No, you're right.
Plus, what did you do wrong?
Everybody knows the magician don't saw the lady in half.
- It's not exactly the same thing.
- It's entertainment.
I am a college professor!
Ah.
They need the Professor in make-up.
Oh-ho! Well.
Aren't you
Charles Van Doren?
I'm sorry, Dad. I didn't mean to wake you. I just had to get out of the city.
You're always welcome,
Charlie.
Sometimes it's hard sleeping in the city.
Well, hope you don't mind.
I took the rest of the cake.
- You look like you could use it.
- Well, under a little strain lately.
That's the way it always is when you're finishing a book.
Oh, no, actually it's the, uh, television show.
Oh,Jesus! I just realized, uh, we watched your show.
Did I tell you? Mother and I moved the television to the den.
No, no.
You didn't mention it.
Anyway, what was it? Uh, something about the Galapagos Islands?
You know what?
I'll try some of that.
The origin and destination of the voyage of the Beagle.
That's right!
Biology for six points.
Good God, the pressure!
All those lights, the money, those strange little booths... that man talking so fast, like being in a bullring.
I don't think
I could remember my name.
You know, I always had a good head for that kind of stuff.
It's just amazing that you could make it look so easy.
But your mother always said you were the actor in the family, Charlie.
- Yeah.
- Huh?
As long as it doesn't interfere with your teaching, why not?
- Dad?
- Huh?
What?
Something on your mind?
You never told me you felt pressure... you know, um, like finishing a book.
Oh-ho-ho, are you kidding?
When I was finishing the Hawthorne book, I tossed and turned so badly... your mother threatened to check into a hotel.
Oh, sure!
You know, I think the old bird's finally getting the hang of this.
You know, I, I just had the strongest memory.
Coming home from school, going to the fridge... ice-cold bottle of milk, big piece of chocolate cake.
It was just the simplicity of it.
I-I can't think of anything that will make me feel that happy again.
Not till you have a son.
That would be our most difficult question on American literature.
For 1 1 points, I'll read you lines from America's greatest poets.
You must identify the author.
First.:
''I hear America singing the very carols I hear. ''
That would be
Walt Whitman.
That's right!
Second.:
''I shot an arrow in the air.
It fell to earth, I know not where. ''
- Henry Wadsworth Longfellow.
- Right again, Jim!
Finally.: ''Hope is the thing with feathers that perches in the soul. ''
That is, uh, actually, by one of my favourite poets.:
- Emily Dickinson.
- I'm sorry, Jim.
Did-- Did you say
Emily Dickinson?
Oh! Well, yes!
All right!
- Dickinson.
- I'm sorry, Jim.
Did-- Did you say
Emily Dickinson? Oh! Well, yes!
...favourite poets.:
Emily Dickinson.
I'm sorry, Jim.
Did-- Did you say
Emily Dickinson?
Oh! Well, yes!
- Who is it?
- Mr Snodgrass?
- Yeah.
- Uh, my name is Richard Goodwin.
- Yeah.
Hi. I'm a federal investigator with a congressional subcommittee.
The committee's been investigating the quiz shows.
Um, I was just looking at a kinescope of your appearance on Twenty-One. I noticed--
Mr Snodgrass?
- This is good.
- Yeah? What is it?
- Drive on by.
- What?
- Go around to the back entrance.
- Okay.
Mr kintner's office.
E-Excuse me. Do you think he might see me before the peacock molts?
- Uh, who are you with again?
- I'm with the United States Congress.
- Perhaps you've heard of them.
- Oh, your name is Goldw--
Excuse me, not you.
- Your name is Goldwyn?
- Goodwin.
Ah, yes. Please have a seat,
Mr Goldwyn, uh, uh, Goodwin.
I'll see if he's available.
- Right.
- Yes, that's red, long-stemmed.
Thank you.
Well, I'm sure he'd be available if my name were Geritol.
Perhaps if you could come back another time.
- Good night, Rose.
- Good night, Mr kintner.
- Mr kintner.
- Excuse me!
- My name is Richard Goodwin.
- Oh?
I'm with the Congressional Subcommittee on Legislative Oversight.
Congratulations.
How's Chairman Harris?
- Ah, he's fine.
- Still in that sand trap where I left him?
Mr kintner, I am here to give you a chance to cooperate.
We'll cooperate in any way we can. Now, will you excuse me?
Twenty-One is rigged, and I can prove it. Who won, how long they were on the show.
It was all a scheme to keep the ratings up, and NBC made millions off it.
Young man...
I am the President of the
National Broadcasting Company.
I have no idea what the day-to-day operations of Twenty-One are.
Does Chairman Harris know every little thing you're up to?
I have Enright cold.
And, sir, that means I have you.
- Really?
- Really.
Then why are you the one that's sweating?
This week's challenger from New York,
New York, welcome Mrs Vivienne Nearing.
Returning this week with $ 1 39,000, our champion Charles Van Doren.
A very cordial welcome to the show,
Mrs Nearing. Mr Van Doren.
-Jack.
- You're back again with a lot of money at stake.
Mrs Nearing, let's tell the Professor and our audience a little something about you.
A sometimes painter, pianist and Double-Crostics fan...
she has a Bachelor's Degree from Queens College, New York... and an M.A. and L.L.B. from Columbia.
She and her husband Victor are lawyers in New York.
- Quite a bean inside that pretty head, huh?
- She is terrifying.
All right, I think you both know how to play the game. Don't forget to put your earphones on.
The very best of luck to both of you! Let's play Twenty-One!
Some of the most important aeroplanes of World War II were the following.:
the P-40, the P-4 7, the P-5 1...
the B-2 4, the B-25 and the B-26.
Give me the nicknames that the
Air Force gave to these planes.
That's much harder than the question they asked that woman, and hers was ten points!
- Do you know the names of those planes?
- Of course not. Sit down.
Who would know the names of those planes?
- He's not the Secretary of Defence.
- Shh, shh.
- B-2 4, Liberator.
As we enter our final round, Mrs Nearing leads by a score of 2 1 to 1 6.
It is a moment of truth, as it were, for Charles Van Doren, our reigning champion... after a record-breaking
1 4 weeks.
Will he hold onto his title?
Wow.
- Mrs Nearing?
- Yes?
You have the required 2 1 points.
We're going to let you listen in on this last round.
Please do not divulge your score or speak in any way.
Mr Van Doren, the category is royalty.
- Royalty.
- Royalty.
- Yes, sir.
- How many points would you like to try for?
- Uh, well, let's see, uh--
- I'll take five, five points.
- All right.
Name the kings of the following countries:
Norway, Sweden, Belgium and Iraq.
- Could I take the third part last?
- Certainly.
Take as much time as you need, Charlie.
You have a lot riding on these answers.
I sure have. Well, Norway, that would be Haakon. King Haakon.
- That's right.
-And Sweden, um, Gustavus.
- Right again, Charlie.
The King of Iraq?
- Iraq.
- Well, um--
- Turn it-- Turn it off!
Turn the damn thing off.
My God! What got into you?
It's just too nerve-wracking!
I-I remember that's his, um, great-uncle...
in that wonderful book,
The Seven Pillars of Wisdom.
Um, Do-- No. Um--
Faisal. Oh, King Faisal.
- Correct. And Belgium?
- Belgium. Belgium, Belgium,
Belgium. Let, Let me see--
- That's the third part?
- That's right.
Um--
The King of Belgium, um--
Um--
Um--
Let me see.
Professor, would you like more time?
Belgium.
The King of Belgium.
I, I, I can picture him, Jack, right down to that Hapsburg lip that they--
It's-- I can't seem to summon the name. Um--
He's gonna dump it.
Is Garroway here?
Professor, I'm sorry. I'm going to have to ask for your answer.
It seems like an easy one.
Leopold.
No.
No, I'm, I'm sorry, Charlie.
The answer is Baudouin. king Baudouin.
Leopold is Baudouin's father, the former king.
What a stunning turn of events.
- Mrs Nearing, you have just unseated our champion.
- Baudouin. Of course.
Come out here, both of you.
Listen. You know what to do.
Give him another chance, that's what.
Call it a bonus round, but get him on that show again.
- Someone will call if he loses, won't they?
- I'm sure.
- Congratulations.
- Thank you.
- Changing of the guard as it were.
You take home $ 1 0,000 of Mr Van Doren's money.
We'll try not to hold that against you.
Please, come back next week.
Tell us if you want to continue playing. I sure hope you do.
- How 'bout a warm hand for our new champion...
- Thank you.
- Mrs Vivienne Nearing?
Whoa. Now, who's that in our wings? Is that Dave Garroway?
Dave Garroway of the NBC
Today Show, ladies and gentlemen.
Hello, Dave.
- How are you, Charlie?
- Fine, thank you, Dave.
I was wondering, what are you gonna do now?
Well, I was, um, uh, hoping to enjoy some peace and quiet now... and, um, a chance to get back to my books.
Well, you know, eventually this sad day had to come, but we don't wanna lose you, Charlie.
So, at the Today Show, we decided why not make Charlie... our special cultural correspondent... to the people and to the school children of America.
Well, I-- I hope you're not firing the chimp.
How does $50,000 a year sound to you, Professor?
Wow. Wow.
Um, well, I, uh--
I was hoping to, um, to get back to my teaching.
Well, this is the largest classroom in the world, Professor: television.
So, if you will, just sign right here on the dotted line.
Charlie, walk away.
Come on. You don't need it.
- Congratulations, Charlie.
- Thank you.
- They're watching.
- That would be wonderful.
- Did Mr Garroway leave?
- Yes, sir.
- Good show, Dave.
- Thanks.
- Mrs Nearing, congratulations.
- Oh, thank you.
- It was a wonderful show.
- Gentlemen, this is Mrs Nearing.
- Al.
- You know Al Freedman.
- Yes, we've met.
- Right. Okay.
- You're gonna be meeting tomorrow.
- Okay, hold still--
- You're a very disruptive young man.
Okay, let's bring the camera out, and let's bring the blackboard in, please.
- Okay, very good.
- Hey, you remember James Snodgrass?
* (glitch in the encoding) *
- And get her in there with her family.
-Yeah, he was a contestant on your show.
-Okay. And, yeah.
You know how many contestants we've had on this show? And could we have a sh-- a shot...
- This man was an artist.
- with Jack Barry. That's very good.
- Maybe that'll jog your memory.
- He was an artist.
- Al digs these people up.
God knows where he finds them.
- He's in Greenwich Village.
- And now I'd like a picture with her mother on the, on the left--
There was a question about the first line of a poem by Emily Dickinson.
And Barry apparently expected he was going to say Ralph Waldo
Emerson, and get it wrong.
Yeah. Really? Mr Goodwin,
I'm very busy right now.
Dan, I have it on the kinescope, okay? It's clear as day. The man literally did a double take.
Oh, he did a double take! And, and who told you this? Is this Herb again?
- Or is this the
Greenwich Village beatnik?
- Oh, that's interesting.
Now, w-why is he a beatnik?
Because he's not Charlie Van Doren?
Yeah, you're damn right.
He's not Charlie Van Doren.
You know, you got these crackpots comin' out of the woodwork.
You're snoopin' around askin' questions.
You don't have a shred of concrete evidence to--
Dan, let me tell you somethin'.
In this envelope...
are all the questions that James Snodgrass was asked on Twenty-One, okay?
The odd thing about this envelope is he appeared on the show on January 1 3th... if you'll recall. Yet, somehow, he mailed this to himself
January 1 1 th, registered mail.
I'd say that's pretty goddam concrete, wouldn't you?
Here we go. Let's, let's get a good one.
Right into the camera.
Smile right into the camera.
There you go.
- I wasn't in that, was I?
You didn't see me?
- No, you were out. It's okay.
Why would he do that?
How's that trap feel clamped on your leg?
He sent it to himself registered mail?
Now, why should you be the fall guy here when NBC and Geritol are makin' the real money?
Dick.
- Dan.
- You want me to implicate the network?
You don't owe them a thing.
If I even hinted that the network knew-- and they didn't know-- they'd never let me through the door again.
I got a sneakin' suspicion you're not going through that door anyway.
Television's my life,
Dick.
It's over. Why don't you go talk to your family?
I just had a thought.
Would you be interested in your own panel show?
Seriously.
What?
I'll get back to you on that, Dan.
- Please excuse the robe.
- Oh, that's all right.
It's the first decent night's sleep I've had in months.
- Would you like some coffee?
- I thought I'd stop by before
I head back down to Washington.
- I've got a 1 0:00 train.
- Mm-hmm.
We're going to announce our hearings later today.
Oh, really?
As I exit the stage, you enter.
Well, don't forget the world's biggest classroom.
Oh, that. Well, it's-- It's the, it's the world's biggest something.
Uh, how do you like it, Dick?
You seem like a, a black coffee man.
Yeah, black's fine.
Here we go.
A toast to... escape.
*(glitch in the encoding)*
''It is the basket in which the heart is caught... when down some awful Battlement the rest of Life is dropt.''
King Baudouin.
Emily Dickinson, actually.
The one you lost on.
Oh, that. Oh it, it seems the Belgian Consulate... has formally protested my ignorance.
Up at Cornwall, Charlie, your father said he felt like Leopold. Remember?
Well, you lost on one you knew.
Same as Stempel.
Well, I, I must've had a mental block.
I-I was there last night, you know. And I-I could swear... a smile crept across your face when you lost.
I wanted to get off the show.
You can understand that.
Look, I-I feel like I've been holding my breath for 1 4 weeks.
Why? What'd you think it was?
Uh, look. I spoke to the committee, okay?
We're going to hold the hearings without you.
I am not out to destroy you or your family.
- You go on, you live your life, and God bless ya.
- Okay.
But I wanna know, man to man, did you get the answers?
- Man to man?
- Yeah, just between us.
What is this? Is this still that business with Stempel?
I mean, Dan says he's not the most reliable fellow.
Well, there's a problem, Charlie.
I found another contestant.
A man named James Snodgrass.
And he says he got the answers too.
- Are you sure these people are telling the truth?
- He put all the questions... in a sealed envelope and sent them to himself, registered mail.
- That was two days before he appeared on the show.
- Doesn't prove anything.
- Hey, you don't have to be a genius to connect the dots.
- Well, don't connect them through me.
Hey, don't treat me like I'm some member of your goddam fan club.
Are you tellin' me everybody got the answers but you?
- You're so persistent, Dick.
You know, I really envy that.
- Was it just the money, Charlie?
You'll forgive me, but anyone that thinks money is ever just money couldn't have much of it.
Charlie, you want to insult me, fine.
But you can't envy me at the same time.
Jesus, Dick! If someone offered you all this money... to be on some rigged quiz show, instant fame, the works, would you do it?
No. Of course not.
No, no. Throw the whole thing in: the cover of Time, Dave Garroway...
50,000 a year to read poetry on television.
Would you do it?
- No.
- And I would?
H-Honestly, Dick.
All right.
Look, do me a favour.
Don't embarrass me. keep your mouth shut. Don't say anything. Don't talk to the papers.
Just disappear for two weeks.
Please, don't make me call ya.
More coffee, Dick?
Nope. I better go.
I don't wanna mi-miss my train.
The subcommittee will be in order.
The, uh, special Subcommittee on Legislative Oversight... was created pursuant to Section 1 36... of the Legislative
Reorganization Act of 1 946... to conduct a general investigation into the operation... of the, uh, Federal regulatory agencies.
All right. I'll ask if you were assisted in any way.
You answer, ''Yes.''
I'll say, ''How?''
You say, ''I was given the questions and the answers in advance.''
Okay, why don't you just sit on my pants, all right?
I'll ask, ''Was this done routinely?''
You answer, ''Yes.''
Not that tie.
The television tie, okay?
- We've gone over this five times already.
- All right.
-Just try to relax up there.
- You didn't get to press my shirt, did ya?
Be confident. Look at the Chairman directly when you answer.
Enough! Now, you're worse than Enright.
I'm telling the truth.
If they prefer to be lied to, then can just turn on the television, all right?
- It's just that there's a lot riding on this.
- You're telling me... there's a lot riding on it, yeah.
- Well, what do you think,
Toby, huh? Huh?
- What? What do I think about what?
What do you think? You want-- You ready to watch y-your husband give 'em hell?
- I just don't know what you're gonna accomplish.
- Look, as soon as...
- Enright realizes th--
- What do you want, the two-tone or the oxford?
- I think you should wear the oxford. Here.
- Mrs Stempel, listen to me.
When Enright realizes that he's all alone up there, and he's-- they're gonna cut him loose... he will implicate NBC and
Geritol like that, and believe me, you're gonna see somethin'.
I know what you're gonna accomplish. I just don't know what he's gonna accomplish.
You wanna know what? If I do nothing else, I will convince them... that Herbert Stempel knows what won the goddamned Academy Award... for the Best goddamned Picture of 1 955.
- That's what I'm going to accomplish.
- I'm sick of all this.
The subcommittee calls
Herbert Stempel.
- So, i-in other words, you kept on winning.
- Yes, sir, that is correct.
At any time during this, uh, championship run, were you ever assisted in any way?
I was given the questions and answers in advance.
Generally, I would receive the questions and answers on Friday.
Then we'd have sort of a rehearsal on Monday.
- Now, this is from the very beginning?
- Yes.
Dan Enright came to see me in my kitchen, and he said, uh...
''How'd you like to make $25,000?''
And I said, ''Who wouldn't?'' I mean--
Mr Stempel, what do you mean by ''rehearsal''?
Well, uh, for example, he, uh, told me how to breathe heavily into the microphone... and sigh, uh, such as this, uh.
He told me how to stutter and say in a plaintive voice...
''I will take, uh, nine, uh, nine points.''
- So it was all choreographed.
- H-How to bite my lip.
How to mop my brow. He told me specifically not to smear my brow... but rather to pat for optimum effect.
Of course, I'm shvitzing the whole time because they turned off the air conditioning.
Excuse me?
- That's funny.
- Mr Chairman?
Mr Chairman.
With your permission...
we might, at this point, view a, a portion of the programme Twenty-One?
Whenever you're ready.
Herb Stempel, with your
$69,500 still at stake...
although now at $ 2,500 a point.
The category is newspapers.
How many points you wanna try for?
There.
There's the lip-biting.
Yes, we see.
Finally, I was told to, uh, open my eyes... and with a dazzling smile, give the answer and explode when Jack
Barry says, ''That is right.''
The Emporia Gazette?
That is right!
I don-- I don't know where he got it all. Some article on mass psychology he read in Esquire.
- I'll try eight points.
- Yeah, watch Van Doren. He's even better at it than I am.
- M-Mr Stempel, i-if I might refer you--
- Mr Stempel...
- are you suggesting that Charles
Van Doren was also coached?
- Of course he got the answers.
Why would they give me the answers, and not give him the answers?
Why would they make me take a dive unless they knew the other guy would get to 2 1 ?
It's illogical. You don't fix one guy without fixing the other guy.
It's im-m--
It's implausible mathematically.
It would be, and you have eight points.
Hey, you see? Lo-- You see?
L-Look at him. You see, with the brow, patting not smearing?
Uh, Mr Stempel, have you ever received... any psychiatric treatment of any kind?
- What?
- Uh, Mr Stempel, I was wondering if--
Mr Goodwin, please.
Five sessions a week.
That's pretty extensive, isn't it?
Yeah, well, I believe we could all use a little help at various times in our lives.
Is it possible that any of your testimony is motivated by an irrational animosity...
- toward Mr Enright?
- I, I, I don't know.
If a, if a man doesn't live up to his agreements--
A morbid fixation on Mr Van Doren?
If a man promises certain things just to shut me up--
''Now, how'd you like to make $25,000?''
And you said, ''Well, who wouldn't?''
But in retrospect, look at Van Doren.
I should've held out for a lot more.
You prostituted your intellectual ability for money.
That's the difference between me and Van
Doren. I admit it. I have my morality.
Charles Van Doren is a professor at Columbia University.
A Masters degree in astrophysics.
A Ph.D. in literature.
Hails from one of the most prominent intellectual families in this country.
Isn't it just possible,
Mr Stempel... that you got the answers and he didn't?
This is awful.
So I told my husband,
''W-We really need a vacation.''
- And my husband says, ''What are you gonna do with the cat?''
- Uh-huh.
- And I said, ''I don't know.''
And he said, ''Well, you better...
- Good morning. think of something, or we're not going on vacation.''
Will you excuse us?
- Charlie, I'm Bob kintner.
- Oh.
- Don't get up. It's about time we met.
- Hi. It's a pleasure.
- This whole quiz show mess.
- Uh-huh.
- And hearings and all that.
- Yeah. I've been following that in the paper.
Well, our legal department has prepared this for you.
We'd like you to hold a press conference.
Oh, there's a split infinitive here in the second paragraph.
Shall I schedule it?
Well, look, um,
I haven't been subpoenaed.
And I can't think of anything that'd sound guiltier than a... a man who hasn't been accused of anything protesting his innocence.
Now, Charlie, speculation in our society has a way of becoming fact.
Television is a public trust.
We can't afford even a hint of a scandal in our company.
Well, I had rather not do it.
I'm sorry.
Haven't we been good to you?
Haven't we treated you like part of our family?
We have great expectations for you, Charlie.
I know you're gonna do the right thing.
- I'm sorry, Mr Van Doren--
- Is he in?
- He's gone, Mr Van Doren. He's--
- He's gone to Washington?
Mr Freedman's gone to Mexico.
I still don't understand how you can hold a quiz show hearing without Van Doren.
Ah, Van Doren had no contact with NBC or Geritol. Don't you understand?
They deal with Enright.
Enright's the key here.
The key to what? The jury hears the public. The public doesn't know Dan Enright.
The purpose is not to reform the souls of the contestants. The purpose is to reform television.
- It's like the Barenblatt and the Sweezey cases.
- Oh, you don't want to call him?
Fine, Dick.Just don't patronize me with your legal bullshit.
- She's got a point, Dick.
- Bob, maybe it's time for you to go home, huh?
How'd you like
Dick's steak done, Bob? Medium?
There's absolutely no need to drag the man into the spotlight.
- You dragged Herb Stempel into the spotlight.
- Stempel?
The man has to be dragged from the spotlight with his teeth marks still on it.
Yeah, well, nobody forced
Charles Van Doren to go in front of 50 million people, either.
Sandra, this is not McCarthyism.
We are not here to expose for the sake of exposing.
- This is not the point!
- No, that is the point!
That is not your point.
You are ten times the man
Charles Van Doren is, Dick.
Ten times the brain, and ten times the human being.
Meanwhile, you're bending over backwards for him.
You are like the Uncle Tom of the Jews.
I'm glad it's so easy for you to destroy a man's life.
I'll have to keep that in mind.
Bob, sit down.
The quiz show hearings without Van Doren is like doing Hamlet without Hamlet.
The Chairman's instructions are for me to get you up there as promptly as possible.
The questions are to take no longer than 1 5 minutes.
You're to receive the questions in advance... and I'm to thank you for the courtesy of attending this hearing.
Mercy. What a gruelling line of inquiry.
Must have a familiar ring, the questions in advance.
Would you excuse us for a moment, please?
And take this, please.
Thank you.
- Young man--
- The ratings went up if the same contestant... came back week after week.
There was only one way for that to happen. You had to know that.
Young man, I sell over $ 1 4 million a year worth of Geritol.
Geritol. That's the kind of businessman I am.
That show, Twenty-One, cost me
$3-1 /2 million year in, year out.
Sales went up 50% when Van Doren was on.
Fifty percent.
So the very idea that I was unaware of every detail or aspect of that show's operation... well, frankly, it's, it's very insulting.
- So you knew.
- That's even more insulting.
- You had to know.
That's what you just said.
- It's not about what I know.
- It's about what you know.
- You don't know what I know.
- You know that Dan Enright ran a crooked quiz show.
- Oh, he never informed you?
- Did he?
- Let's see what he says.
Dan? Look, Dan Enright wants a future in television. Okay?
What you have to understand is that the public has a very short memory.
But corporations, they never forget.
He's not that stupid.
He knows he's through.
Oh, no. He'll be back. NBC's gonna go on. Geritol's gonna go on.
It makes me wonder what you hope to accomplish with all this.
Don't worry.
I'm just gettin' started.
But even the quiz shows'll be back.
Why fix them? Think about it, will ya?
You could do exactly the same thing by just making the questions easier.
See, the audience didn't tune in to watch some amazing display of intellectual ability.
They just wanted to watch the money.
Imagine if they could watch you.
You're a bright young kid with a bright future. Watch yourself out there.
I turned in my clubs after that day.
-Just, no more.
- Well, you, you weren't too good... when you were out on the links with me that day.
I can't wait to get you out there again.
- Stuck in that sand trap...
- No more. No more for me.
- for about an hour.
Would you, uh, state your name and profession?
My name is Robert kintner.
I'm the President of the
National Broadcasting Company.
My name is Martin Rittenhome.
I run Pharmaceuticals Incorporated.
I take that responsibility very seriously, Congressman.
Well, we immediately commenced our own internal investigation.
...to ferret out this corruption wherever it may exist.
Nobody brought the article in
Time magazine to your attention?
I was in Europe.
I didn't see it.
You didn't see it.
You were travelling.
I didn't see it.
I was travelling at the time.
You sure you never asked about a particular contestant, or about the ratings, nothing?
I never asked anything.
That was their department.
I relied on the excellent reputation of Dan Enright.
Dan Enright was more in the nature of an independent contractor.
Do you remember what you thought when you found out?
Well, I was as shocked as you are. I mean... this was a terrible thing to do to the American people.
I never, never imagined... they could perpetrate this fraud on the American public.
I'd like to say one other thing.
I'd like to say one other thing.
I think all that money should be returned.
Mr Goodwin, any further questions?
No, sir. Thank you.
No further questions.
On behalf of the subcommittee,
I wish to thank you... for your appearance and your testimony here.
What's, what's going on?
Van Doren's made a statement.
I look like the mark in a shill game here, and you're starting to look to me like the shill.
- Wait a minute, sir. If you can just--
- Shut up. I don't know what I'm gonna do here.
When the hell is Van Doren comin' in here? I don't see him on the schedule.
- He's not on the schedule.
- What?
- Wait a minute.
We discussed this. The contestants are not the villains here.
We were only gonna bring in the ones who would come in voluntarily.
All I know is, in the last hour
I've gotten over 200 telegrams from people askin' me... why I won't let poor Charles
Van Doren defend himself.
I got every woman in Arkadelphia squealin' like a pig under a gate.
- And let me tell you somethin', these women vote.
- Oh, I cannot believe this.
And where the hell is
Albert Freedman?
The marshall's are bringing him back from Mexico.
- By what? By mule?
- Sir, please, just tell me what it is that he said.
''Mr Van Doren made himself available to members of the subcommittee staff.
He has advised them at no time was he supplied with any questions or any answers, was--''
That statement of yours took me a bit by surprise.
I know, I know.
We had a deal.
I asked myself, ''Why would he make a statement like that?
He knows
I'll come after him.''
But then it occurred to me.
He knows
I'll come after him.
I can't decide if you think too much of me or too little.
Charlie, I want to think the best of ya.
Everyone does.
That's your curse.
- Did you bring a subpoena?
- Right here.
Well?
You know, I remember five, six years ago my Uncle Harold... told my aunt about this affair he had.
It was a sort of mildly upsetting event in my family.
- Mm-hmm. Mildly?
- Well, you have to put it in context.
See, the thing of it is, the affair was over somethin' like eight years.
So, I remember askin' him, ''Well, why'd you tell her? You got away with it.''
And I'll never forget what he said.
It was the ''getting away with it'' part he couldn't live with.
I might take that chance.
A chance is what I'm givin' ya.
Don Quixote is life.
I still don't see how, how this old guy with a, with a, with a, uh, horse... and a fat old sidekick can think he's a knight.
It means, if you want to be a knight, act like a knight. Okay.
Act like a knight?
You act like a knight.
I am a knight.
- I shall miss them.
- What is this? That retirement business again?
That'd be like a snail retiring from his shell.
I can't go on doing this forever.
It's for you now, Charlie.
So, what's the news? Did you read Norman Mailer in Dissent?
I only glanced at it.
I haven't really had time.
Everyone's talking about it. Don't know whether he's a genius or a fool.
Have you heard, Dad, there's this, uh, congressional committee... that's, um, well, they're investigating the quiz shows?
Yeah, I read that.
What's it about exactly?
Well, evidently, a certain of the contestants were given the answers in advance.
Cheating on a quiz show, it's like plagiarizing a comic strip.
Well, at any rate, it seems the committee wants to call me to, uh, uh, testify.
Oh, I've testified before.
Funding for the arts. It's nothing.
- I think this is a little different.
- You'll run circles round them.
It's not exactly Jefferson and Lincoln down there any more.
I think this is a little different, Dad.
I'd think you'd be glad at a chance to clear your name.
Otherwise people might believe--
People will believe whatever they want to believe. That's not the issue.
Just tell 'em the truth.
You'll do fine.
The real issue, Charlie, is how this keeps distracting you from your teaching.
- Oh, Dad, it's not--
- This and that programme in the morning... though you insist that it doesn't.
Dad, I can't simply just tell them the truth.
Can't tell them the truth?
Why on earth not?
It's, it's complicated.
Complicated?
Yeah, I can't. I ca--
Charlie, from what I understand, it's just this bunch of frauds... showing off an erudition they didn't really have.
- All you have to do is--
- Actually, the problem is, Dad... is it seems I was one of those frauds.
What?
Wha-- What do you mean?
They gave me the answers.
They gave you the answers?
They gave you the answers?
Well, no, no. A-At first, they just asked me questions... they already knew
I knew the answers to.
We ran through those, and I still didn't want them to actually give me the answers... so I had them give me the questions, and I'd go look up... the answers on my own, as if that were any different.
Well, we, we ran through those in a, a couple of weeks... and then I just didn't have the time; finally, it just seemed silly, so--
They gave you all that money to answer questions they knew you knew? Now, that's inflation.
- You're not being very helpful.
- I'm sorry, Charlie, it's--
I'm an old man. It's all a little difficult for me to comprehend.
It's television, Dad. Uh, look, it's, it's just, it's just television.
You make it sound like you didn't have a choice.
What was I supposed to do at that point?
Disillusion the whole goddam country?
- Charlie, you took the money.
- Yes, I know! Yeah, I took the money!
- Is that what this was about?
- No. No, I-- No, I don't know. I--
- It was a goddam quiz show, Charlie!
- ''An ill-favoured thing, sir.
- This is not the time to play games.
- But mine own.'' It was mine.
Your name is mine!
* (glitch in the encoding) *
Charlie.
I-I'm sorry.
I'm really sorry, Dad.
You'll be, um... dragged into all this, you and Mother.
Oh, my God, Charlie.
How are you gonna tell that committee?
Will you come down there with me?
The, uh, subcommittee calls Charles Van Doren.
Charlie! Quit walkin', Charlie.
Charlie, right here.
Hey, Charlie! Please.
Quit walking. Charlie!
Charlie, wait. Here!
Mr Van Doren!
Hey! Over here! Over here!
Professor! Professor, wait.
Photographers will please clear the room.
- Will you please state your name?
- Charles Van Doren.
- Hey, I've gotta get in there.
- I'm sorry, you can't.
- No, I've gotta get in there. I'm--
- Excuse me, sir.
- But my husband is sitting in there--
- Wait a minute! Wait a minute!
- Hey, you, come back here!
- Do you solemnly swear... that the testimony you are about to give will be the truth... the whole truth, and nothing but the truth, so help you God?
I do.
Now, we are advised that, uh, you have a prepared statement... that you would prefer to, uh, give at the outset?
Yes, sir. Uh, might I first have a glass of water?
Of course you may.
You may proceed.
''I would give almost anything I have... to reverse the course of my life in the last year.
The past doesn't change for anyone.
But at least I can learn from the past.
I've learned a lot about life.
I've learned a lot about myself... and about the responsibilities any man has to his fellow men.
I have learned a lot about good and evil. They're not always what they appear to be.
I was involved... deeply involved, in a deception.
I have deceived my friends... and I had millions of them.
I lied to the American people.
I lied about what I knew... and then I lied about what I did not know.
In a sense, I was like a child who refuses to admit a fact in the hope that it'll go away.
Of course, it did not go away.
I was scared... scared to death.
I had no solid position, no basis to stand on for myself.
There was one way out, and that was... simply to tell the truth.
It may sound trite to you, but I've found myself again after a number of years.
I've been acting a role, uh... m-maybe all my life, of thinking
I've, I've done more... a-accomplished more, produced more than I have.
I've had all the breaks.
I have stood on the shoulders of life, and I've never gotten down into the dirt to build... to erect a foundation of my own.
I've flown too high on borrowed wings.
Everything came too easy.
That is why
I am here today.''
Mr Van Doren...
I want to compliment you for that statement.
- Thank you, sir.
- Uh, Mr Van Doren...
I would like to join the Chairman in commending you... for the soul-searching fortitude displayed in your statement.
Thank you, sir.
Thank you very much.
Mr Van Doren,
I just want to add my kudos.
I have listened to many witnesses... in both civil and criminal matters, and... yours is the most soul-searching confession I think I have heard in a long time.
Thank you, sir.
Mr Van Doren,
I'm also from New York; a different part of New York.
I'm happy that you've made the statement... but I cannot agree with most of my colleagues.
See, I don't think an adult of your intelligence ought to be commended... for simply, at long last, telling the truth.
If the commit--
If the committee has nothing to add...
Mr Van Doren, you are dismissed.
Excuse me. Charlie!
- Hey, hey, get outta there.
- Come on!
- Hey, hey, hey, Charlie!
- Over here! Charlie!
- Excuse me.
- Hey, Charlie!
- Charlie!
Let 'em out, boys.
The subcommittee will come to order.
Our next witness will be
Mr Daniel Enright.
How 'bout it, Charlie?
Charlie!
Charlie, over here, please.
- Maybe they'll get you to agree--
- Charlie!
- Charlie, you're gonna have to answer some questions.
- Okay. One at a time.
- One at a time.
- How do you feel, Charlie?
- Relieved.
...the truth, the whole truth, and nothing but the truth, so help you God?
- I do.
- Who helped you write that statement?
Charlie, did you know you've been fired by NBC?
- No, no. I didn't know that.
- Charlie, what do you have to say to...
- the young people of America?
- Professor, uh, are you, uh, proud of your son?
- I've always been proud of Charlie.
- Are you proud of what he did?
The important thing now is for Charlie to get back to his teaching.
Did you know that the Columbia
Trustees are meeting right now?
They're going to ask for Charlie's resignation.
Professor Van Doren, you spent your whole career at Columbia.
What's your reaction to that?
Professor Van Doren?
Dad, go ahead with Mother.
I'll meet you outside.
No reaction. Charles, a few more questions, please.
Charlie, when did you know--
Did the network or sponsor bring pressure on you... to, uh, bring the same contestant back week after week?
- No, sir.
- Would, they, uh... express any approval or disapproval of any particular contestant?
Never. Not to me.
- Get to the answers.
- Were they aware that you were supplyin'... the contestants with the answers?
No, sir. They had no knowledge whatsoever.
Herb Stempel. Herb-- Herbie, how 'bout a picture? You and Van Doren together.
No, not now.
Christ, look at the guy.
- C'mon, the both of ya.
- You know what the problem with you bums is?
Y-Ya never leave a guy alone, u-unless you're leavin' him alone.
- Who do you blame, Charlie?
- Professor? Professor, right here, please.
- Do you feel the committee treated you fairly?
- You gonna give back the money?
How'd the pressure up there compare to Twenty-One?
So you freely admit that you helped rig these shows?
- What else could we do?
- Hey, congratulations.
- For what?
- I'm a businessman.
- Van Doren.
- And the drama of--
- Hey, I thought we were gonna get television.
The truth is, television is gonna get us.
And you obviously don't think you did anything wrong.
Yes, we did one thing wrong:
We were too successful.
You were too successful?
Those advertising dollars came from somewhere.
Why do you think the newspapers and magazines are making such a big thing about this?
Mr Enright, you make it sound like you are the victim here.
Well, the sponsor makes out, the network makes out... the contestants see money they probably would never see in a lifetime... and the public is entertained.
So who gets hurt?
Mr Freedman, you freely admit...
- that you helped rig these shows?
- Yes, sir.
''Yes, sir''?
That's it?
Well, sir, I don't know what else to say.
Give the public what they want.
It's like your business.
Uh, do you see a, a need for government regulation in this area?
You know, it's not like the quiz shows are a public utility, sir.
It's entertainment.
We're not exactly hardened criminals here.
We're, we're in show business.
See the shark with
Teeth like razors
You can read his
Open face
And Macheath he's
Got a knife, but
Not in such an
Obvious place
On a beautiful
Blue Sunday
See a corpse
Stretched in the strand
See a man dodge
'Round the corner
Mackie's friends will
Understand
Mr Meier
Reported missing
Like so many
Wealthy men
Mack the Knife acquired
His cash box
God alone knows
How or when
Jenny Towler
She turned up lately
With a knife stuck
Through her breast
While Macheath he
Walks the embankment
Nonchalantly
Unimpressed
And the ghastly
Fire in Soho
Seven children
At a go
In the crowd stands
Mack the Knife, but
He isn't asked
He doesn't know
And the child-bride
In her nightgown
Whose assailant's
Still at large
Violated
In her slumbers
Mackie, how much
Did you charge
Yes, the child-bride
In her nightgown
Her assailant's
Still at large
Violated
In her slumbers
Mackie, how much
Did you charge
Mackie, how much did you charge
How much did you charge
How much did you charge
How much did you charge
How much did you charge
Now!
Send the infantry.
-Milord...
-You lead them!
Retreat!
Bastard!
All right.
-Wallace!
-Wallace!
Wallace! Wallace!
Wallace! Wallace!
Wallace! Wallace!
I knight thee Sir William Wallace.
Sir William, in the name of God, we declare and appoint thee guardian and high protector of Scotland and thy captains as aides-de-camp.
Stand and be recognized.
Does anyone know his politics?
No, but his weight with the commoners could unbalance everything.
The Balliols will kiss his arse, and so we must.
Sir William.
Sir William, inasmuch as you and your captains hail from a region long known to support the Balliol clan, may we invite you to continue your support and uphold our rightful claim?
Damn the Balliol clan!
They're all Longshanks' men!
Gentlemen. Gentlemen!
-Now is the time to declare a king.
-Wait!
And you're prepared to recognize our legitimate succession, I take it.
You're the ones who won't support the rightful king.
Those were lies when you first wrote them.
-No.
-That's the truth.
I demand recognition of these documents!
These documents were lies when you wrote them!
Gentlemen, please! Gentlemen!
Please, gentlemen!
Wait! Sir William, where are you going?
We have beaten the English, but they'll come back because you won't stand together.
What will you do?
I will invade England and defeat the English on their own ground.
Invade? That's impossible.
Why?
Why is that impossible?
You're so concerned with squabbling for the scraps from Longshanks' table that you've missed your God-given right to something better.
There's a difference between us.
You think the people of this country exist to provide you with position.
I think your position exists to provide those people with freedom, and I go to make sure that they have it.
Wait!
I respect what you said, but remember that these men have lands and castles.
It's much to risk.
And the common man that bleeds on the battlefield, does he risk less?
No.
But from top to bottom, this country has got no sense of itself.
Its nobles share allegiance with England.
Its clans war with each other.
-Aye.
-Aye.
If you make enemies on both sides of the border, you'll end up dead.
We all end up dead.
It's just a question of how and why.
I'm not a coward. I want what you want, but we need the nobles.
-We need them?
-Aye.
Nobles.
Now, tell me, what does that mean, to be noble?
Your title gives you claim to the throne of our country, but men don't follow titles.
They follow courage.
Now, our people know you.
Noble and common, they respect you, and if you would just lead them to freedom, they'd follow you.
And so would I.
Damn it!
My sodomite cousin the prince tells me he has no troops to lend, and every town in northern England is begging for help.
-He advances!
-To which town?
To here, milord.
Bring the food and provisions inside.
Double the wall guards, seal the gate.
Now!
Bring in the provisions!
Sir, we can get you out if you leave now.
I'm not about to tell my uncle
I've lost him the greatest city in northern England.
Come on!
Make way for the king!
It's not your fault.
Stand up to him!
I will stand up to him and more.
What news of the north?
Nothing new, Your Majesty.
We've sent riders to speed any word.
I heard the word in France, where I was fighting to expand your future kingdom.
The word, my son, is that our entire northern army is annihilated, and you have done nothing.
I have ordered conscriptions, sir.
They're assembled and ready to depart.
Excuse me, sire, but there's a very urgent message from York.
Come.
-Leave us.
-Thank you, sire.
-Wallace has sacked York.
-What?
Wallace has sacked York!
Sire, thy own nephew.
What beast could do such a thing?
If he can sack York, he can invade lower England.
We would stop him!
Who is this person who speaks to me as though I needed his advice?
I have declared Phillip my high counselor.
Is he qualified?
I am skilled in the arts of war and military tactics, sire.
Are you?
Then tell me, what advice would you offer on the present situation?
I shall offer a truce and buy him off.
But who will go to him? Not I.
If I fell under the sword of that murderer, it might be my head in a basket.
And not my gentle son.
The mere sight of him would only encourage an enemy to take over the whole country.
So whom do I send?
Whom do I send?
I'm dreaming.
Yes, you are.
And you must wake.
I don't want to wake.
I want to stay here with you.
And I with you, but you must wake now.
Wake up, William.
Wake up.
William, wake up, wake up.
William!
A royal entourage comes, flying banners of truce and the standards of Longshanks himself!
I am the Princess of Wales.
I come as the king's servant and with his authority.
To do what?
To discuss the king's proposals.
Will you speak with a woman?
I understand you have recently been given the rank of knight.
I have been given nothing.
God makes men what they are.
Did God make you the sacker of peaceful cities, the executioner of the king's nephew, my husband's own cousin?
York was the staging point for every invasion of my country, and that royal cousin hanged innocent Scots, even women and children, from the city walls.
Longshanks did far worse the last time he took a Scottish city.
You ask your king to his face.
Ask him.
You see if his eyes can convince you of the truth.
Hamilton, leave us.
-Milady...
-Leave us. Now.
Let us talk plainly.
You invade England, but you cannot complete the conquest so far from your shelter and supply.
The king desires peace.
Longshanks desires peace?
He declares it to me. I swear it.
He proposes that you withdraw your attack.
In return, he grants you title, estates, and this chest of gold, which I am to pay to you personally.
A lordship and titles.
Gold.
That I should become Judas?
Peace is made in such ways.
Slaves are made in such ways!
The last time Longshanks spoke of peace, I was a boy, and many Scottish nobles, who would not be slaves, were lured by him, under a flag of truce, to a barn where he had them hanged.
I was very young, but I remember Longshanks' notion of peace.
I understand you have suffered.
I know about your woman.
She was my wife.
We married in secret because I would not share her with an English lord.
They killed her to get to me.
I have never spoken of it.
I don't know why I tell you now, except I see her strength in you.
One day, you'll be a queen, and you must open your eyes.
You tell your king that William Wallace will not be ruled, and nor will any Scot while I live.
My son's loyal wife returns unkilled by the heathen.
So he accepted our bribe?
No, he did not.
Then why does he stay?
My scouts tell me that he has not advanced.
He waits for you at York.
He says he will attack no more towns or cities if you are man enough to come and face him.
Did he?
The Welsh bowmen will not be detected arriving so far around his flank.
The main force of our armies from France will land here
The main force of our armies from France will land here to the north of Edinburgh.
Conscripts from Ireland will approach from the southwest to here.
Welsh bowmen? Troops from France?
Irish conscripts?
Even if you dispatch them today, they'd take weeks to assemble.
I dispatched them before I sent your wife.
So our little ruse succeeded.
Thank you.
And while this upstart awaits my arrival in York, my forces will have arrived in Edinburgh behind him.
You spoke with this Wallace in private.
Tell me, what kind of man is he?
A mindless barbarian.
Not a king like you, milord.
You may return to your embroidery.
Humbly, milord.
You brought back the money, of course.
No. I gave it to ease the suffering of the children of this war.
That's what happens when you send a woman.
Forgive me, sire.
I thought that generosity might demonstrate your greatness to those you mean to rule.
My greatness will be better demonstrated when Wallace returns to Scotland and finds his country in ashes.
William!
There's riders approaching!
Personal escort of the princess.
Aye.
Must have made an impression.
Aye.
I didn't think you were in the tent that long.
Mademoiselle.
It's true! English ships are moving up from the south!
I don't know about the Welsh yet, but the Irish have landed!
I had to see it with me own eyes before I could believe it.
What the hell are the Irish doing fighting with the English?
I wouldn't worry about them.
Didn't I tell you before? It's my island.
Hamish, ride ahead to Edinburgh and assemble the council.
-Order it.
-Aye.
-Your island?
-My island! Yup!
You want to negotiate?
No, please, gentlemen!
Lords, Craig is right!
This time, our only option is to negotiate.
Now, unless you want to see Edinburgh razed to the ground...
My army has marched for more days than I can remember and we still have preparations to make, so I'll make this plain.
We require every soldier you can summon.
Your personal escorts, even yourselves, and we need them now.
With such a force arrayed against us, it's time to discuss other options.
Other options?
Don't you wish at least to lead your men onto the field and barter a better deal with Longshanks before you tuck tail and run?
-Sir William...
-We can't defeat this army!
-We can! And we will!
-Sir William!
We won at Stirling, and still you quibble!
We won at York, and you would not support us.
If you'll not stand up with us now, then I say you're cowards.
And if you are Scotsmen,
I'm ashamed to call myself one.
Please, Sir William, speak with me alone.
I beg you.
Now, you've achieved more than anyone ever dreamed, but fighting these odds, it looks like rage, not courage.
It's well beyond rage.
Help me.
In the name of Christ, help yourselves!
Now is our chance. Now.
If we join, we can win.
If we win, well, then we'll have what none of us have ever had before.
A country of our own.
You're the rightful leader, and there is strength in you. I see it.
Unite us.
Unite us!
Unite the clans.
All right.
Right.
This cannot be the way.
You said yourself, the nobles will not support Wallace.
So how does it help us to join the side that is slaughtered?
I gave him my word.
I know it is hard.
Being a leader is.
Now, Son...
Son, look at me.
I cannot be king.
You and you alone can rule Scotland.
What I tell you, you must do.
Not for me, not for yourself, for your country.
Lads, make way.
Coming through.
Make way, lads.
Make...
The Bruce is not coming, William.
He'll come.
Mornay and Lochlan have come, so will the Bruce.
Quite a lovely gathering.
Wouldn't you agree?
The archers are ready, sire.
Not the archers.
My scouts tell me their archers are miles away and no threat to us.
Arrows cost money. Use up the Irish.
The dead cost nothing.
And send in the infantry and cavalry.
Infantry!
-Infantry!
-Infantry!
Cavalry!
-Cavalry!
-Cavalry!
-Cavalry!
-Cavalry!
Advance!
-Advance!
-Advance!
-Good to see you this morning!
-Hi. How are you?
Irish.
Glad to have you with us.
Watch this.
Mornay? Lochlan?
I gave Mornay double his lands in Scotland with matching estates in England.
Lochlan turned for much less.
Archers.
I beg pardon, sire.
Won't we hit our own troops?
Yes, but we'll hit theirs as well.
We have reserves.
Attack.
Archers!
-Archers.
-Archers.
Loose!
Loose!
Send in our reinforcements.
Send in the rest!
Bring me Wallace.
Alive, if possible.
Dead, just as good.
Send us news of our victory.
Shall we retire?
Protect the king.
Get up!
Get up!
Up!
Get up!
-Get him out of here!
-Jesus!
Go!
I'm dying.
Let me be.
No.
You're going to live.
I've lived long enough to live free.
Proud to see you become the man you are.
I'm a happy man.
I'm the one who's rotting, but I think your face looks graver than mine.
Son, we must have alliance with England to prevail here.
You achieved that.
You saved your family, increased your land.
In time, you will have all the power in Scotland.
Lands, titles, men, power, nothing.
-Nothing?
-I have nothing.
Men fight for me because if they do not,
I throw them off my land and I starve their wives and their children.
Those men who bled the ground red at Falkirk, they fought for William Wallace, and he fights for something that I've never had.
And I took it from him when I betrayed him, and I saw it in his face on the battlefield, and it's tearing me apart!
All men betray, all lose heart.
I don't want to lose heart!
I want to believe, as he does.
I will never be on the wrong side again.
No, please!
There he is! After him!
Lord Craig, is it true about Mornay?
Aye.
Wallace rode into his bedchamber and killed him.
More a liability now than ever he was.
And there's no telling who'll be next.
Maybe you.
Maybe me.
It doesn't matter.
-I'm serious, Robert.
-So am I!
Christ! Shit!
Search the place!
Lochlan.
William Wallace killed 50 men.
Fifty if it was one.
A hundred men with his own sword.
Cut through them like...
Moses through the Red Sea.
His legend grows.
It will be worse than before.
He rallies new volunteers in every Scottish town, and when he replenishes his numbers...
They're sheep, mere sheep!
Easily dispersed if we strike the shepherd.
Very well.
Pick a flock of your finest assassins and set a meeting.
Milord, Wallace is renowned for his ability to smell an ambush.
If what Lord Hamilton tells me is correct, he warmed to our future queen and would trust her.
So we'll dispatch her with the notion that she comes in peace.
Milord, the princess might be taken hostage or her life be put in jeopardy.
My son would be most distressed by that.
But in truth, if she were to be killed, we would soon find the king of France a useful ally against the Scots.
You see, as king, you must find the good in any situation.
It's William Wallace, sure.
He's given up his sword.
Be ready.
Milady,
I received your message.
This is the second time you have warned me of danger.
Why?
There will be a new shipment of supplies coming north next month.
Foods and weapons. They won't...
No, stop.
Why do you help me?
Why do you help me?
Because of the way you are looking at me now.
Just when we thought all hope was lost, our noble saviors have arrived.
Off with their hoods.
Sir William, we've come to seek a meeting.
Well, what's the point?
You've all sworn loyalty to Longshanks.
An oath to a liar is no oath at all.
Every man of us is ready to swear loyalty to you.
So let the council swear publicly.
We cannot.
Some scarcely believe you're alive.
Others think you'll pay them
Mornay's wages.
So we bid you to Edinburgh.
Meet us two days from now.
Pledge us your pardon, and we'll unite behind you.
Scotland will be one.
-One? You mean us and you.
-No.
I mean this.
It's the pledge of Robert the Bruce.
You do know it's a trap. Tell him.
I think if the Bruce wanted to kill you, he'd have done it already at Falkirk.
-Aye.
-I know. I saw.
Leaving him aside, what about the others?
Nest of scheming bastards!
They couldn't even agree on the color of shite!
It's a trap. Are you blind?
Look at us.
We've got to try. We can't do this alone.
Joining the nobles is the only hope for our people.
You know what happens if we don't take that chance?
What?
Nothing.
I don't want to be a martyr.
Nor I. I want to live.
I want a home and children and peace.
-Do you?
-Aye, I do.
I've asked God for those things.
It's all for nothing if you don't have freedom.
-That's just a dream, William.
-A dream? Just a...
Then what have we been doing all this time?
We've lived that dream.
Your dream isn't about freedom.
It's about Murron.
You're doing this to be a hero
'cause you think she sees you.
I don't think she sees me.
I know she does.
And your father sees you, too.
Jesus.
Get up. Give us your hand.
Shall I come with you?
No. I'll go alone.
I'll see you after.
Right.
Sooner rather than later, I hope.
-He won't come.
-He will.
I know he will.
Milord, he approaches!
No!
Stay out of it, Robert!
You lied! You lied!
Bruce is not to be hurt!
That's the arrangement!
Father!
You rotting bastard!
Why? Why?
Longshanks required Wallace.
So did our nobles.
That was the price of your crown.
Die!
I want you to die!
Soon enough, I'll be dead and you'll be king.
I don't want anything from you.
You're not a man!
And you're not my father.
You're my son, and you have always known my mind.
You deceived me.
You let yourself be deceived.
In your heart, you always knew what had to happen here.
At last, you know what it means to hate.
Now you're ready to be a king.
My hate will die with you.
William Wallace, you stand in taint of high treason.
Against whom?
Against your king.
Have you anything to say?
Never in my whole life did I swear allegiance to him.
It matters not. He is your king.
Confess, and you may receive a quick death.
Deny, and you must be purified by pain.
Do you confess?
Do you confess?
Then on the morrow, you shall receive your purification.
-Your Highness.
-I will see the prisoner.
We've got orders from the king that nobody...
The king will be dead in a month and his son is a weakling.
Who do you think will rule this kingdom?
Now open this door.
Majesty.
Come on, filth. Up on your feet.
Stop it!
Leave me.
I said leave me!
Milady.
Sir, I come to beg you to confess all and swear allegiance to the king that he might show you mercy.
Will he show mercy to my country?
Mercy is to die quickly, perhaps even live in a tower.
In time, who knows what can happen if you can only live.
If I swear to him, then all that I am is dead already.
You will die. It will be awful.
Every man dies.
Not every man really lives.
Drink this.
It will dull your pain.
No. It will numb my wits, and I must have them all.
For if I'm senseless, or if I wail, then Longshanks will have broken me.
I can't bear the thought of your torture.
Take it.
All right.
I have come to beg for the life of William Wallace.
You're quite taken with him, aren't you?
I respect him.
At worst, he was a worthy enemy.
Show mercy, O thou great king, and win the respect of your own people.
Even now, you are incapable of mercy.
And you...
To you, that word is as unfamiliar as love.
Before he lost his powers of speech, he told me his one comfort was that he would live to know Wallace was dead.
You see, death comes to us all.
But before it comes to you, know this.
Your blood dies with you.
A child who is not of your line grows in my belly.
Your son will not sit long on the throne,
I swear it.
I'm so afraid.
Give me the strength to die well.
Here he comes!
Now behold the awful price of treason!
You will fall to your knees now, declare yourself the king's loyal subject and beg his mercy.
And you shall have it.
Rope!
Stretch him!
That's it! Stretch him!
Shame! Shame!
Pleasant, yes?
Rise to your knees, kiss the royal emblem on my cloak, and you will feel no more.
Rack him!
Enough?
It can all end right now.
Peace.
Just say it.
Cry out, ''Mercy.''
Mercy!
-Mercy!
-Mercy!
-Mercy!
-Mercy!
Cry out.
Mercy! Mercy!
Just say it.
Mercy.
Mercy! Mercy!
Mercy, William.
-Mercy.
-Jesus, now say it.
The prisoner wishes to say a word.
Mercy! Mercy!
Mercy!
Freedom!
After the beheading,
William Wallace's body
was torn to pieces.
His head was set on London Bridge,
his arms and legs sent
to the four corners of Britain
as a warning.
It did not have the effect
that Longshanks planned.
And I, Robert the Bruce,
rode out to pay homage
to the armies of the English king
rode out to pay homage
to the armies of the English king
and accept his endorsement
of my crown.
I hope you've washed your arse this morning.
It's about to be kissed by a king.
Come. Let's get it over with.
Stop!
You have bled with Wallace!
Now bleed with me.
Wallace! Wallace!
-Wallace! Wallace!
-Wallace! Wallace!
-Wallace! Wallace!
-Wallace! Wallace!
In the year of our Lord, 1314,
patriots of Scotland,
starving and outnumbered,
charged the fields of Bannockburn.
They fought like warrior poets.
They fought like Scotsmen,
and won their freedom.
1879. The Civil War is over, and the resulting economic explosion spurs the great migration west.
Farmers, ranchers, prospectors, killers and thieves seek their fortunes.
Cattle drovers turn cow towns into armed camps with murder rates higher than those of modern-day New York or Los Angeles.
Out of this chaos comes legendary lawman Wyatt Earp, retiring his badge and gun to start a peaceful life with his family.
Earp's friend, John "Doc" Holliday, a Southern gentleman turned gunman and gambler, also travels west, hoping the dry climate will relieve his tuberculosis.
Silver is discovered in Arizona.
Tombstone becomes queen of the boomtowns, where the latest Paris fashions are sold from the backs of wagons.
Attracted to this atmosphere of greed, over 100 exiled Texas outlaws band together to form the ruthless gang recognised by the red sashes they wear.
They emerge as the earliest example of organised crime in America.
They call themselves the Cowboys.
Y'all killed two Cowboys.
Shoot.
Looks like we win.
Mexican police, huh?
Tell him to get on his knees.
He will not kneel, patr.
He is very proud.
Hey, somebody get this dick on his knees.
Good shot, Billy.
They call me Curly Bill Brocius.
I'm what you might call the Founder of the Feast.
So next time we come, you'd better step aside.
I ain't kiddin' neither.
Patr, he say, someone will come to revenge for him.
Something like a sick horse who comes to sit with him.
He talk crazy.
That's not what he said, ya ignorant wretch.
Your Spanish is worse than your English.
You go to hell!
You first.
- Hell, let's eat, boys.
- Tamales are good, huh?
I guess they knew we were comin'.
Hey, Johnny, what'd that Mexican mean,
"A sick horse is gonna get us"?
He's quoting the Bible,
Revelations.
"Behold, a pale horse.
The man who sat on him was Death."
"And Hell followed with him."
Move!
Come on! That's it! You move!
Stupid mule!
Come on! Come on, boy! Come on!
Hurts, don't it?
Now let go of that stud and go on about your business.
Mr Earp. My name's Dake.
Crawley Dake,
US Marshal for this territory.
- Forget it. I'm retired.
- Excuse me?
I said forget it.
I don't want the job, and that's final.
- I don't think you understand.
- No, you don't understand, Marshal.
I did my duty, and now I'd like to get on with my life.
I'm going to Tombstone.
- I see. To strike it rich.
- Easy on the grain, Butch.
- Here you go.
- Well, all right, that's fine.
Tell you one thing, though.
Never saw a rich man who didn't wind up with a guilty conscience.
I already got a guilty conscience.
Might as well have the money too.
Good day now.
That's him, all right.
Boy, I'd know that sour face anywhere.
Virgil! Morgan! My God!
- Hey, boy! How are you, Morgan?
- Hi, Wyatt.
- Well, how do we look?
- Great, both of ya.
- Wyatt, you remember Allie.
- Good God. Well, he'd better.
Allie girl.
- And Louisa. Oh!
- Wyatt.
You're so lovely, darlin'.
I'm at your feet, just at your feet.
I guess it's only right.
Ma always said Morgan's the prettiest.
- Yeah, but she doted on the frowner.
- That's right.
- Wyatt.
- Mattie!
Mattie, they're already here.
Folks, this is Celia Ann.
- You can call her Mattie.
- Pleased to meet you, Mattie.
It's nice to meet you.
Well, Wyatt, I couldn't find a single store that had laudanum anywhere.
That's all right, honey.
I sure been dreamin' about this.
God, since forever! Wait! Look here.
Go on up. Look. Huh?
- Hey, Wyatt.
- Don't talk, just...
Yeah.
Thank you for this, Wyatt.
- It's all your doin'.
- We'll make our fortune, boys.
Well, come on.
Gracious. We could be sisters.
Mighty fine.
I wonder where he found her.
Same place we found ours, probably.
Matter, hon? Did you say you needed some laudanum?
- Yes, I did. Yes.
- I have some right here.
Oh, you're a lifesaver.
Just be careful now. It's full of hop.
Oh, don't worry.
I just get headaches sometimes.
Hey, Virg, see anything of Doc while you were in Prescott?
Yeah. He had a streak when we left, him and Kate.
I miss Doc. I miss that old rip.
- I don't.
- He makes me laugh.
That's $500, Holliday.
Are you in or out?
500. Must be a peach of a hand.
Oh, thank you, darlin'.
Kate! You're not wearing a bustle.
How lewd.
Come on, Holliday, you in or out, goddamn it?
Why, Ed Bailey, you look like you're just about ready to burst.
Come on! Come on, show!
Well, I suppose I'm deranged, but I...
I guess I'll just have to call.
Cover your ears, darlin'.
Isn't that a daisy?
Why, you son of a bitch!
Damn, Bailey, just settle down!
Shut up! Take your money and get out,
'cause I'm tired of listenin' to your mouth.
Why, Ed Bailey, are we cross?
Them guns don't scare me.
'Cause without them guns you ain't nothin' but a skinny lunger.
Ed, what an ugly thing to say.
I abhor ugliness. Does this mean we're not friends any more?
You know, Ed, if I thought you weren't my friend,
I just don't think I could bear it.
There. Now we can be friends again.
Touch that gun, I'll burn you down.
I calculate that's the end of this town.
I had a boy at the hotel pack us up.
The horse is outside.
So that's why you're not wearin' a bustle.
My sweet, soft Hungarian devil.
Well!
Good evenin', then.
Let's not bother about the luggage.
Hey, Morg, pretty big, isn't it?
Oh-ho, brother, you can smell the silver in this town.
- Easy.
- Look at these girls over here.
- Hi!
- Hello, girls!
Hot damn, this burg's jumpin'!
Here we go, ladies.
- Isn't that sweet?
- You can say that.
Sheriff.
Newcomers, eh?
The name's John Behan,
Cochise County Sheriff.
- Just hit town, did ya?
- Just this minute.
I'm Wyatt Earp, and these are my brothers, Virgil and Morgan.
Wyatt Earp. Dodge City.
Gave all that up, Sheriff.
Goin' into business.
- Don't even carry a gun any more.
- Going into business, huh?
Well, then, I'm the man to see.
Besides sheriff, I'm also tax collector, captain of the fire brigade and chairman of the Nonpartisan Anti-Chinese League.
- Ma'am.
- How do you do?
Yeah, a man of many parts.
- Say, you folks got a place to stay yet?
- No.
- Like I said, we just got here.
- I also sit on the town lot commission.
Really?
As a matter of fact, we got three lovely cottages coming up for rent.
I'll throw in a good cleaning, no charge.
Believe me, Mr Earp, you're not gonna find a better deal within town limits.
I don't know, sounds pretty good.
- I'll have my man show 'em to ya.
- Thank you.
Hey, Wyatt, get on over here.
I want you to meet Fred White.
He's the town marshal.
- My pleasure.
- Lotta law around here.
- I already met the county sheriff.
- Who, Behan?
He ain't no law. The only real law around here is the Cowboys.
Cowboys? I had a run-in with a couple of them up in Prescott.
Nobody does nothin' without 'em.
I mean, they're it.
There's three of 'em right over there.
You can always spot a Cowboy.
They always wear those red sashes.
The plain fact is the Cowboys are good for business.
'Bout all these saloons?
Oh, that's the real mother lode here in Tombstone.
All up and down Allen Street here.
24 hours a day, you got liquor, hostesses, gamblin', makin' money hand over fist.
All except The Oriental.
That's a regular slaughterhouse.
Even the high rollers won't go near it.
That's too bad too. It's a nice place.
Hell of a waste.
Wyatt?
- There he goes.
- Yeah.
OI' Wyatt.
All right, fella,
I'll brace ya now for a little lesson.
Put your money on the board.
$5 on that six of spades.
Like that.
I'm not gonna tell you again.
Get that cigar outta my face.
Howdy, stranger. What can I get ya?
I wouldn't mind one of those cigars.
I'm about ready to go home.
I wish y'all would stop yakkin'
- and just play cards.
- Thank you.
Kinda nice in here. You run it?
Milt Joyce, owner, operator.
- Wyatt Earp.
- Yeah, sure.
I said lay off the queen, you jackass!
I swear I'm gonna slap somebody now.
Excuse me for askin', Milt, but kinda dead in here, isn't it?
- You don't listen too good, do ya?
- See that bird at the faro table?
You back that queen again, you son of a bitch,
I'll blow you right up that wildcat's ass!
Do you hear me, huh?
He comes bargin' in here one day, slappin' all the customers, wavin' his gun around.
He chased out all the high-class play.
The only trade that comes in here now is the bummers and the drovers, just the dregs.
Why don't you get rid of him, get yourself a straight dealer?
Sure, stranger, that's easy for you to say.
Shit!
Goddamn it, Junior, how many times am I going to tell you to keep that damn cigar outta my face?
Christ almighty, it's like I'm sittin' here playing cards with my brother's kids or somethin', you nerve-racking sons of bitches.
Is somethin' on your mind?
Just want to let you know you're sittin' in my chair.
Is that a fact?
Yeah, it's a fact.
For a man that don't go heeled, you run your mouth kinda reckless, don't ya?
No need to go heeled to get the bulge on a dub like you.
Is that a fact?
That's a fact.
Well, I'm real scared.
Damn right, you're scared.
I can see that in your eyes.
- All right now!
- Go ahead.
Go ahead, skin it! Skin that smoke wagon and see what happens.
Listen, mister,
I'm gettin' awful tired of your...
I'm gettin' tired of your gas.
Nowjerk that pistol and go to work.
I said throw down, boy.
You gonna do somethin', or just stand there and bleed?
No?
I didn't think so.
Here, Milt, a keepsake.
Hang it over the bar.
All right, youngster, out you go.
Don't come back!
Ever!
Well, what do you say, Milt?
25% of the house take sound about right?
Well, we're off and runnin'.
Just acquired us a quarter interest in the game at the Oriental.
- Acquired?
- So to speak.
Now all we gotta do is keep our eyes on that brass ring, fellas.
You're the one, Wyatt.
Why, Johnny Tyler!
- You madcap!
- Doc?
Where you goin' with that shotgun?
I didn't know you was back in town.
Well, well.
How the hell are you?
Wyatt, I am rolling. Morgan.
- Doc.
- Virgil.
'Lo, Doc.
Wyatt Earp?
Going into business for ourselves, Doc.
Wyatt just got us a faro game.
Since when is faro a business?
Didn't you always say that gambling's an honest trade?
No. I said poker's an honest trade.
Only suckers buck the tiger.
The odds are all on the house.
Depends on how you look at it.
I mean, it's not like anybody's puttin' a gun to their head now, is it?
That's what I love about Wyatt.
He can talk himself into anything.
Oh. Johnny, I apologise.
I forgot you were there.
You may go now.
Just leave that shotgun.
Leave it.
Thank you.
- Sheriff Behan!
- Gentlemen!
Sheriff, have you met Doc Holliday?
Piss on you, Wyatt.
Mr Holliday.
Forgive me if I don't shake hands.
- So, how's our little town suit you?
- Fine. Fine.
You know, I was thinking, what this town could really use is a racetrack.
Really? That's not a bad idea.
Send a signal we're growin' up.
Way ahead of yourselves, aren't you, boys?
This is just another mining camp.
Have you seen how everyone dresses?
Awful tony for a mining camp.
No sir, the die is cast. We are growin'.
Be as big as San Francisco in a few years, and just as sophisticated.
You son of a bitch!
Easy, gents! It's a private affair!
Don't raise that iron.
I don't wanna have to...
I'll kill you, you cheatin' son of a...
Very cosmopolitan.
I know him. That's Creek Johnson.
Wyatt? Doc?
- Jack.
- What do you say, old friend?
What the hell's that all about, Creek?
He crawfished a bet and called me a liar.
Sheriff, may I present a pair of fellow sophisticates.
Turkey Creek Jack Johnson,
Texas Jack Vermillion.
Watch your ear, Creek.
- Afraid I'll have to have those guns.
- It was a fair fight. We was legal.
I'm sorry, boys.
I gotta take you before Judge Spicer.
Hand 'em over.
Law and order every time, that's us.
I'm frightfully thirsty.
Well, we made it safe and sound.
Sheriff, what kinda town is this?
Nice scenery.
Well, an enchanted moment.
Interesting little scene.
I wonder who that tall drink of water is.
My dear, you have set your gaze upon the quintessential frontier type.
Note the lean silhouette, eyes closed by the sun, though sharp as a hawk.
He's got the look of both predator and prey.
I want one.
Happy hunting.
Hey there, sister boy!
Please, sister boy, gimme some!
- Gimme, gimme, gimme!
- Leave him alone, Barnes!
Billy, sit with me.
This is so much fun. We haven't been to a show since years.
I hope they're good.
- Wyatt?
- Oh, sorry.
Darlin', you know the Earps.
Kate, how you been?
Mattie, ravishin'.
Doc.
Wyatt, I'd like ya to meet Mayor Clum and his wife.
- Mr Earp.
- Mayor.
Your reputation precedes you.
- I was wondering if you might be...
- Not a prayer. Nice meetin' you.
Professor Gillman? Oh, I seen him in Bisbee. He catches stuff.
Hey, Professor, catch this.
They're shooting at us!
They're actually shooting at us.
At least we won't have to wait for our notices.
Prettiest man I ever saw.
Ladies and gentlemen, the St Crispin's Day speech from Henry V.
To set the scene...
- Goddamn, Barnes!
- Almost shot my damn ear off.
"If we are marked to die,
"we are now to do our country loss.
"But if to live, the fewer men, the greater share of honour."
He's got some nerve, I'll say that.
What d'ya think there, Billy Nilly?
I think he's wonderful.
"...gentle his condition.
"Gentlemen in England now abed shall think themselves accurs'd
"they were not here,
"and hold their manhoods cheap
"whilst any speaks who fought with us upon Saint Crispin's day."
That's great! That's our kinda stuff!
Play it again!
Now what in the hell is this?
That's Faust.
He's gonna make a deal with the devil.
Is your soul for sale, dear?
Know what I'd do?
I'd take a deal and then crawfish and drill that old devil in the ass.
How 'bout you, Juanito?
What would you do?
I already did it.
Very instructive.
But who was the devil?
I'll be damned.
You may indeed, if you get lucky.
Would you look at all those stars?
I mean, you look up and you think,
"God made all of that?
"He still remembered to make a little speck like me."
Kinda flattering, really.
Wyatt, do you believe in God?
- No, come on, really. Do ya?
- Yeah. Maybe. Hell, I don't know.
Well, what d'you think happens when you die?
Somethin'. Nothin'. Hell, I don't know.
Well, I read this book, a book on spiritualism.
Oh, God, here he goes again.
Said that a lot of people when they die, they see this light.
- Like in a tunnel.
- Yeah?
They say it's the light leadin' you to heaven.
Really?
Well, what about hell?
They got a sign there, or what?
Hey, Wyatt, goddamn it.
- I'm serious.
- Hey, Morg.
Comin' to the Oriental, Virg?
- Well.
- Not tonight.
Tonight, me and my old man are gonna have some fun.
Come on, get movin', old man.
Maiden name was Sullivan.
Well, you better go with them, honey.
I gotta go to work.
Please stay with me.
Well, honey, I gotta get to work.
All right. All right.
Well, wait a minute.
I guess I don't have to go right now. I...
- I could stay awhile.
- No, no. I don't wanna keep you.
No, really, I can stay awhile.
That the bottle Lou gave you?
Yes, it is.
Maybe you should see a doctor.
Wyatt, it's just headaches.
I know what I'm doing.
No, I don't need to see a doctor!
- All right, honey. Okay.
- Just go.
Everything's fine, Wyatt.
- Work well.
- All right, good night.
You look beautiful tonight.
Thank you.
- Night, Mattie.
- Good night, Morgan.
Come on.
I want to match seven, seven stinkin' spades.
- Let's go.
- I'm your man.
You win again. Well played, sir.
You are on fire.
- I told you, I'm burnin' up tonight.
- Loser on the ace.
I'll take the red seven, and I got some deeds here.
- I'll take seven stinkin' diamonds.
- Awful lot of money.
You can't stand the heat, pal, get out of the kitchen.
You're the doctor.
Sad news, friend, you lose.
- So, now we're in the mining business.
- You're the one, Wyatt.
We're turnin' into regular tycoons.
Think I'll call this one the Mattie Blaylock.
Mattie'd get a kick outta that one.
- That's her maiden name.
- And what a maiden.
- Pure as the driven snow, I'm sure.
- Hey, Doc, come on now.
It's just his style, Morg.
He doesn't mean anything.
Tell me something, my friend.
I'm curious.
Do you actually consider yourself a married man, forsaking all others?
Yeah, pretty much.
I mean, I was no angel when we met, but neither was she.
People can change, Doc.
Sooner or later, you gotta grow up.
I see.
And what would you do, if she walked in here?
- "She"?
- You know damn well who I mean.
That dusky-hued lady satan, that's who.
- Oh, I'd probably ignore her.
- Ignore her?
I'd ignore her. People can change, Doc.
I'll remember you said that.
What?
- Bravo! Bravo!
- Ma'am? Miss Marcus?
Aw, hell.
Bravo!
Miss Marcus, allow me the pleasure of a drink.
- Thank you, sir.
- Milt, champagne!
Satisfied?
I stand corrected, Wyatt. You're an oak.
Thanks, Kate.
Mr Fabian.
- Well done.
- Well done.
Good show, partner, good show.
Mr Fabian, would you come sit at my table?
Mr Earp, would you mind signing an autograph for me, sir?
My wife's not gonna believe this.
Wyatt Earp, huh? Heard of you.
Listen now, Mr Kansas Law Dog.
Law don't go around here. Savvy?
- I'm retired.
- Good.
That's real good.
Yeah. Yeah, that's real good, law dog,
'cause lawjust don't go around here.
Yeah, I heard you the first time.
Winner to the king. $500.
- Shut up, Ike.
- You must be Doc Holliday.
That's the rumour.
You retired too?
Not me. I'm in my prime.
Yeah, you look it.
You must be Ringo.
Look, darlin', Johnny Ringo, the deadliest pistoleer since Wild Bill, they say.
What do you think, darlin', should I hate him?
- You don't even know him.
- No. That's true, but...
I don't know, there's just somethin' about him.
Somethin' 'round the eyes.
I don't know.
Reminds me of...
Me.
No. I'm sure of it, I hate him.
He's drunk.
Come on, boys, we don't want any trouble in here, not in any language.
That's Latin, darlin'.
Evidently, Mr Ringo's an educated man.
Now I really hate him.
Watch it, Johnny.
I hear he's real fast.
Come on. Go, Johnny.
Bravo!
Drinks are on me!
Gettin' kinda spooky around here.
Curly Bill, huh?
- Who was that other idiot?
- Ike Clanton.
- Table's open!
- The man dealing faro, who is he?
That's Wyatt Earp. Made a name for himself as a peace officer in Kansas.
Peace officer.
Very impressive.
I believe he's married.
More champagne?
Oh, hell.
- Hello.
- Hello.
We've never actually met.
My name is...
Wyatt Earp. Yes, I know.
- I'm...
- Josephine Marcus.
Everybody knows.
I was beginning to think we'd never meet.
This is fortuitous. That means "lucky."
Yeah, I know what it means.
- Easy now.
- What is it?
That mare is in season.
Bet she's starting.
- How do they know?
- They know. It's the scent.
Well, I guess we'd better split 'em up.
It's been real...
I have a better idea.
Let's run it out of them.
Yeah, I'm an oak, all right.
Well, end of the road.
Maybe for you.
That was lovely.
Lovely? You could've been killed back there, or busted up.
Fun, though, wasn't it?
- You'd die for fun?
- Wouldn't you?
Oh, he's laughing.
I didn't think you ever laughed.
Yeah, I laugh sometimes.
Yes, but how often? Are you happy?
Am I happy? Well, I don't know.
I'm happy as the next man, I guess.
I don't laugh all day long like an idiot, if that's what you mean.
- Touchy about it, aren't you?
- No, I'm not touchy. I'm just...
It's a silly question, is all.
"Am I happy? Are you happy?"
Are you happy?
Oh, I'm always happy, unless I'm bored.
That blonde woman, is that your wife?
- What about her?
- Nothing.
What do you want out of life?
- How do you get these questions?
- Just answer.
I don't know!
Make some money, I guess.
- Maybe have some children.
- Doesn't suit you.
- Well, how would you know?
- It just doesn't, that's all.
I oughta know my own mind, and I'm telling you what suits me is a family and kids.
Suits me right down to the ground.
In fact, that's my idea of heaven.
All right, what's your idea of heaven?
Room service.
Oh, he's laughing again.
Well, that's what I want.
I wanna move and go places and never look back.
Just have fun, forever.
That's my idea of heaven.
Need someone to share it with, though.
You mean Behan.
Well, then...
Why are you with him?
Because he's handsome and he's charming and...
He's all right. For now.
Oh, I know, don't say it, I'm rotten.
I've tried to be good. It's just so boring.
The way you talk.
Never heard a woman talk like that?
Never.
I don't have time to be proper.
I wanna live.
I'm a woman. I like men.
If that means I'm not ladylike, then I guess I'm just not a lady.
- At least I'm honest.
- You're different.
There's no arguin' that.
But you're a lady, all right.
I'll take my oath on it.
Come on! Giddap!
Is that the opium Lou gave you?
It's a new bottle, isn't it?
You better go easy on that stuff.
Wyatt, leave me alone.
- And where've you been?
- Just out. Ridin'.
How're you feelin', Mattie?
I don't know.
I'm all right.
I'm fine.
- You sure?
- I'm sure.
Well, I was thinkin' today, we've already made a pile of money in this place.
If we pulled up stakes and just moved on, you know, then we could stay on the move, keep goin', see the world.
Just live on room service for the rest of our lives.
How'd that be?
Room service?
Wyatt, what're you talkin' about?
Nothin'. I just...
Just thinkin' out loud, and you know I...
Nothin'.
Forget about it.
What's she doin' with that lunger?
Hey.
Is that Old Dog Tray?
That sounds like Old Dog Tray to me.
Pardon?
You know, Stephen Foster.
Oh! Susanna.
Camptown Races.
Stephen stinkin' Foster!
Yes, well, this happens to be a nocturne.
- A which?
- You know,
Frederic fucking Chopin.
Oh, yeah.
Boy, I feel great.
I feel just capital.
Do you see what's going on in the street?
- Somebody's gotta do something.
- I believe you're the sheriff.
No, no. This is not county business.
This is a town matter. Marshal?
Why don't you just leave it alone?
No, I gotta do somethin'.
Here's your down card.
Curly Bill!
Come on now.
Well, howdy, Fred.
Hand those over, Curly. Hand 'em over.
Why, sure, dad.
I'm only funnin'.
Here you go.
Fred?
Come on now. Fred?
- Got ol' Fred White!
- Hey, he shot the marshal! Everybody!
Better get him off the street.
Fred White's dead! They killed him.
They killed Fred White!
- All right, back off.
- Get a rope! String him up!
- Nobody's hangin' anybody.
- He just killed a man!
Then he'll stand trial for it.
Now get back! Move!
Turn him loose!
He said to turn loose of him.
Well, I'm not. So go home.
I swear to God, law dog, you don't step aside, we'll tear you apart.
All right, you die first. Get it?
Your friends might get me in a rush, but not before I make your head into a canoe. You understand me?
- He's bluffin'. Let's rush him.
- No, he ain't bluffin'.
You're not as stupid as you look, Ike.
- Now tell them to get back.
- Go on now, get back.
Go on! Billy!
He'll kill me.
And you, music lover, you're next.
It's the drunk piano player.
You're so drunk, you can't hit nothin'.
In fact, you're probably seein' double.
I have two guns, one for each of ya.
All right, break it up now!
Go home now!
I'll see you soon.
- I'll see you soon.
- We'll meet again.
Well, as you can see, never a dull moment.
So it takes Judge Spicer three weeks to get back to town, and he says,
"Well, did you actually see it?"
I said, "No. By the time I got there,
Marshal White had already been shot."
Then Spicer leans forward and he says,
"Well, can't have a murder without a witness."
- What?
- Case dismissed. Can you beat it?
After all that? Aw, hell, who cares?
None of my business anyway.
There you go, Milt.
God, I love this game!
You know, boys, when we're finally set, we gotta each have a billiard room in our houses.
I been thinkin', maybe we oughta open up a place of our own. You know?
There's the real money. Build it up, milk it for all it's worth, then sell it off for a bundle, and breeze outta this burg with more money than Croesus and ready to live like kings.
What d'ya think, Virg?
Virg? Why don't you and me take a walk around town and see if we can't spot us out a couple of nice lots?
It's workin' out just like you said, Wyatt.
Goddamn, boys, we're lootin' this burg six ways from Sunday.
Pretty fun too, isn't it?
Financially, yeah, I gotta admit.
Excuse me.
Wyatt, do you have a moment?
- Please, will you just hear me out?
- Now hold on, Mayor.
He already told you no.
You tell him, Morg.
What about you? You were a lawman.
I'm busy.
We're all busy.
Sorry, Mayor, but you're barkin' up the wrong tree.
You know, you men are makin' a lot of money in this town.
That's good. That's good.
Good for you.
In the meantime, a lot of decent people are suffering.
But, please, don't let me take up any more of your precious time.
Rack 'em.
I tell ya, I'm suffering.
From a hangover.
Stop that!
- Stop.
- No.
Hold on a minute! Wait a minute!
- Calm down and listen to me!
- Yeah, let him speak!
Nobody's sayin' you can't own a gun.
Nobody's even sayin' you can't carry a gun.
All we're sayin' is you can't carry a gun in town.
That's not so bad, is it?
Listen, Mayor, I have to talk to you about this.
No, we don't have to talk.
You can read, can't you?
It's a town matter, not county.
What in the hell are you doin'?
I told you we weren't gettin' involved.
You got us involved when you brought us here.
Now you hold on a minute, Virg.
Hold on nothin'! I walk around this town and look these people in the eye.
It's just like someone's slappin' me in the face.
These people are afraid to walk down the street, and I'm tryin' to make money off that like some goddamn vulture!
If we're gonna have a future in this town, it's gotta have some law and order.
Please, Virg, don't do this to me!
It's got nothin' to do with you!
It's got to do with...
Nothin' to do with me?
I'm your brother, for Christ's sake!
God, I don't believe this!
Talk to him, will you? Or hit him!
Ah, God, don't tell me!
Like you said, Wyatt, we're brothers.
Gotta back your brother's play.
Just did like I figured you would.
All right now, you listen to me, both of ya!
For the first time in our lives, we got a chance to stop wandering and finally be a family.
This is trouble we don't need.
You saw what happened to Fred White.
We know what we're doin', Wyatt.
Okay, fine. Say you're right, say you don't get yourself killed.
There's somethin' else.
All those years I worked those cow towns,
I was only ever mixed up in one shootin', just one.
But a man lost his life, and I took it.
You don't know how that feels, Morg.
Believe me, boy, you don't ever wanna know.
Not ever.
Didn't even make a dent, did I?
All right.
You're both makin' a big mistake.
Do you wanna ante?
Yeah, fine.
What do you think of the singer?
Nice voice.
Wyatt, Doc won't quit.
He's been at it for 36 hours straight.
Clanton and the McLaury Brothers came in an hour ago.
I tried to get him to go to bed, but he won't let go.
I know, and nobody can make him.
Wyatt, just in time. Pull up a chair.
Doc, you been hittin' it awful hard, haven't ya?
Nonsense.
I've not yet begun to defile myself.
I was wonderin' if maybe you wouldn't wanna go on over to the Crystal Palace.
I will not be pawed at, thank you very much.
- I'm sorry.
- That's right.
Doc can go on day and night, and then some.
That's my loving man.
Have another one, my loving man.
I'm in.
Hey.
Loving man, you been called.
What is that now?
That 12 hands in a row, Holliday?
Son of a bitch, nobody's that lucky.
Why, Ike, whatever do you mean?
Take it easy, boys.
Maybe poker's just not your game, Ike.
I know, let's have a spelling contest.
How 'bout if I just wring your scrawny neck?
Enough, Ike.
Are you takin' his part?
I'm the one who got cheated!
You goddamn pimps!
You're all in it together.
Nobody's in anything, Ike.
You're drunk.
Go on home and sleep it off.
Get your goddamn hands off me!
Don't you ever put your hands on me, see?
Don't you ever try to manhandle a Cowboy,
'cause we'll cut your goddamn pimp's heart out.
You understand, you pimp?
Don't you threaten me, you little son of a bitch!
All right! All right!
Come on, easy, Virg, easy!
You just go on home and forget about it, huh, Ike?
Come on, Virg.
I ain't gonna forget nothin'.
Well, that certainly was a bust.
Come, darlin'. Let's seek our entertainment elsewhere.
Forget it, Virg. Go on.
Get some fresh air.
- What's wrong, Doc?
- Nothin'. Not a thing.
I'm right as the mail.
Doc? Doc!
All right, get him up.
Let's get him to the hotel.
- What's wrong with him?
- Lunger.
Yeah, well, I hope you die.
Give me my guns.
My rifle.
Goddamn bastards.
Think they can cheat me.
Nobody cheated you, Ike.
Just go home.
I don't take no mouth from no bartenders, neither.
There, ya see?
Give somebody a rap on the beezer, get some respect around here.
You tell the Earps, I see 'em on the street and Doc Holliday,
I'm gonna send them to hell on a shutter. You tell 'em that.
Pick these guns up.
Come on.
Come on, Ike.
Come on!
- Hey, you walkin'?
- Leave me alone.
- You gonna give Ike back his guns.
- Not till he sobers up.
Wearin' that badge don't make you right.
Who the hell you think you are?
Watch the way you walk, you stupid bastard.
Easy, kid, I'm sorry.
I ain't easy and I ain't your kid.
You take your sorry and shove it up your ass.
I'll fight you right now.
Goddamn it!
You're gonna bleed.
You got a fight comin'. Comin' today.
Bastards! It's comin'!
Your condition's quite advanced.
I'd say you lost some 60% of your lung tissue, maybe more.
What's the verdict?
Two years. Two days.
Hard to say. If you stop now.
Your smokin', your drinkin', your gamblin', your nightlife.
You need complete rest.
What I mean is, you must attempt to deny
- your marital impulse.
- Get out of my sight.
- How are you feeling, Doc?
- Better.
That's good.
I knew it wasn't nothing.
We must talk, darlin'.
It appears we must redefine the nature of our association.
I'm a good woman to you, Doc.
Don't I always take care of ya?
Nobody cares for you like me.
I'm a good woman.
Yes, it's true, you are a good woman.
Then again, you may be the Antichrist.
Goddamn.
Now there's six of 'em.
Hell, this is like a bad dream.
Just stay calm. Use your head.
It'll be all right.
Just the same, though, guess maybe you better swear me in.
Those Cowboys been telling everybody in town they're gonna clean you out.
They're back there in that lot behind the O.K. Corral.
- Thank you, Mayor.
- What're you doin' out of bed, Doc?
What in the hell's goin' on?
Five people come up to my room tellin' me the Clantons and McLaurys are gunnin' for us.
We goin' down there or not?
What are we gonna do?
Wait till the liquor wears off.
Soon as they start gettin' headaches, they'll lose interest.
Lose interest, hell.
They're threatenin' our lives.
- You'll never make that stick.
- They're carryin' guns, Wyatt.
Christ's sake, Virg, that's a misdemeanour.
You go down there and arrest them, something goes wrong, maybe this time somebody really gets his head broken.
You'll have Cowboys comin' around lookin' for trouble from here to Christmas.
You want to risk all that over a misdemeanour?
Damn right I'll risk it.
They're breakin' the law.
It's not your problem, Doc.
You don't have to mix up in this.
That is a hell of a thing for you to say to me.
All right, Virg.
Your call. Give Doc the shotgun.
They'll be less apt to get nervy if he's on the street howitzer.
Go on! Get home!
Goddamn kid.
How the hell did we get ourselves into this?
You don't have to worry about a thing.
I just went over there and disarmed them.
You did? Come on, boys.
Gentlemen, I'm not gonna allow any trouble.
We're here to disarm you.
Throw up your hands.
Hold it! That's not what I want!
Oh, my God.
Billy! Billy!
Stop! No! No!
Don't shoot! I got no gun!
Please don't shoot me! I got no gun!
This fight's commenced!
Get to fightin' or get away!
- That's it!
- Shut the door!
Give me your goddamned gun!
Damn it!
Billy! Billy!
Doc, behind us!
I got you now, you son of a bitch.
You're a daisy if you do.
Morgan, hold quiet now.
Here you go. Easy. Easy, man.
- I got you. All right.
- All right!
All of you are under arrest.
I don't think I'll let you arrest us today, Behan.
Virg!
Virgil!
Well, I guess we did our good deed for today, Mayor.
You were right.
It's nothin' like I thought.
- I almost wish that...
- I know, Morgan.
I know. Me too.
Outta the way!
Gettin' warmer.
Guess spring's comin'.
Hello, Billy. I say hello.
It's deputy!
And I don't want to talk to you!
Those men you killed were my friends.
I'm just a nothin'.
But if I wasn't, I'd fight you right now, so I don't want to talk to you.
All they ever did was laugh at him.
Sister boy should've stuck around.
- What do you want, Ringo?
- I want your blood.
And I want your souls.
And I want 'em both right now.
- I don't want any more trouble.
- Well, ya got trouble!
And it starts with you.
I'm not gonna fight you, Ringo.
There's no money in it.
Sober up. Come on, boys.
You wretched slugs.
Don't any of ya have the guts to play for blood?
I'm your huckleberry.
That's just my game.
All right, lunger. You go to hell.
- I'll put you out of your misery.
- Say when.
- Johnny, don't!
- No, Johnny!
- Get off!
- Easy now!
- Get off!
- It ain't nothin'.
Don't mind him!
He's just drunk, that's all.
Cool down, Johnny!
No! No!
I want them spittin' blood!
Easy, son, easy! Now ain't the time!
Slow down, Ringo.
I tell ya, boys, even I'm worried what's gonna happen once Ringo runs this outfit.
God have mercy!
- Juanito, their time will come.
- Gentlemen.
- Let's go get bullied, boy!
- Let's go get soused!
- Barber.
- Yes, sir?
Proceed, sir.
Listen to me. I need to speak with you.
Not now. I'm busy.
I see what's going on between you and Wyatt.
I'm not a fool. But listen to me.
Lots of so-called hard cases and tough nuts come and go around this town, but none of them has a clue about the real play, none of them.
Now after tonight, there'll be one man in charge of Tombstone.
You'll be happy to know him. Bet on it.
Gonna be one of those nights.
It's gettin' late, boys.
I'm gonna go to bed.
- Good night, Virg.
- Good night, Morg.
Bundle up, Virg.
It's gettin' cold out there.
Yeah.
Tower of Babel.
Death and the Devil.
Oh, dear.
Oh, Allie. I wish you'd learn to play a real card game.
- More tea, Mattie?
- No, no.
- Are you all right, Mattie?
- Yes.
- Are you expecting someone?
- Only Virg.
Please. I know it's awful to come here, but listen.
I think something's gonna happen tonight.
It's Virg.
No! Get down!
That thunder's sure gettin' close.
Virgil. What'd ya forget?
Wyatt.
Will you hurry with that water, please?
Come on, Lou.
Wyatt! Wyatt!
They hit Clum's house too, shot up his wife.
His wife! Whoever heard of that?
They're bugs, Wyatt. All that smart talk about live and let live.
There ain't no live and let live with bugs.
All right, you listen to me now.
We gotta get out of here.
Get out of here?
Listen to yourself, Wyatt.
Lie down and crawl or you might get hurt? What kind of talk is that?
- Do you see what's happening here?
- What?
What do you mean?
What are you saying?
No. Please, no.
I'm afraid your husband's going to lose the use of his arm.
Oh, God, no.
Don't worry, Allie girl.
I still got one good arm to hold you with.
Goddamn!
- Goddamn sons of bitches!
- Morgan, wait a minute! Virg.
- You had to be so damn smart.
- I'm sorry, Allie.
I told you, Virg.
- Not now, Wyatt.
- All right.
All right, what do you want me to do?
- Just leave me alone, for God's sakes.
- Virg...
He doesn't want to talk now, Wyatt!
I heard about what they did to your women. That was wrong.
I'm here to let you know that it wasn't me. I had no part of it.
No? Brothers to the bone, right, McMasters?
No. Not any more. Not after this night.
He's right, Wyatt. You want us for anything, we're with you.
Come on.
Hold him!
No! Get her out of here! Jesus!
Somebody shut that dog up!
I said hold him, goddamn it!
Somebody get that goddamn dog out of here!
The bullet's too deep. I can't get it out.
The way it's lodged in there. I'm sorry.
Easy, Morg. Is that better?
Yeah.
You were right, Wyatt.
They got me good.
Don't let 'em get you, brother.
You're the one.
Easy, Morg.
Don't worry about that now.
Remember what I said about seein' a light when you're dyin'?
Yeah. Yeah.
That ain't true.
I can't see a damn thing.
Morg?
Morg!
Morg?
No.
Morgan! No!
Morgan, don't die! I love you!
Don't die!
Why? Why him?
- No. No, get away from me!
- Wyatt!
Can't you see? Get away from me!
Morgan!
And so she walked out of our lives forever.
I want you to know it's over.
Well.
Bye.
You smell that, Bill?
Smells like someone died.
Jesus, Johnny.
Ike.
Take Stillwell and finish it.
Now, you take care of yourself.
- That's Virgil with the women.
- He's mine!
- All aboard!
- Hey, Mattie! Where's Wyatt?
Right behind you, Stillwell.
No!
Sweet Jesus. Don't shoot.
All right, Clanton.
You called down the thunder.
Well, now you got it.
You see that?
It says "United States Marshal."
Wyatt. Please don't kill me. Please.
Take a good look at him, Ike,
'cause that's how you're gonna end up.
The Cowboys are finished.
You understand me?
I see a red sash,
I kill the man wearin' it.
So run, you cur.
Run! Tell all the other curs the law is comin'!
You tell 'em I'm comin'!
And Hell's comin' with me, you hear?
Hell's comin' with me!
Nobody move!
Nonsense. By all means, move.
Get down!
Hey, Wyatt!
How the hell are ya?
I got some boys over there behind ya!
Got you in a little crossfire.
How do ya like that?
Come on!
Think of something fast, would ya?
Wyatt? Hey, Wyatt.
- No.
- Wyatt!
- No.
- Wyatt, what are you doin'?
Look at that.
Yeah.
Come and get some, boy.
No! Let me!
No.
- Son of a bitch.
- No!
Jesus Christ!
No. No!
Did you ever see anything like that before?
Hell, I ain't never even heard of anything like that.
Nothin'.
Where is he?
Down by the creek, walkin' on water.
Well, let's hope he's got another miracle up his sleeve.
'Cause if I know Ringo, he's headed straight for us.
Well, if they were my brothers,
I'd want revenge too.
No. Make no mistake.
It's not revenge he's after.
It's a reckoning.
Doc. You ought to be in bed. What the hell you doin' this for anyway?
Wyatt Earp is my friend.
Hell, I got lots of friends.
I don't.
My God.
- Are you all right?
- What do you care?
It was your friends that did it.
Must've been Claiborne and Fuller.
They left here last night.
Oh, no.
They tried to take my watch.
He cursed them for cowards, and they shot him.
I don't understand any of this.
I just know it's ugly.
You're all ugly, and he was beautiful.
He tried to bring something fine into your ugly world, and you shot him for it.
Not that you care.
- Billy. Where you goin'?
- I'm not goin' with you.
Billy! Billy, get back here!
I'm sorry, sir, but we got to have some law.
- Billy!
- Let him go. Who cares?
Get on out!
Get the hell outta here! Go on!
Party's over, boys. Let's go!
Halt.
Ringo and Behan are out in front.
There is about 30 of 'em.
They're all wearin' badges.
Christ.
We gotta find a place to hole up.
Doc.
Grab him.
I got him.
I got him!
Is this Henry Hooker's ranch?
That's right. And I'm Hooker.
We got a sick man.
And our horses are done in.
Put him up at my place, as long as it's just tonight.
We're in debt to you.
I know you boys have got to keep movin', but he looks pretty bad to me.
They got held up, and their boss actor got killed.
They came here to water the horses, then they'll push on.
I'm sorry about your friend.
And I'm sorry that I...
I forgave you the moment you said it.
You did? Well...
Thank you.
All set.
I have to go.
Wait.
What the hell is that?
They got McMasters!
Ringo wanted to make sure he got your attention, Marshal!
He wants a straight-up fight, just you and him, to settle this thing once and for all.
Oak grove at the mouth of Silver Springs Canyon, 7:00!
You tell him I'll be there!
- Are you crazy?
- I'll be there!
It's not finished.
After I'm done with Wyatt Earp, take your Cowboys and finish off
Creek Johnson and Texas Jack.
You burn 'em, Ike.
Burn 'em all.
Hell, Johnny, he ain't even gonna show.
He'll show.
I spent my whole life not knowin' what I wanted outta life, just chasin' my tail.
Now for the first time
I know exactly what I want, and who.
And that's the damnable misery of it.
What makes a man like Ringo, Doc?
What makes him do the things he does?
A man like Ringo got a great empty hole right through the middle of him.
He can never kill enough or steal enough or inflict enough pain to ever fill it.
What does he need?
Revenge.
For what?
Bein' born.
It all happened so fast with Curly Bill
I didn't really have time to think about it, but I've had plenty of time to think about this.
I can't beat him, can I?
No.
Wait. I'm goin' with ya.
Oh, God. I'm sorry.
I'm sorry, Wyatt.
It's all right, Doc.
What's it like to wear one of those?
Don't worry.
They want him, they gotta come over us first.
He's waitin' for you by the big oak, quarter mile up that trail.
They're not givin' ya any safe-conduct.
Shootin' starts, you better kick east to the New Mexico line.
I ain't got the words.
I know.
Me neither.
Well.
I didn't think ya had it in you.
I'm your huckleberry.
Why, Johnny Ringo, you look like somebody just walked over your grave.
Fight's not with you, Holliday.
I'll beg to differ, sir. We started a game we never got to finish.
Play for blood, remember?
I was just foolin' about.
I wasn't.
And this time it's legal.
All right, lunger. Let's do it.
Say when.
Come on. Come on!
Oh, Johnny. Come on!
You're no daisy. You're no daisy at all!
Poor soul.
You were just too high-strung.
I'm afraid the strain was more than he could bear.
Oh, I wasn't quite as sick as I made out.
Good God.
My hypocrisy goes only so far.
All right.
Let's finish it.
Indeed, sir. The last charge of Wyatt Earp and his immortals.
Come on! Get going!
Look at this!
Hello, Wyatt.
Father Feeney and I were just investigating the mysteries of the Church of Rome.
It appears my hypocrisy knows no bounds.
You're no hypocrite, Doc.
You just like to sound like one.
I brought you somethin'.
Well, let's see. Where are we today?
I'm $17 down to you.
- Two bits a hand. Stud?
- You keep comin' back here.
I told you not to, and I meant it.
You're the only person
I can afford to lose to any more.
How we feelin' today, Doc?
I'm dying. How are you?
Pretty much the same.
So now we add self-pity to your list of frailties.
All right, Doc.
All right, how many cards you want?
I don't want to play any more.
How many?
Damn you. You're the most fallible, stubborn, self-deluded, bull-headed man
I've ever known in my entire life.
I call.
- You win.
- Yet withal, you're the only human being in my entire life who ever gave me hope.
I was in love once.
My first cousin.
She was 15.
We were both so...
That's good, Doc.
That's good. What happened?
She joined a convent over the affair.
She was all I ever wanted.
What did you want?
Just to live a normal life.
There's no normal life, Wyatt.
There's just life.
Now get on with it.
Don't know how.
Sure you do. Say goodbye to me.
Go grab that spirited actress and make her your own.
Take that beauty and run, and don't look back.
Live every second.
Live right up to the hilt.
Live, Wyatt.
Live for me.
Wyatt, if you ever were my friend, if you ever had even the slightest feelin' for me, leave now.
Leave now.
Please?
Thanks for always bein' there, Doc.
I'll be damned.
This is funny.
I never thought I would see
Gilbert and Sullivan performed right here in Denver.
- Good night, Josie.
- Good night.
Good show.
Ya ever see the sun come up over the Rockies?
It hits all of a sudden, and below there's California.
And you swear you're lookin' at heaven.
I have nothing left, nothing to give you.
I have no pride, no dignity.
No money. I don't even know how we'll make a living, but...
I promise I'll love you the rest of your life.
Don't worry, Wyatt. My family's rich.
What shall we do first?
What you wanted to do the first night we met.
Remember?
May I have this dance?
- Yes.
- And then we'll have room service.
The power of the Cowboy Gang was broken forever.
Ike Clanton was shot and killed two years later during an attempted robbery.
Mattie died of a drug overdose shortly after she left Tombstone.
Virgil and Allie Earp moved to California, where Virgil, despite the use of only one arm, became a town sheriff.
Wyatt and Josephine embarked on a series of adventures.
Up or down, thin or flush, in 47 years they never left each other's side.
Wyatt Earp died in Los Angeles in 1929.
Among the pallbearers at his funeral were early Western movie stars
William S. Hart and Tom Mix.
Tom Mix wept.
My brother Metacomet, may the noble spirit of your father, Massasoit, soar with the eagles.
Chief Metacomet.
Thanks to the friendship of your father, we have survived here.
My father should have let you die!
You are the only one who comes to us with an open heart.
But your people have murdered my father with their lies!
My name is Pearl.
This is the story of my mother, Hester Prynne.
It was the year of our Lord 1666, when she arrived in the
Massachusetts Bay Colony filled with the hope that at last, in this new world would come the freedom to worship without fear of persecution.
My esteemed colleague!
Thy years of toil become thee!
Thy fame preceeds thee, sir.
Governor Bellingham, may I present the Reverend Thomas Cheever.
Welcome, sir.
It's a long voyage.
3 months at sea, will either take away your faith, or harden it to iron.
Allow me to introduce a woman who's been travelling with us,
- Mistress...
- Hester Prynne.
I apologize for the coarseness of my hands, Mistress.
But here in the colonies, everyone must work.
I look forward to the hard work.
It says in Psalm 92: "I will triumph in the work of thy hands".
Thou canst quote the Scriptures.
Aye, Reverend, both Testaments.
My husband taught me.
You must rest.
Then I'll show you what's been accomplished.
I thank thee.
- Then it's Goodwife Prynne.
- Yes, yes.
But I prefer to be called Hester.
Welcome, Hester.
I wish I could've seen it before, when it was wild and untouched.
Madam, you should use less lace in your dressmaking.
Indeed, Reverend.
Master of us all, we give thanks for another bountiful meal, and for newly arrived disciples, that share it with us this night.
- Amen.
- Amen.
So, Governor.
I am impatient to know how you fared with Metacomet.
Well, Metacomet isn't Massassoit, Major Dunsmuir.
But if we respect the agreements we made with his father, we've nothing to fear.
So we don't grow complacent, our wise God sends us a sign.
When we sailed, your letters said we were at peace with the savage.
Well,
I fear the days of "peace" with the Wampanoag is at an end.
Major, we are frightening our new arrival.
We hear much of your success with the praying Indians.
I'm very eager to meet
Reverend Dimmesdale and his converts.
The runts of the litter.
Dimmesdale's little treasures!
Some of us have other opinions.
Mistress Prynne,
I hope you'll stay with us until your husband's arrival.
You're most kind, but I intend to find a house of my own as soon as possible.
On thine own?
Why, yes.
It's not considered fitting for a young woman to live alone.
I've come first to prepare a place for his arrival, so that is what I intend to do.
Mistress Prynne.
The rules we live by may seem arbitrary to a newcomer, but we have learnt the hard way that without absolute order, we cannot hope to survive here.
Rules, Mistress Prynne.
Order.
Survival.
Would you have me disobey my husband?
- I...
- Reverend, you might enjoy the company of my son, Brewster.
He studied Divinity.
Harvard wasn't good enough for him, so he came home to make his fortune as a...
Minister's sons all moaning the Lord's Prayer in their sleep.
Everyone must find his place.
- Morning, Mistress Prynne.
- Good morrow.
So you intend on scandalising the town!
Get up!
Good!
I confess,
I feel alone in a sea of conformists.
Where should we begin our search?
On the cliffs by the sea.
No, it's out of the question.
Why?
No one's lived by the sea since the Indians wiped out Ballinger's Point.
I say we start there.
Well, if you've decided.
Is that it, Brewster?
It's beautiful.
I tried to imagine what her life was like before she came to the new world.
Why did her husband send her on ahead, alone?
Was it a test of her loyalty, or her spirit?
Or was it in his nature to set traps for people in the hope they would fall into them?
It's perfect!
With a cart and a musket,
I could have a home here!
A cart, a horse, a pitchfork, a plow.
I can think of better things to do with these pretty hands than grow calluses on them.
I'll need indentured labor, at least two men.
- The land needs draining.
- You are headstrong.
Perhaps it runs in the blood.
I'm told your father was too.
Is it true he was in debt to your husband and you were the payment?
I've said something to disturb you.
I'm sorry.
I'm truly sorry.
God, thou art wondrous fair!
That hurt!
Good. It'll remind you not to do it again.
Faith?
Prudence?
Did you hear Mistress Prynne has a bathing tub?
What is she, French?
2 Shillings.
Will you bid 2 shillings?
2 and a half?
Come on, gentlemen, do I have a bid for 3 shillings?
3 shillings?
3 shillings?
Anyone else?
Anyone else?
Going for 3 shillings.
Any other bids?
Sold to the gentleman for 3 shillings.
- Next we have this other one,
- Those two.
How much time left on their indenture?
About 3 years, but, shouldn't your husband or father be doing business with me?
Is my money no good to you, sir?
Your money's as fine as wine in the sunshine, Mistress.
If you buy them at a just price,
I'll throw in the girl in red.
She's a slave!
But she don't speak, if that be a problem. Born that way.
Name your just price.
We'd best accompany you if your going to the forest.
Don't worry Mr Bobbin.
I shan't go far.
Mistress Prynne?
Mistress Prynne?
Mistress Prynne?
Where are you?
Mistress Prynne, where are you?
I found her.
- You did not.
- I did to.
- You did not.
- I did to.
Mistress Prynne,
Have you forgotten it is the Sabbath?
Of course not.
Forgive me.
We've come by especially to bring you to church.
Thank you, so much.
Please, go on without me.
I will follow at once.
Make haste.
Yes, sir.
All right, girl,
Come on.
Oh goodnes!
Back up. Back up.
Come on now, back up.
Come on. Come on. Back up.
Good morrow.
May I be of assistance?
Not from up there.
Come on.
Come on.
Steady. Steady.
I can't make this horse understand me.
Let me try.
Come on, girl.
Come on, back up!
Come on, girl.
Come on. Come on.
I'm afraid you're in too deep.
She'll not make it.
Let me try this.
I do hope you can get it free.
I'm already late for the service, and everyone's talking about me.
I've been away and I'm quite behind on local gossip.
I bought the old Newbury place out on Ballinger's Point.
Then,
I owe you an apology.
I've been trespassing.
There's a place at the point where I like to bath.
Really? Well, I shan't charge too steep a tariff.
Come on, girl, back up!
- Back up.
- One,
Two,
Two. Three.
I'm afraid this cart will be stuck here until Sabbath next unless I gather hands to help.
Would you care to ride with me?
On your horse, with you?
Aye, unless you can ride.
I can ride.
You take my horse and I'll take yours.
There's a shortcut to the meeting house, but it's a difficult road.
I shall manage, sir.
- Are you certain?
- Just you lead the way.
Come on! Come on!
Come on! Come on!
May God be with you.
I'm sure he already is.
But aren't you coming to...
Good Sabbath to ye all.
Friends, and fellow voyagers, in the greatest of all dreams.
We've been singled out, like Israel of old, to serve as a model.
But if we are to succeed in building our new Jerusalem, our "City on a Hill", then the power of love, yea, His Divine Love, we must bind our hearts as one!
English and Indian, gentry and indentured, free man and slaves, and make of us an example for all the world, to marvel at and proclaim:
"Here... is the measure of perfection!
Here, lives God's own!"
But we are not succeeding in that test.
We are failing!
And why?
Because we covet, nay, we lust after what is not ours.
Be it for the rich land of our Indian brothers, be it for glory, for profits or for revenge.
Need I read the secret of every heart?
I will if you want.
Yea, I will if you want.
I will lay open the secrets before the eyes of God!
What thou lusteth after is my enemy, sayeth the Lord God.
For only I shall consume thee, only I shall fill thee up.
If thou failest to heed my commandments, then my fist shall descend on thee like a stone!
And thy sword shall cut thee into bloody parts, and even thy memories shall be sacrificed to the winds for all time!
May God bless you, each and every one of you.
Amn.
Amn.
Allow me to present a newcomer to our congregation,
Mistress Roger Prynne.
Mistress Roger?
Aye, her husband, a renowned physician will join her before...
Reverend Dimmesdale and I have already...
I helped when her cart got stuck in the woods.
I greatly enjoyed your sermon.
It's rare for a man so young to speak with such passion.
For some reason,
I felt most inspired today.
We welcome you and your husband to our congregation.
Mother! Mother!
There you are, Hester.
Meet my friend, Running Moose.
He's our schoolmaster.
And I'm sure you'd like some refreshment.
Do you teach the English children as well Mr Running Moose?
They call me John or Johnny here.
We try our best, but the English are a bit slow-witted.
Slow-witted?
Johnny's a bit of a jester, but he was our first praying Indian.
My best friend in the colony.
Arthur,
- this is Mistress...
- We've already met.
Excuse me.
So like home.
Yet beyond those trees
I suspect a savagery, of savage passions, dark and untamed.
Reverend Dimmesdale, have you met our young friend?
Yes, we've met.
Mistress Prynne and I traveled out on the same ship.
I'm going to marry him one day.
No you're not, I'm going to aren't I, Mistress Prynne?
- Marry whom?
- Reverend Dimmesdale, of course!
"A Short Description of the
Great and Last Judgement".
Well, "Platform for Church Discipline".
They're all tracts!
"The Goodwife's Manual..." for Animal Husbandry"
I believe we've already met.
Oh, yes, I...
I'm sorry, I didn't realize.
I should have announced my presence.
What are you reading?
- "Comus", it's by John
- John Milton.
I know it. I've read it.
Have you?
I'm not all counterpanes and coverlets.
Every spare moment, I read.
I'm the same.
I've read every book in this room.
Some of them several times.
Even "Manual for Animal Husbandry?"
A most exhiliarating read.
So, did you truly enjoy my sermon?
Yes, it was most skilful.
Clearly your congregation reverences you.
You liked it not. We don't come up to London standards.
To the contrary.
I was moved by your passion.
And?
Well, when your fist struck your hand, and sliced through the air like a sword,
I found myself wondering what manner of pain lay beneath such forceful oratory.
Your tongue knows no rules,
Mistress Prynne.
And if it did, Reverend, what purpose would it serve?
And here I thought comprehending God was to be my greatest challenge.
Yes, Reverend?
This morning in the forest, why did you not say you were married?
Why did you not say you were a minister?
Good day, Mistress Prynne.
Good morrow, Mistress Prynne.
Good morrow.
You care for a cup of cider?
We are your neighbours, it seems.
Did you like the sermon this morning?
From where I sat it seemed it did please thee.
I liked it very much.
I thought the young minister very...
Handsome?
Harriet Hibbons.
Ruth?
How do you do?
Come and meet some of the others who were not invited to the Governer's shindig.
Sally Short, Mistress Prynne.
How do you do?
I was on the dock when you arrived.
Mary Rollins.
Mary don't like to speak much.
She's only been free from the savages this half year.
And Matona don't trust the English, do you dear?
Mistress Prynne?
Thank you, no.
I never imbibe.
You've gathered some fine
Balm of Gilead,
Shepherd's Purse, yarrow.
You know your plants?
I do. I recite "Culpepper" by heart.
Really?
Then what would you use to heal a bad burn?
I've seen sweet fern work miracles, but Culpepper suggests blackberry and red cedar.
Well, you hear that.
My husband has a very large library and I was able to school myself.
How do you like our new
Jerusalem?
Sober enough for you?
Aye, sober enough.
What I miss is the dancing.
Dancing?
When first we came, they'd be dancing round the maypole.
Feast days we'd sing bawdy songs.
People weren't afraid to play the fool.
We'd teach the bears to dance.
Now days, everybody getting more and more sourfaced and ponderous.
And a whipping post stands where the maypole used to be.
But there's a few of us who haven't forgotten to laugh.
It's been a pleasure meeting you all.
I'm sorry I must take my leave, but I don't want to be stuck in the wilds at night.
There are things that sound to me, the wilds at night are my natural territory.
Particulary when there's a full moon.
Do you try to frighten me with this witch talk?
Not so, Mistress Prynne.
But I can see what others cannot.
Be a curse, to be sure, but I know the hearts of men.
And what does my heart tell you?
You're a most comely woman.
Let a man tremble who wins the hand of a maid, but possesses not the full passion of her heart.
My husband has nothing to fear.
Good day Mistress Hibbons.
Good day, Mistress Prynne.
Good day, Goody Gotwick.
I brought these for
Reverend Dimmesdale.
The Reverend be occupied with his work, Missus.
Leave them books on the table and I'll be sure he gets them.
Good morrow, Reverend.
Good morrow, Mistress Prynne.
Knowing you hunger for new reading,
I brought you some books.
How courteous of you.
Please.
I must apologize for my forthrightness on Sabbath last.
I've earned a few reprimands for speaking too bluntly.
I owe an apology, too.
I can't understand why
I took such offence to such a simple comment.
But I have wondered how you were able to see so deeply into my nature.
Perhaps I'm a witch.
I must be keeping you from your chores.
Thank you for the books.
Good day.
I'm sorry. My hands are covered in ink.
I've been hovered over my translations all day.
Translations?
Aye. I'm attempting to translate the Bible into the local Indian language,
Algonquin.
What an ambitious undertaking.
But I'm told the Indians don't want to be guided by our Bible.
That war with them is inevitable.
Some think that way, but they're wrong.
The Indians, born from a certain liberty, take not easily to bridle and bit.
No man should.
Well...
What?
What?
You keep putting ink on your face.
Oh, I do.
There you are.
I do hope you enjoy the books.
Thank you.
Good day.
Good day.
Mituba?
'Tis only a bathing tub, not a toy of Satan.
Mistress Prynne?
Reverend Dimmesdale!
- You frightened me.
- I'm sorry. I didn't mean to.
It's a wonderful surprise.
- It's beautiful.
- Yes, and frightening.
Just as Eden must have been.
So untouched.
Does it not cry out with it's promise, that everything can begin anew?
I brought back your books.
You couldn't have read them all in four days.
Oh no, I did.
I read most of them twice.
Thank you.
You're welcome.
Farewell.
Hester...
I'm not the man I seem.
I've lived here all my life, my purpose clear.
But now I'd risk everything, my life, my ministry, my soul just to spend a few moments alone with you.
God help me, Hester.
I love thee.
God help me.
I love thee too.
Oh God. Have we lost our way?
No!
I dreamed of thee speaking thy heart.
I have prayed for it even as
I have dreaded it.
Was I alive before
I laid eyes on thee?
What shall we do?
I know not.
Say something to end it, for I have not the power.
Nor I.
Nay!
We could be hanged for this.
I've put you in too much danger, and I must end it by walking away and never speaking with you again.
Go then.
Do as you promised.
Throughout the long summer,
Mistress Prynne and the Reverend
Dimmesdale avoided each other at all costs.
Mistress Prynne rarely went to town and the Reverend escaped to the wilds with the Indians and faithful Johnny Sassamon for company.
And the colony organized it's annual election day as usual.
No one the wiser that there existed among them two hearts struggling against a love that grew stronger with each passing day.
Johnny Sassamon says they've attacked the "Intrepid".
What's he saying,
Arthur?
The Tarrantines attacked an English ship, the Intrepid.
All were massacred.
"Prynne".
"Doctor Roger Prynne".
Mistress Prynne.
I'm here as your minister.
Come in.
There was an attack, an Indian attack on one of our ships.
They say that, all aboard were massacred.
I regret to be... the one to bring you this sad news.
I'll leave you to your mourning.
Are you certain none survived?
They say that the tide washed away the bodies.
God forgive me!
I've prayed so long to be set free.
You did not cause his death, Hester.
God... took your husband.
But was it an answer to my prayers?
Does He work like that?
Perhaps.
If in His eyes there was no other way we could be together.
I must know what the law is.
The mourning, how long must one wait?
1 month? Six months? What?
Where there is no absolute proof of death,
7 years must pass before we're free to be seen in public.
7 years?
Yes...
Greetings, Metacomet.
We have been enemies.
But now Tarrantine and Wampanoag must unite to fight the greedy English. before they push us into the sea.
Were the Indians cruel to you, Mary?
After my little one died, they treated me fair and square.
If truth be told, cruel is how you folks have treated me since I come home.
Thank you.
I didn't do nothing that wasn't forced on me!
The thought of being taken by a savage makes me sick to my stomach.
Well, they do it on the backs of their horses, ridin' across the land.
Hester, you all right?
Yes, I'm just tired.
Mary's right.
You call them savages.
I could tell you a thing or two about your husband before he tied the knot with you.
Stupid slut!
Harold would never had nothing to do with no whore!
You think not?
I've even seen one of your windy ministers pokin' an Injun girl, standin' on a bible so he could roger her better.
They always said the Scriptures should uplift you!
I refuse to be with those who would mock the Holy Book!
Well, she'll not be coming back soon.
Good riddance to her!
We Quakers believe that the Scriptures be not religion, but only the ceremony and history of it.
I agree.
For are not the laws of men but the imagination of mortals, and the inner spirit the true voice of Heaven?
Hester,
I pray you're not sayin' you talk directly to the Deity?
Don't you know that only paid Bible-thumpers can do that?
Have a care, child, or they'll talking of you the way they talk of me!
I know some consider it blasphemous to say this, but I do talk to God.
I have since I was a small child.
And He answers me.
Mistress Roger Prynne... by order of the Governor of
Masachusetts Bay Colony, you are ordered to appear before the magistrates at eight tomorrow morn!
Don't be tardy!
Mistress Prynne, these gentlemen have laid a charge of heresy against you.
Tell me how it is the laws of men are the imagination of mortals?
It is the meetings that you call heresy.
Lascivious talk of fornication with savages.
Fallen women who tell lies about good citizens.
This is what comes when there is no qualified man present to guide these women in their untutored chatterings.
If the discourse of women is untutored chattering, why does the Bible teach that women shall be the teachers of women?
Hester, we ask that you cease these meetings.
No, sirs.
I'll not stop the meetings.
Arthur.
Please join us.
I've been fishing, sir..
You may thank me to remain where I am.
- Please be seated.
- Call our first witness.
Is it truly of import?
Yes, it is of great consequence.
Very well, call your witness.
Goody Gotwick?
Stand up, Goody.
You revealed to my wife something very disturbing.
Tell me, what does it mean when a woman vomits in the morning hours?
And vomits more than once in the morning hours?
I only saw her the one time.
Yes. And?
Goody Mortimer saw her get sick in the market.
Are you with child?
Answer your betters, woman!
Do you carry a bastard child in yur womb?
Yes.
Who is the father?
You are innocent next to the one who would hide behind your skirts.
We would hang that fornicator!
I'll not reveal the name, sir.
I will tell you his name!
His name is Lucifer!
His name is Legion!
His name is lust!
Gentlemen, what do you hope to accomplish?
You know there is no law against pregnancy.
But there is against adultery.
It would only adultery if her husband were found to be alive.
The meetings will stop!
Governor, if you knew the name of this man, would you punish Hester Prynne?
Has she confessed the name to you?
I've confessed nothing!
- Tell us the truth, Arthur.
- He knows nothing of my affairs.
He speaks as my pastor to spare me your harsh hand.
But I fear not your punishments!
I love and honor the man who has fathered this child!
And say what you will, he is my true husband for life, and I shall furnish no information which might cause him harm.
Very well, you leave me no choice.
You're under arrest.
Is this your new Jerusalem?
Let me have a moment alone with the woman.
- I can draw the name from her.
- You shall have your chance.
Gentlemen.
I've considered all the arguments and decided Arthur is allowed to speak to Mistress Prynne alone.
Hester Prynne, place your hand on the Good Book.
Let us pray.
Let us pray.
Why did you not tell me?
I was afraid.
I thought if I worked hard,
I would miscarry.
I must go to Bellingham with the truth.
No, you must not!
You are a saint to these people!
They'll hang you for betraying them!
I prefer to hang, than allow you to suffer for me.
They've no case against me!
- When they tire, they'll release me.
- I know Stonehall.
You've challenged him, and he'll not release you until you are humbled and have recanted your sins.
Do you believe we've sinned?
I know not.
What happen between us had a consecration. Have you forgotten?
I've not forgotten!
Arthur, I know you want to speak out.
Your nature cries out for it.
But you risk your own ruin and deny me my right to stand up to this hypocrisy.
Soldier!
If I need you to speak,
I'll tie this handkerchief from the window.
I love thee woman, but your strength frightens me.
I'll do what you ask.
Amen.
God be with you.
I'm sure he already is.
Gentlemen,
Mistress Prynne has been there more than 5 months without any legal justification.
Even in Plymouth they regard this as barbaric!
I'd like to free her.
At home, I have no peace on this.
But the people see us go to her week after week, caps in hand, only to be turned away.
The woman is unrepentant!
She's fortunate we haven't beaten her publicly!
I'm surprised at you Reverend.
You came here a man of reason.
I came here expecting some semblance of order.
Instead I find a den of fractiousness!
Sir, if you do not stem this dissent, my wife and I will return to England.
And take our parishioners!
If only she would give us a small sign of contrition.
If it had been up to him, my father, he would have ended it and revealed the truth of my origins.
But bound by my mother's wish, he could not.
He went every day to see her and was refused.
His eye ever on that window for her sign that it was time to come forward with the truth.
Had there been flashes of Prynne's unstable nature before in England?
No one knows.
But now, free from Puritan society, he was increasingly seized by spirits so powerful they were terrifying even to the Indians.
He has a ghost in him.
He'll bring us bad luck.
Send him home.
Forgive me, Lord, for I have turned from my Heavenly Father.
Forgive me.
Lord, bring me back to thy bosom.
God's teeth, child!
How could they leave you thus?
I'm so glad you're here!
6 months and not one visitor.
Some of us came, my dear, but we were turned away.
Your slave came every day.
How quick are the pains?
- They're not stopping.
- Here.
Take a sip of this.
I wager you won't refuse my cider this time.
Rvd. Dimmesdale tried always to get you freed.
- Another?
- Yes.
All right, breathe deep.
Breathe deep.
Hold on to me!
Good girl!
Easy, easy.
Let me see.
All's well. All's well.
It's close.
It's very close.
Come, my dear. It's time.
Up you sit.
Good girl. There.
Move down a little.
Good.
This child is ready to be born.
We've work to do!
There.
How could they keep me here so long?
Well, I'll say this, you must have a will of iron.
When you take on the men, it leads to death.
All right, my dear.
Chin down and bear down hard!
More and harder!
Harder! Good!
Good girl. That's it.
Easy.
Easy.
Good. Easy.
Are you sure
God's not punishing me?
To be sure he's punishing you.
He be giving you a child!.
Now. Gently.
Now the head is coming.
The head is through.
Just a little more.
Easy.
Easy. Easy.
She'd here!
Oh, thank you, God!
Yes!
Little Pearl.
Yes!
Yes!
Harriet, she's here!
She's here.
Sit there, Mistress.
Proceed, Reverend.
I'll have them fetch fresh clothes for you and the babe.
I bring good news.
I've prevailed upon the Governor.
You are to be freed.
But by law... you'll be brought to the scaffold for reprimand.
Hester.
Whatever is said, please, be as contrite as your conscience permits.
If not for my sake, for the babe's.
I beg you, don't anger them further!
I've come to baptize the babe.
I've died not seeing you.
I came every day.
I baptize this child,
Pearl.
Pearl.
In the name of the Father, and the son, and the Holy Ghost.
May the Lord bless thee, and care for thee, and watch over thee.
Amen.
Freeing this woman is an invitation to every wife to defy her husband.
Every child it's parent!
No, she should be released.
What?
You don't put her in prison, you put the prison in her.
So each time someone sees her, her sin will be marked into her soul afresh.
Cunningly contrived, my dear.
Make way in the King's name.
A blessing on the righteous
Colony of Massachusetts, where iniquity is dragged into the sunlight!
Know ye that Mistress Roger Prynne has been ordered to bear punishment for fornication and adultery.
If it be determined later that her husband be still alive, she may face a most severe penalty, which is to be hanged by the neck until dead.
Pray, silence, for his Excellency, the Governor.
Hester Prynne, though you show no modesty in you apparel, yet you have a chance, still, to repent your sins.
Yes, Hester, repent!
Child, don't you believe you have sinned?
I believe I have sinned in your eyes, but who is to know if God shares your views?
Woman, transgress not the limits of Heaven's mercy!
Reverend Dimmesdale, you are her pastor.
Speak to her for all our sakes!
Soften her, her hardness her obstinacy!
Listen to the Reverend!
Speak to the woman, my brother.
Exalt her to confess the truth!
Hester Prynne, you hear what these good men say, and see the accountablity under which I labor.
For your soul's peace,
I charge thee speak out the name of your fellow sinner.
Be not silent for some mistaken pity or tenderness for him.
For believe me, if he could step down and stand beside you on your pedestal of shame, it would be better than to carry a guilty heart through life.
What can your silence do for him, except to tempt him?
And compel him to add hypocrisy to sin?
Speak.
She will not speak.
In the name of the Lord, name him!
Name him!
- His name!
- What is his name?
Who might he be?
Very well.
Beadle!
Mistress, if you do not speak out his name, wear upon your bodice this symbol of your sinful fornication.
Heed not this final warning, and you will be a pariah, cut off, shunned and reviled by every man, woman and child in this town!
Why do you wait?
Put it on!
It is not a badge of my shame, but your own!
What do you want?
Have I changed so much, my beloved, that you would slay me as I resurrect myself from the dead?
Roger?
Hester.
Was I ever unkind to you?
Did I not love thee?
Did I not see thee above all womanhood?
Are you not bound to me by sacred oath?
Or has this new land turned thee into a heathen?
Lay our bed will thou, wife.
Pray for thy sins, Hester Prynne.
Beg the Lord to forgive thy corruption.
Pray and I'll wash thee as white as snow.
White as snow, my love.
White as snow.
White as snow.
Arthur?
Hester?
Thank God you're here!
- Why are you taking this risk?
- I had to warn you.
My husband is alive.
Dear God!
Alive?
Now we'll hang for certain.
Why would he show up at this moment if he wasn't God's dark messenger, sent to punish us.
Arthur, you must leave without us.
I cannot bear to see you trapped here, under his watchful eye forever.
Hester, I must stay and watch over you and Pearl.
No. You don't know him.
He'll wait for us to betray each other with the slightest glance or the merest gesture.
Please. You must go!
This God's punishment, because we tried to run from His Will.
I will not say farewell, Hester.
Pray God watch over you.
And so will I.
Kiss Pearl for me each night.
'Tis easy to see the mother's part in her.
Is it beyond research, I wonder, to analyze her nature, and from it's make and mold, give a shrewd guess as to the father?
What are your expectations?
I do not expect your heart to return to you quickly.
But I hope one day you will draw me again into your heart.
Love has forced me to open my heart to another.
Watch your tongue, woman!
'Tis this phantom lover who puts these words into your mouth!
Where is he?
Is his kiss still wet on your lips, on your breast?
- I demand to know!
- If I spent 6 months in a cold jail, and did not tell these iron men, what makes you think
I'll tell you now?
These trials have made me strong!
And I am not the child you married!
Why not announce yourself openly and cast me off at once.
No, no.
I seek no vengeance against you.
But the man lives who wronged us both.
He bears no letter of infamy wrought into his garment.
But I shall read it on his heart.
Breathe one word to him of my true identity, and you will both hang.
If you try to escape, you will be easily found.
Easily!
From the savages
I have learned patience,
Hester Prynne.
Goody Gotwick, thank you.
Reverend, allow me to introduce our newest boarder,
Doctor Chilling...
- Chillingworth.
- Chillingworth.
Good day, man.
Good day, sir.
What brings you to our colony, sir?
I'm a physician, sir.
I would cleanse the ills of the community.
Have I said something strange?
No.
I'm amazed.
We have prayed for a skilled physician.
I see you are translating the Bible into Algonquin.
A most difficult tongue to master.
If I can be of help, Reverend.
I am fluent in Algonquin.
- Fluent?
- Yes.
I was a prisoner of the Tarrantine.
When I spoke improperly,
I was whipped.
I learned quite rapidly.
How were you captured?
I was working my farm in Virginia.
They came, killed my wife, Eleanor,
God rest her soul, and our infant son, and sold me into captivity.
It's a wonder you're not consumed with bitterness and despair.
No, no. In truth,
I am indebted to the Indians.
Some say they are savages, but true savagery,
I find resides elsewhere.
Mistress Roger Prynne.
Mistress Prynne.
And what is your duty, boy?
Follow you around, Mistress.
Well, at least they'll make a path for me.
Whore!
God will punish you, sinner!
Jezebel!
You're not welcome here!
Be gone, Hester Prynne!
Soap, please. Three pieces.
Although he wore no outward symbol of his shame, my father wore his own scarlet letter on the bosom of his soul.
The pain of their separation must have affected us all.
I was a troublesome child.
My father ached for my mother, and filled his loneliness in the wilds with Johnny.
They struggled to keep alive their dream of building a bridge between English and Indian.
Johnny, why are they so close to town?
They say our people have fallen asleep.
So they must remain awake for all of us.
I'm worried.
Is war coming?
The great experiment is not working, is it?
Yes, he's right.
If there's war, what is to stop our praying Indians from rising up and slitting our throats as we sleep?
Faith, Thomas. Faith.
I know what will stop them.
Arthur's friendship with Johnny Sassamon.
Johnny would never betray Arthur.
He worships him.
As Peter worshipped
Jesus.
Gentlemen.
Doctor.
If there's a true war,
God help us all. for neither we nor the savaged will survive it.
I see the governor appreciates the signs less than yee, his Godly advisors.
It is not always easy.
Strangely, the same thing happened in Virginia.
Before the attack, there were signs that went unheeded.
What manner of signs?
The bad winter.
The crop failures.
Far too many Quakers and foreigners in the town.
Some minor elements of witchcraft, etc.
Exactly!
Our first sign was that of Hester Prynne and her women's meetings.
Then the severe winter.
The failed crops.
You see, sir, my colleague has feared from the start, that in the matter of
Mistress Prynne, witchcraft was involved.
Then why in all this time have you not taken measures to cleanse your colony?
What measures do you speak of?
Did you examine the women present at those meetings?
Have you queried the midwife, or inspected the child for the witch's marks?
I shall fear no evil.
I prepare us a table in the presence of thine enemy.
My cup runneth over.
Surely goodness and mercy shall follow me.
I will dwell in the house of the Lord.
The babe's clean, at present.
Hester, we shall leave your child with you for the present, but you must assure us it will be raised a Christian.
Yes, yes.
Yes.
I've been your friend today.
But it cannot always be so.
No.
For inside me I grow more wretched by the day.
I yearn so much for thee.
I fear I might destroy her whole world to win her back.
Tell old Harriet what's troubling you.
I never imagined how cruel and cunning their punishment could be.
Stonehally Cheever stop to preach at me in the street.
The people pointing and shouting.
Even the children.
And that horrible drummer boy following me everywhere.
Perhaps it was all for naught.
I wonder if to be a woman is worthwhile at all.
Even for the happiest of women.
Courage, child.
Take heart. At least you've known what it is to love.
But what if I've repaid it by destroying him?
What if everything I believed so strongly was a lie?
Vain and selfish.
Prynne's cruel punishments were succeeding.
The seasons ran their course.
The distance between them was impassable.
My mother took the terrible risk of writing to my father, reminding to keep their love and his silence.
The subtle but constant presence of Prynne was a torment that threatened my father's very soul.
As for Prynne, his lust for revenge fed on itself so that he hungered for more.
Good morrow, Mituba.
What a pleasant day for a ride.
Poor Mituba.
You're renowned for your loyalty to your Mistress, and I see why.
Was your dry lunch a communication from her lover?
I have the power to arrest you as an accomplice to adultery and bring you before the magistrates for questioning.
And since you are a slave, they might whip you to death.
Easy. Easy.
I only want to help the one we both love.
To free herself from the grasp of a fiend.
Dear Lord, this is it!
He made you strip naked before him!
Totally naked!
Was there a presence in the room?
Now think! Think!
He might have come in one of his many disguises.
Did he come as a bird?
Oh, God. I feel the presence of Lucifer!
Save yourself before it's too late!
Gentlemen, please!
Enough!
Enough!
Go home, Mituba.
You've been a wondrous help.
Commend us to your Mistress.
Go home.
Go home.
So there is a malignancy to be cut out here.
But what kind of witness will a slave be in court?
The bird, obviously, is Harriet Hibbons.
What is it, Pearl?
- Forgive me, Hester.
- Harriet.
Yours was the first place
I thought of to hide.
What is it?
They've, they've, they've ah... broken into my house.
They're looking for me in the woods.
I've been named as a witch!
In the name of God!
Halt there!
Yes, sir!
What's the meaning of this intrusion?
Stand aside, woman!
We know the witch is in here.
There's no one inside but me, my child and Mituba.
So unless you have a warrant, be gone.
Reverend Dimmesdale.
What's happening, major?
We've cornered ourselves a witch.
Here in Hester Prynne's cottage.
If there's a witch inside the house, major,
I'll find her.
Right.
One man at the door.
- Soldier!
- Sir?
Pearl's grown tall.
She's an elf.
Willful.
Dear God, Hester.
It's been so long.
You'r thin.
Are you hiding someone, Hester?
Why do you...?
Why are you risking further anger from the elders?
Because she is no witch!
She's committed no crime beyond speaking her mind!
If she is innocent,
I assure you no harm will befall her.
Arthur. After all that has happened, how can you still trust these iron men?
Don't you see what's happening?
Last month they brought
Sally Short for questioning.
They held her for 2 days.
Last week it was Mary Rollins.
They just questioned them!
What's the crime in that?
The crime is they had nothing!
Don't you see this is some malevolence?
- What has become of you?
- God, woman!
What are your demands?
I've given up everything I own sacred!
I'm in Hell!
In the eye of your husband, who lurks at my side day and night.
In the eye of all who come to me to unburden their soul!
I'm a pollution!
I'm a lie!
They are the pollution!
They are the lie!
But you allow them to destroy all that is good in you!
What's happened to the man I love?
Does he not still live inside thee?
Our love, woman, was a folly.
And the voice we heard, we have been punished for listening to!
What have I become?
To betray the only person on earth who had shown her kindness.
What could feel worse than that?
Mituba?
Poor, mute Mituba.
When Prynne summoned her, she wanted only to undo the harm she'd caused her Mistress.
Peace in this House!
Peace, I say. Peace!
You find these proceedings humorous, Mistress?
Do you expect me to take them seriously?
You're a bunch of grown men poking around my private parts looking for witch's marks!
The slave, Mituba...
Peace, I say. Peace!
The witness, the slave Mituba, has been found dead.
I told you she was a witch!
- Mistress Hibbons is a witch!
- She's a witch!
Witch!
Have you lost all reason?
There's no witchcraft here!
This is murder!
Guards, restrain this woman!
Satan is not at work here among the women!
But if he's here, perhaps he is at work among you men!
Here Satan speaks!
Governor?
I have evidence to render.
As you know,
Mistress Hibbons midwifed
Mistress Prynne's baby Pearl.
Sweet Pearl.
Bastard!
No!
Pearl.
I wish you were my girl.
Poor fatherless child.
Would you like to learn a game?
Yes. Now do what I do.
If I pinch my nose.
You too.
Very good, very good.
Now, pull up my shirt and show my tummy tum-tum.
Now show me your tummy tum-tum.
Pull up your shirt.
Behold the witch's mark!
Behold the devil's own child!
The devil's own child!
The devil's own child!
This woman is innocent!
Innocent? Since you first spoke of this woman, all we've dreames and toiled for in God's name has been threatened!
I've heard enough!
Have you listened?
Factions! Arguments!
Dissent!
That is the work of Satan!
The town was in an uproar.
My father risked one last meeting with my mother, convinced that if they were to hang
Harriet, it would not be long before my mother and I would be seized... and hung.
I had to speak out.
I couldn't stop myself.
Damn your husband!
You and Pearl must go in hiding.
Tonight.
I cannot.
I cannot run.
What are you saying?
Forgive me.
Whatever happens, promise me you'll look after Pearl.
God, woman, how much further must you take this?
As far as my strength will take me.
If Harriet is to hang,
I must hang with her.
I'll ask the other women to stand with us.
They can't hang us all.
Hester, are we ever to know a life together?
I love thee.
I love thee and always will.
I will always love thee.
Lord God, we stood before thee naked once, and now we stand before thee naked again, as a family.
God! Thou has given me this as a gift, and I will not give it up!
Not while I have the strength.
Arthur?
Arthur?
Arthur?
Evening Mistress Prynne.
Expecting someone else?
Ah, no.
Didn't you call out for Arthur?
The only Arthur I know is...
Dimmesdale.
You misunderstood me,
I didn't say...
I should have guessed long ago.
You naughty girl.
So you fucked our minister.
God, I'm about to savour a priceless morsel!
Up we go!
Did he suck your breasts?
Did he lick you?
Where did he lick you?
Show me!
How I wanted to put it in you!
This is to make you pay for my fantasies.
While you were torturing me, you were giving it to another.
Damned witch!
Get out!
Do up your britches and get out!
Bastard! Get out of here!
How I will enjoy watching you and the pastor hang!
Open up, doctor!
There are matters between us we must discus immediately.
So, Arthur Dimmesdale.
At last justice is done!
Ha sido asesinado!
Call out the militia!
Call out the guards!
It's a sign!
The Lord has sent us a sign!
We have strayed!
See how he punishes us!
It's Brewster.
Those savages have killed him!
My son! My son!
Damned heathens!
Lock up the praying Indians, before they murder us in our beds!
Get the praying Indians!
Praying Indians into the compound!
We are loyal to you!
We are loyal to you!
By order of the Governor of the
Massachusetts Bay Colony, you are under arrest for the crime of heresy.
Stop this. It was one of us who killed Brewster.
I have proof.
Bastard!
Johnny, run to Metacomet's place by the river.
Tell him to come and save his people. Run, man!
Here come the witches!
Open the cell.
- Never mind the child.
- Pearl!
- Get in, woman!
- Pearl?
Worry not, Mistress.
I'll see she's raised up to fear the Lord.
Open up, murderer!
There is no witchcraft here!
If we hang these women, then what have we become?
Who are we to condemn on God's behalf?
I love this woman.
I am the father of her child.
And in God's eyes,
I am her husband.
If you must hang someone, to appease your anger and fear, then hang me.
Hang him!
Hang him!
Hang him!
Hang him!
Bastards!
Hester!
Where's my daughter, Pearl?
She's in the meeting house!
You are free, my people.
Go back to Metacomet!
Go back to the forest!
Bellingham will do anything to conceal this madness from England.
He has sworn to me that he will remove the letter.
And make thee a public apology.
How close they are, love and hate.
We're no less bound by one than the other.
Rest in peace, Roger Prynne.
This letter has served a purpose.
Though not the one they had intended.
So why would I stay here?
To be accepted by them?
To be tamed by them?
- There is no perfect world.
- No, not perfect.
But we came here to make a new one.
And for Pearl's sake,
I must do just that.
Hester.
Hester!
Look at me.
If I look at you,
I won't be able to leave
Then leave.
Brave the wilds!
But Hester,
I'm not letting you go without me.
They're watching us.
In the faraway Carolinas, they were at last to find a measure of the happiness that hade been denied them for so long.
My father died before
I reached my teens.
Some say that was a punishment.
My mother never remarried nor loved another.
Some say that was a punishment.
As for me,
I do not see it that way.
My parents shared a love like no other.
I know the spirit of that love lives within me.
And will live within my children forever.
Who is to say what is a sin in God's eyes?
Apointed finger... 
drapery... 
a raised hand... 
a leg which is not a leg, 
but an arm... 
a confused ballet
of gigantic bodies... 
the sweeping movement
of the limbs... 
You should hang your head in shame.
She is without a doubt... the daughter of a painter.
Such behavior... could compromise future commissions from the Church.
The Cardinal would never be influenced in his aesthetic judgments... by a woman.
Even a saintly woman, like you.
You have much to learn, but not here.
Raise the candles.
They're all wrong.
Move, Artemisia.
Like this, Master?
Yes, that's fe.
Saint Cecilia, look up!
Look at Marco.
Marco, where's that angelic smile of yours?
Just a little longer.
It's almost over.
You scared me, Fulvio!
- Some sea treasures for you.
- Get away!
All the colors you like.
There's red, silver.
There's blue and green!
Remember our marriage by the sea?
Your breasts are growing!
Fulvio!
Shield in the left hand, sword in the right.
That's fe.
Now get undressed.
Draw the curtain for Artemisia.
I'll never get anywhere if I can't paint naked men.
Artemisia.
It's the Papal Father, not your father... who forbids women to paint male anatomy.
- I'm forbidden half of art!
- You want to go to jail?
Or send your father there?
Lower the sword. Lower it!
You're killing a lion.
We don't have one, so pretend.
Roberto, prepare my pigments.
Artemisia, what are you doing?
Stop!
Finish your painting by yourself.
Painting is hardly a suitable activity for a woman... but my son insisted.
I have agreed to let Artemisia do his portrait.
Artemisia will be very honored.
Won't you?
And what better way to get acquainted?
If my husband agrees... the payment will be part of her dowry.
Can he pose naked for me?
Excuse her. She doesn't know what she's saying.
She's become very diffult... since her mother died.
I told you about painters!
If I let you kiss me... could I then ask a favor of you?
If you like.
Kiss me then.
Undress.
Take off your pants.
Everything. That too.
That white thing... breaks the flow of your body.
This is only for drawing?
Look how the back muscle... crosses your side... and joins your thigh muscles.
It's less visible in girls.
- Really?
- Yes.
Show me.
Don't move. Let me do this.
These are the studios.
No, that's something else.
Here it is.
You've outdone yourself.
Very impressive.
It's vivid... forceful.
It's superb.
Your sense of color is unrivaled,
Gentileschi.
I am honored.
I'm surprised that you chose silver for the armor.
I posed in gold armor.
But this portrait is ideal... and timeless and perfectly balanced in terms of color.
Moreover, the silver sets off your true stature.
It makes you seem taller.
I seem to remember having suggested the change myself.
Undoubtedly. Your advice was always helpful to my work.
Deliver it to me by Friday.
I'm having a party and I want the portrait there.
Remember to replace the silver with gold.
For him, color means matching his stockings and breeches!
He doesn't know what color is!
For whom do we work, my child?
I paint for myself.
I paint for those who buy my paintings.
There's more at stake than talent.
Under his hideous gold paint... is our silver, our magnifent silver.
He's painting outdoors.
Doesn't he have a studio?
To the right!
Perfect. That's fe.
He's painting the world.
He's outside, but he's looking out a window.
Hurry! We're not in Florence.
Paint dries faster.
He uses a white undercoat to bring out the light.
It's a simple technique.
Batiste!
That's enough for today.
Let's pack up.
Aaron, get the boats.
Fisherman, come help us.
This green, Master?
Very nice.
What is she doing out there?
- She's drawing.
- Drawing what?
Why draw in a fld, like a peasant?
It's the latest fashion in Florence, or so she says.
Tassi must have arrived.
I'll send him a note to welcome him.
We have to be very friendly with him.
He reproduced... every crease... every wrinkle.
A Biblical character... with wrinkles and defects doesn't please everyone.
Caravaggio has had problems because of that.
He shows us a beheading... as if it were like slicing bread.
Quiet. We say too much in front of paintings.
You should be grateful that he makes us want to surpass him.
I think she's a prodigy.
She betters all the others in my studio.
The Academy does not accept girls.
I said she paints like a man.
Lost your way, cutie?
What brings you here?
Waiting for your boyfriend?
No recommendation is higher than that... of Orazio Gentileschi, but...
Let me introduce myself.
Orazio Gentileschi.
I know your work, sir.
And I admire it.
Yes, I know you too.
And if you're a student here, it's thanks... to these.
Make sure you don't lose them!
Look what he's doing.
I want to adjust the light!
She wants to be able to raise and lower it.
Knot them so I can undo them from inside.
He'll never allow this.
Put that there.
The rack goes there.
He'll make you take it all down.
A vigorous consistency
of flesh and blood. 
A whiteness which opens out
to the limits... 
where its fragility vanishes. 
Too skinny!
I've prepared full-scale drawings.
We don't need models.
Gentileschi, you know the central composition is mine.
The Pope put me in charge of the project.
I was chosen for it fst.
Are we talking about the past or the future?
We'll do an excellent job, Orazio.
Tassi and Gentileschi will be considered great artists.
And only the greatest of connoisseurs will recognize... that Tassi was a little greater than Gentileschi.
Tassi and Gentileschi?
I think I'll survive this collaboration.
Come to the bordello.
We'll get a girl and share the work, like here.
Her knickers.
Painting signs by day and sinning by night!
I'll leave the night work to you.
- He stole my angels.
- I know.
I was supposed to do the angels and two saints.
What can I do?
He steals your work from under your nose!
We're lucky we didn't lose the entire commission for the frescoes.
Tassi has powerful friends in the Church.
They say he's a master of perspective.
Maybe we'll learn something from him.
We mustn't lag behind the latest innovations.
See if he can do the nave and leave the vaults for us.
He's too long.
It looks ridiculous.
It's deliberate.
High up on the wall of the church... it will look normal.
Look.
Look from here.
It seems less long.
It must be like when you look between your legs.
It's smaller than when you see it in a mirror.
I don't spend my days in front of mirrors.
What would you know?
Aren't you a virgin?
Agostino, look.
I'm looking for Mr. Gentileschi.
He's not here.
You'd make a good model... but I'd have to see you up close.
Aren't frescoes made to be seen from this distance?
True!
Don't tire yourself.
I pose only for myself.
A girl who paints?
What courage, to try painting yourself.
But it's a lost cause!
Who is talented enough to render such beauty?
Tell Mr. Gentileschi
I fished his drawings.
And who are you?
His daughter.
As long as the Pope trusts me...
God Himself will be your client.
Don't worry.
Get your master!
I thought you were a pupil.
That's no way to treat people!
First I mistook you for a model... now for a boy.
And also perhaps... for a ghost at my window.
I'll forgive you if you forgive me.
Show me one of your paintings, chameleon child.
Come to my studio.
Your studio?
- This is your father's work.
- It's mine.
My face painted by me.
There you are.
Artemisia has lured you into her web.
- He asked to see my work.
- He's a gentleman.
Shall we dine?
Take me as your pupil!
You must!
My father has taught me all he can.
The Academy won't take me.
The Academy didn't see these...
I suppose.
Nor has your father.
You chose to share your secrets with me?
Should I be your professor or confessor?
One Gentileschi is hard enough.
No, I will not and I cannot.
I'll surpass you one day.
You'll come and ask to be my pupil.
What did you say to Tassi?
He said you provoked him.
I told him the truth.
That I'm a good enough painter to be his pupil.
You have to be nice to him.
Now that I've persuaded him to take you as a pupil.
- Where are you going?
- To my lesson!
Wait until tomorrow, Misia.
- I'll go with her.
- No, Marisa can.
You'll mind the house while I work at the church.
Greet our guest with words of welcome.
Come in. They're harmless.
You've come with an assistant.
Am I supposed to open a school?
I can't paint with you watching.
Take your material.
We'll try something else.
What do you see there?
A ship.
A ship. What else?
Ships don't inspire me much.
Try. Make an effort.
I can't draw outdoors.
Without characters, it's like drawing a void.
- A void?
- Yes.
Look at things in a new way.
I'm not used to so much light.
Start over.
Don't keep doing what you know.
Start over.
Enough for today.
Who's that charming thing?
- You must have braved heaven and hell.
- Hell suffed.
- You fled without saying good-bye.
- There was no need.
What I needed to say was this:
Go away!
Let me stay with you.
- I don't love you.
- I can accept that.
Pass me off as your sister.
My dear, sweet sister.
This is Costanza... my sister.
Take good care of her.
Give her the love a brother can't give.
More earth, less sky.
Good.
You cut the world in pieces?
You've always painted your subjects from up close.
But the world is vast.
Relations between things are more complex.
The frame gives order to our vision of the landscape.
Cutting up the canvas like this... gives us the exact relations.
Look how many faraway things... are contained in the squares above... and how few things are in those below.
All I see is land and water.
You're not looking.
Close your eyes.
I'm to learn painting with my eyes shut?
- You're some teacher!
- Close your eyes.
Trust me.
The earth invades the composition.
It occupies... almost all of the center.
It pushes the sky up to the upper two-thirds.
On the horizon... the earth circumscribes the water.
It holds it back.
The water itself is... deep green in the distance, bluer near us.
And the sun.
The sun dances on the water, forming a mirrored path... which comes to meet us wherever we are.
Open your eyes now.
Yes, the water is changing color.
And the sun is a mirrored path coming towards us. It's true!
Well... now... we can add your characters, if you insist.
Who?
I can see the sun!
How's that?
Why don't you ask her?
What's wrong?
I want to work on color.
I can't teach you color.
Why not?
I'm willing to learn!
You know as much as I.
It was mean not to have told me before.
Do I stay like this?
Yes, that's just fe.
How do you capture such physicality without knowing... what the body is capable of?
I never said I didn't know.
Who was the model for your nudes?
Would you pose for me?
I don't mean naked.
Marisa!
Find something to clean.
Go sweep the beach!
Lie down.
Let your head hang off the side.
Now lift your hands to push Judith away.
Pretend you're fhting me off.
It's time to go.
Calm down.
Let yourself go.
I'm hurt.
I'm sorry, Artemisia.
I didn't know.
I thought...
You've taken over my mind like no one before.
I love you.
We have to go.
Yes, madame! Here I am!
Misia, I need you.
Yes, Father. I'm coming.
The exalted lover... 
held the young woman against him. 
He entered her and embraced her... 
in the confused mixture
of forms and dreams. 
Such faraway material... 
so miraculously near now. 
Batiste... your master is a great artist.
I'm very happy I like his work.
It saves me from having to lie.
I have some new drawings for you.
You'll like them.
You have to keep them coming.
These images lose their power quickly, unlike art.
He's found "art" with the Gentileschi girl.
Her power doesn't seem to wear off.
She's the reason
Agostino won't see me.
I don't intend to beg for his respect.
- See you tomorrow?
- What if my father...
He'll fd it strange if you don't come. Tomorrow.
Do they mention the shared commission with Tassi?
I wanted to tell you...
Has this made me lose face in Rome?
It's in the past.
It's almost forgotten.
But some people claim... that you're sharing more than the frescoes.
That's untrue.
I don't share in his depravity!
They say that Artemisia...
He's her teacher and she's never painted better.
But she works only for my studio, not for his.
They refer to more concrete things between them.
Dirty gossip.
They're jealous of a girl... who has the talent of a man.
Besides, she has a chaperon, and he's an honest man.
Don't listen to that nonsense.
I'm thrilled to hear it.
I brought the pigment you asked for.
Who says such things?
Our Florentine friend... what did he teach you today?
Perspective.
Lines converge towards the horizon, like this.
You're tanned.
We were outside, painting the horizon.
And you stayed in the shade?
I was under the parasol.
It protects the canvases.
Batiste... your master isn't coming?
He doesn't tell us everything.
You're going?
But the plaster will dry!
I didn't tell.
Father?
He's gone.
Gone?
He says I'll go to jail for helping Agostino!
Promise me you didn't touch my daughter.
Promise me!
Answer! Answer me!
I trusted you.
Tell me you didn't betray me.
You're my friend.
Agostino, tell me!
Why won't you answer, Tassi?
If you stole her from me, you have to keep her and marry her.
The only way to save her is to marry her.
You have to marry her!
You hear me?
You can't do this to me!
Coward!
What have you done?
You let that man seduce you.
- I trusted you!
- I love him!
- And he loves me!
- He raped you!
No, he gave me pleasure.
- Stop! Shut up!
- Leave her alone!
Talk to her! I can't.
If you tell them he raped you, he'll have to marry you.
Tell them? Tell who?
Don't tell me what to do.
Sleeping with my father won't make you my mother.
You...
You only want one thing.
Everything for yourself.
Me and the frescoes!
A child of 15! His pupil!
Not 15! 17!
Was she born in 1593 or 1595?
It's my money he wants!
My commission for himself.
He's driven by jealousy!
I ask only that amends be made for damage done... to an honorable name and to my daughter's reputation.
Ask Artemisia if I ever hurt her!
I love Artemisia. I love her.
And I've done her no harm.
Then why not marry her?
You'd have your beloved... and a dowry from Orazio Gentileschi.
Don't sell me like that!
I'm a virgin.
I have no reason to be here.
Where is the crime then?
Help me to protect you.
I've done all this for you.
So?
She lost it a while ago.
How many times?
Anyway, she's no longer a virgin.
Far from it.
Mr. Gentileschi, all you've proved up to now... is that your daughter is a liar.
Why are you here?
My poor child, the man you love has been evil since he was a child.
Take your seat.
You may speak.
I've come alone from Florence... to say things which, till now,
I've only said to God.
My brother is a wicked person... who must be stopped.
Continue.
I've come to spare Gentileschi and his daughter.
My brother has a wife in Florence.
A legal wife?
She left me of her own free will three years ago.
He shamed her by having relations with her younger sister.
Slander!
You ran away, but we remember in Florence.
Next witness.
Artemisia.
This is slander, Artemisia!
It was never proved.
Quiet!
And you protect him.
Artemisia, never!
- A liar.
- All this for you.
The young painter girl.
You need a defense.
I won't let you spoil your life.
Nothing will stop Orazio.
Your sister revealed your misbehavior in Florence.
Your sentence may be severe.
My friend... here you are in prison.
Meanwhile, she is free... to see whomever she wants.
She's not worth it.
I can't bear to see you in jail for her.
I'll say nothing against her.
We'll save him anyway.
Is there a window in your cell?
Tell me what you see from it.
Two hills.
One runs into the other.
On one side... near the hill that's farther away...
I can see a tree.
Our eyes follow its branches up to the sky.
Early in the afternoon... its dark green shadow... almost reaches a rock formation...
strikingly white... 
a white too pure
ever to be painted. 
It would seem to spurt
from the canvas. 
In the evening... 
when the light begins to fade... 
my hills become greenish-gray... 
and lose their depth... 
like paper cutouts. 
You hurt me.
You lied to me.
I lied in order to keep you.
I'd do anything to keep you.
Orazio is the cause of our problems.
He never lied to me.
And your past is not his doing.
If only I could erase it all.
You're part of me now.
That cannot be erased.
I love you.
Legs spread, muscles taut. 
Twisted faces upside down. 
An arm stretches out. 
A fist is raised. 
A round breast
escapes from a corset. 
A sword strikes... 
cutting with all its edge. 
An eye stares. 
And the color red... 
erupts onto the canvas. 
Here are 20 drawings by Artemisia.
All of them depict male genitalia.
Ladies, avert your eyes.
Souvenirs, perhaps, of 20 lovers.
In any case... proof of her knowledge of the things of flesh.
And a violation of divine law!
I did those drawings of the human body!
The human body which God gave us!
He's lying!
It's not the work of a painter, but of a woman.
Look.
Artemisia!
She says she is virtuous... and this is what she produces.
Artemisia sees herself as a "Judith."
A criminal.
A traitor.
And Agostino... as the victim of her scheming.
Artemisia and Agostino.
Who is the victim of whom?
Agostino... will you stand up and defend yourself... before it's too late?
Wake up.
Show them into my offe.
I'll settle this.
Let me go!
Tie her hands.
The truth.
We will know the truth that God alone knows.
Hands together, as if for prayer.
Pretend.
You're no stranger to that.
Did Agostino Tassi rape you?
I love only you.
Tighter.
Stop.
- She's suffered enough!
- I'll tear the truth out!
I raped the virgin, Artemisia.
I took her by force... and did it repeatedly, promising to marry her.
Punish me.
She doesn't deserve this!
Untie her hands.
What did I do?
Tassi of Florence... 
I declare you guilty of rape. 
I sentence you to two years in jail. 
Artemisia, please.
We still have work to do together.
Should I help you fish the frescoes... or paint over his?
Don't worry about me, Father.
You gave me something no one can take away.
You taught me to paint.
No, I gave you the suffering you put into your paintings, not the talent.
You made things easier for me.
You blocked the paths that might have diverted me from painting... had I remained a respectable woman.
You've done a magnifent painting, a powerful one.
We say too much in front of paintings.
Take it down.
Excuse me?
Take all this down!
Now, I have to forget her face.
Your father wanted to save you.
If you leave, it will kill him.
No one dies of sorrow.
That's one thing I've learned.
You know I have to leave.
He knows it too.
Two hills. 
Two hills running into each other. 
Nearby, a single tree. 
Our eyes follow it
up to the sky. 
In the afternoon... 
its dark green shadow... 
almost reaches a rock formation... 
whiter than anything. 
Too white to be painted... 
for it would seem
to spurt from the canvas. 
It is late summer of 1942.
World War II is in its fourth year.
Hitler's troops have occupied almost whole Europe and parts of Northern Africa.
They're in the middle of the second big summer offensive against Russia.
Their objective: the Caspian Sea and the Caucasian oil fields.
The 6th Army of General Paulus is quickly approaching that city near river Wolga, ...
...where the bloodiest battle of the century will take place:
Stalingrad.
Hearts are trump.
Yes, sir, Lieutenant.
Onward and upward.
This stuff's lukewarm.
Tastes like piss.
- You're gonna broil in the sun.
- Butter for the fish...
- That's enough, Lupo.
- Have a seat.
Excuse me, Lieutenant.
No, you need spades, not hearts.
Play a spade.
Onward and upward, Rollo.
Can I dry you off?
- And this is mine.
- No, no, no. - Why not?
- Who won the trick?
- I did.
Fritz, when are you going to throw that camel piss away?
It's a going-away present.
For ten marks...
I could get you a bottle.
For ten marks
I'd buy a palm tree... and plant it on your head.
Whatever, you always get the best cards... and I'm horny as hell.
I told you to leave him at the hospital, but no...
Oh, God, sometimes I think... the Tommies smashed your head instead of his.
It's his last day.
Let him play.
His wife's sure in for a surprise.
Lupo!
The doctor said he shouldn't drink anything.
He's gonna have a headache anyway.
Good Italian wine.
- What time is it?
- A little after 1:00.
We can still find a whore.
No, Lieutenant?
Just look at all the women here.
What about your wife's birthday present?
That won't take long.
Battle formation. Hey, comrades, help me with the Lieutenant.
Another formation.
This is getting old.
That's my bottle. Look out!
Be careful.
Good Italian wine...
I can't see.
What kind of shit watch did you buy?
Waterproof to 30 meters.
You still gotta wind it, stupid.
We'll take him like this.
You get the chair.
We'll take him like this.
Who's got my jacket?
Just like moving men...
- My jacket.
- Where's Rollo's jacket?
Be careful!
Men.
The Fhrer commends you... for your fighting in the African Campaign.
You played a large part in driving the English... back to the Nile.
Crucial to the campaign were the storm troopers.
You were chosen because you're the best.
Never forget that.
New missions await you.
But before you will form the core of a new elite company...
I am awarding you with a medal from the Fhrer... for your important role... in the heavy and glorious combat at El Alamein.
Men, this is the new leader... for the first platoon, second company.
Lieutenant von Witzland, step forward.
Those to be decorated... step forward!
Battalion, attention!
Right!
Lieutenant von Witzland, decorate your men!
Why were you late, Corporal?
Hospital visit to your predecessor, sir.
Heroes aren't late, Corporal.
Remember that.
Sergeant... do you intend to accept the Fhrer's award... with your collar open?
Yes, sir, Lieutenant.
The award is revoked.
Battalion, at ease!
Dismissed!
Storm troopers, be ready to move out in a half hour.
Battalion dismissed!
Don't leave me, men, don't leave me!
Take me with you.
Let's go. Move along.
Viola!
Good-bye, my love.
What's up, Fritz?
You in love?
When's the wedding?
Dearest Clara...
Russia.
Two thousand kilometers separate us.
The distance is frightening.
I won't hear from you again for quite a while.
You should still write... but it will take your letters a long time to arrive.
Will it be hard for you?
I know if you had your choice,
I'd be sitting... on a leather chair in your father's office... instead of on a bunk in a freight car.
Please forgive me and try to understand my happiness.
The uncertainty of the last few months has vanished.
All of a sudden, my life has meaning, a goal.
Before, everything seemed unimportant... but as I get closer to the front, my melancholy lifts.
All the feelings
I felt unworthy of... especially my feelings for you, burn bright again.
You should see me... sitting surrounded by these stalwart men of ours.
My men.
I love them, because I know that only through hard work... will I earn their respect.
But if you saw them, their smell might make you faint.
Can't you count?
You gave him the ten.
Lupo was delirious, and he played better than you.
Everybody screws up at first.
Don't worry.
He can't handle my strategy, can you, Rollo?
Hey, those are mine!
Not anymore they're not.
Where's this crate headed, anyway?
How about Stalingrad, gentlemen?
Time to teach Ivan a lesson.
We'll take that city in three days. Cheers!
Do you always look that stupid?
If I didn't know better...
I'd swear we passed this same spot ten hours ago.
Russia's big, all right.
After the war, everybody will get what he wants.
I've already ordered 200 acres and 10 women.
Here?
Not if you paid me.
Then stay in your lousy little town.
Look!
They're already working for us.
Dig, men!
Faster!
- How do you say "faster"?
- "Davai."
"Davai" and "Ruki vyerkh" is all you gotta know.
Adolf's gonna build me a freeway.
All the way to Kirkov, or whatever you call it.
This big country's just aching for a fleet of trucks.
That's enough, Reiser.
I find it touching that our Lieutenant... is keeping us company.
Permission to ask a question, sir?
Go ahead.
This your first time to the front?
Everybody starts somewhere, right?
Should be fun.
Make a bet with you, sir.
I survive and you don't.
For what stakes?
From you, two cases of water.
All right.
And how's he supposed to pay if he's dead?
This is pretty.
And we're not even in Stalingrad yet.
You want me to carry you,
Russian pig?
Move it!
Get up, you Russian asshole.
Go, go, go!
What are you waiting for?
Stop it! Leave him alone.
Give him a chance to get up.
Captain...
I must protest about the behavior of your men.
You want to protest?
Tell the Fhrer.
Lieutenant, over here!
Lieutenant von Witzland.
Storm Troopers Battalion 336,
2nd Company, 1st Platoon.
Welcome to Stalingrad.
All the specialists are finally here.
Let me introduce
Sergeant Pflger, Battalion 179.
He just returned from Voronezh.
I'm glad you made it,
Lieutenant.
Now let's teach Ivan how to swim in the Volga.
- Cigarette?
- No, thanks. Captain...
I'd like to report an incident on the loading platform.
I've already heard.
It seems you like the Russians.
Forget it.
See that ammunition and hand grenades are issued.
Then officers' briefing.
Dismissed.
Your uncle, Colonel von Witzland, is a good friend.
He asked me to look out for you.
"God is with us."
These words are on every
German's belt buckle.
No shit. I never noticed.
There is no holier work... than defending
Western Christian values... against Eastern Bolshevism.
And that's what sets you apart from the Bolsheviks... who have no time for God.
You are never alone.
Even when deep in enemy territory.
Mller, go!
Yes, sir.
Mller, go!
Yes, sir.
This is crazy.
They're shooting their own men.
Damn artillery.
Get down!
He's not all there.
Quiet, boys. Follow my lead.
Men, our objective is that factory... at any cost.
We'll start with that machine gun nest on the right.
Whenever the artillery hits, the Russians hide.
See anything, sir?
It's suspicious.
Here, Captain.
We're at Frieda 20. Cease fire.
I repeat, cease fire.
Where are the five assault guns?
We see nothing, as usual.
As ordered, Major.
All clear to target two, Captain.
Fire only on my command and maintain silence.
Understood?
Let's go, men. Follow me!
Shit.
You klutz, Feldmann.
It's not my fault, Emigholz.
Now Ivan knows where we are.
I'm sorry.
Oh, shit!
Erwin!
It's no use, boys. He's gone.
Take cover!
He said they're better than ours.
They never jam.
Chin up.
Kill yourself some Russians with it.
Smoke 'em out.
Take cover!
Hit the foxholes!
Watch the gas tanks!
Keep moving, men.
We're getting closer.
Go, guys! Forward!
What's wrong?
You stuck? Move!
That way! Move it!
I can't! I can't go!
Get out of the hole.
Pull yourself together, stupid!
Let him go!
Get his dog tags and go!
If you don't come, I'm leaving.
I can't help you anymore.
Go ahead and die, then.
It's your fault.
Keep moving. Come on!
I told you so, idiot.
Follow me!
We can't make it, Captain.
It's impossible.
Nothing's impossible,
Lieutenant.
Find a smoke grenade.
Smoke grenade!
We got to take out that gun.
Fritz, smoke grenade!
He's right, sir.
We can't make it.
Now you can make up for your mistake.
You want your wife to be proud when you return, don't you?
- Let me go, Captain.
- No, I'll go.
I won't let you down, sir.
I know, Lieutenant.
We'll cover you.
Go!
Or else we'd never make it.
Feldmann owed us.
Come on, men! Let's show them!
Pflger, go left.
Witzland, go right.
We must take this factory.
Forward, men! Follow me!
Cover us.
Shoot anything that moves.
Let's go, Fritz.
Dieter.
I shot him.
Shoot already! Shoot me!
- Hands up! Faster! Davai!
- Ruki vyerkh! Now!
I shot my friend!
I did that!
I shot him!
- I don't deserve to live!
- So what! Now just shut up!
Don't worry.
I did the same once.
It's normal in close combat.
If he'd been a Russian, you'd be dead.
Mom, I'm sorry to leave you.
Mom, stay here.
What should I do... so we can stay together?
Mother... wait...
Pflger, return!
Take cover!
Get a gas barrel!
Next goal, the control room.
6:00 p.m. German time.
I need two volunteers.
- We'll go, sir.
- Good.
Come on, push!
One, two... go!
We'll get the Iron Cross for this.
It'll look great on our coffin, Rollo.
Take cover!
Shit. Mother'll die if I get hurt.
Finally, my Iron Cross.
What're you waiting for?
You want to lose another 300 men? Fight!
Forward!
Cover the exits!
Stand still!
Don't move! Ruki vyerkh!
I shit my pants.
I shit in my pants.
You're not the only one.
We have to keep an eye on Ivan.
"Small combat patrols."
What'd you say?
Only 62 of us left.
For your collection.
We started with 400 men.
Tell everyone.
Boost morale.
At least we got Ivan's stove.
Damn stuttering.
After every attack.
Better to stutter... than to die.
Right.
Congratulations, kid.
You're still alive.
Have a smoke.
- I don't drink my courage.
- Asshole.
What are you thinking?
I'm not.
If you start to think, you go crazy.
So I don't.
Have a swig of this.
You've got a switch in your ear.
Turn it... and you stop thinking.
I'm sorry.
Be glad you can still cry.
Go on, have a good cry.
Oils the system.
What's your name?
Mller.
We've got too many of those.
At least 'til the next attack.
You're a little go-getter,
Mller.
GGM
You okay, GG?
What is it?
The Russians tried to get a couple of their wounded, sir.
So I shot.
- They'd do the same.
- Quiet!
Anyone speak Russian?
Me, sir.
Ask if they'd agree to a short truce... to get the wounded.
But that's forbidden, sir.
The Captain would never allow it.
Shut up, Mller... you stupid ass, you idiot!
I was only telling you standard procedure.
Nobody cares about procedure in this city.
Go ahead, Wlk. That's an order.
Our Lieutenant asks... we want to get the wounded.
We have to go first.
I'm not going out there.
Me neither.
- Emigholz.
- Here, sir.
Pass it on: Short cease-fire.
We'll need medics.
Bee one to beehive.
Cease fire. We need medics.
I'll go with you, sir.
You'd better stay.
You'll be okay.
You look like my son.
- How old is your son?
- Three.
Let me go.
It's me. Kolya.
I'll help you.
Don't die.
You bastards!
Cover them!
Hit the windows!
Damn it!
Hand grenade!
- Shoot, Wlk!
- Move clear!
Don't shoot! Hold your fire!
You'll get an Iron Cross for that, sir.
Who opened fire?
Who opened fire?
Quiet, boy.
The Russians started to attack.
I saw it... and I shot.
- You're full of shit!
- He's right, Lieutenant.
I should court-martial you.
Go ahead!
I'll tell about illegal contact with the enemy!
We don't need a court, sir.
Just give him to the Russians.
You'll get in the newspaper.
The obituary column.
Asshole.
Emigholz, you asshole!
Always sleeping.
My shaving kit.
Who's got my shaving kit?
You're still the prettiest.
You should model for the cover of Today's Army.
Grub's here!
False alarm.
They were shooting at the grub.
The mail!
Give it here.
What'd the hashers make today?
Horseshit again.
They must be nuts.
They should eat this crap themselves.
Quit complaining, Rollo.
Yes, I know.
We're the beasts who invaded Russia.
Rollo, I got something for you.
No mail?
She wrote me again that she's had a boy.
That was in her last letter.
But not a word about the cow that's supposed to calve.
Oh, well, she's not the brightest.
She wasn't good in school either.
But the smallest.
He married a dwarf.
So? At least she's sweet.
If I only knew that my cow was okay.
Listen to this. Someone's been stealing our eggs.
They should hang the bastard.
You should talk.
You loot every Russian corpse.
That's different.
They're not at war back home.
Here's a letter for you.
Asshole.
From your wife?
She's at home guarding our furniture.
Schalke beat Hannover 3 to 1.
Alemania lost again.
That's in your letter?
After the war,
I'm gonna play for Bremen.
I've already tried out.
Soccer's bullshit.
I have a rowboat. A two-seater.
My old lady rows while I relax.
By evening, she's tired and quiet.
I have one too.
Hares or rabbits?
I have one too.
Hares or rabbits?
Big.
Your boots... nails bad.
Much cold...
Russian winter.
I can fix them.
Me cobbler. Father cobbler.
Grandfather cobbler.
Quiet! What's "quiet" in Russian?
What for? Let them sing.
Poppy bread.
Hey, Rollo.
Granddad sent me beeswax.
Cure for rheumatism.
That's good.
Something happen at home?
Bomber attack?
You could say that.
While I'm risking my ass... my wife shacks up with a Frenchman.
A POW.
That's illegal.
You sure?
It's probably just a rumor.
She wrote me herself.
Wanted to tell me personally.
We beat the French in six weeks.
Of course, she's scared.
I'll make the Russians pay for this.
But he's French.
I don't give a damn.
What's wrong?
Nothing. Drop it!
His wife left him.
It's better nobody knows.
Kiss my ass!
You all hate me!
Especially you, Lieutenant!
You think I'm a country fool!
Leave me alone!
You're my best man.
Without you, we'd all be dead.
And you'd have won your bet.
Wlk, Pflger, cover the doors.
Ivan's everywhere.
We've got to go down there, or they'll cut us off.
Reiser!
Here, sir.
No contact, sir!
Get your flamethrowers! Go!
Just us?
Emigholz and I will follow.
Wlk!
Yes, sir.
Stay here. If we're not back in two hours, break through.
Time check.
7:00 a.m. German time.
Why me? I'm a radioman.
Sir, let me come too.
What the hell for?
Let him come, sir.
He might bring us luck.
All right. Emigholz.
The flamethrowers!
Come.
Get up! Come on, get up!
We're everywhere, and if I scream...
You're dead.
You too.
At least say it properly.
Is he dead?
Okay.
You're experts at killing.
Quiet, or I'll shoot you.
Shoot me and you'll die.
You'd never get out of here.
- That's the wrong way.
- Don't try to...
How about a truce?
I help you find your people, and you let me go.
Why should I trust you?
I could have killed you.
With this?
Yes, with this.
Wait! What's in your other boot?
My spoon.
You want that too, Lieutenant?
How do you know German?
I give you my word as an officer.
If you get me out,
I'll let you go.
You go first.
Of course.
Go slow.
Are you okay?
Shit, Reiser.
We've got to keep moving.
Thanks, Reiser.
I won't forget this.
Where's Emigholz?
Help me!
There he is.
My leg!
Quiet! If he doesn't shut up,
I'll kill him myself.
Your leg's fine.
That's good, Mller.
Keep moving!
We've got to get out of here.
Move, men! Keep going!
- Were Germans here?
- They went that way.
Be careful, girl.
Thanks, Uncle.
Work!
Medic!
Work!
Medic!
What's going on?
Who's helping the wounded?
Who knows? The Russians broke through somewhere.
The Romanians, I think.
- Get me out of here!
- Lie down.
- Hold still. I'll get a doctor.
- Where are my boots?
- We need a doctor.
- I don't know...
I need a doctor!
Doctor!
- I'm not a doctor.
- Over here! Move!
Get to work!
Damn it, Reiser!
Put the gun down.
And let him die?
Let them all die?
- Get to work.
- I'm not a doctor.
Not another word! From anyone!
Edgar, the doctor's here.
Help me.
Drop your weapon.
Captain, sir. Let me explain.
- What's to explain?
- We just came from the front.
- We risked our lives...
- Shut up.
For our comrade.
Where are you, Schroeder?
Where's my bag?
I expect a report about this unheard-of incident.
Right away, sir.
He's dead.
This can't be.
All for nothing.
You're under arrest.
Drop your weapons.
What happens now?
I didn't want this.
Captain...
I request to speak with the General.
You think you're special?
But it is your right.
Damned Russian sympathizer.
Take them away.
To sum up the situation, gentlemen... we're in deep shit.
Day before yesterday, the Russians... broke through the north, near Kletskaya.
And now, they've broken through in the south too.
They will try to close the circle around Kalach... sometime today.
If they succeed, we'll be trapped.
Keep smoking, Krger.
Captain.
You must help me. Some of my men were arrested at the hospital.
One of the men was wounded.
Reiser lost control and threatened a doctor.
Is this a proper report?
Captain, we were trapped.
The entire 6th Army is trapped!
Pull yourself together.
We're deciding the fate of an army... and you're crying about a couple of men.
You can't do this, sir.
The men believed in you, fought for you.
Are we just a flag on your damned map?
- Excuse me, General.
- What's going on?
It's about the incident at the hospital.
I'll have the Lieutenant escorted out.
Some of my people used force to get preferential treatment.
Isn't that the young Witzland?
Nasty business you're mixed up in.
Will we be court-martialed, sir?
This will not go unpunished.
You'll learn.
What's the problem here?
Why isn't the road open?
Look at all his medals.
You like that, Rollo?
Ask him if you can touch one.
Asshole.
It's your fault we're here.
Break it up.
Save your strength for the front.
That's where you're needed.
Everyone in the truck.
- Move it.
- You too.
- But I'm...
- That's an order!
Since it's Christmas,
I'm going... to give every man some bread.
But you have to say pretty please.
Say please, former Lieutenant!
Please.
Merry Christmas.
If I survive...
I'm gonna forgive the old lady.
I had them tell my wife
I was dead.
It's for the best.
Believe me.
But we'll make it home... someday.
So what?
Let me tell you a Christmas story.
Exactly a year ago was the last time I was home.
Christmas leave... because I destroyed three tanks.
My wife and kids... met me at the station.
They were stranger to me than any of you.
She tried to understand.
The kinder she was... the more I hated her.
Finally I ran off and got drunk.
There was nothing else to do.
When I left the next day, my wife wasn't sorry.
Just the children.
I got back just in time for the new Russian offensive.
And I was home again.
Quiet!
Out of the truck! Get out!
This is insane. They'll never make it to the front.
Get out or I'll shoot!
Shoot me! I don't care!
- Leave him alone.
- Go to hell.
Ivan will finish the job.
- What's that?
- Hermann...
- What the hell are you doing?
- This man was shirking his duty.
Out of my sight!
Lieutenant, this is suicide.
I refuse.
Then go home.
Rollo, I've had it! No more!
Quiet, men!
We've had it. No more!
Shoot us all!
I don't care anymore.
Listen up.
The Russians tried to drive us out of Marinovka yesterday.
Knight's Cross.
Despite heavy losses, we held our position.
I'm sure the Russians will try it again.
But without your help, the line won't hold.
Why is this position important?
Marinovka is our best chance to break through... to General Hoth's tank division... which is only kilometers away.
Good. which is only kilometers away.
Good.
You all know...
Good.
You all know... we must break out to survive.
I ask you:
Do you want to starve without fighting... to be responsible for the deaths of 300,000 comrades?
Think it over, men.
Is it worth fighting for?
Some choice.
Wait.
We're going to make it.
Wait.
Wait.
As long as the Captain leads, we'll fight.
But if you fall, all bets are off.
Agreed.
Comrades, we're going to give these prisoners... a chance to redeem themselves.
You'll be honorably reinstated after this battle. On my word.
Witzland, give me your word as a German officer that you agree.
Yes, sir.
Get ammunition... and form two squads.
Wlk, lead the first squad.
Mller, the second. Dismissed.
We don't have a chance.
Why not surrender?
You know what would happen if we did.
Do we deserve better?
I'm not a Nazi, Otto. you're worse, you lousy officers.
You went along... even though you knew who was in charge.
I told you what would happen.
Tanks!
- Who's got the grenades?
- Rollo.
I look like my grandma.
- Rollo, grenades!
- Have fun.
Fire!
Get your ass down!
Fire!
Where's our artillery?
You're the artillery.
Get out!
Go! Move!
- I want out! Let me go!
- Pull yourself together!
Get down!
Rohleder, get back!
Come on!
Shoot the big guy!
They fit.
Damn it.
I just got used to this arm.
You okay, Captain?
The Russians can only hit my right side.
I was lucky.
It's my last... but we'll share it, Lieutenant.
Thank you, Captain.
Back to camp, men.
Now we wait for Hoth's army.
We'll take the cannon with us.
Where are the horses?
We're the horses.
Everybody out! Now!
Shut the door. It's cold.
Get out.
Leave's been cancelled.
We're staying here.
You're crazy!
Everybody out!
How often did the Russians make you shit in your pants?
All right! I'm a coward!
I'm scared!
This whole thing makes me sick!
Where's my pay anyway?
I get 36 Marks a month, and if I don't get it right now... then I'm going home.
- On foot.
- Calm down, Fritz.
The Russian army must be held.
The fun's not over yet.
Move it!
Faster! Get moving!
Quit loafing! Get moving!
Everybody out! Now!
You lazy bums!
In the name of the Fhrer.
Carry out the order as given.
- Understand?
- Yes, sir.
We're not finished, Lieutenant.
Follow me with your men.
Gentlemen.
Keep moving! Over there!
Can they do this?
It's to remind us which side we're on.
Listen up!
These civilians... are guilty of sabotage.
They are to be executed.
Positions!
They started the killing yesterday.
There's no sabotage.
They're just out of food.
I can't do this.
If you don't, GG, you'll be up there next.
Nothing we can do.
At least their suffering's over.
I can't.
That boy there.
He worked for us.
And for Ivan too.
Shut up.
What the hell's going on here?
We must hurry.
Others are waiting.
Captain, you can't do this.
I can vouch for that boy.
You again.
Does the boy appeal to you?
Remind you of someone back home?
Child murderer.
Shut up, asshole. Shut up!
You want to be busted again?
Return to your post.
You're an officer. Do something!
- I'll handle this.
- Quiet!
Step forward, Corporal.
I'll kill that bastard.
Let him go!
Let me take his place, sir.
Come to attention when I address you!
Are you refusing to obey a direct order?
Let the boy go, sir.
That's enough!
This is not open for discussion.
If you miss... you'll be up there next.
Back in line...
Corporal.
Do you want to take command?
And you're from an officer's family.
Take aim!
Why doesn't he do something, Fritz?
We didn't kill the boy... so you could let us die out here, Lieutenant.
If you were too afraid to give the right order... then at least give it now.
Let's get out of here.
We'll go to the airport.
Somehow I'll get on a plane, even if I have to wound myself.
Calm down, Fritz.
I'm leaving. I mean it.
Know what you're saying?
Desertion!
Talk to him, Lieutenant.
I no longer feel bound by my oath.
After all that's happened...
I think you have the right to leave.
I'm not going to let you get us in trouble again.
That's enough! Understand?
You're not being reasonable.
You're just scared, Rollo.
Kill me.
You're a sergeant.
It's your duty.
Fritz... stay here!
I pity you, Rohleder.
You fight to the end.
You're already dead.
Who's coming with me?
Say hello to your son for me when you get home.
What about you?
I know it's crazy, but I can't.
I just can't.
A year ago,
I would have been first... but now...
I'll keep him company.
Good luck.
I think you'll lose your bet with the Lieutenant, Rollo.
Shit. Where the hell are we?
No idea.
I'll ask for directions.
Where is Pitomnik?
Bread!
Bread.
Head west... large ravine...
5 verst to the airport.
Thank you.
Come on.
He has a wounded tag.
You can still read the signature.
Doctor Heider.
This is our pass.
We'll get home with this signature.
Everybody look for one of these.
And put on bandages.
We're wounded.
For you, Hans.
Quiet, man. You're not the only one in pain.
Ah, powder burns.
Obviously a self-inflicted wound.
Close combat. In the trenches.
- Take this traitor away.
- No, Doctor, no!
I can't do this.
They'll catch us.
I'm going back.
It's too late for that now.
Just don't screw up.
You either.
At least I'm not the only storm trooper here.
They should take more of us out.
We're needed elsewhere.
Move!
I have witnesses, Doctor!
What's wrong, son? Fever?
I can't read the signature.
Who's your doctor?
Can't you speak?
Doctor Heider.
Excuse him, Doctor.
He's in shock. Tank battle.
His best friend was blown apart.
Here, son.
For the fever.
You'll be home soon.
Keep an eye on him.
Yes, sir, Doctor.
Where's the Lieutenant?
Hans, we're over here!
- Be reasonable.
- The plane has to unload.
Over here!
You pig! Let me through!
Filthy pig.
Here come our heroes. Assholes.
Hans, where are you?
GG, hold on to me.
You bastard. You dirty bastard.
You could have made it.
Comrade...
Shoot me.
No.
Welcome to our grave.
Careful. Not so hard.
Are you hurt?
You know how fragile he is.
It's only rash.
He's covered with boils.
The Captain, he got the worst.
No planes for you?
You old muskrat.
Guess who saved you?
That'll piss him off.
Leave the Captain alone.
My foot.
This damn pain.
I wouldn't do that.
I told you not to do that.
Great. Now puke on him too.
Give me a butt.
Give me a damn butt!
I have no luck with my right side.
It's nice to spend some time dying together.
Play something.
Stupid damn medals.
Stand up!
Stand up, men!
And come to attention.
I want a report!
Where's your unit?
You...
We're not in the middle of nowhere.
We shoot looters in the German Army.
Or have you forgotten?
Stay where you are! Stop!
GG, GG...
GG, he can't do this. you can't do this!
Don't die, GG.
We'll make it home, GG.
We'll make it home.
Lieutenant... arrest that man!
And get me out of here.
You want a report?
The Russian boy was named Kolya.
And his name was Mller... like a lot of others.
You can still make up for this!
You must be very hungry.
I have supplies.
The white house.
By the theater.
We'll drive there.
Germans don't shoot Germans.
I'm an officer.
You can't just leave me here!
I can't believe it.
Bastards.
Stop it. You'll get cramps.
By rank. We'll go by rank.
You're first, Lieutenant.
So, GG. Some for you.
Dead Rollo... cheers.
Dead Otto... dead Fritz... to our grand offensive.
Three's the trick.
Hearts are trump.
Hey, Fritz, hearts are trump!
There's a spot of blood on the
10 of spades. Just so you know.
Damn... right side.
Three play cards... while the other's getting laid.
I'm not pretty enough for you?
I want a woman once more before I die.
You're all that's left.
You could do me one favor.
- Shoot me! But you're afraid!
- Stop it!
You've probably got an innocent girl at home.
Do you love her? Yes? Oh, yes!
A German soldier's love... increases with every step between him and his woman.
But you'll never see her again.
Poor fool! You probably never even slept with her.
Maybe you should have some Slavic meat after all.
There!
As soft and white as your virgin's!
Fuck me and shoot me!
There! Shoot yourself.
I'm tired of killing.
- Get out!
- No!
You bastard!
You dirty bastard!
I couldn't do it either.
I'm the Germans' whore.
A collaborator.
Nonsense.
They forced you.
I should have killed myself.
I thought that too.
Quit slowing down the game.
Spades are trumps.
There's some blood on the 10 of spades.
You know us very well.
I know you through and through.
My mother was German.
I once loved your language.
I'll never forgive myself.
I had the strangest dream.
I had to piss, but I couldn't because I was sleeping.
Damn dream.
Better than pissing, right, Lieutenant?
Have some real food.
Then try again.
I'll teach her to be nice to you.
Don't touch her.
I mean it.
Nobody touch her!
Everybody up!
Rohleder, come here.
Yes, Captain.
- Don't do it, Rollo.
- If he doesn't, I'll shoot you.
Stay there.
You wouldn't hurt your Captain, would you?
Come here.
Yes, sir.
I won't court-martial you.
You were good soldiers... until you chose to survive at any cost.
Shut up.
None.
Don't move, Reiser.
Do you think you can live with yourselves as deserters?
Shut your damn mouth!
Don't kid yourselves.
You should know you'll always be soldiers.
War is your home.
You're already dead!
For two years,
I've prayed to be killed.
The flesh melts from my bones... and seeps through the rocks.
But you know what?
I piece myself together again... every night.
And none of you can kill me.
You used to be an officer!
Quit laughing!
Where's the front?
I demand a report!
That's an order.
Heil Hitler!
Let's get out!
Wait, Captain.
I'll help.
Fresh air!
You're all crazy.
A short rest, Captain.
Then we'll go.
Don't fall asleep.
We'll go soon.
Where's the front?
What's going on?
General...
Sergeant Rohleder, Iron Cross.
Give me your weapon.
Come on, give it to me.
I'm a deserter.
Don't talk nonsense.
Stand up.
- Where's the front?
- Come with me.
Gentlemen.
The front. Where's the front?
We'll go soon.
Don't fall asleep.
I'm not going to die.
You know, Hans, at home... when you die as a soldier... at least they're proud.
That's something, isn't it?
Siberia?
Not me.
I'm cold enough.
I'll get you out.
I'm going with her.
We won't even get a hundred meters.
But what's the difference?
That way.
Let's go. It's dark enough.
We made it.
The best thing about the cold is... you feel nothing.
Everything freezes.
It's too cold to cry.
Get out of here, Fritz.
I mean it. Go!
The best thing about the cold is...
You don't have to worry about sunburn.
Ever been to the desert?
You'd hate it.
It's so hot... you're always... sweating.
You think you're melting, like butter.
The desert is shit.
Except for the stars.
They're so close...
You know?
During the Battle of Stalingrad more than one million people died.
They were either killed in action, froze to death or died of starvation:
Russians, Romanians, Italians,
Hungarians, Germans and Austrians.
Out of the 260,000 soldiers of the 6th Army, 91,000 were captured.
Only 6,000 men survived the captivity and returned home years later.
I just don't understand it, Bob.
I've logged a lot of miles.
I've followed the sales textbook by the letter.
I've applied myself diligently.
I mean, I try and I try, and I just cannot get in the door.
- I mean... what am I doin' wrong?
- Earl, sit down.
Sure, you've got a great product, but you have to remember what you're really selling: yourself.
So it's not necessarily what I say as how I say it?
That's right, Earl.
A good salesman can sell anything.
And I remember when you were a good salesman at the beginning.
Something's changed.
I don't want to pry,
but is everything all right at home, with Margie?
- Will there be anything else?
- Leave it.
- Just leave it.
- Yes, sir.
- Thank you.
- Thanks.
I watched you walking in front of my desk in an agitated manner,
smoking without having asked if you could smoke in my presence.
0121, mark.
OK, listen up. Fire team discipline in there at all times.
Keep your radios on at all times during the entire penetration.
Check yourselves. False IDs?
- Jim.
- No wallets, no keys?
We rendezvous where?
The Watergate, room 214. When?
At 0300 hours.
Jawohl, mein fartin' fhrer.
I swear, Frank,
I'm gonna make you a new asshole.
Let's get the fuck out of here.
Years of decency and clean living are over.
If anything goes wrong, sit tight.
You'll hear from me or Howard.
Personally, if anything goes wrong,
I'll be calling the President of the United States.
I'm not just gonna be a good salesman.
No, doggone it,
I'm gonna be a great salesman.
- That's the spirit.
- Thanks.
And remember, Earl, always look them in the eye.
Nothing sells like sincerity.
Five men wearing white surgical gloves, business suits,
carrying camera and electronic surveillance equipment
were arrested in the headquarters of the Democratic Committee.
They were unarmed.
Nobody knows yet why they were there
or what they were looking for.
Good evening, General Haig.
Good evening, sir.
Judge John Sirica today sentenced the Watergate burglars
to terms ranging up to 40 years.
The White House continues to deny any involvement.
Presidential counsel, John Dean,
testified before the Senate Watergate committee
that the scandal reaches to the highest levels.
Presidential aides
Haldeman and Ehrlichman
were ordered to resign today.
In a stunning announcement, White
House aide Alexander Butterfield
revealed the existence of a secret taping system.
Vice President Agnew resigned today after pleading no contest
to a charge of income tax evasion.
The president has fired the Watergate special prosecutor,
Archibald Cox, provoking the greatest constitutional crisis in history.
Eight resolutions calling for the impeachment
of the president were referred to the judiciary committee by the House.
It was disclosed to Judge Sirica
that there is an 18-and-a-half-minute gap
in a June 20th, 1972 taped conversation
between the president and Bob Haldeman.
Shock and anger are coming from all sectors of the nation.
Sirica ordered the president to turn over tapes
to special prosecutor Leon Jaworski.
The tapes contain conversations between the president and his aides
and are believed to include discussions of the scandal.
The White House has not yet responded to Judge Sirica's order
and it is not yet known whether the president will comply.
Yeah.
These are the tapes you requested,
Mr. President.
OK.
Cocksucker!
Nixon's never been good with these things, Al.
I'll take care of it, sir.
Do you mind, sir?
- Sorry.
- OK. Go on.
You know, Al, if Hoover were alive, these tapes would never have gotten out.
I want the little shit back.
- Mr. Hoover was a realist, sir.
- Yeah. Not like the others.
Dean, McCord, the rest.
We never got our side of the story out, Al.
People have forgotten.
Such violence.
The tear gassing, the riots, burning the draft cards, the Black Panthers.
We fixed it, Al, and they hate me for it.
'Cause it's Nixon.
They always hated Nixon.
You're all set, sir.
- OK.
- Good night, Mr. President.
Good night, Al.
Hey, Al.
Men in your profession, give 'em a pistol and then leave the room.
I don't have a pistol, Al.
Goddamn it.
Pause.
Start.
- They did what?
- Install bugs, photo documents.
It was a fishing expedition. It was their fourth attempt at the DNC.
O'Brien doesn't use that office.
Possibly looking for an illegal
Hughes donation to the Democrats,
so they couldn't make an issue of your Hughes money.
It was a legal contribution.
Not clear the burglars knew what they were looking for.
They were headed for
McGovern's office later that same night.
- Christ, did Mitchell know?
- I don't know.
Mitchell's out of his mind.
Martha put her head through a window.
- Jesus. Through a window?
- Yeah, they're taking her to Bellevue.
- Maybe she'll stay this time.
- Martha's an idiot.
She'll do anything to get Mitchell's attention.
If Mitchell had been minding the store instead of Martha, we wouldn't have Magruder running some third-rate burglary.
We feel the bigger concern is Gordon Liddy.
- Liddy? That fruitcake? What about him?
- That's just it, sir. He is a nut.
Used to work with the plumbers, turns up running this Watergate caper.
Remember his plan to firebomb Brookings using Cubans as firemen?
- What's Liddy got?
- He was using some campaign cash that was laundered for us through Mexico, the FBI's onto it.
- We could have a problem with that.
- That's a campaign finance violation.
- So if...
- Liddy takes the rap for Watergate, we can take care of him and that lets us off the hook.
I don't have time for this.
Just handle it, Bob.
Keep it out of the White House.
I gotta see Kissinger.
He's throwing a tantrum, threatening to quit. Again.
What else?
Well, sir, one of the people implicated is still on the White House payroll.
Who? Not another goddamn Cuban.
Uh, no, sir. A guy named Hunt.
Howard Hunt, sir.
Hunt? Howard Hunt?
Left his White House phone number in his hotel room.
He works for Colson.
He used him on the Pentagon Papers.
After arrest, he dumps his wiretapping stuff into his White House safe.
We're trying to figure out when he stopped being a White House consultant.
Howard Hunt is working for the White House? Jesus Christ.
This is goddamn Disneyland.
Since when?
Since Chappaquiddick.
He wanted dirt on Kennedy.
- Colson brought him in.
- You know Hunt, sir?
Yeah, on the list of horribles.
I know what he is and I know what he tracks back to.
- He was involved in the plumbers?
- Definitely.
Colson had him break into Bremer's apartment after Bremer shot Wallace to plant McGovern's campaign literature.
I had nothing to do with that.
- He was in this Ellsberg thing?
- Yes. You approved it.
- I did?
- Right after the Pentagon Papers broke.
They went in to get his psychiatric records. We were working on China.
Fuck.
What the fuck?! You're not supposed to take pictures of me!
Take pictures of the files!
Give me the fuckin' film!
Howard Hunt.
Jesus Christ. You open up that scab, you'll uncover a lot of pus.
What do you mean?
- Where's Hunt now?
- He's in hiding.
- He sent Liddy in to talk to Dean.
- And?
- He wants money.
- Pay him.
Pay him? I told him get out of the country. It's crazy to start...
What the hell are you doing,
John, screwing with the CIA?
I don't care how much he wants.
Pay him.
- What are we paying him for, sir?
- Silence.
But you're covered.
It's only this Ellsberg thing, and if that comes out, it's national security.
Cut ourselves loose from these clowns, and that's all there is to it.
No, it's more than that.
I want Hunt paid.
We've never done that before, sir.
How do we do it?
We should set up a Cuban defense fund on this and take care of all of 'em.
- Should we talk to Trini about paying?
- Keep Trini out.
And for God's sake, keep Colson out.
It's time to baptize our young counsel here, Mr. Dean.
That means John can never talk about it.
Attorney-client privilege.
So get to it.
John, you stay close to this, OK?
- Don't worry, sir.
- Good.
OK.
Did I approve the Ellsberg thing?
Huh?
I'm glad we tape all these conversations, but I never approved the break-in at the Ellsbergs'.
Maybe I approved it after the fact.
Someday we gotta start transcribing these tapes.
You approved that before the fact because I went over it with you. But...
- No one's gonna see these tapes.
- Right.
It's more of a problem for Ehrlichman.
He fixed Hunt up with the phony CIA IDs.
But... what else does Hunt have on us?
We gotta turn off the FBI, Bob.
You go to the CIA and tell Helms that Hunt is blackmailing the president.
Tell him Hunt and his Cuban friends know too damn much, and, uh, if he goes public, if Hunt goes public, it will be a fiasco for the CIA.
He'll know what I'm talking about.
- All right.
- Play it tough.
That's the way they play it, that's the way we're gonna play it.
Don't lie to Helms and say there's no involvement.
Just say this is, uh, a sort of comedy of errors, bizarre, without getting into it.
And, uh...
Say the president believes it's gonna open up the whole
Bay of Pigs thing again.
And tell Helms he should call the FBI, call Pat Gray, and say that we wish, for the sake of the country, don't go any further into this... hanky-panky, period.
Bay of Pigs?
That was Kennedy's screw-up.
- Why would that threaten us?
- Just do what I say, Bob.
The only problem with that, sir...
- ...gets us to obstruction of justice.
- Got nothing to do with justice.
- It's national security.
- How is this national security?
The president says it is.
Now, this isn't a moral issue, Bob.
My job is to protect this country from its enemies,
and its enemies are inside the walls.
We gotta keep our enemies at bay,
or our whole program goes down the tubes.
Vietnam, China, the Soviet Union.
- Look at the big picture...
- Damn.
...we end up doing a hell of a lot of good in this world.
Let's not screw it up with a shit-ass, third-rate burglary.
What should
I tell Ziegler to tell the press?
Tell 'em what we always tell 'em. Anything but the truth.
- Fuck!
- Say the president believes
it's gonna open up the whole Bay of Pigs thing again.
- Put me in this position.
- Bay of Pigs?
- Expose me like this.
- Why would that threaten us?
Why don't they fucking shoot me?
In the election of 1860,
Lincoln said the question was whether this nation could exist, half-slave or half-free.
In the election of 1960, with the world around us, the question is whether the world will exist half-slave or half-free.
I think, in the final analysis, it depends upon what we do here in the United States. I think it's time America started moving again.
- Mr. Nixon?
- When it comes to experience, through the years I have sat on the National Security Council,
I have been in the cabinet,
I have met with the legislative leaders...
- Be quiet.
- Relax, everybody, relax.
...discussions with 35 presidents, nine prime ministers,
- two emperors and the Shah of Iran.
- Jesus Christ.
Has he told them how many push-ups he can do yet?
- ...hydroelectric power.
- What the hell happened?
He just got out of the hospital.
He hasn't taken one hour off.
When we consider the line-up of the world, we find there are 590 million people on our side,
800 million people on the Communist side...
- Shoulda slapped makeup on.
- It's not a beauty contest.
- We'd better hope not.
- ...600 million people who are neutral.
What are you doing to him, Murray?
He's not well.
- He doesn't have to debate Kennedy.
- The odds are 5-3 against us.
- When it comes to politics...
- He can win without this.
Senator, one minute for rebuttal.
Castro is only the beginning of our difficulties throughout Latin America.
Oh, shit, he's gonna do it.
Here it comes.
We've seen Cuba go to the Communists.
Eight jet minutes from the coast of Florida.
We must attempt to strengthen the democratic anti-Castro forces in exile.
These fighters have had no support from our government.
- Son of a bitch!
- What?
Kennedy was briefed last week by CIA. He's using it against us.
We can't respond, he welshed on a deal.
- It's a disgrace.
- ...we might never have had Castro.
- Why didn't we?
- Mr. Nixon?
- Man, he's treading water.
- All right, come on.
He violated national security.
Attack the bastard.
...Constitution of the United States, so help me God.
- Mr. Nixon.
- Yeah.
I think...
I think that's the sort of, uh, very dangerous
- and irresponsible suggestion that...
- It's over. More coffee?
...helping Cuban exiles who oppose Castro would not only be a violation of international law, it would be an open invitation for Mr. Khrushchev...
It's still very close.
Senator Kennedy's lead is about, uh, 700,000.
Think Daley stuffed the ballot boxes himself?
In Texas, they had the goddamn cattle voting.
It was he closest race in history,
Dick, and he stole it. Son of a bitch.
He outspent us and he still cheated.
A guy who's got everything.
I can't believe it.
We came to Congress together. We were like brothers, for Christ's sake.
Got all the figures. It's an obvious fraud. We ask for a recount.
Don't be ridiculous. Nobody has contested a presidential election.
Who's gonna do the counting?
The Democrats control Texas, Illinois.
- We shift 25,000 votes in two states.
- And how long will that take?
- Six months, a year?
- What happens to the country?
If I'd called his shot on Cuba,
I'd have won.
- That's what I say.
- Made me look soft.
"I feel very sorry for Nixon because he does not know who he is."
You believe this?
"At each stop he has to decide which
Nixon he's going to be at the moment, which must be very exhausting."
Jack Kennedy.
- It's a disgrace.
- "Nixon is a shifty-eyed goddamn liar.
If he had to stick to the truth, he'd have very little to say.
If you vote for Nixon, then you oughta go to hell." Harry S. Truman.
That's what killed us, Dick, not Cuba.
It's the personality problem. You gonna let the Democrats get away with this?
Goes to Harvard. His father hands him everything on a silver platter.
All my life, they've been sticking it to me.
Not the right clothes, not the right schools, not the right family.
And then he steals from me.
Heh, he says I have no class, and they love him for it.
Dick, you're only 47.
If you contest this election, you'll be finished.
You gotta swallow this one.
They stole it fair and square.
We'll get 'em next time, Dick.
We'll get 'em next time.
What makes you think there's gonna be a next time, Murray?
Because if he's not this Nixon, he's nobody.
- Good morning, sir.
- Hi.
- Hi.
- Hi.
We lost.
I know.
I hate to lose.
It makes us human.
It's not fair, Buddy.
I can take the insults,
I can take the name-calling.
But I can't take the losing.
I hate it.
We don't have to put ourselves through this again, Dick.
We worked for it. We earned it.
- It's ours.
- It is. We know that.
And it's enough that we know.
Just think of the girls.
They're still young.
We never see them.
I lost my parents when I was young.
I don't want them to lose theirs.
Maybe I should get out of the game.
What do you think, Buddy?
And go back to being a lawyer.
End up with something solid, some money at the end of the line.
You know, I, uh...
I keep thinking of my old man tonight.
- He was a failure too.
- You're not a failure, Dick.
You know how much money he had in the bank when he died?
Nothing.
He was so damned honest.
But I miss him.
I miss him a hell of a lot.
- Dad! Dad!
- I got the beets for him.
- Dad.
- Is she in there?
I don't have time for you right now.
I got work to do.
- How is thy son?
- Very well, thank you.
- What'd he say?
- He said, in life,
- there's no free ride.
- What'd you say?
I told them I didn't need a ride,
I need a suit.
Oh, no. Harold, he doesn't respond well to humor.
Maybe Mother can help straighten it out.
I'd rather get a whippin' than listen to another of her talks.
Relax, Dick.
Donald, finish thy sweeping, then pick out the bad apples.
Yes, Mother.
I'm working.
Richard, come with me, would thee?
Why me?
Because Harold hast thy father's will is no reason to admire him.
Let Harold's worldliness be a warning to thee, not an example.
Yes, Mother.
Harold may have lost touch with his Bible, but thee must never lapse.
Now, give it to me.
Do not tell a lie, Richard.
The corn silk cigarette Harold gave thee behind the store this morning.
I don't have them. Mother, I...
I promise I didn't smoke.
I see.
Well, then Richard, we have nothing more to talk about, do we?
Please!
Please.
Mother, I'm sorry. It was...
It was just one time. I'm sorry.
So am I.
Thy father will have to know of thy lying.
No, please, don't... don't... don't tell him.
I'll never do it again,
I promise. Please.
- Richard, I expected more from thee.
- Please, Mama.
I shall never let thee down again.
Then this shall be our little secret.
Remember, I see into thy soul.
Thee may fool the world, even thy father, but not me, Richard. Never me.
Mother...
...think of me always as thy faithful dog.
- Thank you.
- We'll say grace in the next room.
- Richard.
- Is it my turn?
Oh, Heavenly Father, we humbly thank you...
I'll do it. There's a couple of things I wanna say.
Could thee at least remove thy apron, Frank?
This blood pays the bills, Hannah.
I'm not ashamed of how I earn my money.
Heavenly Father, you told Adam in the garden, after that business with the snake, that man would have to earn his way by the sweat of his face.
Well, as far as I can tell, Father, what was true in Eden is true in Whittier, California.
So we ask you now to remind certain of our young people the only way to get a new suit to go to the promenade with Margaret O'Herlihy, who happens to be a Catholic, by the way, is to work for it. Amen.
- Amen.
- Amen.
- Amen.
- Are we gonna pray now, Daddy?
- Don't be silly.
- You think this is funny?
Maybe a trip to the wood shed'll straighten you out.
Pretty soon you boys are gonna have to get out there and scratch.
'Cause you're not gonna get anywhere on your good looks.
Just ask those fellas.
Charity's only gonna get you so far, even with saints like your mother around.
Struggle's what gives life meaning.
Not victory, struggle.
When you quit struggling, they've beaten you.
And then you end up in the street with your hand out.
My mother was a saint,
but my old man struggled his whole life.
They could call him a little man, a poor man,
but they never beat him.
I always tried to remember that, when things didn't go my way.
Let's really get fired up now!
-Get on your stand, Nixon!
- Twenty-eight, 44!
- What's Nixon doing here?
- He thinks he can make it.
Four years of being a tackling dummy.
Poor guy.
- All right! Let's go, defense!
- Hike!
Worst athlete I've ever seen.
But he's got guts.
OK, let's go! Let's do it!
In California's gubernatorial race,
Nixon returned to the political arena
in a long and acrimonious bid against popular incumbent Edmund G. Brown.
Brown's campaign has benefited greatly from the support of President Kennedy,
while Nixon has had trouble convincing voters
this is not another run for the presidency.
With only a few precincts left unreported,
all indications are of another defeat for Nixon,
all indications are of another defeat for Nixon,
who lost the presidency just two years ago by a paper-thin margin.
It seems his brief political comeback
- is in ruins.
- Making a statement?
Thank you, Fidel Castro.
- You're not going to blame Castro?
- I sure am!
Goddamn missile crisis united the country behind Kennedy.
He was supporting Brown.
People were scared.
Castro staged this just to beat you.
Before you join the jubilation of my being beaten, remember people vote not out of love but fear.
They don't teach that at Sunday school or the Whittier Community Playhouse.
- I should go check in with our people.
- I'm glad they don't, Dick.
I'm glad they don't because life is tough and it is unfair and sometimes you forget that in your self pity.
You forget sometimes, Dick, that I had a life before you, before California.
Cocksucker!
Don't you want to listen to Governor Brown's victory speech?
Nope. Not going to listen to any more speeches ever again.
Amen to that.
It's over, Dick.
- I'll concede in the morning.
- Not that.
Buddy?
I have always stood by you.
I campaigned for you when I was pregnant.
During Checkers, when Ike wanted you out, I told you to fight.
This is different, Dick.
You've changed.
You've grown more bitter, like you're at war with the world.
You weren't that way before.
I'm 50 years old now, Dick.
How many millions of miles have I traveled?
How many millions of peoples' hands have I shaked I just don't like?
How many thank-you notes have I written?
It's as if I, I don't know, just went to sleep a long time ago and missed the years between.
I've had enough.
What are you saying?
What are you talking about?
I want a divorce.
My God. Divorce?
What about the girls?
The girls'll grow up. They only know you from television anyway.
- It'll ruin us, our family.
- No, you're ruining us.
If we stay with you, you'll take us down with you.
This isn't political.
This is our life.
Everything's political.
- I'm political, you're political.
- No, I'm not. I'm finished.
Well, this is just what they want, Buddy.
Don't you see?
They want to drive us apart, to beat us.
We can't let them do it.
We've been through too much together.
We belong together.
That's what you said the first time we met.
You didn't even know me.
Oh, yes, I did.
I asked you to marry me, didn't I?
On our first date.
I said it because I knew...
I knew you were the one.
So solid.
So strong.
- So beautiful.
- Hi, I'm Pat Ryan.
- Richard Nixon.
- It's a pleasure to meet you.
Pleasure to meet you.
Well, in a way, yes.
Don't tell me you've been cutting my part.
Of course, honey, you know I would never deceive you. Don't you?
You were the most beautiful thing
I'd ever seen.
I don't want to lose you.
- Ever.
- Dick, don't.
You really want me to quit?
We can be happy.
We really can.
The girls and I love you, Dick.
And if I stop, there'll be no more talk of divorce?
I'll do it. No more.
Are you serious?
Yeah. I'm out.
Is that the truth?
I'll never run again. I promise.
Yeah.
I love you, Buddy.
I love you.
I love you.
Where are they?
- You don't have to make a statement.
- No!
Gentlemen, I can tell you Mr. Nixon is a man who is graceful in defeat, and if he was here with us...
Can I have some quiet, please?
Give the... Just a second!
Some quiet, please. Quiet!
Thank you!
- Mr. Nixon!
- Uh... Ahem.
I believe Governor Brown has a heart, even though he believes I do not.
I believe he's a good American, even though he feels I am not.
I'm proud of the fact that I defended my opponent's patriotism.
You gentlemen didn't report it, but I'm proud I did that. And...
And I would appreciate, for once, gentlemen, if you would just print what I say.
For 16 years, uh, ever since the Hiss case, you've had a lot of fun. A lot of fun.
But recognize you have a responsibility, if you're against the candidate, to give him the shaft.
But if you do that, at least put one lonely reporter on the campaign who will report what the candidate says now and then.
I think, all in all,
I've given as good as I've taken.
But as I leave you, I...
I want you to know, just think what you're gonna be missing.
You won't have Nixon to kick around anymore.
Kick around anymore.
Uh...
Because, gentlemen, this is my last press conference.
- Thank you and good day.
- Is this the end of politics for you?
Will you run again?
In California, we can officially write the political obituary
of Richard Milhous Nixon.
A small town lawyer like Lincoln,
Nixon became a representative at 33 and a senator at 35,
as part of the postwar Republican sweep of the congressional elections
that attacked FDR's big-government New Deal.
Running as a South Pacific veteran,
victories over
Congressman Jerry Voorhis
and Senator Helen Gahagan Douglas made it clear that, to Nixon,
politics was war. He didn't have opponents, he had enemies.
Why, she's pink, right down to her underwear!
Nixon became one of the leading lights on the notorious
House Un-American Activities Committee, questioning labor leaders,
Spanish Civil War veterans,
Hollywood celebrities.
- They'd all be sent back to Russia.
- But it was the Alger Hiss case
that made Nixon a household name.
One of the architects of the United Nations,
intimate of FDR and Oliver Wendell Holmes,
Alger Hiss was a State Department diplomat
accused by freelance journalist
Whittaker Chambers
of passing secret documents to the Soviet Union.
- Hiss is lying.
- Hiss claimed he was being set up
by Nixon and J. Edgar Hoover to discredit the New Deal's policies.
I am not, and never have been, a member of the Communist party.
The case came down to an Underwood typewriter
and a roll of film hidden in a pumpkin patch.
I asked Hiss if he'd known Chambers.
When he said no, I knew he was lying.
I knew I had him.
After two trials, Hiss was convicted not of spying but of perjury.
To some, Nixon was a hero and a patriot.
But to many, he was a self-promoter.
Eleanor Roosevelt angrily condemned him.
Nixon continued to tear into Truman,
Acheson and the Democratic party
for losing mainland China in 1949,
and blamed the Korean War on a weak foreign policy.
I promise to expose and to continue to expose the people that have sold
- this country down the river!
- His speeches, if more subtle
than those of his Republican ally,
Joe McCarthy, were just as aggressive.
The direct result of Truman's decision
is that China has gone Communist!
Mao is a monster! Why?
Who in the State Department is watching over American interests?
Who has given the Russians the atomic bomb?
The Soviet Union is an example of the slave state in the ultimate development.
Driven by demons that seemed more personal than political,
Nixon became Eisenhower's vice presidential candidate in 1952.
But then came the Checkers crisis.
Nixon was accused of hiding a secret slush fund.
About to be kicked off the ticket by Ike, he went live on television...
- ...in an unprecedented appearance.
- ...give this television audience
a complete financial history.
Everything I've earned...
The list included their house, their Oldsmobile,
Pat's Republican cloth coat. And lastly, in what was to become history,
a sentimental gift from a Texas businessman.
You know what it was? It was a little cocker spaniel dog in a crate
that he'd sent all the way from Texas,
black and white, spotted.
And our little girl Tricia,
the six-year-old, named it Checkers.
- Fifty-eight million people saw it.
- Like all kids, they love the dog.
It was shameless. It was manipulative.
Regardless of what they say about him, we're gonna keep him.
It was a huge success.
He stayed on the national scene, serving two terms as vice president
under Eisenhower, against Khrushchev at the Kitchen Debate in Moscow
and stoned by Latin mobs in Venezuela.
Nixon once again became a national hero.
But it all came to a crashing end against Kennedy in 1960
and Pat Brown in California in '62.
And thus ends a great American political story.
The truth is we never knew who Richard Nixon really was,
and now that he is gone, we never will.
Poor little Tricia.
I told her her daddy couldn't get a job in this city when he got out of Duke.
Every white-shoe lawyer firm turned me down. Didn't have the right look.
- I couldn't even get into the FBI.
- Hi! How are ya?
Did you catch that picture of you in the news last week, Dick?
- You were standin' on Fifth Avenue.
- Oh, yeah.
You were lookin' straight ahead and everyone else was lookin' the other way,
- like you just farted or somethin'.
It said, "Who remembers Dick Nixon?"
Unbelievable. I was screamin'.
Yeah, that was hilarious, Martha.
They were looking the other direction, waiting for the light to change.
Typical of the press, they wouldn't correct it.
I think we oughta catch Rocky before he leaves.
I'm sure it's just a little run of bad luck, Mr. Nixon.
- He can walk this direction, can't he?
- Oh, I don't know.
- I've read some nice things about you.
- Maybe where you come from.
But where I come from, Dick Nixon is as misunderstood as a fox in a henhouse.
And do you know why?
Because, my darlin', they all think that your smile and your face are never in the same place at the same time.
You and me, we're gonna have to work on that, sweetie.
Someone freshen Martha's drink.
She's down a quart.
Well, zip-a-dee-doo-dah!
- I think he is frightened by my charm.
- I know I am.
- Pat can't stand her.
- It's the thing she does.
- She talks at night.
- Talks all day too.
How the hell can you put up with her, John?
Well, I'm in love with her.
And she's great in bed.
If a Rockefeller can't become president of the United States, then what is the point of democracy?
The point of democracy is that even the son of a grocer can become president.
And you came damn close, Dick.
How are you?
Hi, John.
New York treating you all right?
I'm sorry I haven't been able to see you.
- You're looking happy, Rocky.
- Happy. Happy, Dick Nixon.
- You remember him.
- Nice to see you again.
- You're obviously making him happy.
- Oh! Repartee, Dick! That's marvelous!
What you predicting? Your boy
Goldwater gonna split the party?
- Some say you are, Rocky.
- Let me tell you something.
Every time the Republican party is a home to extremism, we lose the election.
- You oughta know better than anybody.
- Yeah.
This guy Goldwater is as stupid as McCarthy.
And McCarthy never did you any good in the long run, now, did he?
That's right.
- I hate these cocktail parties.
- John, I'm in hell.
I'll be mentally dead in two years and physically dead in four.
Make some money, Dick.
Prove yourself to the Wall Street crowd.
Let Goldwater and Rockefeller take the fall against Kennedy.
I don't know.
I miss making love to the people.
I miss entering a room.
I miss the pure acting of it, John.
I gotta get back in the arena.
Ladies and gentlemen, it's showtime!
Come on up.
Right this way, ladies and gentlemen.
It's for you, it's for me.
It's Studebaker for 1963.
Amen. Bless you for being here.
There's a man that loves Studebakers.
- Can I get your autograph?
- Mr. Nixon, please run again.
The ex-vice president of the United
States, Richard M. Nixon!
- You throw a hell of a party, Jack.
- The party ain't even started yet.
I've asked these gals out to the ranch for a little private thing.
We're gonna have some fun,
I guarantee ya.
And there's some fellas
I'd really like you to meet.
Trini and I got an early plane. We're hoping to be back in New York for...
It'll be OK. These guys are interesting.
And quiet. The girls are too.
It's not often us Texans get an opportunity to entertain
- the future president.
- Here.
Like you said, Jack,
I'm just a New York lawyer.
- We'll see about that.
- Mr. Nixon, are you gonna run again?
- I don't know.
- He will! I guarantee it!
- Name it, baby.
- That little convertible?
I'll buy you a diamond ring.
I'll buy you one.
- Thank you.
- Hello, baby.
Hey, wait, wait, wait.
This is Julie there.
And that's Tricia.
- Oh, yeah.
- She reminds me a bit of you, Sandy.
She really is wholesome.
But, um, what about you?
- What do you like?
- Well, I like music.
- I like jazz.
- Jazz, yeah. Guy Lombardo.
How about rock and roll?
- Elvis Presley?
- Yeah, he's good. Yeah.
- Decent guy.
- Well, I guess, for me, it also depends on what I'm doin' to the music, Dick.
- Yeah.
- So, what's it like bein' so famous?
A vice president!
Well, it's, uh, not like that, Sandy.
You see, the reason I got into politics in the first place was, well, to do something for the people.
So, how are you two doing?
You know, Dick, there's more privacy in the back of the...
- No, Trini, we're fine here.
- OK.
Hell, Kennedy just pissed Cuba away to the Russians. Just pissed it away.
And he doesn't know what the hell he's doin' in Vietnam.
These are dangerous times, especially for business.
- Agreed.
- We know what you tried to do for Cuba.
If you had been elected in '60,
Castro would be dead now.
Gentlemen, I tried.
I told Kennedy to go into Cuba.
He heard me and he made his decision.
I appreciate your sentiments.
I've heard them from many fine Cuban patriots.
But it's nothing
I can do anything about.
It's a long drive to Dallas. Trini and I have a plane to catch tomorrow. So...
- Dick, these boys want you to run.
- Absolutely.
- That's right.
- Now, they're serious.
They can deliver the South and put Texas in your column.
They would have done it in '60.
Only if Kennedy dumps Johnson.
That'll never happen.
I don't think you know how much people hate Kennedy down here.
He's comin' to town tomorrow, and they will run his ass outta town on a rail!
- Damn right.
- That we will.
We are willing to give you a shit pot full of money to get rid of him.
More than you ever dreamed of.
Nobody's gonna beat Kennedy in '64 with all the money in the world.
Suppose Kennedy don't run in '64.
Not a chance.
Yeah.
Well, gentlemen, I promised my wife I...
I'm out of politics.
You just came down here for the weather, is that right, Mr. Nixon?
I came down here to close a deal for Studebaker.
- What about '68, Dick?
- Five years, Trini.
In politics, that's an eternity.
Dick... your country needs you.
Unfortunately, the country's not available right now.
President Kennedy's due in from Fort Worth in about an hour.
- Kennedy is due in from Fort Worth.
- Yeah, I know.
OK. Let's go through here.
- Excuse us.
- Excuse me. Coming through.
- Excuse us.
- Thank you.
Step away from the gate there.
Thank you.
Go find the pilot.
Let's get out of here.
Look, Edgar, these, uh... these guys were really strange.
- You know, extremists.
- What do you mean by "strange"?
- Right-wing stuff.
- Birchers?
- Birchers, yeah.
- This thing's pretty straight.
- In Dallas, Lee Harvey Oswald...
- Oswald's got a Cuba connection?
- To Castro?
- ...maximum security facility.
- Mrs. Kennedy...
- He's a real Communist.
Well, that makes sense.
OK, well, thank you, Edgar.
Senator Ted Kennedy, arriving early this morning with his mother and sister.
Hoover says this Oswald checks out as a beatnik,
- a real bum.
- Dick, you should call Bobby.
He doesn't want me at the funeral.
- You don't have to go.
- De Gaulle's gonna be there.
- McMillan. Adenauer.
- We go now to the rotunda...
Nixon can't not be there.
Then call him.
I'm sure it was an oversight.
- Yeah.
- ...to pay their respects...
- Jesus.
- ...to their fallen leader.
It's awful.
- It's an awful thing for this country.
- Dick?
No, it's his way.
He hates me.
He and Teddy.
They always hated me.
They've lost their brother.
You know what that means, Dick.
These are perhaps the last images of him alive with his family.
Please, make it stop!
Hold him tighter.
Hold him tighter.
Hold him tighter. Hold him tighter.
Daddy, please make it stop!
Hold him tighter.
The infection's spread to his spine.
Come on!
Stop it!
Get off!
You're it!
No. No, don't!
If I'd been president, they never would've killed me.
Vice President Johnson, shown here being sworn in...
- Dick, are you gonna call? Bobby.
- Hmm?
I'll go through Johnson.
We'll be invited.
This is a sad time for all people.
I ask for your help.
...and are going to see Vietnam through
to an honorable peace...
...to defend an honored cause,
whatever the price, whatever the burden...
...whatever the sacrifice that duty may require.
Accordingly... I shall not seek...
...and I will not accept...
...the nomination of my party for another term as your president.
Good night, and God bless all of you.
Johnson's withdrawal resurrects Richard Nixon
as a strong Republican candidate with a secret plan to end the war.
His mother, Hannah Nixon, just before her death last year,
commented on her son's chances.
Mrs. Nixon, do you think your son will ever return to politics?
I don't think he has a choice.
He has always been a leader.
Do you think he'd make a great president, Mrs. Nixon?
If he's on God's side, yes.
You must be very proud of your son.
I have always been proud of all of my children.
Of course, no one can see into the future.
We didn't know this day would come.
- Where'd he go?
- In the side door.
- Is that Mitchell?
- Shit! Missed him.
I thought that guy was gonna kiss your hand on the side of it.
- Congratulations, sir.
- Yeah, thanks.
Jesus, Dick!
I've never seen anything like it.
Even the goddamn Times is saying you've got it.
- Vietnam's gonna put you in there.
- We got the press this time.
- We got the big mo. We're back.
- So you've decided.
Were you planning to tell me?
We haven't announced anything yet, but...
Jesus. Uh... Pat?
Uh, wait in the living room, will you, fellas? What is it, John?
You need her, Dick. In '60, she was worth five, six million votes.
Yeah. Don't worry.
I'll use the old Nixon charm.
In there. OK.
Who could resist that?
Buddy?
You should be going.
Primaries are soon, aren't they? New Hampshire.
I love you, Buddy. I need you.
I don't want them to love me.
But I need you out there.
It won't be like the last time.
The war's crippled the Democrats.
I can win. We deserve it.
It's ours, Buddy, at last.
Nobody knows that better than you.
Frank Nixon's boy.
Do you remember what Mom said?
We're not like other people. We...
We don't choose our way.
We can really change things, Buddy.
We got a chance to get it right.
We can change America.
It was our dream, Buddy, together, always.
- Do you really want this, Dick?
- Yeah. This, above all.
- And then you'll be happy?
- Yeah, you know I will. Yes! I will.
Then I'll be there for you.
And we are gonna win this time.
I can feel it.
Yeah!
You're the strongest woman
I ever met, Buddy.
- Can I just ask for one thing?
- Anything.
- Would you kiss me?
- Yeah!
We're gonna win the race.
My thanks. It's on to Chicago and let's win there. Thank you.
I would never question
Senator Kennedy's patriotism.
But going around the country, promising peace at any price is, uh, exactly what the
North Vietnamese want to hear.
Cue the crowd.
Go to this bald guy.
Yeah, he's great, isn't he?
I, unlike Senator Kennedy,
have a plan to end the war immediately.
But not for peace at any price, but peace with honor.
What do you think this plan is, Edgar?
A nuclear attack?
He's lying, Clyde. Always has.
That's why Nixon's always been useful.
Hold still.
- OK, who's next?
- The Negro.
No, we gotta have a Negro.
This guy right here.
Negro, front row.
- Mr. Nixon, sir.
- Yeah.
We all know you have built your career on smearing people as Communists.
And now you are building your campaign on the divisions in this country, stirring up hatred and turning people against each other.
- What the fuck's he doing? A speech!
- Cut him off.
- I can't. This isn't Russia.
- Sounds like a Negro.
- Saying Negro things. What's he doing?
- Sounded white when we screened.
Doesn't sound white now, sounds like Angela Davis.
When are you gonna tell us what you really stand for?
- Go to commercial!
- There are no commercials.
- You bought the whole half hour.
- Shit!
When are you going to take off that mask and show us who you really are?
Shut up and sit down!
- OK. OK.
- It's a high hard one, chief.
- Park it.
- There are divisions in this country.
- That's because you created them.
- I did not. The Democrats did.
If it's dialogue you want, you're more likely to get it from me than from people burning down cities.
Just think about it.
- Dr. King said the same thing.
- Oh, please.
You know, young man, who a great hero is? Abraham Lincoln.
- Abraham Lincoln.
- Lincoln. Is he beautiful?
He believed in common ground.
He brought this country together.
I love that man. I love him.
I want the son of a bitch who got that agitator in here fired!
- I have another question.
- There's a little girl sitting here.
- A little girl sitting with a sign.
- Bag the spook. Go to the girl.
- Can you see the girl?
- There are three simple words:
"Bring us together."
That is what I want, and that is what the great silent majority of Americans want.
And that is why I want to be president.
To bring us together.
- Give me a break, Mary.
- Now, you all know me. I'm one of you.
I grew up here, a stone's throw from here,
- on a lemon ranch in Yorba Linda.
- Poorest lemon ranch in California.
Poorest lemon ranch in California,
I can assure you of that.
- My dad sold it before they found oil.
- My dad sold it before they found oil.
- But it was all we had.
- But it was all we had.
- My dad built the house with his hands.
- You're new here. What's your name?
Joaquin, Mr. Hoover.
Oh.
My father sacrificed everything he had so that his sons could go to college.
- A gentle Quaker mother quietly wept
- Oh, Christ.
- when he went to war.
- Turn this crap off, Clyde.
- It's giving me a headache.
- A great teacher.
You may go, Joaquin.
- I want to see him, Clyde.
- Edgar, he works in the kitchen.
Not the boy, you idiot. Nixon.
Hear what he said in Oregon about me having too much power?
It's between Nixon and a Kennedy again.
- Who do you want?
- Kennedy?
Never.
He'll fry in hell for what he did to me.
But Nixon don't know that.
Which is why I'm gonna have to remind him that he needs us a hell of a lot more than we need him.
Your boy's on the way up.
You know, I met this guy years ago in Havana. You know that.
Come on!
He's folding, Johnny.
No, no, no.
You just wait a second.
Olly's Boy on the inside!
Come on! Come on!
And a tragedy! Olly's Boy has fallen on the sixteenth pole.
Sunday's Chance goes on to win it in 25,000...
A bit extreme, isn't it?
It's the drama.
Look, the crowd loves this shit.
May I have your autograph?
Hey, there's Randolph Scott over there.
Look at that.
Cash these for me, would you, Johnny?
- Easy! Easy, easy!
- It's a two-dollar bet, Edgar.
You got thousands coming on this.
I mean, what the fuck?
I told you, just cash it, Johnny.
And don't swear around me. Come on.
Uh-huh.
Hello.
Edgar. Wonderful to see you.
- Clyde.
- Mr. Nixon.
- Hi.
- Thank you for coming, Richard.
OK. Winning?
Actually, I've just had a bit of luck.
Are you gonna win?
You should ask Bobby.
- Little Bobby.
- Yeah, Bobby Kennedy.
Yeah.
Would you, uh, walk with me down to the paddock?
- I'd like to look at the horses.
- Can we talk here?
I got the police chiefs in San Diego.
Actually, I'm trying to spare you an embarrassment.
That was Johnny Roselli you just passed. He's on his way back.
Roselli? Johnny Roselli?
Yes. You know him, Richard? No?
From Cuba?
- Hey, Johnny Roselli. How're you doin'?
- Dick Nixon.
How are you?
I never met the man. Uh...
Well, I know you've...
...been very careful not to.
That's why I'm so concerned.
OK.
- They're off and running!
You'll win the nomination.
- It could be 1960 all over again.
- Love you, Dick!
And Bobby's got the magic like a goddamn rock star.
They climb all over each other just to touch his clothes.
He'll ride his brother's corpse right into the White House.
If things remain as they are.
He's got the anti-war vote.
Or he'll steal it, like his brother.
Bobby's a mean little son of a bitch.
He had the IRS audit my mother when she was dying in the nursing home.
- I know.
- We should shoot the son of a bitch.
- I wanna fight just as dirty, Edgar.
- His women. Use his women.
Any information you have.
The son of a bitch is not gonna steal from me again.
Can you back me up on this?
Can I count on your support?
I look at it from the point of view that the system can only take so much abuse.
- It adjusts itself eventually.
- Yeah.
But there are times...
There are savage outbursts.
The late Dr. King, for example.
Amoral hypocrite.
Screwing women like a degenerate tomcat, stirring up the blacks, preaching against our system.
Sometimes the system comes very close to cracking.
We've already had one radical in the White House.
I don't believe we could survive another.
- Well, like I said, Edgar...
- You ask...
...if you can count on my support.
As long as I can count on yours.
Yeah.
Yeah, the old queen did it on purpose.
No, he wasn't protecting me.
- He was just putting me on notice.
- That he knew Roselli?
- No.
- Hoover knew a lot of gangsters.
Johnny Roselli wasn't just any gangster.
Johnny Roselli was one of the gangsters who set up Track Two in Cuba.
Oh, well, I know all about that.
I don't understand it.
Track Two is Chile.
Yeah, Chile, Congo,
Guadalajara, Iran, Cuba.
Wherever there was need for, uh, an executive action capability,
there's Track Two.
In Cuba, Track One was, uh, the Bay of Pigs invasion.
Track Two was our idea.
We thought that the invasion wouldn't work unless we got rid of Castro.
So we asked ourselves, uh,
"Who else wants Castro dead?"
The Mafia or money people?
So we put together Track Two.
First assassination attempt was in '60.
- Just before the election.
- Before? Eisenhower approved that?
Yeah. Well, he didn't veto it.
I ran the White House side, and the Mob contact was Johnny Roselli.
One of the CIA guys was this jackass,
Howard Hunt.
- Jesus.
- Yeah.
Not just Howard Hunt, but Frank Sturgis and all those other Cubans.
All of them in the Watergate.
They're all involved in Cuba.
Yeah, Hunt reported to my military aide.
I don't know how much Hunt knows or the Cubans, but...
...you never know.
So you wanted Castro dead.
Everybody wanted Castro dead.
You know, if Hunt and the others are CIA...
...why don't we just dump this back in the CIA's lap,
- let Dick Helms take the fall?
- Because...
Because Helms knows too much.
If there's anyone in this country who knows more than me, it's Hoover and Helms, and you don't fuck with Dick Helms, period.
All right. But why, if Kennedy was so clean in all this,
- didn't he cancel Track Two?
- 'Cause he didn't even know about it.
The CIA, uh, never told him.
They just kept it going.
It had a life of its own like it was some...
...kind of a thing, you know?
It doesn't even know it exists.
It just eats people when it doesn't need 'em anymore.
Two days after the Bay of Pigs,
Kennedy called me and he reamed me out.
- He just found out about Track Two.
- You never told him?
I didn't want him to get the credit.
He said I'd stabbed him in the back and called me a two-bit grocery clerk from Whittier.
That's the last time I ever saw him.
See, when I saw Bobby lying there on the floor, arms stretched out like that, his eyes staring...
...I knew then I'd be president.
His death paved the way, didn't it?
Yeah. Vietnam, the Kennedys cleared a path through the wilderness just for me.
Over the bodies.
Four bodies.
You mean two.
Two bodies.
Four.
How many did you have?
Hundreds of thousands?
Where would we be without death, huh?
Abe?
Who's helping us?
Is it God, or is it...
...death?
Harold.
Harold, why don't you sit down, huh?
Here.
That was a whopper.
You'll be able to do it now.
- What?
- Go to law school.
- Mom and Dad'll be able to afford it.
- Harold.
Mama expects great things from you.
Can I... Can I get you anything?
Relax, Dick.
It's just me, all right?
The desert's so beautiful, isn't it?
I want to go home, Dick.
Time to go home.
You... You're not gonna quit on me now, are you, Harold?
Richard.
- I can't.
- You must.
This law school, it's a gift from thy brother.
He had to die for me to get it?
Something has to come of this.
It's meant to make us stronger.
Thee art stronger than Harold, stronger than Arthur.
- God has chosen thee to survive.
- What about happiness, Mother?
Thee will find thy peace at the center, Richard.
Strength in this life, happiness in the next.
Now tell me you didn't want this, Buddy.
Hey!
When the strongest nation in the world can be tied down for four years in a war in Vietnam with no end in sight, when the richest nation in the world can't manage its own economy, when the nation with the greatest tradition of the rule of law is plagued by unprecedented lawlessness, when a nation that has been known for a century for equality of opportunity is torn by unprecedented racial violence, when the president of the United States cannot travel abroad or to any major city at home without fear of a hostile demonstration, then it is time for new leadership for the United States of America.
As we look at America, we see cities enveloped in smoke and flame, millions of Americans crying out in anguish,
"Did we come all the way for this?
Did American boys die in Normandy and Valley Forge for this?"
I pledge to you that the current wave of violence will not be the wave of the future.
Now let us begin by committing ourselves to the truth, to find the truth, to speak the truth and to live the truth.
A new voice is being heard across America today.
It is not the voice of the protesters or the shouters.
It is the quiet voice of the majority of Americans who've been forgotten, the non-shouters, the, uh, non-demonstrators.
They're the good people. They work hard and they save and they pay their taxes.
Now, who are they?
Let me tell you who they are.
They're in this audience by the thousands.
They're the white Americans and black Americans,
Mexican Americans and Italian Americans.
They're the great silent majority, and they have become angry, finally.
Angry, not with hate, but angry, my friends, because they love America and they don't like what's happened to America these last four years.
Let us understand North Vietnam cannot defeat or humiliate the United States.
Only Americans can do that!
I say to you tonight...
I say to you tonight we must have a new feeling of responsibility, of self-discipline. We must look to renew state and local government.
We must have a complete reform of a big, bloated federal government.
Those of us in public service know we can have full prosperity in peacetime.
Yes, we can cut the defense budget.
We can reduce, uh, conventional forces in Europe.
We can restore the natural environment.
We can improve health care, make it more available to all people.
And yes, we can have a complete reform of this government.
We can have a new American revolution!
The whole world is watching!
The whole world is watching!
It'd be a disaster.
There's a lot of sympathy out there for Cambodia.
Tiny, little, neutral Buddhist country.
They'll be rioting in the streets, on your front lawn!
Building the Cambodian army up? That would be harder than a Vietnamese Army.
They have no tradition. Mr. President, the government there will collapse.
- So you're saying do nothing.
- No, sir, continue the bombing.
The same old horseshit.
Well, that's not good enough.
I'm sick of being pushed around by the Vietnamese like we're some, uh, you know, pitiful giant.
They're using our POWs to humiliate us.
What we need now is a bold move into Cambodia and go right after their
VC base camps and, uh... make 'em scream, hit 'em in the ass.
- What do you think, Henry?
- Well, as you know, most of my staff have weighed in against this incursion.
They believe it will fail to achieve anything fundamental militarily and will result in crushing criticism domestically.
I didn't ask what your staff thinks.
What do you think, Henry?
What I think is they're cowards.
Their opposition represents the cowardice of the eastern establishment.
They don't realize, as you do, sir, that the Communists only respect strength and they will only negotiate in good faith if they fear the mad man, Richard Nixon.
Exactly!
Unpredictability is our best asset.
We gotta take the war to 'em, hit 'em where it hurts, right in the nuts.
- More assassinations. Right, Al?
- That's what they're doing.
See, your people in the State
Department, Bill, they don't understand.
- Mr. President...
- Electrify people with bold moves.
Bold moves make history.
Like, uh... Teddy Roosevelt, TR, rushing up San Juan Hill.
Small event, but dramatic.
- People took notice.
- They'll take notice, all right.
If we sneak out of this war, another will start a mile down the road.
We bite the bullet here in Cambodia.
There.
We bomb the hell out of these people.
Tonight, American and South Vietnamese units will attack the headquarters for the entire Communist military operation in South Vietnam.
This is not an invasion of Cambodia.
We take this action not for the purpose of expanding the war into Cambodia, but for the purpose of ending the war in Vietnam.
All across the nation,
major student protests against the U.S. invasion
of Cambodia rocked college campuses.
At Jackson State, two Negro students were killed and ten were wounded.
- ...unanimously and united behind...
- In the streets of New York,
protesters were attacked by construction workers
supporting President Nixon's policies.
In Washington, protesters have barricaded the White House
and are camping out at the Lincoln Memorial.
See, when I think of those kids out there in Vietnam doing their duty, uh, I bet they were scared.
I was when I was there.
But when it comes down to it, you really have to look up to these men because they're the greatest.
I mean, you see these bums, you know, blowing up the campuses, burning books and so forth.
And they call themselves
"flower children."
I call them spoiled rotten.
And I tell you what would cure them.
A good, old-fashioned trip to my Ohio father's woodshed. Right, Julie?
- Right, Dad.
- That's what these bums need.
- Well, thanks and congratulations.
- Thank you, sir.
Yeah. OK. Thanks, everybody. Bye.
The whole world is watching.
Less than 24 hours after
President Nixon called them bums,
Less than 24 hours after
President Nixon called them bums,
four students were shot dead at Kent State University in Ohio.
Enraged student groups are calling
for a general strike tomorrow to shut down...
I tell you, the soldiers were provoked.
Now, stop this pussyfooting around.
Jesus Christ, dead kids.
How the hell did we give the Democrats a weapon like this?
Well, one way or the other,
Kent State is not good.
- We have to get out in front of this.
- Follow the money.
- Sir?
- These kids are manipulated by the Communists, like Chambers and Hiss.
What's the matter with you?
- This isn't '48. They'll never buy it.
- How do you know that, John?
What's Hoover found, for God's sake?
He called the other day, sir.
He asked for President Harding.
- We can have a national prayer day.
- Never complain, never explain.
Come on, these are not fraternity pranks, John.
No, this is anarchy.
It's a revolution.
- I wouldn't go that far, sir.
- Why not?
Well, is it worth it, sir? I mean, is the war worth a one-term presidency?
Right now I think that's what we're looking at.
I will not go down as the first
American president to lose a war.
Going to Cambodia, bombing Hanoi, bombing Laos buys us time so we can get out and give the South Vietnamese a chance.
- Exactly, sir.
- If we keep our heads, we'll win this.
- What, win Vietnam, sir?
- No, no.
No, but we can drive a stake through the heart of the Communist alliance.
Henry's getting strong signals from the Chinese.
They fear the Vietnamese more than the Russians and they're worried about a united Vietnam.
Now, if we stick it out, we'll end up negotiating separately with both the Chinese and the Soviets.
And we'll get better deals than we ever dreamed of from both.
- That is triangular diplomacy.
- Exactly, Mr. President.
That's what geopolitics is about.
The linking of the whole world for self-interest.
You tell me, Ron, how the hell I can explain that on TV to a bunch of simpleminded reporters and, uh, weeping mothers.
But what am I telling the press
- about Kent State?
- Tell 'em what the hell you like.
- They don't understand anyway.
- Excuse me, sir.
Are you saying you're gonna recognize Red China?
That would cost us our strongest support.
No, I can do this because
I spent my whole career
- building anti-Communist credentials.
- If Kennedy or Johnson tried it, they'd have crucified them, and rightfully so.
Damned risky, Mr. President.
Why don't we wait until the second term?
- This will get us a second term.
- This will get me a second term.
Damn it, without risk, there's no heroism, there's no history.
Nixon was born to do this.
Give history a nudge.
- Come on!
- Hear, hear.
If Cambodia doesn't work, we'll bomb Hanoi if we have to.
That's right.
And if necessary, I'll drop the big one.
We have to entertain the possibility.
Goddamn it! Who cooked this damn steak?
Manolo, there's blood all over my plate.
Take it away.
I'm sorry, sir.
You all right?
Yeah.
My brother, Harold, was the same age as those kids, John.
- Tuberculosis got him.
- It wasn't your fault.
The soldiers were kids too.
They just panicked.
Yeah.
They were throwing rocks,
John, just rocks.
They don't think I feel, but I feel too much sometimes.
I just can't let a whole policy be dominated by our sentimentality.
You're doing the right thing.
Don't let 'em shake you.
You know, it broke my heart when Harold died.
That was a long time ago.
Yeah.
I think that's when it starts, when you're a kid.
The laughs and snubs and slights you get because you're poor or Irish or Jewish or just ugly.
Get off that. That leads nowhere.
But you should offer condolences to the families of those kids.
Sure.
I'd like to.
I'd like to offer my condolences.
But Nixon can't.
Enraged student groups across the country
are calling for a general strike tomorrow
to shut down the entire university system until the Vietnam War is ended.
Oh, this is nothing compared to Venezuela.
When I was vice president, Ike sent me down there like a blocking tackle.
They threw rocks, broke out windows.
Almost overturned the car.
Read Six Crises, Bob.
- I did, sir.
- Pat was brave.
Jesus, they're serious.
Why are we stopping? Come on, move it!
- Jesus!
- Get that little punk!
Tackle! Go on, get him!
Yeah!
Yeah. Reminds me of my days at Whittier.
- These kids are useless.
- Probably flunking.
Nothing to do except come here and chase girls.
Their parents' fault.
They're poisoning the upper class, Bob.
- Too soft, too many cars, color TVs.
- Don't forget the South, the West.
Good football colleges.
More with than against you.
Let's not forget they're just kids.
They don't vote.
This is the fall of the Roman Empire.
Are you blind?
We're putting the fig leaves on the statues.
Mr. President.
- Bob.
- I don't know what to say, sir.
Soon as we learned from the Secret
Service that you were en route, the director was notified.
He should be here.
- So where the hell is he?
- Rushing back from his tennis game.
- So let's go.
- Told me to take you
- to his conference room.
- No, his office.
I want a private conversation with him.
I don't wanna be bugged.
- Then his office will be fine.
- OK.
All right.
- How's the job going, Bob?
- Frankly, it stinks, sir.
I have no access.
- We'll see to that.
- He's nervous, sir.
He's heard you're looking for a new director.
- Certainly isn't acting like it.
- That's Helms.
He's the epitome of sang-froid.
A world-class poker player.
Yeah? Well, I own the fucking casino.
I'm honored, Dick, that you've come all the way out here to Virginia to visit us at last.
- My friends call me Mr. President.
- Then so shall I.
- Mr. Helms.
- Arrange for some coffee, will you, General Cushman?
Gentleman, please.
Bob Cushman is a lieutenant general in the Marine Corps, deputy director of the CIA.
- This is what you use him for?
- I didn't choose him as my deputy.
- You did.
- You live pretty well out here.
I understand why you keep your budgets classified.
I suppose you're unhappy...
...because I haven't implemented your domestic intelligence plan.
Yeah, you're correct.
I'm concerned these students are being funded by foreign interests whether they know it or not.
The FBI's useless in this area.
I want your full attention on this matter.
We've tried, but so far we've come up with nothing.
Then find something!
I want these leaks stopped.
Jack Anderson, The New York Times, the State Department.
- I wanna know who's talking.
- I'm sure you realize that this is a tricky area, given our charter and the Congressional oversight committee.
Screw congressional oversight.
I know damn well, going back to the '50s this agency reports what it wants and buries what it wants.
- Pay close attention to this.
- Is something else bothering you?
Yes.
It involves some old and forgotten papers...
...things I signed as vice president.
I want the original in my office and I don't want copies anywhere else.
You're referring, I believe, to chairing the special operations group
- as vice president.
- Yeah.
As you know, that was unique.
Not an operation so much as an organic phenomenon.
It grew, it changed shape, it developed appetites.
It's not unusual in such cases that things aren't committed to paper.
That could be very embarrassing.
I, for one, saw to it that my name was never connected with these operations.
Diem.
Trujillo.
Lumumba.
Guatemala.
Iran.
Cuba.
It's a shame you didn't take similar precautions, Dick.
I'm interested in those documents that put your people together with the gangster elements.
- All the documents.
- President Kennedy threatened to smash the CIA into 1,000 pieces.
You could do the same.
I'm not Jack Kennedy. Uh...
- Your agency is secure.
- Not if I give you all the cards.
I promised the American people peace with honor in Southeast Asia.
That may take time.
Two, maybe three years.
But, in the meantime, your agency will continue at current levels of funding.
Current levels may not be sufficient.
Well, the president will support a reasonable request for an increase.
And me?
Of course, you will continue as DCI, Dick.
You're doing a magnificent job.
Of course, I accept. I'm flattered.
And I want you to know that
I serve only one president at a time.
Yes. And you'll give
General Cushman full access.
It could take a little time.
But I'll order a search for your papers.
- Good.
- It does raise...
- ...a troubling issue.
- What?
Castro.
- Yes?
- We have recent intelligence that a Soviet nuclear submarine
- has docked at Cienfuegos.
- We'll launch a formal protest.
I don't think we can treat this as a formality.
Mr. Kennedy gave the Russians a verbal promise that he would not invade Cuba.
But you authorized Dr. Kissinger to put this in writing?
- Are you tapping Kissinger?
- My job, unpleasant at times, is to know what others don't want me to know.
Not if you have spies in the White House.
It is not my practice to spy on the president.
Dr. Kissinger manages to convey his innermost secrets to the world without my help.
Dick...
We've lived with communism in Cuba for ten years.
But it's never been the policy of this government to accept that.
- And it's certainly not CIA policy.
- CIA policy?
The CIA has no policy except what I dictate to you.
I tried to, uh, adjust to the world as it is today, not as you or I wanted it to be ten years ago.
Is that why you and Kissinger are negotiating with the Chinese?
This is a very dangerous direction,
Mr. President.
Terrible consequences can result from such enormous errors of judgment.
If we were able to separate
China from Russia once and for all, we can, we could create a balance of power that would secure peace into the next century.
And offer Cuba to the Russians as a consolation prize?
- Cuba would be a small price to pay.
- So President Kennedy thought.
I never thought Kennedy was ready for the presidency.
Well, now...
...I would never, uh...
...never consider...
His death was awful.
It was an awful thing for this country.
Yeah.
Do you ever think of death, Dick?
Flowers are a continual reminder of our mortality.
- Do you appreciate flowers?
- No.
No, they make me sick and they smell like death.
I had two brothers die young.
Let me tell you, there are worse things than death.
Yes.
There's such a thing as evil.
You must be familiar with my favorite poem by Yeats,
The Second Coming.
Black Irish, very moving.
Turning and turning in the widening gyre
The falcon cannot hear the falconer
Things fall apart
The center cannot hold
Mere anarchy is loosed upon the world
And everywhere, the ceremony of innocence is lost
The best lack all conviction
And the worst are full of passionate intensity
But it ends so beautifully ominous.
What rough beast
Its hour come round at last
Slouches toward Bethlehem to be born?
Yes.
This country stands at such a juncture.
Manolo?
Mano?
- Mr. President.
- Yeah.
I'm sorry. I was asleep.
What can I get you?
- Well, you know.
- Of course.
Do you miss Cuba, Manolo?
Yes, Mr. President.
We let you down, didn't we?
Your people.
That was Mr. Kennedy, sir.
You don't think he was a hero, do you?
He was a politician.
Did you cry when he died?
Yes, sir.
Why?
I don't know.
He made me...
...see the stars.
How did he do that?
Those kids.
Why do they hate me so much?
Hi, I'm Dick Nixon.
Hi, there.
- Where you from?
- Syracuse.
Oh, yeah, the, uh, Orangemen.
Now, there's a football program.
Jim Brown and that other tailback,
- the one with the blood disease.
- Ernie Davis.
Yeah, right, right, right.
I used to play a little ball myself at Whittier.
Of course, they used to use me as a tackling dummy.
We didn't come here to talk about football.
Yeah, I understand that.
- How old are you, young lady?
- Nineteen.
Yeah.
Well, probably most of you think
I'm a real SOB. I know that.
I understand how you feel.
But, you know,
I want peace too.
But peace with honor.
- What does that mean?
- Bullshit.
Well, you can't have peace without a price.
Sometimes you have to be willing to fight for peace, and sometimes to die.
Yeah? Tell that to the GIs who are gonna die tomorrow in Vietnam.
- What lets you kill women and children?
- What you have to understand is we're willing to die for what we believe in.
- That's the truth.
- Yeah.
Yeah.
Look, that man up there, he lived in similar times.
Oh, he had chaos, civil war, hatred between the races.
- This is all bullshit.
- Sometimes I go to the Lincoln Room at the White House and just pray.
But, you know, liberals act like idealism belongs to them.
That's not true.
My family went Republican because Lincoln freed the slaves.
My grandmother was an abolitionist.
It was Quakers who founded Whittier, my hometown...
- Address the issues.
- ...to abolish slavery.
They were, you know, conservative Bible folk, but they had a powerful sense of right and wrong.
Forty years ago,
I was like you.
- Looking for answers. See?
- Come on.
Tricky Dick himself.
My mother used to feed hobos stopping over at our house.
We got him.
- Don't push, pig.
- Move away.
It's OK, Bob, we're just rapping, my friends and I.
In fact, we agree on a lot of things, don't we?
No, we don't.
You say you want to end the war,
- so why don't you?
- Change always comes slowly.
I pulled out more than half the troops.
I'm trying to cut the military budget for the first time in 30 years.
I want a volunteer army.
But it's also a question of American credibility.
- Our position in the world.
- Come on, Mr. Nixon.
- It's a civil war between Vietnamese.
- You don't want the war.
We don't want the war.
The Vietnamese don't want the war.
So why does it go on?
- You should be going, Mr. President.
- OK.
Please.
You can't stop it, can you?
Even if you wanted to.
'Cause it's not you, it's the system.
The system won't let you stop it.
There's... There's more at stake here than what you want or what I want.
Then what's the point?
What's the point of being president?
You're powerless!
No! No, I'm not powerless.
Because I understand the system,
I believe I can...
I can control it, maybe not control it totally, but tame it enough to make it do some good.
Sounds like you're talking about a wild animal.
Yeah, maybe I am.
We really must go,
Mr. President. Please.
- Hey, what about the war, man?
- When you gonna get us out?
- The old man's moving.
- Move it. Get away.
She got it, Bob.
Nineteen-year-old college kid.
- What? Who?
- She understood something that's taken me 25 years in politics to understand.
The CIA, the Mafia, those Wall Street bastards.
- Sir?
- The beast.
Nineteen-year-old kid.
She called it a wild animal.
Yes, sir.
In Washington, the size of the crowds have swelled to over
a quarter of a million demonstrators protesting the ongoing war in Vietnam.
There must be a quarter million out there.
They've been at it for a whole year.
Young kids just like Tricia.
You think they got a point, Edgar?
- This whole damn system of government.
- Remember what Lenin said in 1917.
The power was lying in the street.
Just waiting for someone to pick it up.
Communists have never been closer than now.
Now is the time to get back to the old themes.
The ones that made you president.
Let the communists know you're on to them.
Little bastards think they can ruin Tricia's wedding by dancing naked in the reflection pool.
Don't listen to 'em.
And don't quit.
Remember, Kennedy and King were against the war.
Where are they now?
How the hell The Times got a hold of this Ellsberg stuff is a disgrace.
Yeah. We can't keep a damn secret in this government.
They're stealing papers right out of this office.
Johnson had the same damn problem
- until he bugged his own office.
- We took that system out.
That was a mistake.
The White House was full of Kennedy people then.
- It still is.
- Who's behind this?
Well, you have CIA people all over this place.
Helms has seen to that.
Then there's Kissinger's staff.
Kissinger himself, I believe, may be the leaker.
- Kissinger?
- Hmm.
He's obsessed with his own image.
He wants his Nobel Peace Prize a little too much.
And as the late Dr. King proved, even an ape can win a prize with good press.
Jesus, I'd like to book him into a psychiatrist's office.
He comes in here ranting and raving, dumping his crap all over the place.
- Could you prove it, Edgar?
- Mr. President,
I always get my man.
Yeah, you do.
This damn tie. Could you help me?
Yeah.
- See, I'd be bugging myself.
- Look.
- Who'd get the tapes?
- No one. Your property.
And it would prove your case.
Why do you think Kissinger is taping all your calls?
For history.
His word against yours.
And right now, he's got the records.
I'll get Manolo to do this.
Thanks.
You know, Churchill once said to me,
"If you want your own history written properly, you better write it yourself."
The only thing is, Edgar,
I don't want this to come back and haunt me.
It won't, as long as I'm here.
Good.
This way.
What's wrong?
We're just not going to buckle to these people.
No more war!
- It's beautiful.
- OK.
Yes, thank you.
Princess, may I?
Thank you.
I'm very proud of you today,
Princess. Very.
Thank you, Daddy.
Yeah?
Some very secret essays on Vietnam have been leaked to The New York Times.
I know, I know. Not now, Chuck.
- The New York Times.
- Get Ron over here.
It's the happiest day of my life.
The New York Times began publishing the first in a series
of 47 volumes of top-secret Pentagon tapes relating to the war in Vietnam.
The papers, leaked by defense analyst
Daniel Ellsberg,
reveal a pattern of government lies and American involvement in the war.
Mr. President, we are in a revolutionary situation.
We are under siege.
The Black Panthers, the Weathermen.
The State Department under Rogers is leaking like a sieve.
And now this little, insignificant little shit, Ellsberg, publishing all the diplomatic secrets of this country is destroying our ability to conduct foreign policy.
I wonder if people here wouldn't think ten years in prison was cheap if they could contribute to ending this war.
The man has become a drug fiend. He shot people from helicopters in Vietnam.
He's had sexual relations with his wife in front of their children.
He sees a shrink in LA.
The man's all fucked up.
And now he's trying to look good for the liberals.
And if he gets away with it, everybody will follow his lead.
- This man must be stopped at all costs.
- I'm as frustrated as you are, Henry, but don't you think this is a Democrat problem? They started the war.
- It makes them look bad.
- But, Mr. President, the Russians, the Vietnamese... it makes you look like a weakling!
Goddamn it. How long have we had this jackass dog? Two years?
Still doesn't come. We need a dog that looks happy when the press is here.
- He's photogenic. Try new biscuits.
- Ah, fuck it.
He doesn't like me, John.
It's your fault, Henry.
- I beg your pardon?
- It's your people talking to the press.
This Ellsberg, wasn't he a student of yours at Harvard?
I mean, he's your idea, Henry.
So why are you running for cover?
Yes, we taught a class together at Harvard, but you know these back-stabbing
Ivy League intellectuals.
- No, I don't, Henry.
- Prosecute The New York Times.
- Go for injunction.
- Yeah, but it's not, bottom line, gonna change a goddamn thing, John.
The... question is how do we screw Ellsberg so bad, it puts the fear of God into all leakers?
The other issue is how the hell we stop these leaks once and for all?
Now, someone is talking to the press.
We gotta stop these leaks at any cost.
You hear me?
Then we can go for the big pick:
- China, Russia.
- Sir, if I might?
- Go, Chuck.
- We can do this ourselves.
The CIA and the FBI aren't doing the job.
Now, we can create our own intelligence unit right here inside the White House.
- Well, why not?
- Our own intelligence plugs the leaks?
- Yeah. Like plumbers.
- Plumbers.
I like it. I like the idea.
Yeah, but is it legal?
Has it ever been done before?
Oh, sure.
Lyndon, JFK, FDR.
I mean, Truman cut the shit out of my investigation of the Hiss case in '48.
- What he did was illegal.
- With this kind of thing, you got to be brutal. A leak happens, the whole damn place should be fired.
Really, I mean, you do it like the Germans in World War II.
They went through these towns, and a sniper hit one of 'em, they'd line the whole goddamn town up and say,
"Until you talk, you're all getting shot."
Really, I think that's what has to be done.
I don't think you can be Mr. Nice Guy anymore.
You just whisper the word to me, and I'll shoot Ellsberg myself.
- We're not Germans.
- Yeah. Ellsberg's not the issue.
The Pentagon Papers aren't the issue.
It's the lie.
- Mr. Hiss is lying.
- Yeah.
Remember, John, back in '48?
Nobody believed Alger Hiss was a communist except me.
They loved Hiss like they love this Ellsberg character.
He was their kind:
Ivy League establishment.
- l am not, and never have been...
- Mr. Hiss is lying.
- Mr. Hiss?
- I was dirt to them, nothing.
- And Dick kicked the shit out of 'em.
- I wouldn't have if Hiss hadn't lied about knowing Chambers. The documents were old and out of date, just like these Pentagon Papers.
The key thing we proved was that Hiss was a liar.
Then people bought that he was a spy.
It's the lie that gets you.
All right, Henry, we're gonna go your way.
Crush this Ellsberg same way we did Hiss.
There is no other choice,
Mr. President.
We'll hit him so hard, he'll look like everything that's sick and evil about the eastern establishment.
You and your plumbers, you get all the dirt on this guy.
See him going to the bathroom in front of the public.
And when we finish with him, they'll crucify him.
Then we'll get our second term.
The claws are out, Frank.
- You seen the guys?
- They're around.
Why? You got a customer?
- The White House.
- You're fuckin' me.
We're gonna be plumbers, Frank.
We're gonna plug leaks.
- Who are we workin' for?
- A guy named Gordon Liddy.
He thinks he's Martin Bormann.
He wants to meet you.
- Gordon Liddy, Frank Sturgis.
- Hey, Frank.
Did you see the look on
Hoover's face? He's redder than a beet.
That little closet fairy's got no choice.
He hates McGovern and Kennedy so much, he's gotta love me.
- And Lyndon?
- He looked old, didn't he?
- Have you talked to Lyndon?
- I asked, "Lyndon, what would you do on a scale of one to ten?" He said,
"Bomb the shit out of Hanoi, boy.
Bomb them where they live."
Yeah. Bob, tell Trini I'll be in Key Biscayne at 4:00.
- With Pat?
- No, alone.
Pat's staying here with Mrs. Eisenhower.
- Yes, sir.
- Good.
Hi, Buddy. What are you doing here?
I missed you.
Why don't we go down to Key Biscayne together?
Because I have to relax.
You know, I was just thinking tonight.
Remember when you used to drive me on dates with other boys?
- Yeah.
- Didn't let me out of your sight.
Yeah. Sure.
It was a long time ago.
Yes, it's been a long time.
Now, look, Buddy.
I don't need that.
I'm not Jack Kennedy.
No, you're not.
So stop comparing yourself to him.
You have no reason to.
You have everything you ever wanted.
You earned it.
- Why can't you just enjoy it?
- I do.
- I do in my own way.
- Then what are you scared of, honey?
I'm not scared, Buddy.
You don't understand.
They're playing for keeps, Buddy.
You know, the press, the kids, the liberals out there.
They're out there trying to figure out how to tear me down.
- They're all your enemies?
- Yes.
- You, personally?
- Yes!
Listen, this is about me.
Why can't you understand that?
I mean, you of all people.
It's not the war. It's Nixon!
It's not Vietnam, it's Nixon.
They want to destroy Nixon.
If I expose myself just the slightest bit, they'll tear my insides out.
You want that? You know?
You want to see that, Buddy?
It's not pretty!
Sometimes I think that's what you want, Dick.
What the hell are you saying?
Are you drunk?
Jesus, you sound just like them now.
I gotta keep fighting, Buddy, for the country.
These people running things, the elite!
They're just soft, chicken-shit faggots.
They don't have the long-term vision anymore.
They just want to cover their ass and meet girls and tear each other down.
Oh, God, this country's in deep, deep, deep trouble, Buddy.
I have to see this through, you know.
Mother would have expected no less of me.
I'm sorry, Buddy.
I just wish you knew how much I love you, that's all.
It took me a long time to fall in love with you, Dick, but I did.
And it doesn't make you happy.
- You want them to love you.
- No, I don't.
- I'm not Jack Kennedy.
- They never will, Dick.
No matter how many elections you win, they never will.
Gentlemen, the president.
Gentlemen, this is our last damn leak.
It's no way to run a goddamn government.
We're gonna prosecute Ellsberg and anyone else who wants to leak and that means anyone here who crosses the line, I'm going after.
OK? The permissiveness of this year is over.
The belts are coming off and people are gonna go to the woodshed.
'Cause the government cannot survive with a counter-government inside it.
I know how traitors operate.
I've dealt with them all my life.
I've worked with these cases.
It's never little people.
The little people do not leak.
It's always some smooth son of a bitch like Ellsberg.
The Harvard Hebrew boys who leak.
I hear people say, "But Ellsberg did it for the good of the country.
People's right to know."
Well, that's in every case.
Alger Hiss said the same thing.
So did the Rosenbergs.
Look what happened to them.
Old Sparky got 'em.
They always underestimated old Nixon, see.
We're gonna fight just as dirty.
This is sudden death, gentlemen.
We're gonna get 'em on the ground, stick in our spikes and twist and show them no mercy.
So, uh, starting today, no one in this room talks to the press without checking with Mr. Haldeman here.
That means we're on complete freeze on The New York Times, CBS,
PBS, Jack Anderson and The Washington Post.
Mr. Haldeman is the chief high executioner from now on.
Don't come whining to me when he tells you to do something. That's me talking.
If you do come to me,
I'm tougher than he is.
Anyone who screws with us, his fucking head comes off.
You got that?
Well, thank you very much, gentlemen.
Good day to you.
History will never be the same.
We've taken a step into the future.
We have changed the world.
- Five, ten.
- What else you got?
I must say, you look very good,
Mr. Chairman.
Looks can be deceiving.
We know what risks you've taken in inviting us here.
I took no risk.
I am too old to be afraid of what anyone thinks.
Don't ever trust them.
They never tell the truth or honor their commitments.
Vietnamese are like Russians.
Both are dogs.
Mr. Chairman, there's an old saying in my country:
The enemy of my enemy is my friend.
That has the added virtue of being true.
Your writings have changed the world, Mr. Chairman.
Bullshit.
My writings mean absolutely nothing.
- I want to know your secret.
- My secret, Mr. Chairman?
How a fat man gets so many girls.
Power, Mr. Chairman, is the ultimate aphrodisiac.
You know,
I voted for you in your last election.
I was the, uh, lesser of two evils.
You are too modest,
Mr. Nixon.
You are as evil as I am.
We are the new emperors.
We are both from poor families and others pay to feed the hunger in us.
In my case, millions of reactionaries.
In your case, millions of Vietnamese.
Civil war is always the cruelest kind of war, but our two nations were forged by revolution.
The United States, China.
Peace? Is peace all you're interested in?
The real war is in us.
History is a symptom of our disease.
In a surprise Christmas bombing of Hanoi,
President Nixon delivered more tonnage
than was used at Dresden in World War II.
It is without doubt the most brutal bombing in American history.
Newspapers are calling it a Stone Age tactic
and Nixon a maddened tyrant.
Nixon's response:
"When the Vietnamese take the Paris peace talks seriously, I'll stop."
A penny for your thoughts.
Just think of the...
Think of the life Mao's led.
In '52, I... I called him a monster.
Now he could be our most important ally.
Only Nixon could've done that.
You're a long way from Whittier.
Yep. Yes, I am.
Congratulations, Dick.
- Mr. Ziegler.
- Mr. President, the press guys asked if you could come back.
- The hell with them.
- I'll go back, Mr. President.
No, they want you, Mr. President.
I, uh...
I think it would be a good move.
- Who's back there?
- Everybody.
OK.
Gentlemen, I go now to discover the exact length, width and depth of the shaft.
Ladies and gentlemen, the president.
- Hi.
- Hi.
- Mr. President...
- Congratulations, sir.
- Well done!
- Thank you, sir!
Well, it looks to me like we're gonna lose a war for the first goddamn time.
- Yep.
- You're goin' right along with it, buyin' into this Kissinger bullshit, this... detente with Communists.
Detente. Sounds like a couple of fags dancin'.
Jack, we're not living in the same country you and I knew in '46.
Our people are just not gonna sacrifice in major numbers for war.
Can't even get 'em to accept cuts in their gas tax.
Now, the Arabs and the Japanese are draining the gold reserves...
Whose fault is that?
If we'd won in Vietnam, we wouldn't be having this conversation.
Nobody's fault, Jack. It's, uh, change.
It's a fact of history.
Even that old cocksucker
J. Edgar Hoover's dead.
Now who'd have thought that possible?
How's the food over there in China,
Mr. Nixon?
It's delicious, if you're president.
So, what are you gonna do about that Allende fella nationalizing our businesses in Chile?
You gonna send Kissinger down there?
We're gonna get rid of him, Allende,
I mean, just as fast as we can.
- He's at the top of the list.
- How about Kissinger along with him?
Now, Kissinger's misunderstood.
He acts like a liberal for his establishment friends,
- but he's even tougher than I am.
- So Kissinger stays.
Just like Castro, Mr. Nixon.
Yeah. He stays.
And you are comfortable with that decision?
Desi's got a point.
What the hell are we gonna do about the Communists in our own backyard?
What do you really mean, Jack?
I mean, I got federal price controls on my oil.
And the rag heads are beatin' the shit out of me, Dick.
And your EPA environmental agency has got its thumb so far up my ass,
- it's scratchin' my ear!
- I think it's time for us to be...
- Let him finish, Bob.
- I got a federal judge orderin' me to bus my grandkids halfway across this town to go to school with nigger kids.
Now, Dick, Mr. President, aren't you forgetting who put you where you are?
The American people put me where I am, Jack.
Really?
- Well, that can be changed.
- In a heartbeat.
Jack, I've learned politics is the art of compromise.
I learned it the hard way.
I don't know if you have.
Well, let me tell you this, Jack.
If you don't like it, there's an election in November and you can take your money out in the open and give it to Wallace.
How about it, Jack? Willing to do that?
Hand this country over to some pansy poet socialist like George McGovern?
'Cause if you're not happy with the EPA up your ass, try the IRS.
Goddamn, Dick.
- You're not threatening me, are ya?
- Presidents don't threaten, Jack.
They don't have to.
Good day to you, gentlemen. Thank you.
With third party candidate
George Wallace out of the race,
paralyzed by an assassin's bullet,
Richard Nixon has crushed George McGovern
in the 1972 presidential election.
It is the second-biggest landslide in American history.
As the new term begins,
it does not seem the Watergate investigations have damaged Nixon
politically in any significant way.
Probably our biggest achievement as an administration, when it's all said and done, isn't China or Russia.
It's pulling out of Vietnam without a right-wing revolt.
- I believe you're right.
- The presidency isn't enough anymore.
- Sir?
- The presidency by itself won't protect us, Bob.
We're beyond politics now.
- Mr. Ehrlichman.
- Yeah.
Sir, just in from Paris. The Vietnamese have accepted Henry's peace proposal.
- Good.
- The bombing worked. They're caving.
Congratulations!
That mad bomber theory wasn't so crazy after all.
Henry is coming back to join us.
He wants to be included in the photographs, of course.
- There's a surprise.
- This could be it.
This could be it. Four long years. Jeez.
Incidentally, I don't know if this is the right time, but you should know.
Bill Sullivan at the FBI got back to us with his report on Kissinger.
- I didn't wanna bring it up because...
- Go on.
Well, Sullivan, uh, thinks he's the one.
Henry's the leaker.
Yeah, I knew it.
I knew it from '69 on and I said it all along.
- I remember.
- I didn't, Bob.
Looks like he talked to Joe Kraft and The Times.
Claims that he was dead set against the bombing, that you were unstable and that, uh, he has to handle you with kid gloves.
That explains his press notices.
Working both sides of the fence.
Jew-boy Henry.
My God.
- He talked to The New York Times?
- Yes, he did.
We ought a fire his whining ass right now, when he's on top.
You know what? It'd set the right example for the this administration.
I would personally volunteer for that assignment right now.
No. No.
He's our only star right now.
He'd go crying to the press.
He'd crucify us.
Son of a bitch.
Get someone on our staff on his ass.
Tap his phones.
I wanna know everyone he talks to.
Let's see how long the Kissinger mystique lasts.
So, John, what about these Watergate clowns?
This, uh, Sirica's crazy.
Thirty-five year sentence.
No weapons, right? No injuries.
There's no success.
It's just ridiculous.
Sirica's just trying to force someone to testify, but they're solid.
What about this Washington Post crap?
Woodwind and Fernstein.
- Bernstein, sir.
- Who the fuck are they, anyway?
Bob, you working on revoking their television license?
- Yes, sir, I am.
- Good.
Well, they're trying to connect
Bob and John with the secret fund.
- But they don't have much.
- They don't have anything.
The F.B.I.'s feeding me their reports.
I didn't think you should lose any more sleep over it, sir.
Good man, John, good man.
I can therefore announce that our long and tragic involvement in Vietnam...
...is at an end.
Our mission is accomplished.
We have a cease-fire...
...and our prisoners of war are coming back home.
South Vietnam has the right to determine its own future.
So, we have peace with honor.
The president will take some of your questions now.
- Mr. President!
- Dan.
Isn't it true little has been achieved that the Communists have not been offering since 1969, that in fact your administration has needlessly prolonged the war and escalated it to new levels of violence?
I will, uh... try to answer that question in some detail.
Mr. President!
What is your reaction to James McCord's statement that high-level White House officials were involved in the Watergate break-in?
That's the dumbest thing
I've ever heard.
The Washington Post is reporting that Mr. Haldeman and Ehrlichman secretly dispersed up to $900,000 in campaign funds.
Is there any truth to that?
Now, let me make this perfectly clear.
I will not respond to the charges of The Washington Post.
Nor will I comment on a matter that is currently before the courts.
- Mr. President!
- Sir!
Sir, do you intend to cooperate with Senator Ervin's committee?
Will you agree to the appointment of a special prosecutor?
- Mr. President, sir!
- Mr. President!
- Thank you.
- Mr. President!
Mr. President, sir...
Ron, get in there and do something!
I end the longest war in American history and they keep harping on this chicken-shit! God!
God!
You know who's behind this, don't you?
Teddy Kennedy.
Yeah, he drowns a broad in his car, and he can't run for president.
He did get pretty burned at Chappaquiddick.
My point exactly! Somebody had to die before he got his shit in the papers!
Fucking Kennedys get away with everything! Goddamn them!
You see me screwin' everything that moves?
For Christ's sake, I did what
The New York Times editorial page said for me to do!
I ended the war!
I got S.A.L.T. One with the Russians,
I opened China.
So why are these assholes turning on me?
'Cause they don't like the way I look, where I went to school!
- Because they're not Americans.
- They don't trust America.
Why would they?
They just come here to stick their snouts in the trough.
Who are these people? Sulzberger.
Their parents are gold traders from eastern Europe, with due respect.
They buy things.
They come to "Jew" York city and buy up things. And one of the things they buy,
Mr. President, is The New York Times.
You know what? You should be proud, because they'll never trust you, sir.
Because we speak for the average American.
You know why they're turning on me?
It's because they're not serious about power, that's why.
They're playing with power.
They're forgetting the national interest.
In the old days people knew how to hold power, how to set limits.
They wouldn't have torn this country apart over a third-rate burglary.
For Christ's sake, now all they care about are their egos, looking good at cocktail parties.
Beating out other papers and chasing girls.
Wondering whether someone said something nice about them.
Short-term, frivolous bullshit.
Ben Bradlee worrying about Teddy Kennedy liking him.
- Get Mr. Dean in here, Will you?
- Mr. President,
I fear we are drifting toward oblivion.
We are playing a totally reactive game.
We have to get ahead of the ball.
Now, we all know that you are clean.
Right?
Then let's take off the gloves.
Let's do a housecleaning.
Housecleaning?
No, it could be ugly, Henry, really ugly.
It must be done, sir.
Your government is paralyzed.
All kinds of shit could come out.
The Ellsberg thing.
You knew about that, didn't you, Henry?
Well, I heard something.
It sounded idiotic.
Idiotic.
Yeah, I suppose it was.
I thought it was your idea to expose Ellsberg as a sex fiend.
I guess somebody just took you too literally.
I never suggested a bunch of imbeciles break into a psychiatrist's office.
It doesn't matter. The point is you might lose your media darling halo if the media start sniffing around our dirty laundry.
Sir, I never had anything to do with that and I resent the implication...
Resent it all you want, Henry, but you're in with the rest of us.
Cambodia. Ellsberg.
The wiretaps you put in.
The president wants you to know you can't just click your heels and head back to Harvard Yard.
It's your ass too, Henry, and it's in the wind twisting with everyone else's.
- Sir.
- Yeah?
There are times when even the president can go too far.
You played it perfectly, sir.
That cocksucker'll think twice
- before he leaks again.
- Yeah.
He'll be looking in his toilet bowl every time he pulls the chain.
Hunt wants more money.
- Another 122,000.
- Fuck.
If he doesn't get it right away, he's going to blow us out of the water.
He means it. Since his wife died in the plane crash, he's over the edge.
Pay him. Pay him what he wants.
We gotta turn the faucet off on Hunt and these Cubans. They're out of control.
John, you might want to...
It's gotta be Helms. He's behind this.
- I think we can leverage Helms.
- How?
When I met with him, he kind of tipped his hand.
This affair, the president wants you to know, is related to the Bay of Pigs.
And if it comes out...
This has nothing to do with the Bay of Pigs!
I have no concern about the Bay of Pigs!
I couldn't believe it.
This is what the president told me to relay to you, Dick.
I had to remind him who he was talking to.
So I was wondering? What's such dynamite in this Bay of Pigs thing?
Sir.
Though it was clearly effective, because all of a sudden it was no problem for Helms to go to the FBI and try to put a lid on Watergate.
- What about the documents promised?
- He'll give us the documents.
But I think if we offer him an ambassadorship, the ambassadorship to Iran, we can get rid of him. He'll go...
- No, I promised Iran to Townsend.
- Townsend in Belgium. It's available.
He gave us 300 grand. Belgium's not worth more than 100, 150.
What about England?
Forget it.
Annenberg's paid three times that much.
Helms wants Iran, or there might be a problem.
All his old buddies are over there making a fortune...
When does this end, Bob?
- Executive clemency.
- What?
Hunt and the Cubans have nothing to lose now. Pardon them all.
Nobody investigates a crime for which criminals have been pardoned.
- Yeah, I like that.
- But it'll never do.
Pardoning them means we're guilty.
Press, the people'll go nuts.
Am I supposed to sit here and watch them coming closer, eating their way to the center?
Lyndon bugged, so did Kennedy.
F.D.R. cut a deal with Lucky Luciano.
Christ, even Eisenhower had a mistress.
What's so special about me? Huh?
What about Lyndon? He could make a couple calls to the... Hell, and...
...shut this whole damn thing down.
- Anyone talk to him?
- I have.
- What'd he say?
- No dice, he hit the roof.
Why?
He said if you go out with a story about how he bugged your plane, he's gonna reveal...
He's gonna reveal...
- ...Vietnamese peace talks...
- All right.
All right! Stop!
What's the matter with you?
I know. I just know we've made too many enemies.
There's another thing. Bob and I have to testify before the urban committee.
No, you're not.
You're gonna claim executive privilege.
You're gonna stonewall it all the way.
Plead the 5th Amendment.
I don't give a shit.
They can't force the president's people to testify.
Executive privilege looks like we're covering.
We are covering up for God's sake.
Some petty, stupid shit.
There are things I can say what other people said, and they'd be lies.
When I say them, nobody believes me anyway.
Then, we're going to have to give them Mitchell.
Mitchell's family.
Either it goes to Mitchell, or it comes here.
John's right, boss.
It's not personal.
It's just the way the game is played.
Sometimes you gotta punt.
Jesus.
I'm so goddamn worn-out with this.
Who's gonna tell Mitchell?
- You do it.
- Why me?
'Cause he hates you. It's worse when you get it from someone you trust.
Hey. He's wrong, you know.
About Kennedy and L.B.J. and Truman.
How so?
Well, I mean, sure, they did stuff, Bob, but nothing like this.
I mean, forget about the break-in, the, the enemies list, the... You know?
You got the attempted firebombing of the Brookings Institution.
Planting McGovern stuff on the guy that shot Wallace?
Trying to slip L.S.D. to Jack Anderson?
Old man plays politics harder than anybody else.
You think this is about politics?
Do you think L.B.J. would have ever asked Hunt to forge a cable implicating Kennedy in the assassination of the president of Vietnam?
How long have you known Bob,
20 years?
This is the Roosevelt Room, named after our 26th president
20 years, you ever shake hands with him?
Ever have a real conversation with him?
No, this...
This is about Richard Nixon.
You got people dying because he didn't make varsity football.
You got the Constitution hanging by a thread because he went to Whittier, not to Yale.
And what is this Bay of Pigs thing?
Goes white every time you mention it.
- It's a code or something.
- Well, shit, even I figured that out.
I think he means...
- The Kennedy assassination...
- Yeah?
They went after Castro and in some crazy way it got turned back on Kennedy.
I don't think the old man knows what happened. But he's afraid to find out.
He's shitting peach pits every time he thinks about it.
Created a Frankenstein with those damn Cubans.
Eight words back in '72:
"I covered up." "I was wrong."
"I'm sorry."
And the American public would've forgiven him.
But we never opened our mouths, John.
We failed him.
Dick Nixon saying "I'm sorry"?
That'll be the day.
His whole suit of armor would fall off.
- So, you tell Mitchell.
- Yeah.
And John, you do know that we're next, don't you?
You're early, John.
If you'd been that stealthy at the
Watergate, we wouldn't be in this mess.
- I was sorry to hear about your wife.
- Yes.
Take out the money.
The president would like to know if that was the last payment.
- I'll bet he would.
- Is it?
In Richard Nixon's long history of underhanded dealings he's never had better value for his money. If I were to open my mouth, all the dominoes would fall.
Can I ask you a question?
How the hell do you have the temerity to blackmail the president of the United States?
That's not the question, John.
The question is, why is he paying?
- To protect his people.
- I'm one of his people.
The Cubans are his people.
And we're going to jail for him.
Howard, you will serve no more than two years, then he'll pardon you.
Maybe. Maybe not.
But you don't leave your men on the beach, John.
You don't make them beg for their money like thieves.
You don't dump men with families who've served their country.
He didn't know.
This thing has gotten out of hand.
You think a man as controlled as Richard
Nixon would've allowed a break-in at the Democratic National Headquarters without knowing it?
You think Mitchell or Haldeman wouldn't have run it by him at least once?
The president's men did nothing, nothing without
Richard Nixon's permission.
John, sooner or later...
Sooner, I think, you're going to learn the lesson that's been learned by everyone who's ever gotten close to Richard Nixon.
That he's the darkness reaching out for the darkness.
And eventually it's either you or him.
Your grave's already been dug, John.
F.B.I. director-designate
L. Patrick Gray
shocked the Senate by revealing that John Dean
has been secretly receiving
F.B.I. reports on Watergate.
Crown, this is Echo Six.
How are you, sir?
Gray also said that Dean lied when he claimed Howard Hunt
did not have an office in the White House.
- How is he?
- He's in a bad mood.
He's running late. Have a seat.
This is the sort of thing
Mafia people can do.
Washing money, things like that.
We don't know about these things
- because we're not criminals.
- How much you need?
I would say these people will cost a million dollars over the next two years.
We could get that.
Get a million dollars in cash.
I know where it could be gotten.
I'm still not confident we can ride through this.
Some people are gonna have to go to jail. Hunt's not the only problem.
Haldeman let me use the $350,000 cash fund in his safe to make the payments.
Ehrlichman had a role, a big role, in the Ellsberg break-in.
Oh, I don't know about that.
And... And I'm...
I think it's time we begin to think in terms of cutting our losses.
Are you... You're saying cut our losses, John, and all the rest.
And, you know, suppose the thing blows and they indict Bob and the others?
Jesus, you'd never recover from that, John. I mean...
No, it's better to fight it out instead and not let people testify.
Sir, I, I still don't think we can contain this anymore.
There's a cancer on the presidency, and it's growing with every day...
Jesus, you know, every...
Everything's a crisis among the upper intellectual types, the softheads.
The average people don't think it's much of a crisis.
For Christ's sake, this is not Vietnam.
No one's dying here.
I mean, isn't it ridiculous?
- I agree. It's ridiculous but...
- It's goddamn crazy!
Goldwater was right when he said
"For Christ's sakes, everybody bugs everybody else." We know that.
It's the cover-up, John, not the deed, that's really bad here.
If only Mitchell could step up and take the brunt of it, you know.
Give 'em the hors d'oeuvre. Maybe they won't come back for the main course.
You know, that's the tragedy in all this. Uh...
Mitchell's gonna get it anyway, so it's time he assumed responsibility.
You're not paying attention.
He won't. He's told Ehrlichman he won't.
You tell my good friend Dick
I got suckered into this thing by not paying attention to what these bastards were doing.
I don't have a guilty conscience, and he shouldn't either.
Yeah.
Well, he's right.
Maybe it is time to, uh, go the hang-out route, John.
A full and thorough investigation.
We've cooperated with the F.B.I.
We'll cooperate with the Senate.
- What have we got to hide?
- No, we've nothing to hide.
No. Nothing to hide.
You know, the only...
The only fault in the plan is they're not gonna believe the truth.
- That's the incredible thing.
- I agree. It's... it's tricky.
Everything seems to lead back here.
- People would never understand.
- No.
John, I want you to get away from this madhouse.
I want these reporters.
I want you to go up to Camp David for the weekend and write up a report.
Put everything you know about Watergate in there and say,
"Mr. President, here it all is." OK?
You want me to put it all in writing over my signature?
Well, uh... nobody knows more about this thing than you do, John.
You know, the details.
That stuff I don't know. But.
Sir, I'm not going to be the scapegoat for this.
Haldeman and Ehrlichman are in it just as deep as I am.
No, now, John, you don't wanna start down that road. I remember, uh...
...Whittaker Chambers telling me back in '48.
He was a man who suffered greatly.
And he said, "On the road of the informer, it is always night."
Now, it's beyond you, or even me, John.
It's the country. It's the presidency.
- I understand that, sir.
- You know how I feel about loyalty.
I'm not gonna let any of my people go to jail, that I promise you.
The important thing is to keep this away from Haldeman and Ehrlichman.
I'm trusting you to do this, John, and
I have complete confidence in you. OK?
- I'll work on it.
- OK.
Say hi to that wife of yours, will you? Good.
- Shit.
- It happens.
The place is a shambles.
Hey!
I was determined that we should get to the bottom of Watergate
and the truth should be fully brought out, no matter who was involved.
Today, in one of the most difficult decisions of my presidency
I accepted the resignations of two of my closest associates in the White House,
Bob Haldeman and John Ehrlichman,
two of the finest public servants it has been my privilege to know.
More light, Chief?
No, Bob.
Six bodies.
The counsel to the president,
John Dean, has also resigned.
I will not place the blame on subordinates,
on people whose zeal exceeded their judgment,
and who may have done wrong in a cause they deeply believed to be right.
In any organization, the man at the top must bear the responsibility.
That responsibility, therefore, belongs here in this office and I accept that.
There can be no whitewash at the White House.
Two wrongs do not make a right.
Now, l love America.
God bless America, and God bless each and every one of you.
And we're clear.
Out.
Thank you.
Are you going to Key Biscayne?
- Yeah.
- Excuse me, sir.
When?
Tomorrow.
Ron told me that, um...
Bob Haldeman has been calling, but you won't talk to him.
If he's convicted, will you pardon him?
No.
Why are you cutting yourself off from the rest of us?
Can't we discuss this?
- What exactly do you want to discuss?
- You. What you're doing.
- What am I doing?
- I wish I knew. You're hiding.
- Hiding what?
- Whatever it is you've been hiding.
You're letting it destroy you, Dick.
You won't even ask for help...
Manolo, uh...
Mrs. Nixon's finished.
I am the only one left, Dick.
If you don't even talk to me...
Brezhnev's coming in three days.
I don't wanna deal with them and him and you.
How much more?
How much more is it going to cost?
When do the rest of us stop paying off your debts?
I'd like to finish my dinner in peace if it's not too much to ask.
No, it isn't.
I won't interfere with you anymore.
I'm finished trying.
Thank you.
"Thank you"?
Dick, sometimes I understand why they hate you.
The committee will come to order.
Counsel will call the first witness.
Mr. John W. Dean, III.
After I departed the president's office
I went to a meeting with Haldeman and Ehrlichman to discuss the matter.
The sum and substance of that discussion was,
the way to handle this now was for Mitchell to step forward.
It was a disappointment to me because it was quite clear that the cover-up,
as far as the White House was... was concerned, was going to continue.
Why is he doing this?
He's our goddamn lawyer.
If he had a problem, why didn't he come talk with us?
Remember, the weasel's got no proof.
It's still an informer's word against the president's.
...were all indictable for obstruction of justice.
That was the reason I was disagreeing with all that was being discussed.
Give 'em hell, general.
Mao taught me in 1963...
...if I have nuclear weapons...
...let 400 million Chinese die...
...300 million will be left.
- Mao!
- Yeah.
I can tell you what happened.
You want names? I can give you names.
Haldeman.
I'm talking about the president.
- Mao!
- We all know in our country...
I can give you the president.
This man in his dog heart.
You want him to be your ally?
Well, he was your ally for 20 years, Leonid.
Yes, yes, Dick.
Mr. Nixon...
Life is the best teacher, and therefore it must not interfere with the building of the S.A.L.T. Two treaty between our great countries.
Peace in our era is possible.
- Excuse me, uh, Leonid.
- It's OK, Dick. It's OK.
He's spilling his guts to the
Ervin committee. Unfortunately...
Did you?
- Daddy?
- What?
Did you cover it up?
You think I'd do something like that, honey?
Well, then you can't give up.
You just can't.
You're one of the best presidents this country has ever had.
You've done what Lincoln did, brought this country back from civil war.
You can't let your enemies tear you down.
You've gotta stay and fight.
I'll go out there and make speeches.
Nobody knows the real you, how sweet you are, how nice you are to people.
I'll tell them.
You're the most decent person I know.
I just hope I haven't let you down, Kitten.
They just don't know the real you.
They just don't know.
Tricky Dick always knew what was goin' on.
Every last goddamn detail.
And my husband is not going to take the rap this time.
They know they can't shut me up.
Probably end up killin' me.
She doesn't know what she's talking about. Stop bothering her!
Hell, she's nuts.
You bastards have seen to that.
Will you get together again?
Our marriage is finished, thank you.
Stick that up your keister!
Now, were the visitors that went into the White House warned that their conversations with the president would be taped?
Again, I am not aware of the technical details.
On Friday, we have the high school students from Ohio.
Saturday is the National
Women's Republican Club.
...Watergate wide open, former White House aide
Alexander Butterfield testified before the Senate Select committee.
He revealed a taping system that may have recorded conversations
in the White House, the executive office building
and even members of his own family.
All calls to the White House
of whatever nature and character, would be taped?
- The tape would not discriminate.
- None of them had knowledge
that their conversations were being taped?
This is a stunning revelation.
If such tapes exist, they could tell us, once and for all
what did the president know, and when did he know it.
I want Hunt paid.
I want Hunt paid.
It's time to go the hang-out route.
- If they fear the madman...
- It's a legal contribution.
Who the hell authorized this?
- I still don't...
- ...the CIA...
There's a cancer on the presidency, and it's growing with every day...
...too damn much...
If Hunt goes public, it'll be a fiasco for the C.I.A.
They're like love letters.
You should burn 'em.
Why didn't you?
They're evidence.
You can't legally destroy evidence.
You don't expect me to believe that for one minute, do ya?
Does it matter what's on 'em?
Really? Murder, Dick?
Sex? Your secrets, your fantasies?
- Or is just me and you and...
- Don't be ridiculous.
I remember Alger Hiss.
I know how ugly you can be.
You're capable of anything.
See, it doesn't really matter at the end of the day what's on them because you have absolutely no remorse.
No concept of remorse.
You want the tapes to get out.
You want them to see you at your worst.
- You're drunk.
- Oh, yeah!
No one'll ever see those tapes, including you.
And what would I find out that I haven't known for years?
What makes it so damn sad is that you couldn't confide in any of us.
You had to make a record for the whole world.
- They were for me. They're mine.
- They're not "yours". They are you.
You should burn them.
- What has changed in you, Richard?
- Go away!
These guys went after Castro seven times, ten times.
What, do you think people like that, just gave up? They just don't walk away.
- What, do you think?
- I never said this.
- Seven times, ten times.
- Ten times.
- You think people like that gave up?
- Never.
Castro. These guys went after Castro.
If this got out, they'd blame me for everything.
Forget Kennedy or Johnson. It's Nixon!
Whoever killed Kennedy came from this thing we created, this beast.
In the latest bombshell, the president's lawyers revealed
that there is an 18-and-a-half-minute gap
in a critical Watergate tape.
Reactions of disbelief and anger are being heard across the country.
My God.
Pat!
Pat!
- Has he had chest pains?
- He woke up coughing blood!
I'm in charge here!
Has he been short of breath?
- No, and he's sure that he has T.B.!
- Why T.B.?
Because his family had it.
His brother had it.
- I think it's flooded.
- Richard.
Get those I.V.s started.
Please lie down, Dick.
- They need you to lie down!
- Sedate him!
Dick. Dick.
Richard?
- Mother.
- Pretty soon, you boys'll have to...
Maybe a trip to the woodshed'll...
Daddy?
Vice President Agnew has resigned today pleading no contest
to charges of income tax evasion.
This follows Watergate Special
Prosecutor Archibald Cox's
continuing investigation into President Nixon's finances.
The president paid no income tax
- in 1971 and '72
- They need you to lie down, Dick.
...and may have used funds to improve his residence in San Clemente...
Where's the blood coming from?
What's wrong with him?
He's got an acute viral pneumonia and a very serious phlebitis.
If a clot were to break loose, it could go into his lungs.
Oh, no.
The president has returned to the White House.
But Archibald Cox has declared war by issuing a subpoena
But Archibald Cox has declared war by issuing a subpoena
- for nine of the president's tapes.
- Never! Over my dead body.
It's the president's personal property.
I'll never give up my tapes to a bunch of Kennedy-loving, Democrat cocksuckers.
This could trigger the impeachment.
They'll go to the Supreme Court.
I appointed three of those bastards.
I'll never give them my tapes.
Can the president afford to ignore a subpoena?
Who the hell does Cox think he is? I've never made a dime from public office.
I'm honest. My dad died broke. Jesus.
That son of a bitch Cox, he went to the same law school as Jack Kennedy.
The last gasp of the establishment.
Yeah, they got the hell kicked out of 'em in the election so now they gotta squeal about Watergate
'cause we were the first real threat to them in years.
My God, we would've changed it so they couldn't have changed it back in years.
Yeah.
- If only the, uh...
- Mr. President.
- Sir, Congress is...
- No, over here, sir.
Sir, Congress is considering four articles of impeachment.
- Yeah. For what?
- They're very serious charges, sir.
- First, abuse of power.
- Yep.
- Second, obstruction of justice.
- What else?
Third, the failure to cooperate with Congress.
- And last, bombing Cambodia, sir.
- Can't impeach me for Cambodia.
The president can bomb anybody he likes.
- That's true.
- We'll win that, but the other three...
- Fred, they sell tickets.
- It's Ron, sir.
They sell tickets to an impeachment like a damn circus.
OK, so they impeach me.
Well, fuck 'em!
Yeah, well, it's just a matter of mathematics.
How many votes we have in the Senate?
- About a dozen.
- A dozen?
Jeez, I got half of 'em elected.
OK, so I got the South and Goldwater and his boys.
I'll take my chances in the Senate.
- Yes, we should.
- This damn leg.
Well, then, sir, we'll, uh...
...have to deal with the possibility of removal from office, loss of pension and possibly... possibly even prison.
Yeah, well, plenty of people did their best writing in prison.
- Gandhi, Lenin.
- That's right.
What I know about this country,
I could rip it apart.
If they want a public humiliation, that's what they'll get.
- Yes, they will.
- I'll never resign this office. Never.
- Where the fuck am I? What's in there?
- The P.O.W.s and their families.
- I'm supposed to be...
- Compassionate, grateful...
- Proud.
- Sir?
- Proud. Of them.
- Oh, yes, of course.
- Fire him.
- Who?
- Cox. Archibald Cox. Fire him!
- He works for the attorney general.
- Only Richardson can fire him.
- May I echo my concern, sir?
- Then tell Richardson to fire him!
- Well, Richardson won't do that, sir.
- He'll resign.
- The hell he will. Then fire him too.
If you have to go down to the janitor at the justice department fire that son of a bitch.
Mr. President, may I just say something, sir?
I think that you should welcome this subpoena.
- Why?
- Well, sir, the tapes can only prove that Dean was a liar. Right?
That's right, sir.
Well, there's more.
There's more than just me.
You can't break, my boy.
Even though it's ended.
You can't admit, even to yourself, when it's gone.
Do you think those P.O.W.s in there did?
Now, there's some people, and we both know them, Al think you can go stand in the middle of a bull ring and cry "mea culpa, mea culpa," while the crowd is hissing and booing and spitting on you.
Well, a man doesn't cry. I don't cry.
You don't cry. You fight.
OK.
Ladies and gentlemen, the president of the United States!
Good evening. We interrupt this program for a special report from NBC news.
The country is in the midst
of what may be the most serious constitutional crisis in its history.
President Nixon has fired special prosecutor Archibald Cox.
Attorney General Elliot Richardson has quit
and his deputy William Ruckelshaus was fired when he refused to fire Cox.
Attorney General Robert Bork executed Nixon's orders,
- fired the prosecutor.
- ...to head off impeachment proceedings
the president has agreed to release transcripts of 46 taped conversations.
In a simple ceremony, Gerald
Ford was sworn in as vice president.
Citing wrongdoing, a judge has dismissed all charges against Daniel Ellsberg.
A grand jury has indicted former
Nixon aides Haldeman, Ehrlichman...
You're a lawyer, for God's sake.
How can you let this shit go through?
- Look. This. Nixon can't say that.
- Well, you did say it, sir.
Never! I never said that about Jews.
- Makes me sound like an anti-Semite.
- We can check the tapes again.
No need. I know what I said.
Have you lost your mind? Look, Al!
Nixon can't say this!
"Niggers. Niggers." It can't say that!
- We could delete it.
- We're doing the best we can.
- It's not good enough!
- Would you have us black it out, sir?
- We could write "expletive deleted."
- Cut all these "goddamns" and "Jesus Christs" out. Jesus.
Mr. President. Don't you see that all these deletion marks in the transcripts make it look as though you... you do nothing but swear?
It soils my mother's memory.
You think I want the whole goddamn world to see my mother like this?
Raising a dirty-mouth?
We could start again, sir, but we don't really have the staff to do that.
Then start over! Just start over!
The world will see only what I show 'em!
From page one, Al. Page one, Ron!
Ron, get in there and do something.
All this stuff.
Five seconds, Mr. President.
And four, three, two...
Good evening, my fellow Americans.
Tonight I'm taking an action unprecedented in the history of this office.
I had no knowledge of the cover-up till John Dean told me about it
- on March 21st, a year ago.
- I think I'm going to throw up.
...no payment to Hunt or anyone else be made.
- He's lost touch with reality.
- I've made my mistakes,
but in all my years of public life,
I have never profited.
Can you imagine what this man would have been
- had he ever been loved?
- I've earned every penny.
In all of my years of public life
I have never obstructed justice.
It's a tragedy because he had greatness in his grasp.
- I welcome this examination.
- But had the defects of his qualities.
- I made $250,000...
- They'll crucify him.
Does anybody really care anymore?
...which many of you were good enough to purchase.
And what happens after?
...every year.
When l, in 1968 decided to become a candidate for the president,
I decided to clean the decks and to put everything in real estate.
So, that's where the money came from.
That's all I own.
That's what we have, and that's what we owe.
Because people have got to know whether or not their president...
...their president is a crook.
Well, l am not a crook.
I've earned everything I have
...doesn't have a mink coat.
She does have a respectable
Republican cloth coat.
And I always tell her she'd look good in anything.
There has never been any feathering of nests. Not in this administration.
Now, let me just say this.
And I want to say this to the television audience...
Supreme Court ruled today eight to nothing that Nixon's claims
of executive privilege cannot be used in criminal cases
- and must turn over subpoenaed tapes.
- The House Judiciary Committee
has voted 27 to 11
to recommend impeachment to the House.
The deliberations now go to the House floor.
In its report, the committee offers evidence Nixon obstructed justice
on at least 36 occasions, that he encouraged his aides to commit perjury
and that Nixon abused the powers of his office.
In a separate report, the Senate Select committee
details the misuse of the l.R.S., the F.B.l., the C.l.A.
and the justice department.
It denounces the plumbers and it raises the question
of whether the United States had a valid election in 1972.
Come in.
Victory at Sea, Al. Henry.
The Pacific Theatre.
Christ, you can almost hear the waves breaking over the decks.
I'm afraid we have another problem,
Mr. President.
Excuse me, gentlemen.
June 23rd, '72, sir.
Your instructions to Haldeman regarding the C.I.A. and the F.B.I.
So?
Your lawyers feel that it's the smoking gun.
Totally out of context.
I was protecting the national security.
Sir, the deadline is today.
Can we get around this, Al?
It's the Supreme Court, sir.
You don't get around it.
If, uh...
If you resign, you can keep your tapes as a private citizen.
You could fight them for years.
What if I stay?
You have the army.
The army?
Lincoln used it.
That was civil war.
How do you see this?
Oh, God.
We can't survive this, sir.
They also have you instructing Dean to make the pay off to Hunt.
There's nothing in that statement the president can't explain.
Sir, you talked about opening up the whole Bay of Pigs thing again.
- That's right.
- Three days before, the June 20th tape.
- The one with the 18-minute gap.
- I don't know anything about that.
You mentioned the Bay of Pigs several times.
Sooner or later, they're going to want to know what that means.
They're going to want to know what's on that gap.
It's gone. No one will ever find out what's on it.
They might if there was another recording.
We both know it's possible.
I know for a fact that it's possible.
I've spoken to Ford.
There's a very strong chance that he'll pardon you.
I don't need a goddamned deal, for God's sake. I...
This is something that you will have to do, Mr. President.
I thought you'd rather do it now.
I'll wait outside.
Sir.
May I say, sir, that if you stay now, it will paralyze the nation and its foreign policy.
You always had a great sense of timing, Henry.
When to give and when to take.
How do you think Mao and Brezhnev will react?
Do you think they'll remember us, Henry, after all the great things you and I did together, as some kind of... of crooks?
They will understand.
To be undone by a third-rate burglary is a fate of biblical proportions.
History will treat you far more kindly than your contemporaries.
Yeah.
Depends who writes the history books.
I'm not a quitter, never have been.
But I'm not stupid either.
A trial would kill me.
That's what they want.
They won't get it. Fuck 'em.
If they harass you, I too will resign, and I will tell the world why.
Don't be stupid.
The world needs you, Henry.
You always saw the big picture.
You were my equal in many ways.
You're the only friend I got, Henry.
Do you ever pray?
You know, believe in a supreme being?
Not really.
You mean on my knees?
My mother used to pray a lot.
It's been a long time since I really prayed.
Let's pray, Henry.
Let's pray a little.
Just you and me.
I hope this doesn't embarrass you,
Henry.
No. Not at all, no.
This is not going to leak, is it?
Don't be too proud, Henry.
Never be too proud to go on your knees before God.
God.
How can a...
How can a country come apart like this?
What have I done wrong?
I opened China.
I made peace with Russia.
I ended the war.
I did what I thought was right.
God, why do they hate me so?
It's unbelievable. It... It's insane.
Oh, Mom, I'm sorry. God, please forgive me, God. I didn't mean it.
I never wanted to do...
I don't want this to... Is it me?
Is this happening?
I can't believe...
Al.
They smelled the blood on me this time, Al. I got soft, you know?
A rusty, metallic smell.
- I know it well, sir.
- It came over from Vietnam, you know?
- Sir?
- That smell.
I mean, everyone suffered so much.
Their boys killed.
They need to sacrifice something.
You know, appease the gods of war.
Mars, Jupiter.
I am that blood, General.
I am that sacrifice.
In the highest place of all.
Yeah. All leaders must finally be sacrificed.
Things won't be the same after this.
No, I played by the rules. Rules changed right in the middle of the game.
There's no respect for American institutions anymore.
No, people are cynical.
The press, ah, the press is out of control.
People spit on soldiers.
Government secrets mean nothing.
I pity the next guy who sits here.
Good night, gentlemen.
Mr. President.
When they look at you, they see what they want to be.
When they look at me, they see what they are.
Dick, please don't.
I can't.
I don't have the strength anymore.
It'll be over soon.
No, it's going to start now.
Oh, Buddy.
If I could just sleep.
- If I could just sleep.
- There'll be time for that.
Yeah.
You know, once when I was sick as a boy, my mother gave me this stuff and she made me swallow it.
It made me throw up all over her.
I wish I could do that now.
I'm so afraid.
There's darkness out there.
I could always see where I was going.
But it's dark out there.
God, I've always been afraid of the dark.
Buddy.
There are many fine careers.
This country needs good farmers,
There are many fine careers.
This country needs good farmers, good businessmen, good plumbers good carpenters.
I remember my old man.
I think that they would have called him sort of a, sort of a little man, a common man.
Well, he didn't consider himself that way.
You know what he was?
He was a streetcar motorman first.
Then he was a farmer.
Then he had a lemon ranch.
It was the poorest lemon ranch in California, I can assure you.
He sold it before they found oil on it.
Then he was a grocer.
But he was a great man because he did his job.
And every job counts up to the hilt regardless of what happens.
Nobody will ever write a book, probably, about my mother.
Well, I guess all of you would say this about your mother.
My mother was a saint.
And I think of her two boys dying of tuberculosis and seeing each of them die.
And when they died...
Yes, she will have no books written about her.
But she was a saint.
Now, however, we look to the future.
I remember something, uh,
Theodore Roosevelt wrote when his first wife died in his twenties.
He thought the light had gone from his life forever.
But he went on, and he not only became president but as an ex-president, he served his country always in the arena, tempestuous, strong, sometimes right, sometimes wrong.
But he was a man.
And as I leave that's an example
I think all of us should remember.
See, we think sometimes when, things happen that don't go the right way; we think that when someone dear to us dies, when we lose an election, or when we suffer defeat that all is ended.
Not true.
It's only a beginning, always, because the greatness comes, not when things go always good for you, but the greatness comes when you're really tested, when you take some knocks, some disappointments when sadness comes.
Because only if you've been in the deepest valley can you ever know how magnificent it is to be on the highest mountain.
So, I say to you on this occasion, we leave, proud of the people who have stood by us and worked for us and served this government and this country.
They want you to continue to serve in government if that is what you wish.
Remember, always give your best.
Never get discouraged.
Never be petty.
Always remember, others may hate you.
But those who hate you don't win unless you hate them.
And then, you destroy yourself.
And so we leave with high hopes and good spirits and with deep humility.
And I say to each and every one of you, not only will we always remember you but always, you will be in our hearts.
And you'll be in our prayers.
And only then will you find what we Quakers call "peace at the center".
He gave of himself with intelligence and energy and devotion to duty.
Richard Nixon was buried and honored by five presidents on April 26, 1994.
Less than a year after his beloved wife,
Pat, had died.
Nixon always maintained that if he had not been driven from office
the North Vietnamese would not have overwhelmed the South in 1975.
In a sideshow, Cambodian society was destroyed and mass genocide resulted.
The second half of the 20th century will be known as the age of Nixon.
ln his absence, Russia and the
United States returned to a decade
of high-budget military expansion and near war.
Nixon, who was pardoned by President Ford,
lived to write six books and travel the world as an elder statesman.
For the remainder of his life, he fought successfully to protect his tapes.
The National Archives spent
14 years indexing and cataloging them.
Out of 4,000 hours,
60 hours have been made public.
ESiR
...Les Misrables 10th
Anniversary Concert...
...Les Misrables 10th
Anniversary Concert...
Live at the Albert Hall, London...
...( Subtitle transcript/synchro by Soulhunter )...
Look down! Look down!
Don't look 'em in the eye.
Look down! Look down!
You're here until you die.
The sun is strong, it's hot as hell below.
Look down! Look down!
There's 20 years to go.
I've done no wrong; sweet
Jesus hear my prayer!
Look down! Look down!
Sweet Jesus doesn't care.
I know she'll wait...
I know that she'll be true.
Look down! Look down!
They've all forgotten you.
When I get free, you won't see me here for dust!
Look down! Look down!
Dont look 'em in the eye.
How long, oh Lord, before you let me die?
Look down! Look down!
You'll always be a slave.
Look down! Look down!
You're standing in your grave.
Now bring me prisoner "24601".
Your time is up and your parole's begun.
- You know what that means?
- Yes, it means I'm free!
No!
It means you get your yellow ticket of leave.
- You are a thief.
- I stole a loaf of bread...
- You robbed a house!
- I broke a window pane.
My sister's child was close to death and we were starving.
You will starve again unless you learn the meaning of the law.
I know the meaning of those 19 years, a slave of the law.
Five years for what you did!
The rest because you tried to run.
Yes, "24601".
My name is Jean Valjean!
And I'm Javert!
Do not forget my name!
Do not forget me, "24601".
Look down! Look down!
You'll always be a slave.
Look down! Look down!
You're standing in your grave.
Freedom is mine.
The earth is still.
I feel the wind.
I breathe again and the sky clears.
The world is waking.
Drink from the pool.
How clean the taste.
Never forget the years, the waste.
Nor forgive them for what they've done.
They are the guilty - everyone.
The day begins, and now let's see what this new world will do for me...
You'll have to go! I'll pay you off for the day.
Collect your bits and pieces there and be on your way.
You've given me half what the other men get.
This handful of tin wouldn't buy my sweat!
You broke the law. It's there for people to see.
Why should you get the same as honest men like me?
And now I know how freedom feels, the jailer always at your heels, it is the law.
This piece of paper in my hand that makes me cursed throughout the land, it is the law.
Like a cur I walk the street... the dirt beneath their feet.
Come in, sir, for you are weary.
And the night is cold out there.
Though our lives are very humble what we have we have to share.
There is wine here to revive you.
There is bread to make you strong.
There's a bed to rest 'till morning, rest from pain and rest from wrong.
He let me eat my fill,
I had the lion's share.
The silver in my hand cost twice what I had earned.
In all those 19 years, that lifetime of despair - and yet he trusted me.
The old fool trusted me, he'd done his bit of good.
I played the grateful surf and thanked him like I should.
But when the house was still
I got up in the night... took the silver, took my flight!
Tell His reverence your story, let us see if he's impressed.
You were lodging here last night, you were the honest bishop's guest.
And then out of Christian goodness, when learned about your plight...
You maintain he made a present of this silver.
That is right.
But my friend, you left so early.
Surely something slipped your mind?
You forgot I gave these also, would you leave the best behind?
So, monsieur, you may release him for this man has spoken true.
I commend you for your duty and
God's blessing go with you.
But remember this, my brother.
See in this some higher plan.
You must use this precious silver to become an honest man.
By the witness of the martyrs.
By the passion and the blood.
God hath raised you out of darkness.
I have bought your soul for God.
What have I done, sweet
Jesus, what have I done?
Become a thief in the night, become a dog on the run?
Have I fallen so far and is the hour so late that nothing remains but the cry of my hate?
The cries in the dark that nobody hears. Here where I stand at the turning of the years.
If there's another way to go I missed it 20 long years ago.
My life was a war that could never be won.
They gave me a number
Murded Valjean.
When they chained me and left me for dead just for stealing a mouthful of bread.
Yet why did I allow that man to touch my soul and teach me love?
He treated me like any other. He gave me his trust, he called me brother.
My life he claims for God above.
Can such things be?
For I had come to hate the world.
This world that always hated me.
Take and eye for an eye!
Turn your heart into stone!
This is all I have lived for.
This is all I have known.
One word from him and I'd be back beneath the lash, upon the rack.
Instead he offers me my freedom.
I feel my shame inside me like a knife.
He told me that I had a soul.
How does he know?
What spirit comes to move my life?
Is there another way to go?
I am reaching but I fall and the night is closing in.
As I stare into the void, to the whirlpool of my sin.
I'll escape now from the world, from the world of Jean Valjean.
Jean Valjean is nothing now.
Another story must begin!
[APPLAUSE]
At the end of the day you're another day older. And that's all you can say for the life of the poor.
It's a struggle, it's a war, and there's nothing that anyone's giving.
One more day standing about, what is it for?
One day less to be living.
At the end of the day you're another day colder. And the shirt on your back doesn't keep out the chill.
And the righteous hurry past.
They don't hear the little ones crying.
And the winter is coming on fast, ready to kill.
One day nearer to dying.
At the end of the day there's another day dawning.
And the sun in the morning is waiting to rise.
Like the waves crash on the sand.
Like a storm that'll break any second.
There's a hunger in the land. There's a reckoning still to be reckoned.
And there's gonna be hell to pay at the end of the day!...
And there's gonna be hell to pay at the end of the day!
At the end of the day you get nothing for nothing.
Sitting flat on your butt doesn't buy any bread.
There are children back at home, and the children have got to be fed.
- And you're lucky to be in a job...
- And in a bed!
And we're counting our blessings.
Have you seen how the foreman is fuming today?
With his terrible breath and his wandering hands?
It's because little Fantine won't give him his way.
Take a look at his trousers, you'll see where he stands.
At the end of the day it's another day over.
With enough in your pocket to last for a week.
Pay the landlord, pay the shop.
Keep on grafting as long as you're able.
Keep on grafting till you drop or it's back to the crumbs off the table.
You've got to pay your way at the end of the day!
And what have we here, little innocent sister?...
Come on, Fantine, let's have all the news.
"Dear Fantine you must send us more money... Your child needs a doctor...
There's no time to lose..."
Give that letter to me, it is none of your business.
With a husband at home and a bit on the side!
Is there anyone here who can swear before God she has nothing to fear, she has nothing to hide?
What is this fighting all about?
Would someone tear these two apart?
This is a factory, not a circus.
Now, come on, ladies, settle down.
I run a business of repute.
I am the mayor of this town.
I look to you to sort this out, and be as patient as you can.
Now someone say how this began.
At the end of the day she's the one who began it.
There's a kid that she's hiding in some little town.
There's a man she has to pay, and guess how she picks up the extra?
You can bet she's earning her keep sleeping around.
And the boss wouldn't like it.
Yes, it's true, there's a child, and the child is my daughter.
And her father abandoned us leaving us flat.
Now she lives with an innkeeper man and his wife and
I pay for the child - what's the matter with that?
At the end of the day she'll be nothing but trouble.
And there's trouble for all when there's trouble for one!
While we're earning our daily bread, she's the one with her hands in the butter
You must send the slut away or we're all gonna end in the gutter
And it's us who'll have to pay at the end of the day!
I might have known the bitch could bite,
I might have known the cat had claws...
I might have guessed your little secret.
Ah yes, the virtuous Fantine!
Who keeps herself so pure and clean, you'd be the cause, I had no doubt... of any trouble hereabout.
She'd play a virgin in the light but need no urgin' in the night.
She's been laughing at you while she's having her men.
(She'll be nothing but trouble again and again)
You must sack her today.
Right, my girl... on your way!
There was a time when men were kind.
And their voices were soft... and their words inviting.
There was a time when love was blind, and the world was a song.
And the song was exciting.
There was a time when it all went wrong...
I dreamed a dream in time gone by when hope was high and life worth living
I dreamed that love would never die.
I dreamed that God would be forgiving.
Then I was young and unafraid.
And dreams were made, and used, and wasted.
There was no ransom to be paid.
No song unsung, no wine untasted.
But the tigers come at night... with their voices soft as thunder... as they tear your hope apart... as they turn your dream to shame.
He slept a summer by my side.
He filled my days with endless wonder.
He took my childhood in his stride... but he was gone when autumn came.
And still I dream he'll come to me.
And we will live the years together.
But there are dreams that cannot be.
And there are storms we cannot weather.
I had a dream my life would be so different from this hell I'm living.
So different now from what it seemed... now life has killed the dream...
I dreamed.
[APPLAUSE]
I smell women, smell 'em in the air!
Think I'll drop my anchor in that harbour over there.
Lovely ladies, smell
'em through the smoke.
Seven days can make you hungry for a poke!
Even stokers need a little stoke.
Lovely ladies waiting for a bite.
Waiting for the customers who only come at night.
Lovely ladies ready for the call.
Standing up or lying down or any way at all.
Bargain prices up against the wall!
What pretty hair... what pretty locks you've got there!
What luck you've got... it's worth a centime, my dear.
- I'll take the lot!
- Don't touch me; leave me alone!
Let's make a price.
I'll give you all of ten francs.
- Just think of that...
- It pays the debt.
- Just think of that...
- What can I do?
It pays a debt, ten francs may save my poor Cosette.
Old men, young men, take 'em as they come.
Harbor rats and alley cats and every kind of scum.
Poor men, rich men, leaders of the land.
See them with their trousers off they're never quite as grand.
All it takes is money in your hand!
Lovely ladies going for a song ..
Got a lot of callers but they never stay for long.
Come on, captain, you can wear your shoes.
Don't it make a change to have a girl who can't refuse?
Easy money lying on a bed.
Just as well they never see the hate that's in your head.
Don't they know they're making love to one already dead?
Here's something new.
I think I'll give it a try.
Come closer, you, I like to see what I buy.
The usual price for just one slice of your pie.
I don't want you, no no, monsieur, let me go.
- Is this a trick? I won't pay more.
- No, not at all.
You've got some nerve, you little whore!
You've got some gall.
It's the same with a tart as it is with a grocer.
The customer sees what he gets in advance.
It's not for the whore to say"yes sir" or "no sir", it's not for the harlot to pick and to choose... or lead me to dance!
I'll kill you, you bastard, try any of that!
Even a whore who has gone to the bad won't be had by a rat.
Tell me quickly, what's the story?
Who saw what, and why, and where?
Let him give a full description, let him answer to Javert.
In this nest of whores and vipers let one speak who saw it all.
Who laid hands on this good man here?
What's the substance of this brawl?
Javert, would you believe it?
I was crossing from the park.
When this prostitute attacked me, you can see she left her mark.
She will answer for her actions when you make a full report.
You may rest assured, monsieur, that she will answer to the court.
There's a child who sorely needs me - please, monsieur, she's but that high.
Holy God, is there no mercy?
If I go to jail she'll die!
I have heard such protestations every day for 20 years.
Let's have no more explanations, save your breath and save your tears.
Honest work, just reward - that's the way to please the Lord.
A moment of your time, Javert,
I do believe this woman's tale.
But monsieur mayor...
You've done your duty, let her be, she needs a doctor, not a jail.
But monsieur mayor!
- Can this be?
- Where will she end?
This child without a friend?
I've seen your face before.
Show me some way to help you.
How have you come to grieve in such a place as this?
Monsieur, don't mock me now, I pray.
It's hard enough I've lost my pride.
You let your foreman send me away.
Yes, you were there and turned aside.
- I never did no wrong.
- Is it true what I've done?
- My daughter's close to dying.
- To an innocent son?
- If there's a God above...
- Had I only known then...
He'll let me die instead.
In His name, my task has just begun.
I will see it done.
But monsieur mayor...
I will see it done.
But monsieur mayor!
I will see it done!
Can this be true? I don't believe what I see.
A man your age to be as strong as you are.
A memory stirs... you make me think of a man.
From years ago... a man who broke his parole.
He disappeared.
Forgive me, sir, I would not dare.
Say what you must. Don't leave it there.
I have only known one other who can do what you have done.
He's a convict from the chain gang, he's been ten years on the run.
But he couldn't run forever.
We have found his hideaway.
And he's just been re-arrested, and he comes to court today.
Well, of course, he now denies it.
You'd expect that of a con.
But he couldn't run forever, no, not even Jean Valjean.
He thinks that man is me.
He knew him at a glance.
That stranger he has found - this man could be my chance.
Why should I save his hide?
Why should I right this wrong?
When I have come so far and struggled for so long?
If I speak I am condemned.
If I stay silent I am damned.
I am the master of hundreds of workers, they all look to me.
Can I abandom them?
How would they live if I am not free?
If I speak I am condemned.
If I stay silent I am damned.
Who am I?
Can I condemn this man to slavery?
Pretend I do not see his agony?
This innocent who bears my face, who goes to judgement in my place?
Who am I?
Can I conceal myself for evermore?
Pretend I'm not the man I was before?
Must my name until I die be no more than an alibi?
Must I lie?
How can I ever face my fellow men?
How can I ever face myself again?
My soul belongs to God, I know,
I made that bargain long ago.
He gave me hope when hope was gone,
He gave me strength to journey on.
Who am I?
Who am I?
I'm Jean Valjean!
And so, Javert, you see it's true!
This man bears no more guilt than you.
Who am I?
Cosette, it's turned so cold.
Cosette, it's past your bedtime.
You've played the day away.
And soon it will be night.
Come to me, Cosette, the light is fading.
Don't you see the evening star appearing?
Come to me, and rest against my shoulder.
How fast the minutes fly away and every minute colder.
Hurry near, another day is dying.
Don't you hear the winter wind is crying?
There's a darkness which comes without a warning.
But I will sing you lullabies and wake you in the morning.
Oh Fantine, our time is running out.
But Fantine, I swear this on my life.
Look, monsieur, where all the children play.
Be at peace...
Be at peace evermore.
- My Cosette...
- Shall live for my protection.
- Take her now.
- Your child will want for nothing.
Oh, monsieur, you come from God in heaven.
And none will ever harm Cosette as long as I am living.
Take my hand.
- The night grows ever colder.
- And I will keep you warm.
Take my child, I give her to your keeping.
Take shelter from the storm.
For God's sake, please stay 'till I am sleeping.
Tell Cosette I love her and
I'll see her when I wake...
Valjean, at last!
We see each other plain.
Monsieur, la mre, you'll wear a different chain.
Before you say another word, Javert...
Before you chain me up like a slave again...
Listen to me - there is something I must do.
This woman leaves behind a suffering child.
There is none but me who can intercede.
In mercy's name, three days are all I need.
Then I'll retire - I pledge my word.
Then I'll retire.
You must think me mad!
I thought of you across the years.
Men like you can never change.
A man such as you.
- Believe of me what you will.
- Men like me can never change.
- There is a duty that I'm sworn to do.
- Men like you can never change.
- You know nothing of my life.
- No, "24601".
All I did was steal some bread.
My duties to the law...
- You know nothing of the world.
- You have no rights.
- You would sooner see me dead.
- Come with me, "24601".
But not before I see this justice done.
Now the wheel has turned around...
Jean Valjean is nothing now.
- I am warning you, Javert!
- Dare you talk to me of crime?
- I am a stronger man by far!
- And the price you had to pay?
- There is power in me yet!
- Every man is born in sin.
- My race is not yet run.
- Every man must choose his way.
- I am warning you, Javert!
- You know nothing of Javert!
- There is nothing I won't dare.
- I was born inside a jail.
- If I have to kill you here...
- I was born with scum like you!
- I'll do what must be done.
- I am from the gutter, too.
[TO FANTINE]
I shall swear to you tonight.
[TO VALJEAN]
There is no place for you to hide.
Your child will live within my care.
Wherever you may hide away...
And I will raise her to the light.
[BOTH]
I swear to you, I will be there.
There is a castle on a cloud.
I like to go there in my sleep.
Aren't any floors for me to sweep.
Not in my castle on a cloud.
There is a room that's full of toys.
There are 100 boys and girls.
Nobody shouts or talks too loud.
Not in my castle on a cloud.
There is a lady all in white.
Holds me and sings a lullabye.
She's nice to see and she's soft to touch.
She says "Cosette, I love you very much."
I know a place where no-one's lost.
I know a place where no-one cries.
Crying at all is not allowed.
Not in my castle on a cloud.
Oh help! I think I hear them now.
And I'm nowhere near finished sweeping, scrubbing and polishing the floors.
Oh, it's her! It's madame!
Now look who's here!
[AUDIENCE LAUGH]
The little madam herself.
Pretending once again she's been so awfully good.
Better not let me catch you slacking.
Better not catch my eye!
Ten rotten francs your mother sends me.
What's that going to buy?
Now take that pale, my little madamoiselle.
And go and draw some water from the well.
We should never have taken you in in the first place.
How stupid the things we do.
Like mother, like daughter, the scum of the street!
Still there, Cosette?
Yours tears will do you no good.
I told you, fetch some watch from the well in the wood.
Please do not send me out alone.
- Not in the darkness on my own...
- Enough of that!
Or I'll "forget" to be nice!
[AUDIENCE LAUGH]
You heard me ask for something and I never ask twice.s
Welcome, monsieur.
Sit yourself down.
And meet the best inkeeper in town.
As for the rest, all of them crooks.
Rooking the guests and cooking the books.
Seldom do you see honest men like me.
A gent of good intent who's content to be...
Master of the house.
Doling out the charm.
Ready with a handshake and an open palm.
Tells a saucy tale, makes a little stir.
Customers appreciate a bon-viveur.
Glad to do my friends a favour.
Doesn't cost me to be nice.
But nothing gets you nothing;
Everything has got a little price.
Master of the house, keeper of the zoo.
Ready to relieve them of a sou or two.
Watering the wine, making up the weight.
Picking up their knick-knacks when they can't see straight.
Everybody loves the landlord.
Everybody's bosom friend.
I do whatever pleases,
Jesus, won't I bleed 'em in the end!
Master of the house, quick to catch your eye.
Never wants a passer-by to pass him by.
Servant to the poor.
Butler to the great.
Comforter, philosopher and lifelong mate.
Everybody's true companion.
Everybody's chaperone.
But lock up your valises.
Jesus! Won't I skin you to the bone!
Enter, monsieur, lay down your load.
Unlace your boots and rest from the road.
This weighs a tonne, travel's a curse.
Here we strive to lighten your purse.
Here the goose is cooked.
Here the fat is fried.
And nothing's overlooked 'till
I'm satisfied.
Food beyond compare.
Food beyond belief.
Mix it in a mince and pretend it's beef.
Kidney of a horse, liver of a cat.
Fillin' up the sausages with this and that.
Residents are more than welcome.
Bridal suite is occupied (hmm!)
Reasonable charges plus some little extras on the side.
Charging for the lice, extra for the mice.
Two percent for looking in the mirror twice.
Here a little slice, there a little cut.
Three percent for sleeping with the window shut.
When it comes to fixing prices, there are lots of tricks he knows.
How it all increases, all them bits and pieces.
Jesus! It's amazing how it grows.
Master of the house, quick to catch your eye.
Never wants a passer-by to pass him by.
Servant to the poor,
Butler to the great.
Comforter, philosopher and lifelong mate.
Everybody's true companion.
Give's them everything he's got.
Dirty bunch of geezers, Jesus!
What a sorry little lot.
I used to dream that I would meet a prince.
But God Almighty, have you seen what's happened since?
Master of the house isn't worth my spit.
Comforter, philosopher and lifelong shit.
Cunning little brain, regular voltaire. Thinks he's quite a lover but there's (not much there).
What a cruel trick of nature landing me with such a louse.
God knows how I've lasted living with this bastard in the house!
Master of the house.
Comforter, philosopher -
Servant to the poor.
Butler to the great.
Hypocrite and toady and inebriate!
Everybody bless the landlord!
Everybody bless his spouse!
Everybody raise a glass!
Raise it up the master's arse!
Everybody raise a glass to the master of the house.
[APPLAUSE]
[SILENCED CONVERSATION]
[APPLAUSE CONTINUTES]
I found her wandering in the wood.
This little child, I found her trembling in the shadows...
And I am here to help
Cosette, and I will settle any debt you may think proper.
I will pay what I must pay to take Cosette away.
What to do? What to say?
Shall you carry our treasure away?
What a gem, what a pearl.
Beyond rubies is our little girl.
How can we speak of debt?
Let's not haggle for darling Cosette.
Dear Fantine, gone to rest. Have we done for your child what is best?
Shared our bread. Shared each bone.
Treated her like she's one of our own.
Like our own, monsieur!
[AUDIENCE LAUGH]
Your feelings do you credit, sir.
And I will ease the parting blow.
Let us not talk of bargains or bones or greed.
Now, may I say, we are agreed?
That would quite fit the bill if she hadn't so often been ill.
Little dear cost us dear... medicines are expensive, monsieur.
Not that we'd begrudge a sou.
It's no more than we Christians must do.
One thing more, one small doubt.
There are treacherous people about.
No offence, please reflect:
Your intentions may not be correct.
No more words. Here's your price.
15 hundred for your sacrifice.
Come, Cosette. Say goodbye.
Let us seek out a friendlier sky.
Thank you both for Cosette.
It won't take you too long to forget.
Look down and see the beggars at your feet.
Look down and show some mercy if you can.
Look down and see the sweepings of the street.
Look down, look down upon your fellow man.
How do ya do? My name's Gavroche.
These are my people, here's my patch.
Not much to look at, nothing posh.
Nothing that you'd call up to scratch.
This is my school, my high society.
Here in the slums of Saint Michele.
We live on crumbs of humble piety.
Tough on the teeth, but what the hell?
Think you're poor?
Think you're free?
Follow me.
Follow me!
Look down and show some mercy if you can/
Look down, look down upon your fellow man.
What d'you think you're at?
Hanging round my pitch?
If you're new around here, girl, you've got a lot to learn.
Listen, you old bat. Crazy bloody witch!
Least I give my customers some pleasure in return.
I know what you give!
You give them all the pox!
Spread around your poison 'till they end up in a box.
Leave the poor old cow.
Move it, Madeleine.
She used to be no better 'till the clap got to her brain.
When's it gonna end? When we gonna live?
Something's gotta happen now or something's gonna give.
It'll come, it'll come, it'll come...
Where are the leaders of the land?
Where are the swells who run this show?
Only one man, and that's Lamarque.
Speaks for the people here below.
See our children fed.
Help us in our shame.
Something for a crust of bread.
In Holy Jesus' name.
In the Lord's Holy name.
In his name, in his name...
Lamarque is ill and fading fast.
Won't last the week out, so they say.
With all the anger in the land... how long before the judgement day?
Before we cut the fat ones down to size?
Before the barricades arise?
Look down and show some mercy if you can.
Look down, look down upon your fellow man.
There... out in the darkness... a fugitive running, fallen from God.
Fallen from grace.
God be my witness.
I never shall yield
'till we come face to face.
'Till we come face to face.
He knows his way in the dark.
Mine is the way of the Lord.
Those who follow the path of the righteous shall have their reward.
And if they fall as Lucifer fell...
The flame, the sword...
Stars... in your multitudes...
Scare to be counted.
Filling the darkness.
With order and light.
You are the sentinels.
Silent and sure.
Keeping watch in the night.
Keeping watch in the night.
You know your place in the sky.
You hold your course and your aim.
And each in your season returns and returns.
And is always the same.
And if you fall as Lucifer fell... you fall in vain.
And so it must be!
For so it is written.
On the doorway to paradise.
That those who falter and those who fall... must pay the price.
Lord, let me find him.
That I may see him... safe behind bars!
I will never rest.
'Till then this I swear.
This I swear by the stars!
[APPLAUSE]
At Notre Dame the sections are prepared! At rue de Bac they're straining at the leash!
Students, workers, everyone.
There's a river on the run.
Like the flowing of the tide,
Paris coming to our side!
The time is near. So near it's stirring the blood in their veins.
And yet beware.
Don't let the wine go to your brains.
For the army we fight is a dangerous foe.
With the men and the arms that we never could match.
Oh, it's easy to sit here and swat 'em like flies.
But the national guard will be harder to catch.
We need a sign to rally the people, to call them to arms.
To bring them in line.
- Marius, you're late.
- What's wrong today?
You look as if you've seen a ghost.
A ghost you say... a ghost maybe.
She was just like a ghost to me.
One minute there, then she was gone!
I am agog!
I am aghast!
Is Marius in love at last?
I've never seen him "ooh" and "aah".
You talk of battles to be won.
And here he comes like Don Juan.
It's better than an opera.
It is time for us all to decide who we are.
Do we fight for the right to a night at the opera now?
Have you asked of yourselves what's the price you might pay?
Is it simply a game for rich young boys to play?
The color of the world is changing day by day...
Red, the blood of angry men.
Black, the dark of ages past.
Red, a world abou to dawn.
Black, the night that ends at last.
Had you been there tonight you might know how it feels
To be struck to the bone in a moment of breathless delight.
Had you been there tonight you might also have known...
How the world may be changed in just one burst of light!
And what was right seems wrong.
And what was wrong seems right.
- Red.
- I feel my soul on fire.
- Black.
- My world if she's not there.
- Red.
- The colour of desire.
- Black.
- The colour of despair.
Marius, you're no longer a child.
I do not doubt you mean it well.
But now there is a higher call.
Who cares about your lonely soul?
We strive towards a larger goal.
Our little lives don't count at all.
Red, the blood of angry men.
Black, the dawn of ages past.
Red, a world about to dawn.
Black, the night that ends at last.
[APPLAUSE]
Well, Courfeyrac, do we have all the guns?
Feuilly, Combeferre, our time is running short.
Grantaire, put the bottle down!
Do we have the guns we need?
Give me brandy on my breath
And I'll breathe them all to death!
In St. Antoine they're with us to a man! In
Notre Dame they're tearing up the stones!
- Twenty rifles good as new.
- Listen!
Twenty rounds for every man.
- Listen to me!
- Double that in Port St. Cloud!
- Listen everybody!
- Seven guns in St. Martin!
General Lamarque is dead.
Lamarque is dead.
Lamarque, his death is the hour of fate.
The people's man.
His death is the sign we await!
On his funeral day they will honor his name.
It's a rallying cry that will reach every ear!
In the death of Lamarque we will kindle the flame.
They will see that the day of salvation is near.
The time is here. Let us welcome it gladly with courage and cheer
Let us take to the streets with no doubt in our hearts.
But a jubilant shout, they will come one and all.
They will come when we call!
Do you hear the people sing?
Singing the song of angry men?
It is the music of a people who will not be slaves again.
When the beating of your heart echoes the beating of the drums.
There is a life about to start when tomorrow comes.
Will you join in our crusade?
Who will be strong and stand with me?
Beyond the barricade is there a world you long to see?
Then join the fight that will give you the right to be free.
Do you hear the people sing?
Singing the song of angry men?
It is the music of a people who will not be slaves again.
When the beating of your heart echoes the beating of the drums.
There is a life about to start when tomorrow comes.
Will you give all you can give so that our banner may advance?
Some will fall and some will live.
Will you stand up and take your chance?
The blood of the martyrs will water the meadows of France.
Do you hear the people sing?
Singing the song of angry men?
It is the music of a people who will not be slaves again.
When the beating of your heart echoes the beating of the drums.
There is a life about to start when tomorrow comes.
How strange this feeling that my life's begun at last.
This change... can people really fall in love so fast?
What's the matter with you, Cosette?
Have you been too much on your own?
So many things unclear.
So many things unknown.
In my life there are so many questions and answers... that somehow seem wrong.
In my life... there are times when I catch in the silence the sigh of a far away song.
And it sings of a world that
I long to see... out of reach, just a whisper away... waiting for me!
Does he know I'm alive?
Do I know if he's real?
Did he see what I saw?
Does he feel what I feel?
In my life I'm no longer alone now the love in my life is so near.
Find me now. Find me here.
In my life she has burst like the music of angels... the light of the sun.
And my life seems to stop as if something is over and something has scarcely begun.
Eponine...
You're the friend who has brought me here.
Thanks to you...
I am one with the gods and heaven is near.
And I soar through a world that is new, that is green.
Every word that he says is a dagger in me.
In my life there's been no-one like him anywhere... anywhere where he is.
If he asked, I'd be his.
[BOTH] In my life...
There is someone who touches my life.
- Waiting near.
- Waiting here.
A heart full of love.
A heart full of song.
I'm doing everything all wrong!
Oh, God, for shame.
I do not even know your name.
Dear madamoiselle, won't you say?
Will you tell?
A heart full of love.
No fear, no regret.
My name is Marius Pontmercy.
Cosette, I don't know what to say.
- Then make no sound.
- I am lost...
- I am found.
- A heart full of life...
[BOTH] A night bright as day.
You must never go away.
- Cosette, Cosette!
- This is a chain we'll never break.
- Do I dream?
- I'm awake.
A heart full of love.
[EPONINE] He was never mine to lose.
[MARIUS/COSETTE] A heart full of you.
[MARIUS/EPONINE] One single look and then I knew...
Why regret what cannot be?
[COSETTE/EPONINE] - I knew it too!
These are words he'll never say.
Not to me.
From today.
Not to me, not for me.
Every day...
[COSETTE/MARIUS] - For it isn't a dream.
[EPONINE] - His heart full of love.
[COSETTE/MARIUS] Not a dream after all.
[EPONINE] He will never feel this way...
[APPLAUSE]
This is his lair, I've seen the old fox around.
He keeps himself to himself, he's staying close to the ground.
I smell profit here!
Ten years ago he came and paid for Cosette.
I let her go for a song, it's time we settled the debt.
This'll cost him dear.
What do I care who you should rob?
Give me my share, finish the job.
You shut your mouth, give me your hands.
What have we here?
Who is this hussy?
It's your brat, Eponine, don't you know your own kid?
Why's she hanging about you?
Eponine, get on home, you're not needed in this.
We're enough here without you.
I know this house, I tell you there's nothing here for you.
Just the old man and the girl.
They live ordinary lives.
Don't interfere, you've got some gall. Take care, young miss, you've got a lot to say.
She's going soft.
Happens to all.
Go home, 'Ponine.
Go home, you're in the way.
I'm gonna scream.
I'm gonna warn them here.
One little scream and you'll regret it for a year.
What a palaver, what an absolute treat.
To watch a cat and its father pick a bone in the street.
Not a sound out of you!
Well I told you I'd do it,
I told you I'd do it.
[SCREAMS]
You wait, my girl.
You'll rue this night.
I'll make you scream.
You'll scream, all right.
Leave her to me. Don't wait around.
Make for the sewers, go underground.
It was your cry sent them away.
Once more 'Ponine saving the day.
Dearest Cosette - my friend 'Ponine.
Brought me to you, showed me the way!
Somebody's near - let's not be seen.
Somebody's near.
My God, Cosette!
I heard a cry in the dark.
I heard the shout of angry voices in the street.
That was my cry you heard, Papa.
I was afraid of what they'd do.
They ran away when they heard my cry.
Cosette, my child, what will become of you?
Three men I saw beyond the wall.
Three men in shadow moving fast.
This is a warning to us all.
These are the shadows of the past.
It must be Javert!
He's found my cover at last.
I've got to get Cosette away before they return.
We must get away from shadows.
They will never let us be here.
Tomorrow to Calais...
And then a ship across the sea!
Hurry, Cosette, prepare to leave and say no more, tomorrow we'll away!
Hurry, Cosette, it's time to close another door and live another day!
One day more.
Another day, another destiny.
This never-ending road to Calvary.
These men who seem to know my crime will surely come a second time.
- One day more.
- I did not live until today.
How can I live when we are parting?
One day more.
Tomorrow you'll be worlds away.
And yet with you my world has started.
One more day I'm on my own.
Will we ever meet again?
One more day with him not caring.
I was born to be with you.
What a life I might have known.
And I swear I will be true.
But he never saw me there.
- One more day before the storm!
- Do I follow where she goes?
- At the barricades of freedom.
- Shall I join my brothers there?
- When our ranks begin to form.
- Do I stay and do I dare?
Will you take your place with me?
[ALL]
The time is now - the day is here.
[VALJEAN/JAVERT] - One day more!
One more day to revolution.
We will nip it in the bud.
I will join these little schoolboys.
They will wet themselves with blood.
One day more.
Watch 'em run amuck, catch 'em as they fall.
Never know your luck when there's a free for all.
Here a little dip, there a little touch.
Most of them are goners so they won't miss much!
[STUDENTS] - One day to a new beginning.
Raise the flag of freedom high.
- Every man will be a king.
- Every man will be a king.
- There's a new world for the winning.
- There's a new world to be won.
[ALL] Do you hear the people sing?
[MARIUS]
My place is here, I fight with you!
One day more!
[MARIUS/COSETTE]
I did not live until today.
[EPONINE] One more day all on my own!
[MARIUS/COSETTE]
How can I live when we are parted?
One day more!
[MARIUS/COSETTE]
Tomorrow you'll be worlds away.
[EPONINE]
What a world I might have known!
[MARIUS/COSETTE]
And yet with you my world has started.
[VALJEAN] Tomorrow we'll be far away.
Tomorrow is the judgement day.
[ALL] Tomorrow we'll discover what our God in heaven has in store!
One more dawn.
One more day.
One day more!
[APPLAUSE]
And now I'm all alone again.
Nowhere to turn, no-one to go to.
Without a home, without a friend.
Without a face to say "hello" to.
And now the night is near.
Now I can make believe he's here.
Sometimes I walk alone at night when everybody else is sleeping.
I think of him, and then I'm happy with the company I'm keeping.
The city goes to bed and I can live inside my head.
On my own... pretending he's beside me.
All alone...
I walk with him 'till morning.
Without him I feel his arms around me.
And when I lose my way I close my eyes and he has found me.
In the rain the pavement shines like silver.
All the lights are misty in the river.
In the darkness the trees are full of starlight.
And all I see is him and me forever and forever.
And I know it's only in my mind.
That I'm talking to myself and not to him.
And although I know that he is blind... still I say there's a way for us.
I love him but when the night is over...
He is gone.
The river's just a river.
Without him the world around me changes.
The trees are bare and everywhere the streets are full of strangers.
I love him but every day I'm learning.
All my life I've only been pretending.
Without me his world will go on turning.
A world that's full of happiness that I have never known.
I love him...
I love him...
I love him...
But only on my own.
[APPLAUSE]
Red, the blood of angry men.
Black, the dark of ages past.
Red, a world about to dawn.
Black, the night that ends at last!
Now we pledge ourselves to hold this barricade.
Let them come in their legions and they will be met...
Have faith in yourselves and don't be afraid.
Let's give them a screwing they'll never forget!
This is where it begins.
And if I should die in the fight to be free...
Where the fighting is hardest there will I be.
Let them come if they dare.
We'll be there!
[CHEERING]
You at the barricade listen to this:
No one is coming to help you to fight.
You're on your own.
You have no friends.
Give up your guns - or die.
Damn their warnings, damn their lies.
They will see the people rise.
Damn their warnings, damn their lies.
They will see the people rise!
Listen my friends, I have done as I said.
I have been to their lines,
I have counted each man.
I will tell what I can.
Better be warned - they have armies to spare.
And the danger is real. We will need all our cunning to bring them to heel.
Have faith.
If you know what their movements are we'll spoil their game.
There are ways that a people can fight.
We shall overcome their power.
I have overheard their plans.
There will be no attack tonight.
They intend to starve us out before they start a proper fight.
Concentrate their force.
Hit us from the right.
Liar!
Good evening, dear inspector!
Lovely evening, my dear.
I know this man, my friends, his name's Inspector Javert.
So don't believe a word he says
'cause none of it's true.
This only goes to show what little people can do.
And little people know when little people fight.
We may look easy pickings but we've got some bite.
So never kick a dog because he's just a pup.
We'll fight like twenty armies and we won't give up.
So you'd better run for cover when the pup grows up!
Bravo, little Gavroche, you're the top of the class!
So what are we going to do with this snake in the grass?
Tie this man and take him to the tavern in there.
The people will decide your fate,
Inspector Javert.
- Take the bastard now and shoot him!
- Let us watch the devil dance.
You'd have done the same, Inspector, if we'd let you have your chance!
Take this man, bring him through.
There is work we have to do.
Dont you fret, monsieur, Marius.
I don't feel any pain.
A little fall of rain can hardly hurt me now.
You're here, that's all I need to know.
And you will keep me safe.
And you will keep me close.
And rain will make the flowers grow.
But you will live, 'Ponine
Dear God above...
If I could close your wounds with words of love...
Just hold me now, and let it be.
Shelter me, comfort me...
You would live a hundred years.
If I could show you how.
I won't desert you now...
The rain can't hurt me now.
This rain will wash away what's past.
And you will keep me safe.
And you will keep me close.
I'll sleep in your embrace at last.
The rain that brings you here is heaven-blessed.
The skies begin to clear and I'm at rest.
A breath away from where you are.
I've come home from so far.
- So don't you fret, monsieur, Marius.
- Hush-a-bye, dear Eponine.
- I don't feel any pain.
- You won't feel any pain.
- A little fall of rain.
- A little fall of rain.
- Can hardly hurt me now.
- Can hardly hurt you now.
I'm here.
That's all I need to know.
- And you will keep me safe.
- I will stay with you.
- And you will keep me close.
- 'Till you are sleeping.
- And rain will make the flowers...
- And rain will make the flowers... grow.
[APPLAUSE]
She is the first to fall.
The first of us to fall upon this barricade.
Her name was Eponine.
Her life was cold and dark.
Yet she was unafraid.
We fight here in her name.
She will not die in vain.
She will not be betrayed.
Here comes a man in uniform.
What brings you to this place?
I come here as a volunteer.
But look upon your face.
- You wear an army uniform.
- That's why they let me through.
- You've got some years behind you, sir.
- There's much that I can do.
You see that prisoner over there?
A volunteer like you.
A spy who calls himself "Javert".
He's gonna get it too.
They're getting ready to attack.
Take this and use it well.
But if you shoot us in the back, you'll never live to tell.
Platoon of sappers advancing toward the barricade!
Troops behind them! Fifty men or more.
[GUNFIRE]
"Valjean saves Enjolras from a sniper's bullet."
See how they run away?
My God, we've won the day.
They will be back again, make an attack again.
For your presence of mind, for the deed you have done.
I will thank you, monsieur, when our battle is won.
Give me no thanks, monsieur.
There's something you can do.
If it is in my power.
Give me the spy, Javert.
Let me take care of him.
The law is inside out.
The world is upside down.
Do what you have to do.
This man belongs to you.
The enemy may be regrouping.
Hold yourselves in readiness.
Come on, my friends.
Back to your positions.
The night is falling far.
We meet again.
You've hungered for this all your life.
Take your revenge.
How right you should kill with a knife.
You talk too much.
Your life is safe in my hands.
- I don't understand.
- Get out of here.
- Valjean, take care, I'm warning you.
- Clear out of here.
Once a thief forever a thief.
What you want, you always steal.
You would trade your life for mine.
Yes, Valjean, you want a deal.
Shoot me now for all I care.
If you let me go, beware.
You'll still answer to Javert!
You are wrong, and always have been wrong.
I'm a man no worse than any man.
You are free and there are no conditions.
Bargains or petitions.
There's nothing that I blame you for.
You've done your duty, nothing more.
If I come out of this alive, you will find me... at number 55 Rue Plumet.
No doubt our paths will cross again.
Go.
Drink with me. Today's gone by.
Sing with me the songs we knew.
Here's to pretty girls who went to our heads.
Here's to witty girls who went to our beds.
Here's to them and here's to you.
Drink with me. Today's gone by.
Can it be you fear to die?
Will the world remember you when you fall?
Could it be your death means nothing at all?
Is your life just one more lie?
Drink with me. Today's gone by.
To the life that used to be.
At the shrine of friendship never say die.
Let the wine of friendship never run dry.
Here's to you and here's to me.
Do I care if I should die now she goes across the sea?
Life without Cosette means nothing at all.
Would you weep, Cosette, should Marius fall?
Will you weep, Cosette... for me?
[APPLAUSE]
God on high... hear my prayer.
In my need you have always been there.
He is young. He's afraid.
Let him rest.
Heaven blessed.
Bring him home.
Bring him home.
Bring him home.
He's like the son I might have known.
If God had granted me a son.
The summers die one by one.
How soon they fly on and on.
And I am old.
And will be gone.
Bring him peace.
Bring him joy.
He is young.
He is only a boy.
You can take, you can give.
Let him be. Let him live.
If I die, let me die.
Let him live.
Bring him home.
Bring him home.
Bring him home.
[APPLAUSE]
You on the barricades, listen to this.
The people of Paris sleep in their beds.
You have no chance.
No chance at all.
Why throw your lives away?
Let us die facing our foes.
Make them bleed while we can.
Make 'em pay through the nose.
Make 'em pay for every man.
Let others rise to take our place.
Until the earth is free!
[GUNFIRE]
[GUNFIRE]
[All at the barricade are killed, except Marius,
[who is wounded and unconscious, and Valjean.]
Here's a hint of gold stuck into a tooth.
Pardon me monsieur, you won't be needing this no more.
Shouldn't be too hard to sell.
Add it to the pile.
Add it to the stock.
Here among the sewer rats.
A breath away from hell.
You get accustomed to the smell.
Well someone's got to clean 'em up, my friends.
Bodies on the highway, law and order upside down.
Someone's got to collect their odds and ends.
As a service to the town.
Here's a tasty ring.
Pretty little thing.
Wouldn't want to waste it.
That would really be a crime.
Thank you sir, I'm in your debt.
Here's a little toy.
Take it off the boy.
His heart's no longer going and he's lived his little time.
But his watch is ticking yet!
Well, someone's got to clean them up, my friends.
Before the little harvest disappears into the mud.
Someone's got to collect their odds and ends.
When the gutters run with blood.
It's a world where the dog eats the dog.
Where they kill for bones in the street.
And God in His Heaven,
He don't interfere.
'Cause he's dead as the stiffs at my feet.
I raise my eyes to see the heavens.
And only the moon looks down.
The harvest moon shines down!
[APPLAUSE]
It's you, Javert.
I knew you wouldn't wait too long.
The faithful servant at his post once more.
This man's done no wrong and he needs a doctor's care.
I warned you I would not give in.
- I won't be swayed.
- Another hour yet, and then I'm yours.
And all our debts are paid.
The man of mercy comes again.
- And talks of justice
- Come, time is running short.
Look down, Javert. He's standing in his grave.
- Give way, Javert.
- Take him Valjean.
- There is a life to save.
- Before I change my mind.
I will be waiting, "24601".
Who is this man?
What sort of devil is he?
To have me caught in a trap and choose to let me go free?
It was his hour at last to put a seal on my fate.
Wipe out the past and watch me clean off the slate!
All it would take was a flick of his knife.
Vengence was his and he gave me back my life.
Damned if I'll live in the debt of a theif.
Damned if I'll yield at the end of the chase.
I am the Law and the
Law is not mocked.
I'll spit his pity right back in his face.
There is nothing on earth that we share.
It is either Valjean or Javert!
How can I now allow this man... to hold dominion over me?
This desperate man whom I have hunted.
He gave me my life, he gave me freedom.
I should have perished by his hand!
It was his right.
It was my right to die as well
Instead I live, but live in hell!
And my thoughts fly apart.
Can this man be believed?
Shall his sins be forgiven?
Shall his crimes be reprieved?
And must I now begin to doubt... who never doubted all these years?
My heart is stone and still it trembles.
The world I have known is lost in shadow.
Is he from heaven or from hell?
And does he know... that granting me my life today...
This man has killed me even so?
I am reaching, but I fall.
And the stars are black and cold.
As I stare into the void... of a world that cannot hold.
I'll escape now from that world.
From the world of Jean Valjean.
There is nowhere I can turn.
There is no way to go on!
[Javert throws himself into the swollen river.]
[APPLAUSE]
Did you see them going off to fight?
Children of the barricade who didn't last the night?
Nothing changes, nothing ever will.
Every year another brat, another mouth to fill.
Same old story, what's the use of tears?
What's the use of praying if there's nobody who hears?
Turning, turning, turning, turning, turning through the years.
Turning, turning, turning through the years.
Minutes into hours and the hours into years.
Nothing changes, nothing ever can.
Round and round the roundabout and back where you began!
Round and round and back where you began.
There's a grief that can't be spoken.
There's a pain goes on and on.
Empty chairs at empty tables.
Now my friends are dead and gone.
Here they talked of revolution.
Here it was they lit the flame.
Here they sang about tomorrow.
And tomorrow never came.
From the table in the corner... they could see a world reborn.
And they rose with voices ringing.
I can hear them now!
The very words that they had sung.
Became their last communion.
On the lowly barricade... at dawn.
Oh my friends, my friends forgive me.
That I live and you are gone.
There's a grief that can't be spoken.
There's a pain goes on and on.
Phantom faces at the window.
Phantom shadows on the floor.
Empty chairs at empty tables... where my friends will meet no more.
Oh my friends, my friends, don't ask me... what your sacrifice was for.
Empty chairs at empty tables... where my friends will sing no more.
Every day you walk with stronger step.
You walk with longer step.
The worst is over.
Every day, I wonder every day... who was it brought me here from the barricade?
Don't think about it, Marius.
With all the years ahead of us!
I will never go away and we will be together every day.
Every day. Every day.
We'll remember that night.
And the vow that we made:
A heart full of love.
A night full of you.
The words are old but always true.
Oh, God, for shame, you did not even know my name.
Dear madamoiselle, I was lost in your spell.
A heart full of love.
[VALJEAN] She was never mine to keep.
[COSETTE] No fear no regret.
- My name is Marius Pontmercy.
- She was youthful, she was free.
Cosette, Cosette!
- I saw you waiting and I knew.
- Love is the garden of the young.
- Waiting for you at your feet.
- Let it be...
- At your call.
- Let it be.
- And it wasn't a dream.
- A heart full of love.
- Not a dream...
- This I give you...
- after all.
- This day.
[APPLAUSE]
Ring out the bells upon this day of days!
May all the angels of the Lord above... in jubilation sing their songs of praise!
And crown this blessed time with peace and love!
Ain't it a laugh?
Ain't it a treat?
Hob-nobbin' here among the elite?
There goes a prince. Here comes a Jew.
This one's a queer but what can you do?
Paris at my feet.
Paris in the dust.
And here's me breaking bread with the upper crust.
Beggar at the feast.
Master of the dance.
Life is easy pickings if you grab your chance.
Everywhere you go law-abiding folk.
Doing what is decent but they're mostly broke!
Singing to the Lord on Sundays.
Praying for the gifts He'll send.
But we're the ones who take it.
We're the ones who make it in the end.
Watch the buggers dance.
Watch 'em till they drop.
Keep your wits about you and you stand on top.
Masters of the land, always get our share.
Clear away the barricades and we're still there.
We know where the wind is blowing.
Money is the stuff we smell.
And when we're rich as Croesus,
Jesus! Won't we see you all in hell.
[APPLAUSE]
Alone I wait in the shadows.
I count the hours 'till I can sleep.
I dreamed a dream Cosette stood by.
It made her weep to know I die.
Alone at the end of the day.
Upon this wedding night I pray.
Take these children, my Lord.
To thy embrace.
And show them grace.
God on high... hear my prayer.
Take me now... to thy care.
Where you are let me be.
Take me now.
Take me there.
Bring me home.
Bring me home.
Monsieur, I bless your name.
I am ready, Fantine.
Monsieur, lay down your burden.
At the end of my day.
You raised my child with love.
- She's the best of my life.
- And you will be with God.
Papa, papa, I do not understand!
Are you alright? They said you'd gone away.
Cosette, my child, am I forgiven now?
Thank God, thank God, I've lived to see this day.
It's you who must forgive a thoughtless fool.
It's you who must forgive a thankless man.
It's thanks to you that I am living.
And again I lay down my life at your feet.
Cosette, your father is a saint.
When they wounded me, he took me from the barricade.
Carried like a babe... and brought me home.
To you.
Now you are here.
Again beside me.
Now I can die in peace.
For now my life is blessed.
You will live, Papa, you're going to live.
It's too soon, too soon to say goodbye.
Yes, Cosette, forbid me now to die.
I'll obey.
I will try.
On this page I write my last confession.
Read it well when I at last am sleeping.
It's a story of those who always loved you.
Your mother gave her life for you then gave you to my keeping.
Come with me where chains will never bind you.
All your grief at last, at last behind you.
Lord in Heaven look down on him in mercy.
Forgive me all my trespasses and take me to your glory.
[SPIRITS]
Take my hand and lead me to salvation.
Take my love for love is everlasting.
[WITH VALJEAN] And remember the truth that once was spoken
To love another person is to see the face of God.
(Do you hear the people sing lost in the valley of the night?)
(It is the music of a people who are climbing to the light.)
(For the wretched of the earth there is a flame that never dies.)
(Even the darkest night will end and the sun will rise.)
They will live again in freedom in the garden of the Lord.
They will walk behind the plough-share they will put away the sword.
The chain will be broken and all men will have their reward!
Will you join in our crusade?
Who will be strong and stand with me?
Somewhere beyond the barricade is there a world you long to see?
Do you hear the people sing?
Say, do you hear the distant drums?
It is the future that they bring when tomorrow comes!
Will you join in our crusade?
Who will be strong and stand with me?
Somewhere beyond the barricade is there a world you long to see?
Do you hear the people sing?
Say, do you hear the distant drums?
It is the future that they bring when tomorrow comes!
Tomorrow comes!
[APPLAUSE]
Do you hear the people sing?
Singing the song of angry men?
[BOTH] It is the music of a people who will not be slaves again.
When the beating of your heart echoes the beating of a drum...
There is a life about to start when tomorrow comes.
A la volont du peuple et  la sant du progrs...
Das ist die Symphonie von Menschen die nicht lnger Sklaven sind...
[Japanese]...
[Hungarian]...
[Swedish]...
[Polish]...
[Dutch]...
When the beating of your heart echoes the beating of the drum...
There is a life about to start when tomorrow comes.
[German]...
Some will fall and some will live. Will you stand up and take your chance?...
The blood of the martyrs will water the meadows of France.
[Norwegian]...
[Czech]...
[Danish]...
Will you join in our crusade? Who will be strong and stand with me?...
[Icelandic]...
Do you hear the people sing? Say, do you hear the distant drums?...
It is the future that they bring when tomorrow comes.
[ALL] One day more.
One day more.
[VALJEAN] Tomorrow we'll be far away.
Tomorrow is the judgement day.
[All] Tomorrow we'll discover what our God in heaven has in store.
One more dawn.
One more day.
One day more!
...( Subtitle transcript/synchro by Soulhunter )...
Aalst, Belgium - end 19th century
Pick up those bobbins!
Put that basket away!
Watch out!
What's this?
Go on, pick it up.
Pick that up!
Work, or I don't need you.
Get out, son of a bitch!
And you, 20 centimes fine!
I didn't do anything!
20 cents or out too.
Professor Daens, is it true that you want to leave the college of Dendermonde?
I've had nine beautiful years,
Monseigneur. That's enough.
You've had nine years of troubles with everybody.
Them with me, maybe.
I won't deny that.
Anyhow, now I want to go to Aalst.
I have a spot as a junior priest in Drongen.
You're expected there tomorrow.
You know very well that I've had real problems in Drongen.
- And indeed, with everybody.
- I remember, because you still have.
I don't think I'm welcome there.
You can hold your own.
And you're a difficult man.
Shouldn't you consider in peace what you actually want?
You're not happy anywhere!
You're right, Monseigneur. That's why I'm leaving for Aalst tomorrow.
If you really need me, you can find me there.
Please, Lord, free us from Daens.
In the name of the father,
Son and Holy Ghost. Amen!
May St. Ursula protect our factory in these troubled times.
Hail Mary, Mother of God.
Lord be with you, blessed above all women and blessed is your Son Jesus.
Holy Mary, Mother of God, pray for us, now and forever. Amen.
Go away, there! Get out!
There, there are more!
There's Nini!
Those coals are ours. Get out!
You don't need coals.
Aalst! Two-minute stop!
Two-minute stop.
And? Where are these socialists?
All this panic for nothing!
Well, well! Father Daens!
- Adolf... What a surprise!
- Am I not welcome?
- Or is Aalst yours only now?
- No, no.
But the bishop did not inform us.
- Where do I send this, Father?
- To my brother's, printer Daens.
Read "Forwards"!
The socialist paper!
Read "Forwards"!
The socialist paper!
Please sirs, for you it's free!
Don't hit me!
- According to Belgian law, I can...
- I'm the law here you can nothing. Back to Ghent!
Guys, dirty Lisette has potatoes.
Lisette!
- Gee, what a potato.
- My potatoes!
There's another fat one.
Thieves!
Let's go, fellows. Run!
My potatoes, thieves!
Bunch of bastards!
What are you doing?
This is no cemetery or dunghill.
- Why are you bringing this here?
- Throw them away at your place.
Throw it away!
I'm fed up with the child.
Look there!
Father, do you agree with him?
Dumping his corpses here.
What can I do with it?
It's not up to me to bury her.
Besides, I need my cart.
I've got work to do.
- What happened?
- Frozen to death, Father. Feel it.
It's the same every day.
Farmers find them and bring them here instead of burying them.
Does anybody know her?
Everyone knows her, Father.
Nini, with the wet cherry.
So, potato-thief, maybe you also know where her parents are?
Yes, over there somewhere.
Around the corner, under the bar.
Whose arse is this.
Whose arse is that.
Whose arse may this well be.
But man, this is the coal bag.
That coal bag belongs to me...
Fellows, they've released a crow!
Cover your bum, your man is here!
Gust! That's a priest!
Doesn't have to look for favours around here. Do you Father, or are you looking for the devil?
- I'm looking for Nini's parents.
- Hot Nini, with the wet cherry?
Gust!
Over there, Father.
Listen, if you're here to lecture us, don't bother!
And certainly not about that whore.
It's everyone for himself here
And our poor-box is empty.
But... do you know what happened to her?
- Did you see her?
- She's banged up.
We know. And leave my man alone.
None of your business!
- Indeed.
- This is the one.
Red swine, I didn't do anything.
You haven't either, did you, Jef?
She liked it.
She came to ask for it herself.
Here.
Don't let them bury her like a dog.
Buy her a coffin.
- Hey, more thieves!
- Uncle Adolf!
- Are those boxes for us?
- Of course! Choose, you skunks!
Adolf... gee! It's been a long time!
- Can I move in here?
- Run off again?
I hate priests, the college makes me sick.
I could teach you in private and finally pay you back.
Don't be silly. you're welcome!
Peter will be glad!
- I hear you're still kind to your readers.
- Adolf!
What a surprise!
- Travelling through?
- No, I'm staying!
Does your bishop allow this?
Here, competition.
You trust yourself on the streets with such a newspaper?
Where did you get it?
A socialist's gift at the station.
- Any room for me on the front page?
- If you want...
ENOUGH DEAD CHILDREN IN AALST
Did you read this, Borremans?
A catholic paper against our ideas agitating the workers against us.
- You must talk about it to Woeste.
- You do it. There he is.
- Have you read it Mr. Chairman?
- I'm aware, my friends.
I will bring reason to that little printer.
It's going too far.
Aalst is getting more dangerous by the day.
They insult and loot us and threaten our women.
They terrorise the country and this newspaper.
- Don't exaggerate, Druw.
- Do I?
Let's not waste our time.
That paper I can handle.
These workers shouldn't bite the hands that feed them.
The church should take care of that.
As an employer you take care of their of salvation too.
You don't know these workers.
They have the same worries as us directors.
How many factories will survive the crisis in Aalst?
If the government won't subsidize me, I will close down.
- There will be no subvention.
- But you promised...
My colleagues in the government don't want state intervention.
The recommend the English method.
Limit production costs to enable competition.
Lower the wages?
That's impossible.
It's not, I pay them 1.60 franc for 14 hours work.
Cumont pays 2 franc for 11 hours.
And he's still complaining, he's going to go down.
If we all draw the line, they even will accept 1.40 franc.
While a loaf of bread costs 60 centimes and a bag of coal 1,50?
Pay them with potatoes.
Why not?
The money goes to booze anyway.
They won't survive...
They also won't survive if the factories closes
- Poverty is not the problem.
- I agree with that.
But to me it's dangerous to lower the wages now.
People are already upset.
We could implement the Scottish system.
Three workers to four machines.
And if we only let the women work we safe half.
You can't mean that?
- It's an interesting idea.
- The Scots still do it as well.
Three female worker to four machines.
12, 13 or 14 hours per night?
Are there not enough accidents already?
How many fatal accidents have you got?
And you, Antoine? And you lot?
Safe us your demagogy.
In every war there will be casualties.
You are monsters. The lot of you.
We liberals stand up for our workers who live in total poverty.
No aid from you and Aalst loses its industry and you your constituents.
I'm sorry to interrupt,
Mr. Woeste and you gentlemen...
...but now it's time to relax.
- What a charming thought.
- Don't hide, Junior.
Say hello to Mr. Woeste.
Hello, Junior.
Work hard and you be as big and important as your dad.
Who is teaching you?
We are looking. They have recommend
Father Daens to us.
The brother of that printer.
Let's hope he thinks differently.
It doesn't say a-e, but e, consul-e.
The root always stays the same.
Carry on.
- Again, carry on.
- Latin bores me, Father.
Don't recite it like a parrot, without knowing what you say.
- What is written there?
- Consul.
- Do you know what that is.
- No.
Only women and children. Go away.
Let those children pass.
- Out, Scholliers, no work for you.
- Because you say so?
Too old. Try to work in Germany.
Let my dad in.
- What's your name?
- Nette.
- Take his place at the spinner.
- I work in the laundry
Shut up!
Here.
Don't work on bare feet.
No work, Andre!
Scottish system, you're off.
I'm going to work.
Or do your machines work alone?
- You cost too much.
- Too much?
Must we pay to work here now, according to your Scottish system?
I don't speak Flemish, but I know what you write.
I received countless letters.
I cite:
Daily children die at the gates of the factories.
If I didn't know better...
...I would think this is written by a socialist.
But it's true.
Too many children die.
You only stir up commotion.
Don't forget your catholic subscribers.
As leader of the Catholic Party...
...I won't let you smear the pillars of our society.
I assure you...
May I introduce my brother Adolf to you?
- This is our chairman.
- Pleasure.
You've arrived at the right moment.
I just warned your brother about the context of his article.
As a priest why don't you try to reason him.
- That would be difficult.
- And why so?
Because I wrote the article myself.
Decent of you to protect him...
But your cassock makes me disbelieve you
I hope your conceptions do right to your costume.
That goes without saying.
But some of your ideas don't match your clothing.
If you want to keep your soutane, don't start again.
You're crazy!
Talking to him like that...
- What'll we do now?
- We? You just carry on...
...with another article.
Come. Take these two to the six and from now on take the five as well.
Sort it out among you.
You lot, get to your machines!
To your machines!
Hang your coat there.
Watch out.
Wait till the machine is stationery.
Tie up your hair.
It's dangerous like that.
- Keep your hands off me.
- Don't be afraid
- I'm not as bad as they say.
- Leave me alone.
If he touches you once more,
I'll beat him up.
I'll smash his face.
I'll beat Borremans as well.
You don't believe me, do you?
You'll see...
Show Ponnet in!
- Monseigneur.
- Is what Daens writes true? Or not?
Depends on the point of view the facts are considered from.
- I'm a priest, a shepherd.
- That's not what I asked.
Nobody can deny that poverty reigns in Aalst, Monseigneur, just like in many other cities, but we do our best to help.
Did... Daens ever show you his sermons?
No. I'm not good enough!
Sometimes he doesn't even bother to speak to me.
I try to behave like a Christian, but my feelings do not really matter here.
You can have it for a week.
You can kiss it at your leisure.
Wear your helmet, because a bad blow is easily given.
So, Catalina comes in and you speak to him directly an remember: you only have one hour to save your life.
Borremans, come out,
I'll hit you!
- Come out, if you dare!
- Get him, Titus!
Don't!
- Stop that dog! 
- Titus! Titus!... Heel!
- Leave me alone.
- I want to help you.
Priests are for the rich.
Father, what is going on?
Father, come... your wounds need treating.
No need to clean up St. Ursula.
No celebration for her this year.
And neither for us. No mass.
No party.
Leave them alone, dad.
Come on, go home, dad.
But father, you are hurt!
- You scare people.
- Guess so.
But this needs to be tended to.
- What's your name?
- Nette, Nette Scholliers.
Come.
- We have nothing as it is.
- Mama , this is father...
...Daens.
Good morning, Madame, Monsieur.
Sorry to bother.
I bumped into something.
Sit down, Father. Nette...
Take a clean towel.
Welcome, Father.
Kids, look here!
A real priest in the house.
Frans! Forgive him, Father.
He was fired at the factory.
- Louis... Wannes
- No need to wake them.
If they don't seen you they won't believe you were here.
Come on, Wannes, open your eyes!
Open your eyes Louis!
Doesn't matter. They have to go to work anyway. On the night-shift.
They never go to school?
The two youngest do, sometimes.
The others work.
- Good workers.
- All of them. And our Louis...
Louis...
He's a porter at the town hall.
Close your eyes, Father.
Louis, get up, the priest is here.
Let him, he's drunk.
- Nette! - Louis is a Buck.
At night the beat up the reds.
Shut up. The Bucks are bastards.
What is going on here?
Someone needs a beating?
If you want to, do like the priest and beat up your friend Schmitt.
- He can't keep his claws to himself.
- Nette, don't discuss this now.
But ma! -Schmitt is boss.
That doesn't mean he can touch me!
No more of this.
- Schmitt is not the only one, eh?
- Louis!
Say that again if you dare.
Let's pray first.
In the name of the Father and the
In the name of the Father and the son and the Holy Ghost. Amen.
Lord bless us and this meal.
In the name of the Father and the son and the Holy Ghost. Amen.
A potato, Father?
- Or a cup of coffee?
- Thanks. - They're Polders.
Nora is a good cook. Enjoy yourself.
Now that you're here, Father, may I ask you something?
What would you do?
For 30 years you work for a director through thick and thin.
Shut up!
All these years, you walk in his beautiful procession, his procession for St. Ursula.
And then, suddenly, he says:
"Get out!"
What would you do, Father?
You'd still go to his procession?
Not me!
No, Father, not me.
Provided his sermon is decent and deals with higher ideas, nothing actually opposes a priest to share with a large audience.
But Father Daens' sermon is of shocking triviality. and I regret to say, is revealing a shameful demagogy.
Quite right, Mr Woeste, quite right.
But after all, this subject is only inspired on Rerum Novarum
...and on paternal preoccupations of his holiness
Leon XIII, for the condition of the workers.
This encyclical doesn't mention the stirring of the workers against those who feed them!
Now, Daens has created such suspicion that the government considers to send an investigation committee to Aalst.
- What a triumph for our enemies!
- On the contrary, Mr Woeste.
If, as you say, we are talking about slander an inquest will prove that Father Daens is wrong.
A word from you would suffice, to reduce him to silence.
Father Daens is careless,
Mr Woeste,
But... he has a brilliant mind, and in that case, I'm not sure that a remonstration is enough.
Monseigneur, you have other means than a mere remonstration to ensure his obedience.
When a priest uses his cloth to spread hostilities, it can be taken away.
Mr Woeste, I'm afraid that only the ecclesiastic authorities are capable to judge this.
Of course, Monseigneur.
But you must understand me.
I came in everybody's interest to avoid this matter from going beyond this diocese and leading us to appeal to higher instances.
An energetic cure at the right moment can prevent complications.
Don't you agree?
I understand you perfectly my son.
An investigation committee in the factories of Aalst!
An investigation committee in the factories of Aalst!
Read "The Worker"!
Read Father Daens' new article.
Read "The Worker"!
The paper of good Catholics!
Read "Forwards!"
The real paper for the worker!
Large demonstration in Ghent for general voting rights!
Read "Forwards!" the socialist newspaper.
You there. Yes you miss!
He wants you.
You must buy this.
I wrote something for you.
I will read it to you...
...in your ear.
Leave it. It's a fool from Ghent.
You, Reds, can't read.
Your paper smells of hell.
Give me a clean catholic paper.
Hey, Fonske! - Read "Forwards"!
The real newspaper for the workers!
Here. Read this to me,
I can't read.
Me neither...
Read "The Worker"! - You there, big mouth.
What is written here? Can you tell?
- I can't read this catholic jargon.
- I told you he couldn't read.
Give that paper to me.
Ladies, great news.
"Thanks to Doctor Dupont and his magical salts, constipation is a thing of the past!"
- That's not what it says. 
- No? Who can read? You or me?
- Then read us Daens' article!
- Here is your article:
Common sense has prevailed.
The government has decided that a committee of 6 honourable personalities will investigate the factories of Aalst.
They will be able to interrogate the workers directly...
Surely, you don't believe, what the priest says, that they'll listen.
They're all the director's friends.
If you want respect from them, you must change the government
Hence, the parliament first.
But since we don't have a say in parliament, we need voting rights first!
Who are you to criticize Daens?
There is no one like him in Ghent.
Your priest says the same as we do.
But we did it first.
So loud that we didn't hear it!
Besides, Daens is in our paper and not in yours, you red cabbage!
This committee only comes to eat.
- No potatoes, but fat steaks.
- What?
That Daens is a saint.
He will change the factories.
Priests are sly and change nothing.
You don't know what a committee is.
We, socialists, demanded 2 francs for 12 hours.
So what?
Daens asked 12 francs for 2 hours.
You wise ass!
The riddle has been solved by a great catholic
Put all your children to work.
They'll never get ill.
Here my friend, sell mine too.
You'll be more successful.
So no more schools to raise.
Children. Weavers...
Sold out already?
- Do I get anything?
- For what you want from Nette, you'll have to do more than read.
Buy us a drink and we'll forget you are a socialist.
The Bucks!
And our Louis!
There! Let's get him, fellows.
- Red dog, damn it!
- Shit ass!
Brussels? This is Aalst.
May I speak to Mr Woeste?
Doesn't work?
Eugene, I've never interfered, but this concerns my family.
Please, I beg you.
For Junior's sake. to reconsider the whole thing.
Mr Daens has always been welcome, but he has gone too far! Christ, he demands that my factory be investigated.
You must separate matters.
- Tell Daens!
- No, I'm telling you.
- This is about our son.
- My son will not be educated by a socialist!
Not a word about it!
Shut your mouths!
Take off those rags!
- Off!
- They're all I have.
Then go home!
And no stupidities, you hear?
You know what to say!
- And us?
- You can't all speak!
These are serious people from parliament. At your machines!
At your machines!
Marie, ask Julia to swap places with me.
Julia... Do you want to swap with Nette?
Schmitt... An excellent foreman, knows the factory very well.
Ask him any question you like.
Aren't these machines dangerous?
No, sir. The director has had new modern machines installed.
It's only dangerous when you drink.
I feel that I am going to find me a spot here!
- Do you like to work at night?
- What about your husband? Any kids?
- She only speaks Flemish.
- What does she say??
She's happy.
She says she's very happy here.
She wants to work nights, so she stays with her kid in the day.
Excuse me. Any toilets here?
- I'd like to go to the bathroom.
- No, no, it's ladies only.
- What about the men? - This way.
- Is it far? - No, at the director's.
Do you speak Flemish?
The locked the children in there!
What is it, my child?
They're lying!
Go on! Tell him!
We're treated like animals.
We...
Every day there are accidents because we are too tired.
What is she saying?
We're running late, sir.
- Problems Schmitt?
- No, sir.
Scholliers!
Satisfied?
Two francs fine.
Stupid cows.
Why didn't you say something?
- It was our only chance.
- We tried, but they didn't understand.
You were wiggling with your hips.
We should have pulled together.
There won't be another committee.
We will die like rats!
Come on, Milleke, get on!
This isn't your bed, come on.
Get to work!
At your machines!
Faster, come on!
Milleke!
Damn it, watch where you going.
- Mother, is dad coming home tonight?
- Yes, honey, he'll be right there, but be quiet now...
- I'm so hungry, mother.
- I know, son,
- but... Listen!
- Josee!
There's daddy.
- Josee... Where's my dinner?
- You smell of booze again!
- Drink is our downfall!
- Give me food, I tell you,
- or I'll go back to the pub!
- A piece of bread is all there is left in the house.
It's for Fonske.
Give it here!
And speaking about Fonske...
I'll go and ask the factory
When he can start!
No!
He's old enough!
- But Jules! He is only six!
- I was only five!
Go away, all of you!
He is dead!
Clarisse, Julia, take him away.
I will get water.
- Nette, don't. - Get off!
- Come on, Nette.
This is understandable not only in Flemish.
Everybody, to your machines!
- Wait a minute.
- Let me through.
Josee.
We are rich!
Jules, did the director give you a raise?
Yeah, as from today, I am working one floor higher up!
But you're home so early!
Yes, I really hurried.
By the way... where is our Fonske?
He's gone to rehearse at the choir.
Good. I like that.
"Even without knowing the result, the coming of the committee is an important step forward".
"The Committee"? The Committee!
Pieter, Father!
Borremans is closed.
Something must have happened.
Gendarmes!
Draw your sabres!
Officer!
What do you want?
We want to see the committee.
Gentlemen, please come these way.
You can come along if you like.
- They have a dead child, commander.
- Take it from them. - But...
- Execution!
- Yes, commander.
- Charge!
- Oh, no!
Where is Milleke?
It's coming from Mijlenbeeck!
Hey, no! Stop!
Look what you've done.
Fool! Look what you've done.
Get out of here.
Get lost! Get out!
I suggested to Stillemans that you give a sermon on Rerum Novarum, but he insisted that I do it.
- Have you read my sermon?
- Yes.
- What do you think?
- Very bad.
The gospel we just heard is telling us about the multiplication of the bread and fish.
Lots of them hundreds, thousands of them, women and children, rich and poor, had followed Christ and had been listening to Him.
When the evening came, the apostles asked him to send the crowd home, or to the surrounded villages to find food and shelter. And he said
"Why don't you feed them?"
They told him there was barely, enough for themselves,
5 loaves of bread and 2 fishes
He looked reproachfully at them, asked the people to sit, looked towards heaven, blessed the loaves of bread and the fish and had his disciples share them.
There were 5 000 people.
They all ate.
They all had their fill.
Dearly beloved, if Christ teaches us that it is our duty to share without prejudice of rank or class, if he gives away the little food he has to perfect strangers, then why shouldn't this be the duty of the Belgian bourgeois class toward the poor, who they know?
Who work for them!
Or do these people, who claim to be faithful servants of the pope, think that the gospel is not meant for French ears, because it is written in Latin? People scream:
"We're hungry!" Loud and clear.
And these words should not be thrown to the wind.
It is time the voices of the poor were heard in this country.
Besides, my dear friends, how come, the voice of the rich is always much louder than a poor man's?
Why is a poor man's vote worth less than a rich man's?
Who has a right to say: "You are good and you are bad, you can vote, and you cannot?"
Unbelievable!
He preaches universal suffrage!
Gentlemen, directors. What does the pope, whom you like to quote so much, what does he say, in his encyclical Rerum Novarum?
"We are convinced that we should improve the fate of the lower class because a large part of them live in undeserved misery."
My dear friends, it is clear that our Holy Father, Pope Leo XIII, and Christ are speaking the same language and that an end should be put to this organised, established injustice.
And remember, my friends: you don't have anything.
It is not you who have to share, but those, who have just left this church.
How can you be so clumsy?
Thanks to your brutality,
Daens has all the trumps.
Be more clever with you workers.
Give them soup, knit them scarves...
That will make us popular.
The pope wants more charity.
That's the right policy!
I'm not sure that's enough.
The situation is too serious.
- They demand the universal suffrage.
- They'll never have it!
I'm sorry, but... a lot of people think otherwise.
Half of the factories are striking for the universal suffrage.
The agitation is such that, it would be a miracle if Aalst escapes this revolution.
Mr Woeste, the strikers find support everywhere, even within our own party.
Father Daens runs a campaign for the universal suffrage,
- within our party.
- Throw him out.
- Him, his brother and the others.
- No, that's not enough.
That would turn him into a martyr.
There's only one way to finish him unfrock him!
In civil clothes this priest will be a nobody.
I'll go all the way to the Vatican.
- Not in that thing, you won't!
- Very funny...
We must be aware that many workers will turn their back on the Church.
More so the reason not to hesitate and to be firm to Daens.
I'd love to, but I won't be degraded to Mr Woeste's errand boy.
Send Daens to the Congo.
They're short of missionaries.
Then Daens will choose for the blacks and everyone will return.
I know Daens.
Hurry up Willem,
I have work to do.
Sorry Monseigneur, the only solution here might be a prayer.
Arise, ye wretched of the earth...
- Monseigneur...
- This is the result of your reckless talk!
Father Daens!
You are a priest to spread God's word, not the socialists'.
If there is inequality on earth, it is because God wants it.
I wouldn't say that.
You reason like Woeste.
He turns God into a Belgian and bars everyone who doesn't
- belong to his Belgian heaven.
- Quiet... Daens!
I haven't asked you here to discuss politics.
Once more, you embarrass me with your difficult character.
Instead of visiting pubs in your robe, don't you think you should look at yourself and try to find out whether all this popularity doesn't stem from the pursuit of pure vanity?
You don't listen to anybody, because you want them to listen to you!
That is not the issue.
The seriousness of the situation in Aalst escapes you.
You and I are facing hard times.
Flanders is lost if Aalst becomes red.
That's what catholic workers think.
You are stumbling over your own brains.
To give you a chance to do penance for this, you will temporarily celebrate the mass in solitude.
I forbid you to preach in Sint-Martinus church again!
Don't do that, Monseigneur!
- I beg you...
- Kneel, so that I can bless you.
- More...
- No, or there'll be
- nothing left for the little ones.
- Let them work, if they want to eat.
- I'm on strike. - Lazy!
- Ask Louis!
- Louis is a rat.
- Don't speak about him like that.
- You don't work either.
- Don't talk to father like that.
You shut up too, you're on strike!
Give it back, you can't do that!
It's for Jannes.
Give that potato back!
- Enough!
- If that's how it is, there's free soup at the factory.
Sit down you.
We only eat what we work for.
- That soup is for the poor.
- We are poor, Dad!
- Worker or striker?
- I don't work.
- Go away.
- I work.
- Why don't they get anything?
- You only get soup if you work.
Do you think I'm crazy?
Do you think we feed the reds?
That soup is poison!
Belgium strikes! We must join them!
Do you want them to laugh at us?
That soup is to break the strike!
We, the socialist, are giving soup to everybody. Real good
Aalst onion soup for everyone!
- Don't believe them. Who wants some?
- Don't eat it. It's pagan soup!
- Don't believe them.
- Let's all strike! Strike for the universal suffrage!
I think he's right.
We must carry on the strike.
They'll think you're red too!
I don't care, I'm hungry.
Who else?
I'm sure Daens supports the strike.
- He should say so.
- But he's gone.
You'll never see him again, believe me.
Where is Daens, Father?
A priest is like a soldier.
He goes where God needs him.
I want to know where Daens is.
You're hiding him.
- Ridiculous.
- Then were is Daens?
Now, now, friends...
Leave the Father alone.
I want to know where Daens is!
- Where is Daens!
- Schmitt, no more soup.
No soup for strikers!
- Louis!  - Have you gone made?
- Leave that kid alone, you idiot!
- Where's the soup?
- But, Elizabeth.
Wasn't that soup for everyone?
Long live the strike!
And the universal suffrage!
Not enough salt.
One million more votes...
That's preposterous!
You insult the people!
Gentlemen! A little dignity, please!
The vote is closed.
I'll read to you the result of the vote on the law proposal from Mr Nyssens, on the introduction in Belgium of plural suffrage.
Have voted in favour: 119
Have voted against: 14
Abstentions: 12
The proposal has been accepted!
Adolf... Something wrong?
I'm looking for a nice "C".
"Christian People's Party".
"Program".
Here, before you're covered with ink!
How many will we print?
- Thirty thousand?
- To start with.
And one for Woeste. In gold.
We'll be the biggest party in Aalst!
VOTE FOR FATHER DAENS
There's room on Woeste!
You fought for the highest right of man on this earth.
The right to speak freely.
And you won!
From now on, you too will decide what your and your kids future will look like.
The socialists!
Go on, Father! It's good folk that come to listen.
Friends... I know your children are starving, that you hardly ever eat meat, that they pay you with wet coals.
But does that surprise us?
No, because for years the catholic party has oppressed the workers and pushed them into misery, deaf to their cries of despair.
Comrades, shall we once and for all throw off the catholic yoke and finally
- have our own say?
- Yes!
Comrades! For that, unfortunately, we are not yet strong enough.
Friends! We, the liberals, are not strong enough either!
Therefore, we propose to join us and vote for Daens!
Against the Catholics.
Long live Father Daens!
And the socialists!
And the liberals!
Friends! From today you won't have to fear...
You won't have to fear that your voice won't be heard.
If injustice is guaranteed by the law, then the people must rise and with a swift kick throw over all this crap and injustice!
It's every workman's duty to support each other in the struggle for a decent life.
Sorry for this building site,
Mr Woeste, but a king must continually built his kingdom, mustn't he?
- I hope your family is well?
- Very well, Your Majesty.
It seems the universal suffrage was inevitable.
So be it. What do you propose as a remedy?
A stronger catholic unity, sire, and more firmness from the priests.
Eventually, the red demagogy might endanger your throne.
To fight their influence, we have the church, but it doesn't support us enough.
- Cardinal Goossens has arrived.
- Let him in.
What a coincidence... We talk about Church's problems and Goossens asks for an audience.
Should we see him?
- It's up to you, Your Majesty.
- Very well.
Come in, Monseigneur!
We were just discussing, Mr Woeste and me, a subject that concerns you.
Father Daens, I suppose?
I understand that Mr Woeste feels very strongly about that priest becoming elected.
I take the opportunity to answer him that nothing in the canon law permits us to forbid a priest to run for election.
Of course, but, as I recall, a priest must obey his bishop if he forbids him to present himself.
That may be, but it's up to the bishop, and only him!
Come now, could a little priest present such a danger?
- No, Sire. I will solve this problem somehow.
- Great!
One, two, three, four, five...
You must count five letters.
Not six, just five...
Otherwise, you vote for Woeste!
Or do you vote for the directors?
So count five letters as many as
- the fingers of one hand.
- Six!
Mr Woeste himself honours you with his presence.
A warm applause for him and his great sausages!
- Good evening!
- Long live Woeste, our voice in parliament.
Who wants this gorgeous sausage?
With a nice glass of beer?
Drinks are on us!
They're good sausages!
Thank you, Mr Woeste!
- Can I have a sausage?
- Sausage? - "Saucisse"...
Of course! Give him one.
- Here! - I can't vote anyway.
- Yes, very well.
"On the 5th of September, in 1862, they climbed in Wolverhampton in their balloon to a height of 8 838 metres, where they measured..."
Today is election day for the Belgian parliament.
All Belgians older than 25 must vote. Don't forget!
Voting for Daens is a morale sin.
You'll go to hell if you do.
The catholic party protects faith.
So remember to vote for Mr Woeste.
God bless you.
Voting for Daens is against God.
It leads you straight to the devil. Scholliers...
Voting for Daens is a mortal sin
The catholic party protects our faith.
So remember, it's Mr Woeste who deserves your vote. Bless you,
- my child.
- Who's that?
Don't believe what he says.
Are you voting for the rich?
Are you deaf? Voting for
Daens is a mortal sin.
They say he's not a real priest.
They say he has a wife.
Who says so? Louis?
They're all lies
Don't you believe that slander.
Vote for Daens.
Otherwise, nothing will change.
- Here's my salary.
- How many letters in Daens?
Six!
Five letters, Dad!
Invalid.
Invalid.
Yes?
Just as we thought, Adolf!
We checked everything.
There are hundreds of forms too many.
That bastard Woeste let all the dead of Aalst vote.
We were able to reject the Daens brothers' objections concerning your campaign for now Mr Woeste.
The charges of corruption or violence weren't withheld.
But we can't ignore the figures.
They can't be published.
There were far too many bulletins in the ballot boxes.
Because of this blunder, we'll have to start the vote all over again.
Believe me Mr Woeste, we don't have a choice...
Daens... has been elected!
- Daens... has been elected!
- What!
Daens... has been elected!
Daens... has been elected!
Really?
Anna, give them to mama. Thank you.
Now go and tell them in parliament that we are good people.
- Yes, and tell them we're hungry.
- Tell them who they're dealing with,
Long live Daens!
So, Father, you finally found a parish.
My dear friend, it's a pleasure to have you as my parishioner.
Father Daens, the delegate of Aalst will now speak.
Well, let's hear him...
I'll speak in French, because
I understand Mr Woeste is not yet advanced enough in the Flemish language to understand my statement.
Mr Woeste is accusing me of lying concerning the poor of Aalst.
According to him there are only
1 400 people on welfare there, and this honourable member, who is always afraid of being too indulgent, calls even this figure exaggerated.
Don't put words in my mouth.
You quote me incompletely.
Two lines written by a man can hang him.
Oh, but, there are more lines.
They come from official documents.
We know this kind of documents.
They're secret documents only for the use of Mr Woeste and friends.
That's not true. Please, enough.
- Sit down, I'm only beginning.
- Yes, go on.
Mr Woeste, I have here the real official documents from the Public Administration, according to which the register of the poor contains 10,000 needy.
It's still more optimistic than reality.
- I want to explain, Mr President.
- Calm down, Mr Woeste.
You also must explain why
I'd be lying about the workers' wages.
I said they were making 10 francs a week. you questioned that!
You were right: they don't make 10 francs, but only nine.
And if I should believe a letter from Ninove, they only make 6 to 8 francs.
But Mr Woeste doesn't know all this because he has never set foot in a worker's home in Aalst.
He prefers to stay on the balcony of the town hall, with the workers at his feet, hoping for a sausage or a beer.
Finally, allow me to tell you this:
I was walking along the Dender, when a woman came up to me.
She asked me for alms.
Her husband was out of work.
She had four children, a 14 year old girl being the eldest, who had finally found work in a cotton factory, where she had to work, underfed, from 6:00 a.m. till 7:30 p.m., in an unhealthy atmosphere.
Barefoot in tepid water.
Well... do you know how much this young girl, who in these winter temperatures must be literally frozen, takes home?
Fifty centimes per day! Per day.
Well, I ask you gentlemen, knowing that at the age of 20, this girl will be worn out because of this slave labour, when in turn she'll be a mother herself, won't she curse her fate?
Won't she curse the society and the civilization we are so proud of?
Unity, my friends. Unity.
The Holy Father, who I represent here, believes that the greatest danger menacing the catholic world now is disunion.
Unfortunately, I have to admit that Father Daens is succeeding is creating dissensions even amongst you!
And who is the guiltiest of these dissensions, Mr Nuncio?
Father Daens, who suggested an alliance, or Mr Woeste, who has rejected it?
The Church is cautious.
It owes a lot to Mr Woeste.
Within the actual disorder and the growing threat of socialism, men like Mr Woeste have to be spared.
This attitude is hard to conciliate with the evolutionary thoughts of Rerum Novarum.
Rerum Novarum is a general guideline aiming to promote the evolution of spirits on a long term basis.
By using it as a weapon against the catholic party,
Father Daens is using it without consideration.
That is what I tried to make him understand, Monseigneur.
Now, I fear it may be too late.
Father Daens is a political man now and every initiative against him taken by the Belgian episcopate could be misinterpreted.
Let us not underestimate his popularity.
You're right. I agree with you.
But in that case, who could decide?
The Holy Father himself?
You're sure?
If the Holy Father penalizes Daens, we will lose all the catholic workers.
But if he receives Daens without penalizing him, what a publicity for Daens!
Well, gentlemen, let the Holy
Father decide all this for himself.
No?
Your turn, Monseigneur.
It's done. The Belgian episcopate passed on the decision to the Holy Father.
Good. It's been a long time since
I requested his Holiness' blessing.
Father! For you, they just brought it in.
Well?
- I have to go to Rome immediately.
- What?
The pope wishes to see you?
Adolf! This is our chance.
Hey, hadn't you better take the train to Rome, or don't you know
Daens has taken off with Nette?
Having coffee with the pope.
Are you wearing this posh suit for Sunday mass?
I brought you something.
You'll see that our bread is at least as good as in Aalst.
I suppose you need something?
You don't have to blush.
I thought... I thought we might get married.
That is, if you want to?
They certainly move fast in Ghent?
- Or is there something else?
- No, or yes, that too.
We could live in Ghent and you wouldn't have to work in the factory, see?
I would be marrying a socialist?
I would agree with the church, if Daens performs the mass and the "Forwards" band plays for us.
My father plays for St. Cecilia.
Could be nice with the two bands.
Come on, let's go.
One beer.
- That's mine.
- You can't afford it.
Oh, yes, I can.
- You have no job.
- I have a job.
No more.
All swines that voted for Daens are fired.
- Fool, I can't vote. I'm too young.
- Doesn't matter.
I'll tell Daens.
You won't see Daens anymore.
He's stuck in Rome.
In a prison for crazy priests.
- Make yourself comfortable.
- Thanks.
Reverend Daens...
His Holiness can't see you today.
Come back tomorrow, same time.
I'm sorry, but I understood that my convocation was urgent.
- Is there no mistake?
- I am sorry.
Even with Daens in parliament it still stinks in here.
That's your fault, not Daens'.
Daens is sitting on a holy pot now.
- I wonder what that'll change here.
- We'll all get rich, won't we?
We'll come and shit in top hats.
Gust, give me a piece of "Workman".
We're not out of it yet.
Feels good.
Here, one for Schmitt!
Cuppens, Segers, Vlanders,
Poekens, you're fired.
- I just got here!
- All Daensists out!
Reverend Daens.
Again, I'm sorry.
But... there's nobody here.
What does that mean?
You may be more lucky tomorrow.
See you tomorrow.
Jefke...
Where are Jef, Maria and the rest?
I threw them out.
Why?
They're dirty reds, like you.
Then why did you keep me?
Come on, Nette.
Be kind to Schmitt.
If you touch me, I'll tell Daens
You'll answer to parliament.
To whom? To Daens?
Just come here.
You can tell your Daens that, now you know how he has to do it.
Jan...
- Who will feed them all?
- Goddamn!
Don't interfere, brat.
Where have you been?
You'd better help your mother.
What's wrong with you?
I know what's wrong...
That red one got her mouse, eh?
He's crazy. She'll kill him.
Go away, Louis. Go on, go!
All right. All right, I'm gone.
Damn it! For ever.
And forget about my wages.
She can walk the streets like all Daens' women.
Go to bed, you.
What happened?
Was it Schmitt?
Father Daens, please?
Monseigneur, His Holiness sends you this.
- I don't understand.
- Yet, you understand Latin?
Excuse me... You must do everything to promote piety, slant your speeches towards justice, love and cautiousness.
Your dignity and honour as a priest must prevail.
Don't mix with those who want to overthrow society and avoid to cause any dissension within the catholic party.
That's clear enough, isn't it?
I understood, but this is wrong!
What do you mean, wrong? The Church is telling you keep away from the socialists.
Or else, it will abandon you.
I must see his Holiness.
I must speak to him about our workers.
I'm sure he doesn't know their real situation in my country.
I must explain it to him!
Adolf...
Send them home. I won't see anyone.
You're crazy? They come for you.
Pieter! The pope didn't see me.
Father, what did the pope say?
Dear friends, I am grateful for your affection.
In Rome, I have accomplished important things.
We will fight on together, and achieve the ideas expressed in the encyclical of the pope.
But unity should go along with justice.
One can't occur without the other.
You can always rely on me, in life and death.
I've been told the workers should go to school. What for?
What do they really got out of it?
To be able to read papers, like that one, for instance?
Papers that confirm that a certain priest had an audience by the pope.
Whilst in the first place, this priest was summoned to Rome, for disciplinary reasons, and secondly, according to trustworthy sources at the Vatican, has never had the honour of being personally admonished by the pope.
And these very same liars want to teach us a lesson in morals, whilst acting as if they were upholding virtue and religion?
Mr President, I wish to speak.
Ask the pope!
Let him talk. Respect your priests.
Mister Daens, you have seen who your friends are.
My dear parishioners, it is our great regret that we have to ban the writings by the Daens brothers for all of you.
Or we will lose our eternal soul.
Dear parishioners, let us pray that this ban imposed by our dear bishop may lead our lost sheep back to the right trail.
Nette is ill!
We need money urgently, Adolf.
Your allowance is enough for food, but it can't support a party.
We'll have to get organized like the socialists, with our own bakery, own weaving mill and even a savings bank so people get paid, even when ill.
Pieter, that's not the problem now.
I got orders.
The pope wants me to resign.
That's impossible!
All these people fought for you and voted for you.
These people fought for a cause, like you and I, not for a person.
My superiors force me to silence but that doesn't ruin the cause.
Without you it will, you know it.
Pier, want some more?
Friends, I just met the socialists.
Their cooperative needs 20 people immediately.
Jan will tell you more.
Comrades, we'll pay 10 francs and soup.
But we have soup.
But not 10 francs. Come let's go.
Women take the flags!
No! No flags!
Those who want it, can work for the socialists, but not as Daensists.
No Christian flag over there.
Religion doesn't butter our bread.
My son lost his job because I spoke to you.
We mustn't forget the socialists are our enemies.
We'll vote for you again.
Why do you say that, Father?
The socialists are workers like us.
Who beats us up?
The directors, the Bucks.
The bishops give you a hard time.
Why do you stay with them?
Why do you obey them?
Just you, trying to get us out of the shit.
Why can't you stand their divergency?
We must endure more.
Nette... do not abandon our Lord.
If you don't abandon us.
Nette, hey, don't worry.
He is a priest forever.
- How would you know?
- I don't get you.
You can see he's trying to save his skin.
That's not true.
Nette, wait!
Your Daens is a bastard. You hear?
Without us he is nothing. A nobody.
Damn it! Nette, I love you.
No, don't be afraid.
Our dear director of missions has chosen him specially for me.
- Which tribe does he belong to?
- He's a Baluba, Sire, from Kassai.
Sire, isn't he dangerous?
Don't fear. He's gentle, sociable.
- Is he baptized?
- Yes, of course.
A better catholic than some whites.
By the way, Monseigneur, have they finally put an end to the Aalst scandal?
- What about that priest?
- Mr Woeste knows, sire.
We have proposed a solution.
It's up to him to give the answer.
- Well, Mr Woeste?
- It is not a real solution, sire.
Father Daens demands that his seat be transferred to another Christian democrat.
It's out of the question.
Daens has to leave unconditionally.
The Christian democrats spread the bed for socialism, and since the Church doesn't act efficiently, I will make the necessary moves.
Perfect, Mr Woeste.
- Daens come on out if you dare!
- Come along to the cemetery.
The pit is ready.
Look, priest of the devil.
Look, what'll happen to you.
Step outside, priest!
So, we can hang you.
Are you scared, bastard?
Black crow, where are you?
Adolf Daens! Coward!
Show your faces, cowards!
We want your brother, printer.
Father Daens!
Come on, you coward.
To the printer's! Yes, go!
Burn the "Workman"!
The Bucks are attacking the Daens'. They'll destroy everything.
- Father, the Bucks!
- The Bucks? They're everywhere.
Better come with me!
- What's going on?
- The Bucks.
They've been at your brother's too. But nobody got hurt.
What is Pier going to do?
But Father!
Come on, Pier.
Why are you still here?
It's not so bad.
Pieter, listen to me and don't talk back for once.
Stillemans will find me something.
Try to save whatever you can.
I'm pulling out.
Do it for Louise and the children.
Autumn.
Under high, big trees in a very dark wood, where hardly anybody ever comes, you'll find acorns spread on the moss.
Many clever young animals really like these acorns for the fair when winter comes.
5 loaves and 2 fishes, he said.
Our Father, who art in heaven hallowed be thy name. Thy Kingdom come. Thy will be done on earth and in heaven. Give us our daily bread.
- Our Father, who art in heaven...
- Your miracle won't work!
- Let's go steak some beets.
- I'm coming, I'm hungry.
Father Daens? As abbot of this convent, I must tell you that you are here upon Monseigneur Stillemans' request.
You are lucky that we respect the duty of obedience.
Don't forget that.
By the way...
Don't get any illusions about your flock here.
They are beyond your reach.
The only thing expected from you, is that you read from the Bible, because they can't read anymore.
You can start right away. The book is open at the first letter to the Corinthians.
Our Father, who art in heaven hallowed be thy name.
Thy Kingdom come.
Thy will be done on earth and in heaven.
Give us our daily bread.
Our Father who art in heaven, hallowed be thy name...
My task is to spread God's Word, but these men don't need it: they are with God!
We're talking about you, not them!
Without the Church you are lost.
This was your last chance!
The Church has no place for you anymore!
You are no longer a priest!
He didn't confess before he died.
He's a sinner, I can't bury him. You know that very well.
Must we bury him like a dog?
- This is a child, Father!  - He's a thief, everyone knows that. Age has nothing to do with it.
Who's that child?
It's Jefke, Father.
He was hungry.
He wanted to pinch the meat from the wild animals.
- Have his parents been told?
- He's got none.
He won't bury him.
- Come, let me do it.
- You are no longer a priest.
You can't even wear the cloth.
- What are you doing?
- Like you say...
Priesthood, Ponnet, has nothing to do with an outfit.
Don't do it!
That's blasphemy! Adolf!
Our Father, who art in heaven...
Don't follow him.
It's a mortal sin.
The Church will destroy you, like all heretics.
Friends, may be the death of this innocent child, murdered, by egotism and misery, always remind us that, in this turbulent struggle, there's only one enemy: those who will exploit you; and only one ally; those who are suffering beside you and with you.
We'll call our first one Jefke.
Adolf Daens died in 1907 after a 2nd term in parliament.
He was buried on Monday at 9.00 a.m.
Only poor people were present, women with black scarves, workers, strikers and a silent crowd...
Translated by Utter_Nutter Productions
A long time ago...
...a young woman went off into the world...
...like her brothers and sisters.
She fought in wars...
...had children...
...suffered...
...and loved greatly.
I was the sixth-born child...
...Phung Thi Le Ly...
...and I lived in the most beautiful village on earth.
My earliest memories were working alongside Mother in the fields.
Always working, my mother.
Each grain of rice, a symbol of life, never wasted.
While we worked, she'd teach me all I had to know about life.
Mama, where did I really come from?
Where do babies come from?
From my belly button.
Don't worry. God makes babies and puts them in your belly.
You have plenty of warning.
The fragile rice had to be planted and transplanted several times.
Our rice paddies were always near the cemeteries...
...because we believed the spirits passed through the soil into the rice...
...so the new generation, in eating the rice...
...was sharing in the spirit of their ancestors.
One day, in the summer of 1953...
...the French came.
They destroyed our village.
And the following year, we went hungry.
I will never forger my father's eyes...
...as he watched our house burn to the ground.
But, as it had happened to our village for so many centuries...
...we rebuilt our lives.
Mama, where do babies really come from?
Then, in 1963...
...the peasant countryside changed forever.
When the Viet Cong first arrived that rainy season...
...some of them were remnants from the war against the French.
Many of them were displaced immigrants from the North.
All of them were angry.
My parents taught me Vietnam is...
...a free nation.
That is what this war is about.
The Chinese, the Japanese, the French, have each tried to rule us.
And we have won!
The North and the South are inseparable, like sisters.
But in 1954...
...the French and American allies separated us and kidnapped the South.
Can we stand by and watch the kidnappers...
...taking turns raping and corrupting our sister!
That's what this war's about.
Why should outsiders come in...
...divide the land and tell people to go north and then go south?
Why?
If Vietnam were truly for the Vietnamese people...
...we would be able to choose the kind of government we want.
A nation can't have two governments any more than a family can have two fathers.
-They have bombs, ten men for one of us!
-He's right.
What do we have?
We have rags! We have rifles!
And sticks! We have sticks!
We have no rank, no promotion.
We take no money.
We are your servants.
We respect your homes and shrines.
We are your family.
Do you want to dance?
It was my brother Sau I loved the most.
He was always there to protect me and make me laugh.
Hurry.
Sweet rice, black beans.
You be very careful. Write, Sau.
I will return.
Le Ly, I will return.
Be a big girl.
Always take care of Mama and Papa.
Protect yourself from ghosts.
Take care.
As they went north to Hanoi with the Viet Cong...
...I felt it was the last time
I'd see my older brother, Bon...
...and my younger brother, Sau, for a long, long time.
Maybe forever.
But it was Sau who was ripped from my heart.
You understand that a country is more than a lot of dirt, rivers and forests?
You know your brother, Sau, may not come back?
I told you many times...
...the Chinese ruled our land.
Many died.
Le Loi, Jia Long and the Trung sisters.
And your ancestor Phung Thi Chinh fought to throw out the Chinese.
Your grandfather fought and died against the Japanese...
...just before you were born.
We suffered much.
When the Japanese came...
...your mother and I were taken to Danang...
...to build a runway for the airplanes.
We worked like slaves.
Our reward was a bowl of rice...
...and another day of life.
Freedom is never a gift, Bay Ly.
It must be won and won again.
You know that?
I do.
See this land?
Vietnam is going to be yours now.
If the enemy returns...
...you must be both a daughter and a son now.
From my father, I learned to love God and the people I could not see...
...my ancestors.
But I would learn in time...
...my father's words would be twisted by events.
Government soldiers came to our village with the support of American advisors.
Your village will be safe.
They built barricades against the Viet Cong.
It's part of the new Binh Ky hamlet.
Many of you will be asked to take militia training...
...so you will be prepared...
...to resist the Communist rebels!
You will be rewarded...
...with food and money.
Your older children will be sent to camp...
...for military training.
But younger children can go to school.
Your village will be happy and peaceful.
Do you have any questions?
Go to your leader.
The soldiers ate our food, slept with our women...
...and searched us just as the soldiers of the warlords had centuries before.
But the government leader, whose name was Ngo Dinh Diem, America's ally...
...was a Catholic, like the French...
...and that alone made him suspicious to the Buddhists in our area.
The Northern leader, Ho Chi Minh...
...had been a great patriot against the Japanese and the French.
We heard stories of his compassion and his love for Vietnam.
What are they? Americans?
They say they all have blind blue eyes behind their glasses.
If you take their shoes off, they have soft feet and cry in pain.
Take away their glasses, their boots, they can't fight.
Not very good soldiers.
Not very good fence.
Your president, Ngo Dinh Diem, wants to know...
...what will you do if you see a Viet Cong...
...or hear about someone helping them.
Turn him in to the soldiers.
Good.
And get a big reward for every Viet Cong you help capture.
During the day, we were a government village.
But each night, when the soldiers returned to their base and we played...
...there was never any shortage of Viet Cong fighters.
One night, the Viet Cong came for my teacher.
Have you been teaching these children to betray their country? Traitor!
The first thing you should learn on this night...
...Ky La was saved from the oppressors.
We're the liberators!
The night belonged to the Viet Cong.
Even though I was scared...
...there was no real choice.
They fought for our freedom against the Southern government.
No matter who's asking the questions, either side...
...play stupid, stupid, stupid child.
Any news from Sau or Bon?
They're training in the North.
-Any chance for a visit?
-There's no time for sons and mothers.
I told them we needed her on the farm.
For all the help she is here...
...maybe we should send her with Sau.
That'll teach her the value of work.
Don't say that!
Le Ly must do her work like everyone else.
She thinks she's too good for work.
Too busy flirting with no-good schoolboys.
-No, it's the big boys that bother me.
-Don't talk like that.
-Be quiet!
-Don't hit her!
Do you hear me?
Do you want to send all my children to Hanoi or Saigon?
If I can't have my family around me, what's the point of living?
You always think of only yourself!
The French, the Japanese, now the Americans are all over us!
It's good they go North.
War is coming, you stupid, selfish man!
Stop it!
Go!
Forgive him, Mama.
Don't cry.
I've made your papa lose face.
If you ever do that to a husband...
...I'll have both your cheeks glowing, one from him and one from me.
You hear me?
Who's first?
You talk now or it's bye-bye, Charlie!
You dig, asshole?
All right, it's your ass!
Kiss it good-bye.
You're next.
You talk?
You going to talk?
At my mother's request, a local wizard examined the umbilical cords...
...of my two soldier brothers...
...who hadn't written in over a year.
The older one...
...is strong and healthy.
The younger one...
...is in a place too gray for me to see.
No, that's not true.
I know Sau is alive.
I feel it in my womb.
Did you hear...
...funny noises last night?
Maybe voices...
...last night in the rain?
I did.
Here is your trouble, then.
Your shrine...
...is too small.
And we have a lost soul...
...who needs to come in.
That's all.
Just build a shrine outside...
...and everything will be fine.
The Viet Cong ingrained in us a sense of ''xa'':
Duty to land...
...duty to country.
The ant became our moral model.
We formed cells, associations...
...where no one person accumulated power over others.
Only in battle or by your own hands will you be immortalized.
You never moved up in the ant society, you only moved further in.
If the Viet Cong won the peasants over...
...it was because they lived their lives with us.
But every time we ambushed the government soldiers...
...twice as many came back.
Get your sorry asses down there!
One day...
...they came for me.
Papa! Help me!
Tell me quickly.
Why were you on the road?
Cutting grass for the water buffalo.
I didn't tell my parents.
Liar.
Again.
Why were you on the road?
I didn't mean any harm!
Liar!
You are can bo cai...
...VC cadre girl.
You were warning your friends.
Where's the VC base?
I don't know.
How many battles have you been in?
What's your rank?
Please...
I'm just a girl.
I have not done it.
Do you know what this is?
Think what this can do to your body.
How would your baby like you with no nipples?
Or maybe I could cut some skin off your ass to make some sandals.
Think about it...
...Miss Viet Cong hero.
And when you're called again...
...be prepared to tell me everything you know.
Don't move.
Don't move.
I haven't done anything!
I don't know anything!
My mother used my dowry to bribe a military official to have me released.
And now...
...the villagers were suspicious of my family's ties to the government.
Finally...
...the Viet Cong came for me.
-She did nothing!
-Stay back!
No respect!
You've no respect!
-I'm coming with her!
-No, the prisoner comes alone!
Stay back!
Our men were betrayed.
The informer's here!
How else could the enemy know so much?
This village is filled with traitors!
Government sympathizers that would sell us out for a relative...
...for money, for privilege!
So I ask you:
What should we do with these people?
We must give these people a lesson they will never forget.
See?
See it?
-What is it?
-A grave.
Your grave...
...stupid girl.
What deal did you make to get out of prison?
Did you promise them some of our ears for their belts?
No, my mother bribed an official.
Why won't you believe me?
Little rich girl!
You want to live?
My life is in your hands.
What does that mean?
I mean I won't talk to the enemy.
I've been shamed enough in my village.
If you want, I'll go far away.
I'll never come back.
You talk about this, I'll kill you for real.
No, don't!
No, get off!
Shut up!
I was never to understand why I was raped...
...and not killed.
Or if I had ever really been sentenced by the Viet Cong.
It may have just been a warning to my father.
But it ended forever...
...my relationship to my village.
My sister Hai found us a job in the city.
Papa stayed on the land to guard the spirits of our ancestors.
In Saigon...
...much to our confusion...
...the monks were being arrested.
I've never seen so many cars, so many people.
The other one.
Madam, they're ready.
This way.
Country fresh. Good workers.
So, which village?
Ky La.
Near Danang?
Ly is wonderful with children.
Perfect babysitter.
How old is she?
Eighteen.
Is she strong?
Yes, she's very strong. She started to work in the fields when she was four.
They'll do.
Let's go.
You'll be punished for this, you stupid girl!
Making the Master open the door!
Don't be too hard on her.
It's been a long day.
Run off to bed. I'm fine. Go on.
I couldn't sleep.
I couldn't either, Master.
I am not your first.
Yes, you are.
I was raped...
...by the village boys in Ky La.
My poor thing.
Have you bled?
Stupid girl.
You weren't satisfied with a perfect life in a perfect house?
You had to seduce the husband!
Made him stray from his wife.
Look what it brought you.
That's not how it happened!
Anh cares for me. He loves me.
Do you think a stupid girl like you means anything to him?
Now you're going to have his bastard.
Perfect!
You'll have to get rid of it.
We'll go see the herbalist tomorrow.
What are you doing?
Oh, I'm sorry, Madam.
I'm expecting a child.
Yes, I know.
We learned it from the herbalist.
Who is the father?
Don't look so surprised.
A boy.
Someone I met in the park.
You don't know him.
Why are you burning incense?
Because...
...I don't want the baby.
I was praying to be forgiven.
In front of my husband's ancestors?
I don't know what else to do.
The boy's Catholic, like you.
I'm a Buddhist.
I see.
Le Ly, I have another explanation.
I believe the father of your baby is my husband.
Oh, no! Anh... I mean the--
Silence!
You know I'm not well.
But I have given my husband sons.
Beautiful boys.
As fine as any woman could've given him.
Don't think...
...you won't pay for what you've done.
You and your daughter must leave the house at once.
Leave?
But why?
Nobody knows but you.
Let people think the father is some soldier.
I know, and that's enough.
Men are like dogs pissing on posts.
They go once, they go twice.
But Bay Ly's no threat to you.
She has nothing for a proper man.
She's just a country girl.
An ignorant, stupid, foolish child.
A maid that will never be a bride.
She's nothing! Worthless!
Absolutely not.
I won't have her in my house.
Not as a nanny.
Not as a housekeeper.
Then as number two wife!
What?
You're crazy.
As concubine to the Master.
As your slave to kick around.
To warm your husband's bed when you have better things to do.
Why waste your health on a man's rutting when you can leave it to a stupid girl?
You're always number one wife.
The law is on your side.
-Please, Mama!
-Stupid, stop!
They must go now. Today, before supper.
You tried to get rid of it?
Yes, of course.
But your seed, Master, is too strong.
Now it has hold of Bay Ly, too.
Please, help us get by the best we can.
At least until the child is born.
I won't throw you into the street.
But I cannot ask my wife to let you live with us.
I'll put you in an apartment.
Not in Saigon.
How far away do you want them?
How far can you drive in a day?
All right.
I will send them back to Danang.
But we have nothing!
With enough money until the baby's born.
I'll send you money monthly.
To a bank or a relative.
I don't want you to know their address.
That's an absolute condition.
You will have enough to live on.
My steward will handle everything.
One day she'll come back!
Don't forget her!
She makes an excellent second wife.
Promise you won't forget her.
But the money never came.
Madame Lien saw to that.
My mother sold snails for a while in Danang...
...but soon gave up and returned to Ky La.
My father, ashamed that I was unmarried and pregnant, refused to see me.
-You want Mary Jane?
-Go away.
Hey, GI, number one cigarette?
How about some boom-boom?
No, me no hooker!
-Give you $10.
-No. Cigarettes?
-No. Cigarettes?
What you hiding there?
Those baby bellies turn me on.
-Come on, give you $50. Come on.
-No! MP! MP!
No, you fuck off!
What's in the box?
Johnny Walker, cigarettes.
-What's this?
-Marijuana, huh?
This is all I have.
That's okay.
Where's Kim?
In work.
Kim work.
I'll wait for her, little sister.
No, baby. Baby.
You go, 'bye.
Beer.
You go, 'bye.
Beer.
I look for Kim.
Me daughter.
Kim here?
She not here.
Please. Me daughter, daughter.
I come long way.
-Go away.
-Please, please.
Me Papa.
-Papa.
-Get him out.
-No see long time.
-Get him out.
Please, please, please!
Go now, you stupid gook asshole!
-What are you doing here?
-Papa's at the house. Paul's back.
Paul's back? So soon?
Paul, good to see you, honey!
This isn't a good time.
Oh, baby!
I'm six weeks in the fucking bush.
I need some pussy bad! Now!
Father came a long way to see me.
Not good time.
He's got time, I don't. Get him out!
Come back.
I need some pussy, now, baby. Now!
He pays my bills. He's my man.
-Will you come on?
-Give me a little time, Papa.
Come back in two hours.
Let's do it.
See you.
I came to see your sister.
She's at work.
Selling near the base.
-Is she doing well? Getting by?
-She's lazy.
-But I help her all I can.
-And the baby?
I don't know why she had to seduce her master's husband.
When she got caught, did she keep quiet? No!
Yes. She has brought shame on us.
An unwed mother.
But she's not the only one who has brought shame to us.
I do the best I can, Papa.
I'll be late for work.
When you see her...
...tell her I came to see her.
I miss her very much.
She shouldn't worry about being punished for her mistake.
Life finds a way to balance itself.
Will you tell her that?
Of course, Papa.
And me?
You too, my little one.
Your boyfriend treated Papa so bad.
You would be ashamed.
You were there.
This is not the way Papa taught us to be.
Do you think I like what I'm doing?
Someone has to make a living around here.
You don't help!
I don't know why I let you stay here!
My boyfriends all complain about you!
Pregnant women are bad luck!
How disrespectful you are! If Papa--
Papa what?
An invader!
Really?
You sleep with the enemy!
You betray your family!
That's enough!
That's enough out of you!
And I'll marry one, too! You'll see!
And I'll get out of this goddamn country!
And as for you, young lady...
...no more charity for you!
Go on! Get out!
Get out!
Do you think that you're the only one Papa loves?
You spoiled...
...spoiled...
To survive, I picked through the American base camp garbage.
And it was there that I first saw...
...the remains of poor prostitutes who'd been murdered by men.
Thank heaven it's a boy.
Put him up to feed quickly.
Too much blood.
How will you care for him?
Better give him away or kill him.
And your shame will be washed away.
You're a very lucky girl among the indig personnel referred to this office.
I will have no problem placing you.
Provided, of course, you play ball.
No big deal.
We'll do it any way you want.
Now, you do your best...
...and I'll do mine.
Open door!
Don't make such a big deal about it.
Just a little suck.
Bitch!
Stop!
You! Call MP now!
This man try to rape me!
Go! Go!
This is supposed to be a joke, right?
It's a joke.
Months went by.
There were more prostitutes, pimps, black marketeers. Everything had a price.
My family was suffering.
My papa had gotten old and sick and could no longer work the land.
Hey, GI, you buy? You buy?
-No, not today.
-GI, you buy? Smokes? You buy?
GI, you buy?
Hi, Big Mike.
You look beaucoup sau.
No good day.
I got something might change your mood.
See those grunts?
They're leaving for the world today.
So what? They want souvenirs?
I got Chinese jade, Big Mike. Mary Jane.
Titi money.
No, they want a real souvenir.
They want boom-boom you.
Beaucoup boom-boom over there.
Plenty of crabs over there, too.
These pencil dicks are clean. They've been in the bush since they got here.
One of them's going home to his wife.
Want them to go boom-boom some scuzbag and bring home the clap?
They're willing to pay $20 each head.
Le Ly good girl. Fuck off.
Okay, five flags. Just for one guy.
$100 for the other.
$200, real money.
Why?
Too much.
You joking.
These guys got the bread from being in the bush.
I told them clean poon is expensive.
Look, Le...
They beat the odds.
They want to leave something behind.
A memory. Something.
Le Ly not that kind of girl.
No deal.
Jesus Christ, you drive a hard bargain.
400 fucking dollars.
This is green.
That's it. That's all they gave me.
You give me $50 commission, you pocket $350.
Support your family for a year, easy.
What's so hard about it?
15 minutes. It ain't even work.
Just lie there and let them do the work.
What they'll do you've already done.
They don't got all day. Take the money...
...and give them a story to bring home.
You're no cherry.
Just do it for fucking world peace.
Come on!
Send the poor bastards home with a smile.
My father was dying.
I returned for the first time to my village.
What are you doing here?
I heard there's trouble.
Where's Papa?
The Americans came one day to look at our family bunker.
They think Viet Cong inside, make Papa go inside first.
No VC!
But he told them no one was inside.
They still throw grenade.
But it did not explode.
Two Americans went in.
No more.
They were very angry at Papa.
They beat him.
Put paper on his back:
''VC.''
Took him to prison.
Bad, bad beating.
Come, Mama.
Come.
You're drinking now.
Stupid wizard came by the other day.
He said to me:
''I have nothing to tell you.''
Just like that. I have no future.
He didn't mean it.
If I stay in the village, I die.
You know wizards, they hate to give people bad news.
You're just imagining things.
There's nothing to worry about.
Who's worried?
What's wrong with living forever with your ancestors?
I'm worried about you, but your mother is not the same.
What happened to her?
The Viet Cong...
...came after Americans, killed so many of them in a fight.
They were angry.
Traitor! Traitor!
Your Uncle Luc told him to stop.
He yelled:
''How can a woman who sends two sons to die for the revolution...
''...betray her country?
''How can you accuse her of treason?''
Tell her to keep her mouth shut.
I never should have left.
I should have stayed to fight them all: the Viet Cong...
...the government.
What am I now, Papa?
Not a warrior woman. Not a Phung.
Just a tramp, begging in the streets.
So ashamed.
Don't be ashamed.
You did the best you could.
Listen to me.
You were born to be a wonderful wife...
...and a mother.
Not a killer.
Don't ask what's right or wrong.
These questions are very dangerous.
Right is only the goodness you carry in your heart.
Love for your ancestors, for your family.
Wrong is all that comes between you and that love.
Go back to your son.
Make him the best son you can.
That is the war you must fight.
That is the victory you must win.
Quick.
Before they see you and talk.
My little peach blossom...
...what will you do without me?
My father died soon after.
He drank acid and died on the ground he loved.
My father taught me life is simple and compassion follows.
He taught me by forgiving me for being unwed and taking my child to his heart.
I bought my father the best funeral he could have. We mourned him 100 days.
A year passed. I worked at the Korean commissary serving drinks for tips.
The war got worse, and the Americans became part of our landscape...
...part of us.
I want you to meet Steve. He's a sergeant.
Look, he wants to meet a nice Vietnamese girl.
Give me the rest of the money.
Wait!
Wait a minute!
Right there.
Yes, I know her.
There she is. She's come back.
Money, money.
Sorry, my friend no take no for answer.
She's scared you take back money.
You chase her.
Not my fault. Sorry.
You want something else?
I told you, I no want to be your girlfriend.
You want girl, you go see hooker.
Don't bother me.
I'm too old for hookers.
I just wanted to meet you.
I don't care about the money.
Your friend introduced us.
That's all I wanted.
Since I've gone to all this trouble...
...you think it'd be all right if I just came in...
...talked to you for a few moments?
Just talk.
Please? Just a moment.
Please?
Okay. One minute.
I leave door open.
You bad guy, one funny move...
...I call MP.
They right there.
I good girl.
Okay. I go to work.
Thank you for coming.
I hope you happy staying in Danang.
-I'll wait for you.
-No.
I go long time. I work in Korean casino.
Serve booze.
Hostess.
That's okay. I have no place to go.
I gave most of my money to your friend and I can't afford a taxi out of here.
I'm tired from our little race.
Okay. You can stay.
But not too long.
When you go...
...lock door, please.
-Maybe we can have dinner later.
-No.
I have dinner. Not possible.
No problem.
Nice meeting you.
Lock door when you go.
I hope you don't mind if I stretched out for a while.
You're still here?
You said I could rest.
And I wanted to take you to dinner to thank you...
...for your hospitality.
You don't understand. I no want go dinner.
Then we'll just go...
...for a walk or a drink.
It doesn't matter to me.
I want you didi.
You nice man...
...but I no want boyfriend.
You have one?
No, no boyfriend.
Me had boyfriend.
But me no want new boyfriend.
I'm sorry.
It sounds like he hurt you.
Pardon?
You want money for taxi?
-I'm perfectly content right here.
-I know.
I know you want to stay here, but this my house.
You want woman, I call siclo.
I'm not interested in prostitutes.
I'm interested in you.
Is this your little brother?
Is this handsome boy your relative?
My son.
Of course he is.
He looks just like you.
Lot of spirit around the eyes.
Steve.
That your name?
I sorry I not very nice to you.
You want some tea?
The fat girl is my sister.
And this is Mom's eight dogs.
She has the eight ugliest dogs in the United States.
I think I better leave you alone.
Too much rain.
No taxi.
You stay until no more rain.
You sure?
Oh, God, I'm sorry.
-I'm sorry.
-It's okay.
I'm sorry. I'm sorry.
What's this?
Just few things for you and your family.
We're going to have
Christmas all over again.
No. Steve, please.
You do not this.
-You cannot!
-Sure, I can.
I'm not very good with words.
Even if I could speak your language,
I don't think I could tell you how I feel.
I want peace and happiness.
I just want to be with you, and help you and your little boy.
And your mom.
Anything wrong with that?
I no want be your girlfriend, Steve.
I no want boyfriend.
Me and men...
...we have bad karma.
You understand?
Bad karma.
How much bad could have happened to a little girl like you?
You no ask. Goodbye.
You nice man. You find better girl.
Now wait a minute. Hold on.
I know all about karma.
My karma has taken me all over this world all my life...
...living out of a duffle bag.
That's why I'm here.
It's time to settle down, quit pretending I'll live forever.
I'm going home...
...to San Diego.
I got a house...
...and family there.
I want you to be there with me.
You'll be safe. You'll be free.
Your little boy will have his freedom...
...and an education.
My first wife taught me a real lesson in my life. I'm serious.
I need a good Oriental woman.
Like you.
If you'll have me...
...I want you to be my wife.
Three years passed.
No, that's Tommy. And we're going to change ''Hung'' to ''Jimmy.''
We moved to the Central Highlands with Steve's new job.
Steve loved our new son Tommy as if his life had started again.
When you come to California...
...to visit my mama, we'll take you to Disneyland...
...in those pajamas.
Mama missed Papa too much...
...and seemed to be living between this world and the next.
Your papa wanted you to stay on the land.
I can't. It's the past.
Who will care for the land?
I'm old.
Maybe Bon will come back.
I know he will.
America, Mama.
In America I can save the children.
The South is dying. Steve says...
...it'll fall faster than anyone thinks.
His mother and sister are near San Diego and he'll leave the Army for a good job.
He loves me.
I love him.
You love him?
He's good, Mama.
He loves the children.
Americans are thu vo thuy vo chung.
They have no beginning and no end.
They don't care about their ancestors.
So they think they are free to do any bad thing they want.
You will not be happy with this man.
Your father's spirit will not rest...
...till his most-loved child sleeps in his house.
-Where are we going?
-Just don't separate!
-What happened?
-They overran the base!
NVA! Get over here!
Don't separate!
Come on!
-Come on! Get everybody!
-Wait! Jimmy!
It's all right!
-Wait! Our things!
-There's no time! Get up there!
Take that, okay? Goodbye.
We've got to go!
Get the fuck out of here!
-This is the end of the line.
-But Saigon!
-You're getting out of here.
-You say you take us Saigon!
No, come on! Go!
You son-of-a-bitch! Fuck you!
Get out of here!
My family was now blown to the four winds.
But on the road out of Qui Nhon
I realized I was not alone.
My whole country was collapsing.
Be calm.
Butler! Butler!
Steven J.?
I'm sorry. He's listed as missing in action.
You'll have to come back tomorrow.
Ticket, American plane, $2,000.
You come with me,
American man give beaucoup greenback.
For dollars. I got 10,000 piastres.
Look! It's Daddy!
It was everything I dreamed of.
America.
Big skies, and giant people crushed me in their arms.
And best of all was my husband,
Steve Butler.
Marine Sergeant Butler.
Here it is. The dream begins.
In his big craggy face was everything...
...I loved about America.
Played football with the guy that lived in that house.
My first girlfriend's house.
She was a real dog.
You make me happy.
You make me very happy.
He's here! They're early!
She's so cute.
Like a little China doll.
I just want to hug you to pieces!
And the kids!
I'll just eat you up!
Hi, honey!
Home port. Lock and load! There's Ma.
-My baby!
-How are you?
You can sure tell which is Steve's.
That's Le Ly.
Hello.
I'm so happy to meet you, honey.
The boys.
Come on in.
Look at this!
Not bad, huh? It's ranch-style.
We'll be here for a little while.
But soon we'll get our own place.
When you'd get back?
Last night, we got a C-130 out of--
-How was the flight?
-Long, you know.
Was it terrible there?
We don't want to talk about that now.
We'll talk about that later.
I've got steak and baked potatoes all planned, sweetie...
...just like you like it.
And chocolate ice cream.
Do you eat that too?
Please, I prepare some tea if you show me kitchen.
No, I'm supposed to do that.
You're the guest.
This way.
You hungry, Ly?
You mind if I call you Ly for short?
For dinner we have...
...steak, potatoes...
...peas.
For dessert: strawberries.
We'll have you back to normal in no time.
The meat'll take more work, but we've got that under control.
Magic.
''Bless us, O Lord, for these gifts which we are about to receive.
''In the name of the Father, the Son and the Holy Ghost. Amen.''
Were the bugs bad?
-What about drugs?
-Some guys got involved...
...some guys didn't.
My Steve wouldn't do anything bad.
No way.
Johnny got killed.
Le Ly, you got such pretty hair.
Then we got another R and R in Australia.
You should see those beaches.
-Was the money as good as they say?
...I socked away.
Combat pay, no tax, overseas pay, the best. I'd go for another year, if I could.
I guess it's over, though.
Beverly's been calling.
I'm sure she wants it all, too.
Three more years.
Then I'm in fat city.
How are the kids?
Great. You must call them.
John's having trouble in school.
Jerry--
I'll do it, okay?
Can we just relax here?
I'm sure Lee Lay's really jet-lagged out.
Aren't you, honey?
You drank too much.
You forgot my name.
I'm sorry, Le Ly.
Steve was always slow in school.
Just think of it as a Saigon taxi.
Just a rental.
My personal car's in the shop.
You know I understand about money.
You in Marines a long time...
...but you live with your mother.
The problem is Beverly.
She gets half my paycheck.
Plus child support and she's still pissed.
I'm in debt to the credit union...
...for the loan they made me in '67.
I'm practically bankrupt.
I got three more years,
I'll get out with a good pension.
Then I have a good job waiting for me.
Big bucks.
Just you and me.
We're going to be back in the Far East.
Indonesia.
Singapore.
I'll be making $65,000 a year, guaranteed.
Promised to me.
What's this job?
I can't tell you. Not yet. It's confidential.
But I guarantee it'll work out.
We need to go back to Aisle 3 where that cute guy is.
-He'd make a cute snack.
-Yeah, what buns on him!
Pick one.
Uncle Ben, I think.
Uncle trusted man.
We're not feeding the village.
Bernice doesn't even like this stuff.
This is America, baby.
Store stays open 24 hours.
You don't need money in America.
You just give this piece of paper to the bank and the bank pays.
They don't get it.
I do.
We'll lick them together.
We'll lick them together.
Thank you, Lord, for watching over us all this year...
...and for these things for which we are grateful.
I met her on a Danang street corner.
Her girlfriend tried to rip me off.
I had one like that in Okinawa.
She had thighs as plump as that turkey, cracked coconuts with them.
Wait, it's not what you think.
I chased her like a starving ARVN hunting for a grain of rice.
Horseshit.
Don't run off with your dirty mind.
Don't get a headache.
You and me are peas in a pod.
Oriental women...
...will tell you anything you want to hear.
But if you believe it,
I'll be the first to salute you.
What are you saying?
Oriental women are very loyal.
Have a drink. All I'm trying to say is, more power to you, buddy.
Come on, Ly, it's Thanksgiving.
You can eat.
Think of the starving children in Vietnam.
Leave her alone.
She always eats like a sparrow.
Rice and fish, fish and rice...
...that's all the kids ever get.
They're starving for meat and potatoes.
Give her a break. She can't eat for her whole damn country.
I want her to know we're being generous.
I want her to be grateful.
Grateful. Let me tell you about grateful.
We'd go to villages and the first thing old men and women would say to us was:
''Please, sir, don't kill me.''
In Danang, we'd drive past hospitals...
...past people our bombs had blown to bits.
And they'd wave.
Boys and girls with no arms, no legs...
...waving at us like tourist going to the beach.
Why?
Because they're happy to be alive and glad to see us.
We put them where they were.
And there's 20 of them dead or mutilated for every one of us.
So don't expect Ly to do handstands over your turkey.
She knows exactly what she's got and what she's left behind.
-Well, excuse me, baby brother.
-Steve is right.
I'm sorry, Mrs. Butler.
Goddamn.
It's time the kids slept in their own bed.
They more loving when they stay with us.
Who's going to protect them from evil spirits?
Look, it ain't Vietnam in this bedroom.
It's California.
How can I even see you across all these bodies?
Kids sleep alone.
Makes them more independent.
You Le Ly's hero.
Tonight, you protect Le Ly.
You good man.
Just too much whiskey.
I want to go work. I want make money.
I want get out of here.
I think your family like their dogs better than our boys.
What will you do, anyway?
Work factory. Restaurant.
There's plenty Oriental restaurant growing here.
I'd like to go back to Vietnam.
Make a bundle.
I'll tell you the truth,
I kind of miss it, in a way.
What's this job they want you to do for so much money?
It's just between you and me, okay?
Government has rules about what jobs you can do after what I've done.
What job?
It's arms.
Selling arms.
-I don't understand.
-You know, guns? I sell guns.
You joking?
What do you think I did the last 17 years?
What do you think military advisors do?
I go into countries the US helps and teach them...
...how to use the weapons our corporation sell.
How can you sell guns to governments that blow up women and children?
You know that if we didn't sell these weapons...
...the Communists would.
Guns! Communists!
Is that all Americans think about?
It's the only thing I know how to do.
At least I'll make more money doing it.
Do you ever listen to anything I tell you?
Oh, shit.
-You mean the Buddhist stuff?.
-No, not just that!
I mean, my family, my life.
We don't know anything about each other, Steve.
You lied to me in Vietnam.
No, it wasn't a lie...
...exactly.
It was a white lie. A good lie.
Baby, don't do this.
Please. I love you, darling.
Much against Steve's wishes,
I found a job...
...working in a circuit board factory.
I know the girls well...
...so I borrowed $5,000. I need $10,000...
...to open a little deli in an immigrant neighborhood.
We Vietnamese never trust in bank.
Loan money to each other.
Can I borrow some money?
I think I'll make $1,400 profit a month.
I didn't tell Steve.
He'd be angry.
He didn't like my starting a business...
...of my own.
Those cost me $5,000 in Vietnam.
Take it back to Vietnam.
I'm opening a restaurant. I'll be back.
Steve want to give me money, control me.
But I used to working, having my own money.
But in America, he want me to be housewife.
So I wear two hats.
I'm lucky? What do you mean?
You told me two years!
We had an agreement! Not one!
Two years, not $10,000. $20,000!
I don't think so!
I put in air conditioner!
I clean electric wiring!
I remodel! I put up shelves!
I should pay $10,000 for two years and you know it!
When I tell Steve, we have a big fight, then more fights.
Hung, now Jimmy...
...break my heart when he refused to speak Vietnamese with me...
...as did Tommy and our new son, Alan.
In school, because of the war, they said they were Mexican.
I won't sign it.
Fine. No sign.
I was starting to behave like an American...
...yelling back at my husband, frowns, scowls.
And all the time you spend at the temple!
Steve was drinking more...
...and seemed unhappy with his job at the Marine base.
Buddha don't know shit!
There was another side to Steve now
I had not seen before.
He speak angry words now.
All blood and thunder words.
She's a bitch.
What do you want me to say?
She wants more! No reason.
Money goes like water around here.
I got five kids...
...including your bastard.
The Marine Corps owns my body and my soul. I got nothing of my own!
Then why use $400 on two more guns?
Still bitching about money?
That's the gook in you.
You have no right to call me that!
These guns are valuable. I can sell them for twice what I got in them.
One day they could be the only thing between you and death.
Death? Death from who?
You the only person who waves gun around here...
...who drinks and shoots.
I don't need you to tell me what to do!
They're my sons, too...
...and I'll take them up to the mountain, teach them to hunt and shoot!
They'll learn to survive.
No way, buddy!
You will not teach my sons to shoot!
I see too many guns in my life.
Killing no way to protect anything!
I don't want guns in my house! No more.
You want them, you get out!
Fuck you...
...you lying little bitch!
Don't tell me to go. I read your letter.
What letter?
The one from your dink lover.
I saw it in your purse.
Anh?
You went through my things?
What's he writing you in Vietnamese about?
Does he want you back?
No.
He asked about Jimmy.
I send him pictures...
...answer his questions.
-That's all.
-Bullshit!
Lying bitch!
One time, I think I love you.
But I see now we're too different inside to be soul mates.
No more mistake now.
Not with children so young.
Are you saying you want a divorce?
Is that it?
One thing I learn.
In a marriage there's no such thing as one person happy.
One miserable, both miserable.
That the way life works.
Oh, no, baby.
That is the way life works!
Oh, my God!
I felt my soul would go then, any moment.
God is not cruel...
...just practical.
In this life...
...sometimes, against all knowledge...
...we're paying back for a lot of bad past lives.
I can't.
I can't live without you!
They got me so tied up.
Who's doing this to you?
The Marine Corps.
I'm not going to get the civilian job
I promised you.
I'm up for an Admin Board, and they're going to kick me out.
You don't know the half of it.
You don't.
Tell me.
You must tell me all.
You'll feel better.
I'm a killer.
I killed so many over there.
I got so good at it...
...they assigned me to the projects.
Black Ops.
We killed sometimes three or four a night.
All kinds.
Rice farmers.
Rich fat cats bankrolling the VC.
It was a complete mind fuck.
Psy Ops, knives, rip a man's guts out...
...drop his liver on his chest so he won't get to Buddha heaven.
Leave him lying on the road.
Cut his nuts off...
...stuff them in his mouth, sew up his lips, leave him lying in bed.
Blame the VC. I didn't care.
Drugs, running guns, slavery.
You name it.
One time this guy killed a gook girl I was...
...shacking with.
We weren't supposed to fraternize with any Viet nationalists...
...so they killed her.
Cut her throat from ear to ear.
I was in hell, baby.
I was in pure...
...hell.
And maybe I went dinky dau over there.
Maybe I am nuts. Who the fuck knows?
The more I killed, the more they gave me to kill.
You know what it's like?
It's like being eaten alive...
...by sharks. You must keep hitting, you must keep moving...
...because if you stop...
...the sharks will eat you alive.
One day, they cut me off.
Then one day I found you.
And it all changed, I thought.
But, baby, nothing ever changes.
So fuck me, right?
It's okay.
What's going to happen to me?
I'm scared to death.
I don't know.
I, too, was a soldier in past lives.
I hurt many people.
I lied, I stealed...
...I hate.
Now I pay.
Soldiers try to kill my life.
Long time, I have no man love me.
No respect.
It's my fate.
We're the same, Steve.
We have made bad karma.
And our soul debt will come due, if not in this life...
...then in another.
But we can't give up.
We must try.
Different skin...
...same suffering.
Can you love me?
Can you really love me?
Oh, my baby!
But the fights continued and continued.
Finally I went to see a lawyer.
In my heart,
I thought I did not belong in this country.
I thought of going home again.
He's not supposed to take furniture.
Call your lawyer.
It's okay, Sharon. Let him.
That's what a divorce is about.
That's when you divide everything.
-Not now.
-Please.
Let him go.
Eat up.
-What are you doing here?
-It's Sunday.
-Came to take the kids to Mass.
-I don't think so.
Get the hell out of the way!
Jimmy, come!
-What are you doing?
-I'm going, too.
No, you're not!
You're staying right here and fix lunch!
Le Ly, good to see you.
It's been far too long.
This is Steve.
How's Alan? Tommy?
-Fine. You want to see them again?
-Of course! I'm worried sick!
The police want you.
Fuck them. Do exactly what I tell you.
What do you want?
Write a letter to your bitch lawyer, dropping the charges against me.
Tell her you want the house and our stuff put in my name...
...and you're dropping the divorce.
You listening?
Yes, I'm listening.
Get the letter notarized.
Take it to Father Bob. I'll call him.
Do it or you'll be sorry.
Of course, you'll get the letter.
Just don't hurt them.
They're ours. They have our lives in them.
Just get that letter.
My boys. I birthed them with pain.
I chewed their food for them.
I am shocked.
I am insulted at the insolence of men.
They don't respect women.
I cannot believe such men have known a mother's love.
If I show you a tiny baby killed by a bayonet...
...and say it is his karma...
...we may cry for the baby...
...for his karma and the bad karma of the soldier who killed it.
But we must never use our emotion...
...to deny the wheel of incarnation that caused the act.
It is as natural...
...as the movement of the sun...
...and moon.
Master...
...how can I tell him we must be friends and soul mates...
...without being husband and wife?
He has created much soul debt for himself.
But if you fail to give him the opportunity...
...to redeem himself...
...you will only increase you own soul debt.
The man-hate...
...that blinds you...
...will blind any man you find in a future life.
If you turn Steve away...
...you will be rejecting your own redemption.
Child...
...you have forgiven the man who raped you...
...destroyed your country...
...harmed your family.
This is how it should be.
Your karma is mixed with Steve, to Tommy and Alan.
The future...
...the past...
...are all the same.
If you divorce...
...you will only have to come back and work it out again.
The path to Nirvana is never being safe...
...but tricky and steep.
And if you walk only on sunny days...
...you'll never reach your destination.
Choose well...
...my peach blossom.
A child without a father...
...is like a house without a roof.
Listen carefully.
My sister Kim had come to America and married one of Steve's military friends.
Steve and the two boys are here now.
They're drinking.
He's getting ready to take them to Canada.
The boys are upset.
They don't want to stay with Steve.
Fine, next Tuesday.
-Whatever you want.
-Put Steve on. I must speak to him.
Here.
It's for you. Here.
Let go.
Please, I know you hate me.
But I don't hate you.
Let me help you.
Let me try.
I feel your pain.
You come back home. No police.
Just you, me and the children.
We make this right.
I'll go to your church.
I'll try harder. I'll put the shrine away.
I love you, Steve.
I love the man I saw in Vietnam.
I'll find you again.
He's still there, Steve.
I still love you.
Steve, please.
-You can't go in.
-My children.
-They're all right! Steve--
-What?
He killed himself.
The spirits are here.
Oh, this is marvelous.
Your husband is here.
He is a little shy.
He doesn't want to come into the house.
He's not used to this new world.
He's in much pain.
But he forgive you.
He ask for you...
...to take his soul into the Buddhist temple.
He say:
''Place me in the temple.''
As he finds peace...
...so will your family and your children find peace.
That's it.
Are you sure that was Steve?
He was such a strong Christian.
Trust me.
He change a lot.
And, by the way...
...this house.
Have to leave.
No good.
Your front door faces your back door.
Everything that come into your life the front way, will go out the back.
Men...
...money...
...happiness...
...everything.
Move fast!
It was 13 years after the war that I first returned to Vietnam...
...to the spirit of my father...
...to my sisters and brother, Bon...
...who had survived the war...
...and to my mother, who I had not spoken to in years.
An ocean had come between us.
I feared it would be the last time for my sons to see her.
I had prospered in America. Yes.
I buy and rent houses, became part in a restaurant...
...working all the time, losing touch as a mother.
Affairs with different men, none of whom touched my heart.
Stopping in old Saigon first...
...now Ho Chi Minh City...
...my heart trembled with anticipation as I took Jimmy to see his father...
...who, as a teenage girl,
I'd fallen madly in love with...
...twenty years before.
Had he changed?
Don't start that again.
You look healthy.
You're a ghost.
I don't see you.
I don't know where you are.
How is your sister Kim?
Fine.
Fine.
Your grandsons. My boys.
Jimmy is Hung.
Tommy is Chau.
Alan.
Born in America.
What'd she say?
She says you're giant.
She can't believe your size.
You used to scratch your back...
...on the wooden post in our house.
-Look at her teeth!
-Stop that.
Brother.
Take one.
Be polite.
I'm sorry. I can't.
Don't spoil a good time.
My oldest son and my youngest daughter are back with me.
My two halves on either side.
We share the same mother, I agree.
I love her as a sister...
...but I cannot accept her gifts.
I had this terrible fear you would despise me...
...because I married your enemy and left while you were still fighting.
It's been so many years.
Much is forgiven.
But you don't understand how much suffering Americans caused.
Things are very hard.
We use our own excrement...
...to grow vegetables!
All we had to hold on to was the future...
...because we knew that the future would not arrive unless we won...
...so we kept dying, no matter what...
...just like ants beneath the elephant's feet.
It wasn't because we were brave.
Because we had no choice.
Our freedom was all...
...all that mattered.
When the future finally came...
...there was more war.
The Cambodians, the Chinese.
When I came to look for Mama in 1980....
You have no idea how much your mother suffered.
She was too old to work the paddies.
She had to give the land, our land, to the State after liberation.
When I found Mama and Hai...
...they were starving.
Their clothes were rags, their farm tools stolen...
...the animals slaughtered.
The house was in ruins.
Wild dogs attacked them.
Nobody in the village cared for them.
Just two old ladies scavenging...
...and growing vegetables to stay alive.
Now you come here...
...a rich, strange foreigner.
You'll turn the village against them.
And against us...
...the Phungs, who have suffered so much.
Things were bad for everyone after liberation.
Many times, heaven and earth changed places.
If you ask me, rebuilding a nation after a war...
...is like trying to start a family by getting raped!
If war produces one thing, it's many cemeteries.
And in cemeteries there are no enemies.
All I could think of for so long...
...was how I made your brother, Sau, go to war.
Your father wanted your brother to know some of the joys of married life...
...but I said no, so sure I was doing the right thing.
Can you believe it?
I gave up a grandson to gain a soldier.
And I lost both.
How wrong I was.
It was also An Sau's choice.
He was just being a good son when he obeyed me.
If I could, I'd have stopped you from going to America.
What would've happened to your sons here?
I'm so proud of you, Bay Ly.
You've grown up to see the side of things that's hidden from most people.
Tears are God's way of paying you back...
...for what He's taken.
I have no more tears.
I have cried them out to all directions of the wind.
My color's changing, Ly.
It began last year.
I have seen it before in others.
You have come back, and that's what matters.
You have completed your circle of growth.
Low tide to high tide...
...poor to rich...
...sad to happy...
...beggar to a fine lady.
Your past is now complete...
...and my destiny as your mother is now over.
I'm looking forward to joining your papa.
That night,
I slept in the house my father built.
Afterward, he found no need to visit me in my dreams.
I gave my offerings to all the dead of the village.
I had come home, yes.
But home had changed...
...and I would always be in between...
...south, north...
...east, west...
...peace, war...
...Vietnam, America.
It is my fate to be in between heaven and earth.
When we resist our fate, we suffer.
When we accept it, we are happy.
We have time in abundance, an eternity...
...to repeat our mistakes.
But we need only once correct our mistake...
...and at last hear the song of enlightenment...
...with which we can break the chain of vengeance forever.
In your heart you can hear it now.
It's the song your spirit has been singing since your birth.
If the monks were right and nothing happens without cause...
...then the gift of suffering is to bring us closer to God...
...to teach us to be strong when we are weak...
...to be brave when we are afraid...
...to be wise in the midst of confusion...
...and to let go of that which we can no longer hold.
Lasting victories are won in the heart...
...not on this land or that.
Max.
Unfortunate he's just so cute.
Here.
Hello, stranger.
- There you are.
- Thanks.
It's nice.
- Who's that?
- It's Max.
How are we doing, then, girls?
Give me that.
Let her die.
Revenge!
- He's your man.
- That's my boy.
Streets of Berlin
I must leave you soon
Oh, will you forget me?
Was I ever really here?
Find me a bar on the cobble-stoned streets where the boys are pretty
I cannot love for more than one day
But one day is enough in this city
Find me a boy with two ocean-blue eyes
And show no pity
Take out his eyes
He never need see how they eat you alive in this city
Streets of Berlin will you miss me?
Streets of Berlin do you care?
Streets of Berlin will you cry out if I vanish into thin air?
What's the problem?
Watch it!
You, too.
Come on.
I'm a rotten person.
Why am I so rotten?
Why do I do these things?
He's gorgeous, though, isn't he?
I don't remember anything.
Did we have a threesome?
Maybe the two of you had a threesome.
Hello.
Morning.
I look silly.
Not now.
This place....
Yes?
It's really....
The country will be nice.
- What's the country?
- The house.
Your country house.
How do we get to the country?
- A car.
- Mine?
- Shit!
- Rosen.
Our landlord. We owe a lot of rent.
Rent? I thought you were rich.
Rich?
You told me you were rich.
I was joking. Listen....
You don't happen to have any extra cash, do you?
Don't make jokes. I don't like jokes.
You don't want me with you. Is that it?
Maybe I'm not good enough for you.
Not rich enough.
My father made watches.
That's not so wonderful.
Is it, "Baron"?
Baron?
Him.
No!
Fuck!
Hold him.
Greta!
Gracious!
Still alive?
I'm impressed.
Love your street-wear.
Over, now.
Ciao.
Is it safe?
What?
For us to go home.
You fucking queers.
Don't you have any brains at all?
- It's not safe.
- Who was he?
- Who was who?
- The blonde boy.
Wolfgang Granz.
Guess who his boyfriend was?
You're not guessing.
Karl Ernst.
Who's Karl Ernst?
What kind of world do you live in?
Aren't you girls ever curious about what's going on?
Don't lecture. Who's Karl Ernst?
George, actually.
What?
I'm George, now.
Karl Ernst was von Helldorf's deputy.
I suppose you have no idea who von Helldorf is.
Second-in-command of the Storm Troopers, immediately under Ernst Rohm.
Ernst Rohm, I know him.
He's that fat queen.
Friend of Hitler's.
Runs around with many beautiful boys.
Goes to all the clubs.
Rudy, shut up.
- Why?
- Just shut up.
Mein Frer had Rohm murdered last night.
And all of his friends.
And their friends.
And their tricks.
And whoever happened by.
So queer is out.
Queer is dead.
You just pulled the wrong guy.
We can explain it to someone.
It's not as if we knew him.
Hello, darling.
- So how about you?
- Me?
Everyone knows I'm not queer.
I've got a wife and kids.
I've had every whore on this street.
I'm just an average kind of guy.
- Bye-bye now.
- Where are you going?
Prayer.
- How much?
- How much, what?
How much did they give you?
What a desperate thing to say.
Here, take this.
- We don't want it.
- Shut up, Rudy.
- Stop telling me to shut--
- Shut up.
It's not enough.
If they catch us, I'll name names.
A threat. I'm utterly terrified.
Here....
I'm a true Christian.
I won't say a word to the Gestapo until the service is over.
Ciao.
I'm not leaving Berlin.
- We have to.
- We don't have to.
I've paid up for dance class for the next two weeks. I can't leave.
Why did you have to take him home?
You've ruined everything.
Go back to your fucking dance class.
They can shoot you in the middle of an arabesque.
Move out of the way.
Where will we go?
What is it?
Do you love him?
- What?
- The dancer.
Christ!
I just feel responsible.
Fluffs can't afford that kind of responsibility.
- Why are you laughing?
- That word.
"Fluffs."
Damn!
We aren't allowed to be fluffs, anymore.
We aren't even allowed to kiss or embrace... or fantasize.
They can arrest you for having fluff thoughts.
Uncle Freddie!
It's not funny.
I think geraniums are best.
The family takes care of me.
But you... throwing it in everyone's face.
No wonder they don't want anything to do with you.
Maximilian...
- take the ticket.
- I need two.
But I haven't the right dress for the dance.
Look.
Over there.
Cute.
I suppose.
Think he's a fluff?
Don't care.
Except the baritone.
You've been on the run since '34... over a year with that dancer.
The family knows all about it.
You can't live like that.
- Please--
- I need two tickets.
- I can't get two.
- "I can't get two."
Nothing really works, does it?
Get out.
How about a deal?
Two tickets to Amsterdam, two new identity cards.
Once we get to Amsterdam, I'll ditch him.
The family can have me back.
Maybe they don't want you back.
It's been 10 years.
They want me.
It's good business.
I'm an only son.
Remember that marriage that Father wanted to arrange?
Her father had button factories, too.
She's a widow now, lives in Brussels.
Make the arrangements again.
Our button factories can sleep with her button factories.
And eventually when all this blows over, you can get me back to Germany.
If I want a boy...
I'll rent him... like you.
I'll be a discreet, quiet... fluff.
Just get us both out alive.
I can't do things on my own.
Not now.
I'll have to ask your father.
Walk away.
Be careful.
You should sign on.
They don't check your papers.
It's good exercise, too, for the shoulders.
I'm getting nice shoulders.
- What did you do today?
- Nothing.
I went to town.
- I'm working on something.
- Really?
A deal.
A deal. Wonderful.
I might get us new papers, and tickets to Amsterdam.
- You said that in Hamburg.
- It didn't work out, in Hamburg.
- You said that in Stuttgart.
- You gonna recite the list?
Why not? I'm tired of your deals.
You know what? This cheese stinks.
Why don't we just cross it?
What?
The border.
This guy on the job today was telling me it's easy.
He said he knew spots.
Spots?
Spots to get through.
I told him to come talk to you.
- Here?
- Yes.
Rudy, I told you, we don't want anyone to know that we're here... or that we're trying to cross the border.
Are you that stupid?
- I'm not stupid!
- He could tell the police.
Okay, so I am stupid.
Why don't we just try it anyway?
Because I am working on a deal.
Who with?
I can't tell you.
This is crazy.
We're in the middle of the jungle.
- Forest.
- Jungle.
I'm a dancer, not Mowgli.
I can't dance anymore.
I've walked my feet away.
But you don't mind.
You're working on a deal.
You worked on a deal in Berlin, and now in the jungle.
Forest.
Jungle.
I want to get out of here.
I could have.
But you're right.
I'm stupid.
Now you're just hanging around, waiting for me to die.
I think you've poisoned the cheese.
It's your cheese.
Choke on it.
I can't tell you how much
I want you to choke on it.
Christ!
Remember cocaine?
Yes.
I'd like some cocaine.
What would you like?
New glasses.
My eyes have changed.
I need a new prescription.
- I'd like new glasses.
- In Amsterdam.
- Sure.
- In Amsterdam.
Cocaine and new glasses.
You'll have plants.
Wonderful Dutch plants.
And dance classes.
And do you know what?
We can buy a Dutch dog.
Everyone should have a dog.
Burning.
Don't.
I really love you.
Don't.
If they hear us....
They won't hear us.
Streets of Berlin
I must leave you soon
Will you forget me?
Was I ever really here?
Listen.
Run.
Rudy!
Glasses.
Give me your glasses.
Horn-rimmed.
- Intelligentsia.
- What?
Stand up.
Step on your glasses.
Step on them.
Take him.
Max!
Glasses.
Don't!
Don't move. You can't help him.
This isn't happening.
It's happening.
Where are they taking us?
A detention camp.
- Probably Dachau.
- How do you know?
I've been through transport.
They took me to Cologne for a propaganda film.
- Pink Triangle in Good Health.
- "Pink triangle," what's that?
Queer. If you're queer, that's what you wear.
Like Jews, a yellow star.
Political, a red triangle. Criminal, green.
Pink is as low as you can get.
This isn't happening.
This can't be happening.
If you survive the train, you stand a chance.
Here's where they break you.
You can do nothing for your friend.
If you try to help him, they will kill you.
If you try to care for his wounds, they will kill you.
If you want to stay alive, he cannot exist.
This can't be happening.
He hasn't a chance. He wore glasses.
It isn't happening.
It is happening.
Who is this man?
I don't know.
Your friend?
Look at him.
Look!
- Your friend?
- No.
Your friend?
- Your friend?
- No.
Stand up.
Hit him.
Like this.
- Hit him. It's your friend.
- No.
Open your eyes.
Again.
That's enough.
Your friend?
- No.
- No.
Stand up.
Take him.
Hello.
- Yellow star?
- What?
Jew?
Yes.
I wouldn't have thought it.
How did you get that?
- What?
- Your pink triangle.
I signed a petition.
- What kind?
- For Magnus Hirschfeld.
- He wanted to make queers--
- Legal.
But the Nazis got him.
I was a nurse.
They said a queer couldn't be a nurse.
Suppose I had to touch a patient's penis?
They said rather than be a nurse,
I should be a prisoner.
So... that's how I got my pink triangle.
How'd you get the yellow star?
I'm Jewish.
You're not Jewish, you're queer.
Maybe I'm both.
- Then you'd wear both.
- I didn't want one.
- Didn't want one?
- You told me it was the lowest.
But so is a yellow star.
I didn't want to be a queer... so I worked a deal.
- With the Gestapo?
- Yes.
You're full of shit.
I'm going to work a lot of deals in the camp.
Sooner or later, they'll release us.
I'm only under protective custody.
That's what they told me.
I'm going to stay alive.
Friendship lasts about 12 hours in this place.
We had ours on the train.
You didn't think I'd make it, did you?
Off the train.
- I wasn't sure.
- I'm going to stay alive.
- Yes.
- Because of you.
You told me how.
Yes.
I did.
I'm sorry.
About what?
I don't know.
Your friend.
He wasn't my friend.
I made a deal.
What?
A deal.
Leave me alone, please.
They said... if I could....
They said....
What?
Nothing.
I think, maybe....
- Okay--
- I made....
They took me... into that room on the train.
And they said, "Prove that you're...."
And I did.
Did what?
I made love.
- Who to?
- Her.
Only... maybe only 13.
She was dead.
Just....
Bullet in her.
They said, "Prove that you're...."
And I did.
Lots of them... watching... laughing, drinking.
"He's a bit bent," they said. "He can't."
But....
How?
I don't know.
I wanted....
To stay alive.
- And there was something.
- Something?
Exciting.
Oh, God!
I killed him.
Sweet lips.
Angel.
- God....
- She was.
She was like an angel to save my life.
Don't do that.
You mustn't do that.
For your own sake, you mustn't touch me.
I'm a rotten person.
Rotten.
No.
Get up.
Jew bastard.
Get up!
I'm going to stay alive.
Here.
- You will work here.
- Yes, sir.
- He'll explain.
- Yes, sir.
- I'm watching.
- Yes, sir.
- I see everything.
- Yes, sir.
- No slacking.
- No, sir.
- I see everything.
- Yes, sir.
You.
Yes, sir?
- Tell him what to do.
- Yes, sir.
- You.
- Yes, sir?
- Every two hours there is a rest period.
- Yes, sir.
- For three minutes.
- Yes, sir.
- Stand at attention.
- Yes, sir.
- Don't move.
- No, sir.
- The bell rings.
- Yes, sir.
- You.
- Yes, sir?
- Explain it to him.
- Yes, sir.
You're responsible.
Yes, sir.
- You.
- Yes, sir?
I see everything.
Yes, sir.
We had a boy like that in school.
Used to lead us in Simon Says.
Okay.
- I'll explain.
- Okay.
- We have to move rocks.
- Yes, sir.
- You take one rock at a time.
- Yes, sir.
- Move it over there.
- Yes, sir.
When the entire pile is over there, you take one rock at a time... and you move it back.
- And move it back?
- Yes.
We move rocks from there to there, and then back from there to there?
- Yes, sir.
- Why?
Start moving. He's watching.
It's supposed to drive us mad.
- These are heavy.
- You get used to it.
- What do you mean, drive us mad?
- Just that.
Makes no sense, serves no purpose.
They do it to drive us mad.
- They probably know what they're doing.
- No, they don't.
I worked it out.
It's the best job to have.
That's why I got you here.
- What?
- Don't stop. Keep moving.
You two.
Over here.
You were at the stones.
- Was it harder than this?
- I suppose so.
So it was dangerous.
- This isn't?
- No.
Don't you think you should have asked me?
- Asked you what?
- If I wanted to move rocks.
If I wanted to talk to you....
I couldn't ask you.
We're in different barracks.
Thank heaven.
I spent money getting you here.
- Money?
- Yes. I bribed a guard.
- Where did you get money?
- My uncle sent me some.
- And you bribed a guard?
- Yes.
- For me?
- Yes.
- You are mad.
- I thought you'd be grateful.
I like cutting stones.
This is insane.
Twelve hours of this a day.
I'll be crazy in a week.
Like you.
- Jesus.
- I'm sorry I did it.
- You're sorry.
- You don't know what's good for you.
This is the best job to have.
Moving rocks back and forth, for no reason?
The best job to have?
- Why don't you understand?
- I don't want to understand.
- I don't want to talk to you.
- You have to.
- Why?
- I got you here to talk.
- Hard luck.
- I don't want to talk.
Move your rocks and I'll move mine.
Just don't speak to me.
I thought you'd be grateful.
It's so hot.
- Burning hot.
- You talked to me.
Weather talk, that's all.
After three days.
Everyone talks about the weather.
Heard a rumor.
- What?
- Sardines tonight.
Don't like sardines.
Only a rumor.
Suppose, after all of this... we have nothing to talk about.
Was I awful to bring you here?
Come on, don't get depressed.
Smile.
You're not smiling.
You can't see me.
I can feel you.
I wish we could look at each other.
I've been looking at you all morning.
Yeah?
You look sexy.
- Me?
- Without your shirt.
No.
Come off it. You know you're sexy.
No.
Liar.
Of course I'm a liar.
Your body's nice, too.
It's okay, not great.
No, it's nice.
Not as nice as yours.
No... but it's okay.
- How do you know?
- I've been looking, too.
- When?
- All day.
- Yes?
- Yeah.
Listen. Do you...
What?
...miss....
What?
You know.
No, I don't.
Everyone misses it.
- No.
- Everyone in the camp.
No.
Come on, no one can hear us.
You're not a yellow star with me, remember?
I don't want....
What?
To miss it.
But do you?
Yes.
Me, too.
We don't have to.
What?
Miss it.
We're here together.
We don't have to miss it.
We can't look at each other, we can't touch.
We can feel.
- Feel what?
- Each other.
I can feel you right now... next to me.
- Can you feel me?
- No.
Come on, don't be afraid.
No one can hear us.
Can you feel me?
Maybe.
Feel me.
It's so hot.
I'm touching you.
It's burning.
I'm kissing you.
Burning.
Kissing your eyes.
- Hot.
- Kissing your lips.
- Yes.
- Mouth.
- Yes.
- Inside your mouth.
- Neck.
- Yes.
- Down.
- Yes.
Chest to my tongue.
Burning.
- Your chest.
- Your mouth.
- I'm kissing your chest.
- Yes.
- Hard.
- Yes.
- Down.
- Yes.
- Your cock.
- Yes.
- Do you feel my mouth?
- Yes. Do you feel my cock?
- Do you feel?
- Do you feel?
- Mouth.
- Cock.
- Do you feel my cock?
- Do you feel my mouth?
Yes.
Do you....
Do you know what I'm doing?
Yes.
- Can you taste what I'm doing?
- Yes.
Taste.
- Yes, feel.
- Together.
- Do you feel me?
- I feel you.
- I see you.
- I feel you.
- I have you.
- I want you.
Do you feel me, inside you?
I want you inside me.
Feel.
I have you inside me.
- Inside you.
- Strong.
Do you feel me thrust?
- Hold.
- Stroke.
Strong.
Strong.
I'm going to....
Do you feel I'm going to?
- I feel us both.
- Do you?
Yes.
Yes, strong.
More.
Now, more.
Oh, my God!
Did you?
Yes, you?
Yes.
You're a good fuck.
So are you.
Max?
What?
We did it.
Fucking guards, fucking camp, we did it.
They're not going to kill us.
We made love.
We were real, we were human.
We made love.
They're not going to kill us.
I never... thought we'd... do it without touching.
I dream about rocks.
I close my eyes and I'm moving rocks.
Rocks... never end.
- I'm going insane.
- Think of something else.
I've been up all night.
Someone in our barracks killed himself.
They hate that.
It's an act of free will.
Heard a rumor.
- Sardines?
- Yes.
I hate sardines. I hate all food.
Scraps, sardine scraps... that's all we get, anyhow.
Not worth eating.
Didn't know you could have sardine scraps.
- I'm going insane.
- All right, it's my fault.
This job's the worst.
I got it wrong, I'm sorry.
I'm glad to be here.
How can you be?
That's my secret.
Maybe if I closed my eyes....
Heard a rumor.
What?
We may get potatoes.
- When?
- Tomorrow.
- I don't believe it.
- They said so in my barracks.
- Who is "they"?
- Some blokes.
- Are they sexy?
- Shut up.
- You should be with us, where you belong.
- No, but you shouldn't be here.
I want to be here.
Why?
Because I love rocks... because I love you.
I do.
I love you.
Isn't that silly?
What are you doing?
Arranging these neatly.
We've become sloppy.
They can beat you for it.
Don't love me.
It's my secret.
Don't love me.
It makes me happy.
And I have a signal.
When I rub my left eyebrow at you, like this... it means I love you.
I bet you didn't know that.
Don't love me.
I can't help it.
- I don't want anybody to love me.
- Too bad.
- I can't love anybody back.
- Who's asking you to?
Queers aren't meant to love.
They don't want us to.
You know who loved me?
Do you know who loved me?
That boy.
That dancer.
I don't remember his name, but I killed him.
See?
Queers aren't meant to love.
I'll kill you, too.
Hate me.
That's better.
Hate me... don't love me.
I'll do what I want to do.
It isn't any of your business, anyhow.
I don't believe we're doing this.
Rocks make sense, but not snow.
My hands are....
It makes a change.
You have a barracks leader.
- He can get you medicine.
- It doesn't matter.
- If you're nice to the Capo.
- It doesn't matter.
- You're losing weight.
- I don't like sardines.
- It's getting worse.
- And it's getting colder.
- You need medicine.
- Stop nagging me.
I thought you loved yourself.
It's too cold.
I'm scared.
Who isn't?
I want you to care.
I would, if I was warm.
I'll warm you.
You can't.
I'm next to you.
Don't start.
I'll make love to you.
- Not now.
- Yes, now.
- I have a headache. I can't.
- Don't joke.
I'll make love to you.
No.
I'll make you warm.
You can't.
You'll feel warm.
- I can't.
- You'll feel it.
In my fingers.
All over.
I can't.
I'm kissing your fingers.
They're numb.
My mouth is on fire.
- My fingers....
- Are getting warm.
Are they?
They're getting warm.
Yes.
My mouth is on fire.
- Yes.
- Your fingers are on fire... your body's on fire.
Yes.
My mouth is all over you.
My mouth is on your chest, kissing your chest... biting your nipple.
- Biting into it.
- Yes.
Harder.
Stop it! That hurts.
- Harder.
- Stop it! I'm serious. You're hurting me.
You pulled away.
I did.
It was exciting.
For you, maybe.
I don't try to hurt you.
I like being hurt, it's exciting.
It's not.
Not when you're rough.
I'm not being rough.
Why did you have to spoil it?
You were making me warm.
Why can't you be gentle?
- I am.
- You're not.
You tried to hurt me.
You make me warm and then you hurt me.
I hurt enough.
I don't want to feel more pain.
Why can't you be gentle?
- I am.
- No, you're like them.
You're like the guards.
You're like the Gestapo.
We stopped being gentle.
I watched it... when we were on the outside.
People made pain and called it love.
I don't want to be like that.
I can't do anything right.
I don't understand you.
I used to do things right.
You still can.
I want to make you happy.
Then be gentle with me.
I don't know how.
- Just hold me.
- I'm afraid to hold you.
- Don't be.
- I'm afraid.
- I'm going to drown.
- Hold me, please.
Hold me.
Okay.
I'm holding you.
- Are you?
- You're here in my arms, I promise.
I promise, I'm holding you. You're here.
Touch me.
- Are you?
- Yes.
Touching.
Gently.
Touching... softly.
Warm me.
Softly.
Warm me, gently.
Softly.
I'm touching you softly.
Gently.
You're safe.
I'll keep you safe and warm.
You're with me now.
You'll never be cold again.
I'm holding you now... safe... and warm.
As long as you're here... as long as you're with me... as long as I'm holding you... you're safe.
- It sounds better.
- It does?
- Loosening up.
- It is?
- Medicine's helping?
- Yes.
How did you get it?
I told you...
I spoke to my barracks leader.
He took me to an officer.
Which one?
Some captain, the new one.
Why don't you tell me?
- You're never going to let up, are you?
- Probably not.
- Suppose you don't like the answer?
- I'll chance it.
I went down on him.
- What?
- You heard.
- I didn't.
- You wanted to know.
I told you you wouldn't like it.
That SS Captain?
- He's the worst bastard in the--
- I know.
- You went down on him?
- I had to, I didn't have any money.
- You touched him?
- No, I just went down on him.
That's what he wanted.
I needed the medicine.
- I'd rather cough.
- You wouldn't.
That bastard.
- Is he queer?
- Who knows?
Just felt like it, maybe.
He could be queer, but you don't like to think about that.
- You don't want them to be queer.
- I don't.
That's silly.
For once you're right. It is silly.
There are queer Nazis... and queer saints, and queer geniuses... and queer nobodies... just people.
That's why I'm wearing this triangle.
That's why you should be wearing it.
Do you think the Captain would let a queer go down on him?
Somebody straight, yeah, even a Jew.
He would kill me if he knew I was a queer.
My yellow star got your medicine.
- Who needs it?
- Then give it back.
Throw it away, why don't you? And die.
I am tired of being told
I should have a pink triangle.
Ever go to the Silhouette?
Yes.
I never saw you there.
You weren't looking.
- Greta's Club?
- No.
Good, you had taste.
The White Mouse?
Sometimes.
I'm surprised you never saw me there.
Did you sunbathe?
I loved to sunbathe.
- In the nude?
- Of course.
- By the river.
- That's right.
And you never saw me?
Actually, I did.
I saw you by the river.
You were making a fool of yourself... and I said, "Some day I'll be at Dachau with that man, moving rocks."
I didn't like Berlin.
I mean, I wasn't happy.
But I like it now. I miss it.
We'll go back someday.
- When we get out of here?
- Yes.
We will, won't we?
We have to, don't we?
Yes.
- Horst?
- What?
We could go back together.
You. Jew.
Yes, sir?
Are you feeling better?
Sir?
Your cold?
Yes, sir.
- Remarkable.
- Yes, sir.
Carry on.
You!
- Pervert.
- Yes, sir?
Are you ill?
No, sir.
You have a cough.
No, sir.
Something caught in your throat?
- Yes, sir.
- From breakfast?
Yes, sir.
Carry on.
- You. Pervert.
- Yes, sir?
- You coughed.
- Yes, sir.
- You're not well.
- I am, sir.
I see.
You. Jew.
- Yes, sir?
- Watch.
- Watch, sir?
- Yes. Watch.
You.
- Yes, sir?
- Put down that rock.
Good. Now go for a walk.
A walk, sir?
Yes, a walk.
And you. Jew.
Up here.
Enough.
Now take off your hat.
My hat, sir?
Your hat.
Yes, sir.
You.
- Yes, sir?
- Relax.
- Yes, sir.
- And watch.
Yes, sir.
- You.
- Yes, sir?
Throw your hat away.
Not there.
- Not there, sir?
- No.
Pick it up.
Yes, sir.
Throw it on the fence.
The fence, sir?
The fence.
That's all right.
We'll wait.
Are you better?
Yes, sir.
Nasty cough.
Yes, sir.
On the fence, now!
On the fence. Yes, sir.
You.
Yes, sir?
Are you watching?
Yes, sir.
Good.
- You.
- Yes, sir?
Get your hat.
- Now, sir?
- Now!
Are you sure, sir?
Quite.
Could I do without my hat, sir?
No.
Yes, sir.
He scratched me.
You.
Jew.
Yes, sir?
I hope the medicine helped.
Get rid of the body.
Yes, sir.
No!
No, it's okay. I won't drop you. I'll hold you.
If I stand at attention, I can hold you.
They'll let me hold you.
I won't let you down.
I never held you before.
I won't let you drop.
You know what?
Horst?
You know what?
I think....
I think I love you.
Don't tell anyone.
Don't worry about the rocks.
I won't drop you, I promise.
I think I loved....
Can't remember his name.
A dancer.
I think I loved him, too.
Don't be jealous.
You're safe.
I won't drop you.
I love you.
What's wrong with that?
Oh, my God!
You can't sleep here.
- Get away from me.
- Why don't you go to an inn?
- Why do you think?
- Did you knock on doors and ask people?
I asked everywhere. Leave me alone.
You didn't ask there.
Knock on that door.
Who can that be?
Do you have food?
- Come in.
- Look, I'm a convict.
My name is Jean Valjean.
I've served 19 years' hard Iabor.
They let me out four days ago.
I'm on parole.
I have to go to Dijon to report Monday, or they'll send me back to prison.
Here's my passport. I can't read, but
I know what it says. "He's dangerous."
Monsieur, you're welcome to eat with us as my guest.
I'm a convict. You saw my passport.
I know who you are.
You're gonna let me inside your house?
What crime did you commit?
Maybe I killed someone.
How do you know
I'm not going to murder you?
How do you know
I'm not going to murder you?
A joke?
I suppose we'll have to trust each other.
I didn't kill anyone.
I'm a thief. I stole food.
I stole, but I paid for it.
Nineteen years in chains.
So they let me out, and they give me a yellow passport.
What can I do with a yellow passport?
I have to go to my parole officer in
Dijon, and then what? Starve to death?
Nineteen years, and now the real punishment begins.
- Men can be unjust.
- Men? Not God?
All right.
Whoever you are, thank you.
A meal and a bed to sleep in.
A real bed.
And in the morning, I'll be a new man.
Swine.
Is anybody there?
So we'll use wooden spoons. I don't want to hear anything more about it.
- I'm sorry to disturb you.
- You caught him!
I had my eye on this man.
Thank God.
I'm very angry with you, Jean Valjean.
What happened to your eye, monseigneur?
- Didn't he tell you he was our guest?
- Oh, yes.
After we searched his knapsack and found all this silver... he claimed... that you gave it to him.
Yes. Of course
I gave him the silverware.
But why didn't you take the candlesticks? That was very foolish.
Mme Gilot, fetch the silver candlesticks.
They're worth at least 2,000 francs.
Why did you leave them? Hurry!
M. Valjean has to get going.
He's lost a lot of time.
Did you forget to take them?
- Are you saying he told us the truth?
- Of course.
Thank you for bringing him back.
I'm very relieved.
Release him.
You're letting me go?
Didn't you understand the bishop?
Mme Gilot, offer these men some wine.
They must be thirsty.
Thanks.
And don't forget-- don't ever forget you've promised to become a new man.
Promise.
Why are you doing this?
Jean Valjean, my brother, you no longer belong to evil.
With this silver, I've bought your soul.
I've ransomed you from fear and hatred.
Now I give you back to God.
Good afternoon, Captain.
I'm Javert, the new police inspector.
Here are my orders from the Paris prefect.
Oh, yes. Hello, Inspector Javert.
I've been expecting you.
I'm Captain Beauvais.
- How was your journey?
- You haven't Iooked at my orders.
Oh, I'm sure they're all right.
Have you eaten?
- Or would you--
- I'd like you to follow procedure.
Well, everything seems... to be in order, Inspector.
You are now in charge of the Vigau police.
In Paris, things are miserable.
Crime is rampant.
The streets are filthy.
Conditions here are much better.
Yes. Life in Vigau has never been better.
Shall I take you to our brick f actory?
- That's our biggest business.
- Very well.
This way.
- Who owns the factory?
- The mayor.
He was one of the workers.
But when it went bankrupt five years ago-- incredible to think of now-- he bought the whole works for Iess than 500 francs.
I should report to the mayor as soon as possible.
- Let's do that first.
- Yes, sir.
The mayor seems to be the force behind everything. Must be a man of genius.
He is extraordinary. But I should warn you, he is also a little eccentric.
- Eccentric? In what way?
- Well, he's shy. Lives Iike a hermit.
Didn't even want to be mayor.
Tried to refuse the honor, but the town fathers insisted.
Not ambitious, yet he's this successful.
He's a mystery. Some people think he's crazy, but I like him.
- I like him, and I feel sorry for him.
- You feel sorry for the mayor?
Because he's lonely. Here we are.
- He lives here?
- Strange, isn't it?
Little better than a worker's house.
Good afternoon, Monsieur Ie Maire.
The new inspector has arrived.
- He wants to report.
- That's all right. He doesn't have to.
But Monsieur le Maire, if you don't permit the inspector to report...
I think he will burst into tears.
Monsieur le Maire, I'm Inspector Javert.
I have the honor of reporting to my post as your prefect of police.
- I'm sorry. What's your name?
- Inspector Javert.
- You were expecting me. Paris should--
- You have papers?
Yes, I apologize. I should have presented them immediately.
Good. Thank you for coming.
Captain, make sure the inspector is settled comfortably.
- Yes.
- Good day.
- The men and women work separately?
- Yes.
Monsieur le maire redesigned the factory in order to keep the sexes apart.
- I told you he's eccentric.
- Not eccentric, Captain. No.
He cares about honest working women and wants to protect their virtue.
Very proper. Very wise.
- Sorry.
- Excuse me.
You've ruined another one!
They're going to dock my wages.
All right! Enough.
Fantine, get your things.
- I'm gonna move your place.
- Good riddance!
An unforgettable experience, but I'll forget it anyway!
Let's go. Back to work! Come on.
The fun's over. Come on. Back to work.
Well, I'd feel safer if you had an escort.
Don't worry. I can look after myself.
I haven't much time. I must leave.
I hope this urgency does not imply distress.
May I ask why you are withdrawing your entire fortune?
I trust that you are aware that this institution is at your service--
Thank you. But this is a business opportunity. No crisis.
I'll be back tomorrow.
I have received disturbing information about one of the girls.
I haven't questioned her, but I believe she has a child and is not married.
- What? Is she a whore?
- I don't hire--
- I don't hire women who sell themselves.
- Of course you don't. I apologize.
It's just, I don't want our ladies to be exposed to corruption.
I suggest dismissal.
- I trust your judgment.
- Thank you.
Fantine, come with me, please. Come on.
She's caught the tart.
Please don't let me go now, madame.
My little girl is sick.
You read it in that Ietter from the people who take care of her.
They write that she's got the military fever.
They need 40 francs for medicine, or she'll die in a week.
Who are these people, the Thnardiers?
Are they relatives?
No, not relatives.
You deliberately left your child with strangers to conceal her?
You're dismissing me for having a child--
Not for having a child... but for having a child out of wedlock and pretending to be an honest woman.
I have to earn money to feed her.
How can I work and take care of her?
I have to lie.
You make it sound as though your lie is my fault.
No. I'm sorry. I'm upset.
I don't mean to argue, madame.
My Cosette is a sweet little girl, an innocent little girl.
Don't punish her for my sin.
I was stupid. I fell in love--
"In love." That is always the excuse.
Yes, you're right. I'm bad.
I'm a bad person.
But the Thnardiers are good people.
They have two daughters of their own.
My Cosette can play with them.
She won't be so lonely.
She's better off with them. Only I have to make money to pay for her medicine.
- Please. Just a month. I'll work hard.
- Monsieur cares about his workers.
He cannot have women of questionable morals influencing the girls.
I'm sorry.
What's going on?
Five sous for the chair.
Nice doing business with you.
- Are you skipping out?
- I sold it for extra money.
- You owe me a month's rent.
- Not till next week.
Pay now, or you're out. I've got people who want the room. Thirty francs.
- You got 50 in your hand.
- I'll give you 15. The rest next week.
How? They fired you.
Who told you I was fired?
- This is still a small town.
- I have a job.
- Don't lie.
- I start next week.
Everybody knows your story.
You've got a bastard kid.
Nobody's gonna give you work.
Please take half. I'll get you the rest.
Don't look so worried.
Things aren't that bad.
You've still got a bed.
Yes. Good hair quality. Ten francs.
Dear Reverend Mother... the bishop of Digne, may he rest in peace... often told me of your convent and its good works.
In his memory, I would like to give a--
Or "I should Iike"?
"Should" is preferable.
And "endow" is less brutal than "give."
- I should like to endow--
- Monsieur, there's been an accident!
One of the workers, Lafitte!
Breaking my-- Get me out!
- I can't breathe!
- Stand back. Let me through.
Help us. We need leverage.
Come on! Move! Quickly now!
Get me out! It's breaking my ribs!
- Get ready.
- Come on. Push! All together!
Come on.
- Marla, where's Claudette tonight?
- Good evening.
Oh, she's--
There are more than ever.
Oh. Inspector, you startled me.
Yes, I've counted four new girls.
You see, Captain, when a town grows, crime grows with it.
Shall I get the men? We'll make arrests.
- No. Did you check off the regulars?
- Yes.
- And I've noted the new girls.
- Good work.
- Is it 10:00? I didn't hear it ring.
- I'm early. I was restless.
- You heard about Lafitte and the cart?
- Heard nothing else.
Incredible feat. Has the mayor always been that strong?
Well, he's a big man.
But I didn't know he was that strong.
- Didn't he show it when he was young?
- I didn't know him when he was young.
Oh, that's right. He moved here.
Where's he from?
He came here from Paris, but that's not where he was born. I think he told--
Didn't you check his papers when he arrived?
I suppose I did. Don't remember.
Perhaps you didn't.
Why should you?
What about her?
- Who are you? Push off!
- Yeah, clear off.
Please.
Hi, dearie.
Yes, yes.
She's new.
Who is it?
I'm buying your horse and cart.
The doctor says your kneecap's broken.
You won't be able to do your old job.
I've taken the liberty of writing to the Sainte Marie Convent in Paris.
The sisters need a new caretaker and gardener.
I'm sorry. I'm so sorry.
Sorry for what?
Monsieur, I used to--
I was angry at you... because when you came here, you were a worker like me... and you grew rich while I had troubles.
We've all had troubles, Lafitte, and we all need help from time to time.
Rest, and I'll let you know when I've word from the convent.
"Thank you... for our... new c--"
C-A-R-E--
- Caretaker. That's it. Caretaker.
- Excuse me.
Inspector Javert is here to see you.
Tell him to wait.
I have exciting news, Monsieur le Maire.
Paris is interested in my plan.
- What plan is that?
- It's in the letter.
Why don't you tell me?
You said it's your plan.
I forgot. I apologize.
- Apologize for what?
- I forgot, you don't read.
Your clerk mentioned it.
Neglected your education to make your fortune, I suppose.
What is Paris interested in?
I'm all ears.
Because of Vigau's extraordinary growth during the past five years...
I've proposed that we make a detailed census.
Well, that would be interesting.
But how is it a police matter?
Modern law enforcement demands modern methods, and that means information.
For example: How many people have moved here in the last decade?
Where did they come from?
What's their background?
Is our criminal population homegrown, or are they outsiders?
Without information we cannot know how to control the dangerous elements.
- You might be making a mistake.
- What mistake is that?
Sometimes people move to a new town to start with a clean slate.
You might be doing more harm than good by prying into their private lives.
An honest man has nothing to fear from the truth.
For example, Paris knows... that my father was a thief... and my mother, a prostitute.
If my mother or father were to move here to Vigau...
I would want everyone to know who and what they are.
- Even if they had reformed themselves?
- Reform is a discredited fantasy.
Modern science tells us that people are by nature Iawbreakers or law abiders.
A wolf can wear sheep's clothing... but he's still a wolf.
I was just thinking, Inspector, that you have been unlucky.
Unlucky? I don't understand.
Unfortunately, you've been assigned to a dull post.
You'd be happier in Paris... where everyone, either by nature or experience, is dishonest.
Indeed. But I'll see if I prefer Paris.
They've asked me to report to the deputy prefect to further explain my idea.
I'll be gone for four days.
We'll miss you. Good luck.
Thank you. And good-bye.
Inspector, one moment.
Please.
A f arewell gift.
You're offering me a gift?
Yes, Inspector. My papers.
Baptism certificate.
Passport.
Working papers from the Marseilles docks.
I want to get your census off on the right foot.
Pleasant journey, Inspector.
Move on. Have your papers ready.
It is Paris. We don't waste time here.
- Inspector Javert. Let me through.
- Papers. Move on.
Inspector Javerf, fhe prefecf was impressed by your proposal.
I expect him to approve a budget for your census within the month.
Thank you, sir. That's excellent news.
You are known in Paris now.
Your future is bright.
So I suggest you drop... this request for an investigation of the mayor.
Sir, I was a guard for a year in the quarries of Toulon.
I saw Jean Valjean perform the same feat of strength the mayor did with the cart.
The hard labor makes them incredibly strong.
Once I made the connection... once I was no longer dazzled by his wealth, I've grown more certain daily.
Now I recognize his f ace and voice,
I'm amazed I didn't know him right away.
- Well, Javert, I don't doubt that--
- Sir.
I'm prepared to denounce him.
Denounce him? Without proof?
If I force a trial, the evidence will be found.
If he showed you papers, and they were in order--
I checked the baptism certificate.
It's a copy.
Eleven years ago there was a fire at the parish.
The original records were destroyed. All his documents are based on that copy.
Your identification alone is not enough to subject the mayor of Vigau... to a trial.
File a report, and I'll recommend we investigate.
Sir, Jean Valjean is a thief.
It makes a mockery of our institutions to have a corrupt and depraved man... in charge of our industry and government.
I said file a report.
I'll investigate on this end, discreetly.
Do not denounce him without proof.
Be patient.
He's not going anywhere, is he?
"Madame... the ten francs a month we agreed on is no longer enough.
Cosette grows bigger by the minute.
She enjoyed her sixth birthday party and the new doll we bought her.
We love her, so we won't charge for her present.
But she needs a new coat and shoes.
We can't afford to pay for them.
And she eats more than both our daughters put together.
Beginning right away you must send 20 francs a month... or you'll have to fetch her.
Sincerely, Thnardier."
- So what's your answer?
- I can't move.
I don't have money to pay in advance for a room.
Am I a charity?
You haven't paid me in four months.
- I paid you.
- I have bills. I can't spread my Iegs.
Besides, it's not good business to rent to a whore. What about your necklace?
- That's worth something.
- No, not this. It's for my daughter.
You better come up with something.
I want ten francs, or you're out!
This time I want cash.
Good evening, monsieur.
My God, you're hideous.
- Well, how much?
- A franc.
- You're joking.
- Fifty sous.
- To screw a corpse?
- Come here.
She hasn't got a drop of blood in her veins!
Mademoiselle.
Mademoiselle, how about a sous?
I have a sous.
I have a sous to spend on you.
Let's give your tits a bit of color.
Now... how about something... to drink!
Something to drink!
Now down you go, tart.
Oh, she's mad!
She's attacking him!
Sir, this is a disturbance.
May I?
I'll take care of this.
That's enough!
It's not my fault! They started--
Go home!
- Be quick about it!
- Let's go.
Captain.
You asked me to tell you if he went too far.
Well, I've kept my mouth shut long enough.
Have her taken to the prison.
You'll get six months.
Six months? What about Cosette?
What'll happen to her?
- Who is Cosette?
- My daughter.
If I don't send the Thnardiers money, they'll turn her out.
- Is your daughter here in Vigau?
- No, sir. She lives with--
Then she's not my concern.
Inspector!
Inspector, please listen to my side.
I know I hit the gentleman.
I know I was wrong.
But do they have the right to put snow down my dress... especially when it's the only one
I have, and I need it for work?
I'm sorry. I don't mean to argue.
It won't happen again.
Inspector, please.
- Please be merciful.
- All right.
I've listened to your side.
You're still getting six months.
- The eternal fire can't change that.
- One moment.
It's you. You did this to me!
You fired me.
Slut! Come here!
- Let her go.
- What?
Let me explain. I was crossing the square when you arrested her.
I asked people, and they said it was the fault of the men who'd attacked her.
In f act, they should be under arrest.
Now that you've heard this new evidence,
I want you to release her.
He said I can go.
He is the mayor, isn't he?
I'll be going.
- I won't be any bother to anyone.
- Sergeant, who said she could go?
- I did.
- No, you don't.
I'm the final judicial authority in Vigau. She's innocent.
- She spat on you.
- She was upset. I forgive her.
She insulted you.
In front of my men, she defiled you.
- That's my concern, Inspector.
- No, sir. You are wrong.
You are the personification of order... morality, government-- in fact, the whole of society.
You don't have the right to forgive her for debasing all of us.
You don't have the authority to destroy justice.
I do.
Under Articles 9 and 11 of the criminal code, I can order her release.
Sergeant, she is free to go.
I cannot allow that, monsieur.
I was there. She attacked a man.
- The decision is mine. She is free.
- Not while I am in charge of this post!
Under Article 66, you are relieved of command until tomorrow morning.
You are dismissed, Inspector! Leave!
Now!
You're free to go.
Water.
I doubt she'll survive.
She talks continually about Cosette.
Who's that?
- Her daughter.
- She needs will to fight the infection.
Perhaps if the girl were with her--
I understand. Thank you, Doctor.
You'll need nurses. I can't arrange for them till morning. What about tonight?
I'll take care of her tonight.
Keep her body warm and her head cool.
Good night.
Why did the gossip bother you?
- You didn't have to fire me.
- Your clothes are damp.
- I have to get you some dry--
- It's all right.
There'll be no charge. You deserve it.
But I don't understand why you're being so kind.
I was preoccupied. I didn't know.
If you'd come straight to me, none of this--
You need to rest.
- You don't want a kiss?
- I want you to rest.
And don't worry.
I'll bring your daughter to you.
- You're going to the Thnardiers?
- No. I can't.
I'll send the money to bring Cosette here.
- She can't live with me.
- Of course she can.
She will.
She'll attend the school, and you won't have any more worries.
When you're better
I'll find work for you.
But you don't understand.
I'm a whore, and Cosette has no father.
She has the Lord.
He is her Father.
And you are His creation.
In His eyes you have never been anything but an innocent... and beautiful woman.
- You look better every day.
- Liar.
- Please.
- Thank you.
Fantine, look.
Is that Thnardier's handwriting?
- Yes.
- Is something wrong?
- Read it.
- I don't know how.
- Would you read it to me?
- Well, I'm-- I'm learning, myself.
We're a fine pair.
My clerk tells me this man can't bring
Cosette because you owe him money.
- I don't. I paid him.
- I've sent him money as well.
It's an obvious lie. He could've brought Cosette and been paid in person.
Then I'll go get her.
No, wait. Stay where you are.
It's all right.
There's no need.
He thinks you've come into money.
He's become a little greedy, that's all.
I've sent him what he's asked for, and extra, to bring Cosette.
She should be here in a few days.
How wonderful to see her.
- You must eat.
- Have your lunch.
What about you? Don't you eat?
'Our litfle lark, our darling Cosetfe... is eager to be with her mother, but she has a cough.
'Like my mummy's,' the sweet angel said.
The physician advises she's not well enough to travel now.
I'll bring her when she's stronger.
Meanwhile, the medicine is expensive... and the doctor's bills are criminal.
Fantine owes us another 50 francs."
- All right. I've heard enough.
- Do you want to dictate a reply?
No.
Instead, write this note for Fantine to sign:
"M. Thnardier... you will hand Cosette over to the bearer.
Regards."
I'll be leaving right away.
- Javert.
- I need to see you immediately.
- Alone.
- Thank you, Pierre.
I'm in a hurry, Inspector.
A serious-- A grave violation of the public trust has been committed.
An inferior has shown a complete lack of respect for the law.
- He must be exposed and punished.
- Who is the offender?
I am.
I slandered you, monsieur. I'm here to ask that you demand my dismissal.
Inspector, what are you talking about?
Resignation is honorable, and I don't deserve it.
I must be punished.
You treated me unjustly over the-- about the woman.
This time you must treat me justly.
You must dismiss me.
For what?
I denounced you to the Paris prefect of police.
- I swore that you were a convict.
- You said I was what?
A convict.
I had no proof.
Only a memory of this man, Jean Valjean, whom I guarded 20 years ago in prison.
I denounced you without a shred of evidence.
- You denounced me?
- Yes.
I was a fool. They told me I was wrong.
They said you couldn't be
Jean Valjean, and they were right.
I've just returned from Arras, where I saw the real Jean Valjean.
- The real Valjean?
- Yes.
Two weeks ago, a man called Carnot was arrested for poaching apples.
At the prison, a convict took one look at him and said, "I know this man.
We were in prison in Toulon
20 years ago.
He's Jean Valjean." I didn't believe it.
I went there to see for myself.
Well, there's no question.
Carnot is Valjean.
I apologize, monsieur.
I Iook at you now, and it's obvious you're not a convict.
You don't think I'm a convict?
Of course I don't.
I've seen Valjean with my own eyes.
I must've been out of my mind to think a great man like you could be a criminal.
- This man-- He admits to being Valjean?
- Of course not.
He pretends to be a half-wit who can't understand the charges.
Valjean has broken parole.
That calls for life imprisonment.
- When is the trial?
- Tomorrow.
- How long will it take?
- No more than an afternoon.
- Tomorrow.
- The evidence is overwhelming.
I returned so you could dismiss me and press charges for slander.
I must consider.
I was just on my way home.
Walk with me.
You are a stern man.
But you're honorable.
I want you to remain prefect.
- Monsieur le Maire, that's impossible.
- You've exaggerated your offense.
I've not exaggerated, monsieur.
I resented you.
I chafed at your authority.
And out of revenge I slandered you.
If a subordinate of mine had done that
I would have broken him.
You must punish me, monsieur, or my life will have been meaningless.
Blame me.
- You, Monsieur le Maire?
- I order you to forgive yourself.
Blame me for that mercy.
You will remain prefect.
Those are my orders.
Will you go get her today?
Yes. Tonight.
Is something wrong?
I'm going to do my best.
I'm going to get better for my girl.
But if He chooses to take me, will you look after Cosette? I have no right--
You and Cosette will always be safe with me.
I swear it.
- Is this the courthouse?
- Yes, sir.
Thank you.
- May I go in?
- I can't let you in. It's full.
It's full? There are no seats?
Jammed.
- We got two great cases.
- So I can't get in?
Not a chance.
Unless-- Unless monsieur is a public official.
There's a seat reserved for them right beside the judge.
Best seats in the house.
I'm the mayor of Vigau.
Gentlemen, will you be so kind as to remain seated... while m'lords, the judges, reexamine the prisoner's records.
Prisoner to remain standing at the bar.
- Monsieur le President.
- It is an honor.
- Welcome.
- Thank you.
Continue the examination.
You pretend to be simple.
So I give you a simple question to answer.
Are you or are you not the convict Jean Valjean?
In the first place--
- What was the first place?
- Answer the question.
You're wicked!
That's what I was going to say.
Only I forgot your name.
I'm a man who--
Oh, what's the word for it?
I'm one of those who doesn't eat every day.
I'm-- I'm hungry.
That's the word.
You've already been found guilty of poaching.
Answer the prosecutor's question.
Did he ask a question?
Are you or are you not Jean Valjean?
You say I was born in Faverolles.
That's very clever, telling me where I come from.
That's more than I know.
My-- My parents were tramps.
In view of the shrewdly contrived denials... of the accused, who is trying to pass himself off as an idiot...
I call the witness Brevet to the stand.
So ordered.
Brevet, I remind you... that what you say may destroy a man's life.
You must be absolutely certain of your testimony.
My memory is good.
The best thing I have.
The accused will rise.
- Do you recognize this man?
- Yeah.
I was the first to recognize him, so I ought to get credit.
Never mind who was first. Who is he?
That's Jean Valjean. We served
19 years together in prison.
He looks older, of course.
Looks stupider too.
That's probably age.
- I call the convict Lombard to stand.
- You may step down.
The accused should remain standing.
I repeat my warning. A man's life can be destroyed by your answer.
Do you recognize the accused?
I can't help but recognize him.
We did five years on one chain.
What's the matter with you, eh?
No "Hello"?
Eh? Did you miss me, eh?
Hello.
I call Bertin to the stand.
I warn you as well.
Your answer can ruin a man.
Do you recognize the accused?
Yeah. He's Jean Valjean.
May I address the court?
Yes, sir. Yes, certainly,
Monsieur le Maire.
Look at me. Do you recognize me?
I recognize you. You were an informer in
Toulon, and I see you're still a snitch.
Hello, Brevet. And you, Lombard.
Don't look at my f ancy clothes, at my scraped chin. Look at my eyes.
You called yourself "Godless", right?
You've got a scar on your left shoulder.
I gave it to you the night you tried to kill me, remember?
- When I pinned you over the stove.
- It is you.
Show the court your scar.
Bertin, in the hollow of your left arm, there's a date tattooed, 1789.
The year of the Revolution.
Show them.
I know these men, Monsieur le President, and they know me.
I am the man you want.
I am Jean Valjean.
- It's him!
- Oh, my God!
Monsieur le Maire, I know you to be a kind man, but this--
A kind man?
When I was in prison, I was as ignorant, mean and devious as these men. Not kind.
And I wish I could keep my mouth shut and let this poor wretch suffer for me.
But-- Continue with the investigation, monsieur.
You will find further proof that I am Valjean.
I need you in the office right away.
- You're back.
- I don't have the child yet.
- I'll be leaving in an hour. How is she?
- Cough's much worse.
There's more blood now. She's--
I think she's just holding on to see her daughter.
- Wait.
- I've an urgent message for Javert.
- I'll take it up.
- To be delivered by hand.
This is a special warrant from Arras.
I knew it.
Monsieur, you're back.
If something were--
I was just dreaming... about you.
- Don't excite yourself.
- And me.
And Cosette.
We were at her confirmation... and she looked so beautiful.
- Fantine, if something were--
- But then she didn't know me.
And I was crying.
I have to tell you something.
- I know...
- I won't be able--
I'm not going to live long.
Would you give this to her?
- I saved it for her.
- Yes.
- Could you give it to her, please?
- I'll give it to her.
She can come stay with you, can't she?
You will raise her, won't you?
Yes.
- I'll raise her.
- Promise me, monsieur.
I promise.
He lies so well, doesn't he?
He's had a lot of practice.
A lifetime of lies.
- Save me!
- It's all right.
He's not here for you.
Monsieur le Maire--
He isn't mayor anymore.
- Let me talk to you in private.
- Speak up. Don't mumble!
- I need a f avor.
- Come on! Speak up!
- Give me two days to fetch her child.
- Are you joking?
- I'll pay anything you want.
- Do you think I'm that stupid?
I think you do.
You must have laughed when you forgave me, generous and kind Mayor.
- I beg you--
- You'll not fetch things for your whore!
You're going back where you belong, and this bitch is going to jail.
Listen to me! You'll never see your daughter again! You're going to prison!
He can't save you.
He's a criminal.
Scum of the earth!
Get up!
It's a pleasure to see you again,
Valjean.
You killed her.
Where will you go, Valjean?
You don't have papers.
I'll find you.
She repented, didn't she?
- She made her peace with God.
- Yes, monsieur.
Are you a convict?
Is that true?
Yes.
- Where's the inspector?
- Inside.
Did you kill him?
That's a pity.
You'd better hit me hard enough to make a lump.
- Where is he?
- He left half an hour ago.
- On foot?
- On the wagon.
- Which way?
- The southern route.
- Commandeer the mail coach.
- Yes, sir.
Not you, Beauvais.
You two, go!
- Ask anybody. Everybody saw him leave.
- How much money did he take?
- He didn't take any.
- Show me the book.
I don't understand.
He transferred ownership.
To all the employees.
Shares have been apportioned by seniority.
He withdrew nothing for himself.
Quickly!
Faster! Come on!
Drive them there!
Whoa.
- Morning, Monsieur le Maire.
- Good morning.
- Whoa!
- Don't slow down. Give me the reins.
Come on!
We're going too fast, sir!
Hold on!
You're--
You're under arrest--
The whore-- who did she write to?
The address-- give it to me!
There you are, you little slut.
What took you so long?
- It's heavy.
- Don't let me hear you complaining.
You don't bring a sou.
The least you can do is clean the rooms!
I feed your greedy little mouth.
Do I get thanks?
No, I get smart answers.
Now get to work!
Finish those stockings or you'll get no supper. You have to earn your keep!
What do you want?
- A room, please.
- A room costs 20 sou.
I'll pay in advance.
Oh. Very well, monsieur.
My dear, my sweet, my precious--
- You've forgotten, haven't you?
- I've forgotten.
I do that, don't I?
I forget things.
- What have I forgotten?
- We've rented the regular room.
We've only got the wedding chamber left.
I'm sorry, monsieur, but that costs 40 sou.
- You want a meal?
- Bread and cheese.
Is that all?
There's rabbit stew.
- What's she knitting?
- Who?
Oh. She's making stockings for my daughters.
- She's not your daughter?
- Not that creature. No.
Why? Does she interest you?
Perhaps.
- What's her name?
- Cosette.
- What are they worth?
- The girl?
- The stockings.
- The stockings-- I don't know.
- You can buy the stockings.
- Probably 30 sou.
I'll buy them.
I'm paying for her time.
I want her to play.
Of course, you understand,
I meant 30 sou for each stocking.
Cosette, get up. Come on.
Get out of there.
Get out of there!
Get out!
You're working for me now.
You can rest or you can play.
What would you like?
Madame, is it true?
Am I allowed to play?
You heard, didn't you?
You must play!
Hurry up! Start playing.
Perhaps monsieur would like
Cosette to play on his lap?
I'm heading to Paris.
- Is there a mail carriage I can take?
- It's gone already.
Next coach to Paris arrives at dawn.
- You Iike our Cosette?
- I want to take her with me.
Monsieur, I have to tell you the truth.
I adore that child.
- You adore her.
- Yes, it's true.
I'm not rich. I've had to pay over 400 francs for her medicine.
But I'm a stupid man.
I have no sense, just a heart.
- A big heart.
- You paid over 400 francs.
Five hundred.
All right.
I want to leave right away.
I'm sorry, monsieur. But her mother gave her to us to protect.
- I can't let a stranger take her--
- How much?
This isn't a question of money.
- What right do you have to the girl?
- You don't want money?
Of course not.
I mean--
Even if you offered 1000 or 1200 francs.
I couldn't give her to you.
True, I owe 1500 francs.
My whole life would be solved if only I had 1500 francs, but--
I can't think about money.
It's a question of law.
All that matters is:
- Who has a right to the child.
- That's a relief.
Here's a letter from Cosette's mother authorizing me to take her.
Cosette, quick!
Do we have to walk all the way to Paris?
- Yes. Are you tired?
- No, monsieur. I'm all right.
Cosette, best not to call me "monsieur."
People will think we're strangers.
Then what shall I call you, monsieur?
Well, what about "papa"?
But you're not my father, monsieur.
Are you?
Want me to carry you?
I can reach the branches!
You're the tallest lady in France.
- I'm the queen of France.
- That's right.
You're the queen of France.
You're the queen, Cosette.
Have your papers out and ready to be inspected.
Wake up. This is Paris.
Form an orderly queue and have your papers ready!
You! Keep in line back there!
Have your papers out and ready for inspection!
Let these carriages through.
We must get here.
Have your papers out and ready for inspection.
Listen. Wait here.
I won't be long. All right?
Have your papers out and ready for inspection.
Don't leave me!
You have to be quiet.
I'm just having a look at the wall.
- I'm not leaving you.
- Are we gonna climb that wall?
Yes.
All right?
Papa! But you told me to call you papa.
You! Where are your documents?
- No luck yet.
- He's on foot.
The little girl would slow him down.
Well, Javert... you said he was Valjean, and we ignored you.
Rather than apologize...
I want you to know that I've asked the prefect to transfer you to Paris... to work as my deputy.
Monsieur, I'm honored.
Thank you.
Meanwhile, these men are at your disposal to find Valjean.
All right, Cosette.
Give me your doll.
Now, climb on my back.
Come on. Here.
Put your foot here.
That's it. Big jump.
That's a girl. All right.
- Papa, I'm frightened.
- Don't look down.
- Of course he won't.
- Pardon me?
- He won't what?
- Have your papers ready.
I want three of you in each direction to walk around the wall.
Look for a narrow gap where someone could jump onto a roof.
- Go!
- I don't understand.
He has no proper papers, sir.
He won't come through here.
- Watch here.
- Yes, sir.
Stay down!
We'll have to cross here.
Shut up! Do you want to get us killed?
I'm sorry. It's all right.
I'm sorry.
But we have to be quiet.
This is the only place we can get over.
Listen to me. We have to jump.
Come on. Take my hand.
- What's on the other side of this wall?
- It's a convent.
I'm not going to wake up a building full of nuns... who are terrified of men and search their beds!
- It's for their protection.
- This is a strict order.
They're not permitted to look at a man much less speak to him!
It's a boarding school for girls.
They must be protected.
The girls are daughters of the aristocracy... whose parents will kiss your feet if you are right... and have you guillotined if you are wrong!
I know he's in there.
What? Who are you?
Now I'm trapped under the cart,
Lafitte.
If you would collect all the nuns and schoolgirls and take them to the chapel.
Then my men could search everywhere and you wouldn't be in danger.
We're not afraid of men.
We're here to adore Christ.
- I can't protect you out here.
- A search of our grounds... our school or our convent is impossible.
I'm sorry, Inspector.
I've told the Mother Superior you're my brother.
- You'll be the new gardener.
- Good.
Thank you.
Tomorrow can you arrange for her to go to school here?
- I can pay.
- Who is she?
She's an orphan.
She'll be with me now.
- Pity.
- What?
I was thinking of next year, when it will be Cosette's turn.
Is it a pity to be devoted to Christ?
A beautiful nun is a tragic waste.
Well, even though Cosette will be stuck here... at least you can see the world.
Or Paris anyway.
Aren't you curious?
You haven't been outside now in how many years?
The world never changes.
It is changing.
You should have a look for yourself.
You'll be surprised.
- What are you looking at?
- I'm just watching the people go by.
- I don't want to take my vows.
- Your promised the Mother Superior.
- I want to leave. Please.
- But we're safe here.
- Safe from what?
- We have everything we need.
I can work here.
I can be near you.
- We have a good life here.
- Please, Papa.
I'll think about it.
I'm very grateful for everything you've done for us, Reverend Mother.
But my daughter's happiness is what's most important to me.
Naturally, I'm disappointed
Cosette has changed her mind.
But I, too, want to see her happy.
Thank you.
We shall leave as soon as I can find a suitable home.
I was wondering--
I don't know anyone in Paris.
If you could help me find a house in a decent area--
Lafitte, how could you afford such a house?
Before we came here, I had money-- family money-- that I saved... to help provide for us.
Well, I hope you're certain that you've made the right decision.
I am.
Look, Papa.
- I shan't be long.
- I'll wait here.
- All right. But don't leave the cab.
- I'll stay put.
I'll be back soon.
Ma'am, have you got any money?
Why not?
Because it's against the law to strike.
The king has declared that everything is a crime.
Writing is a crime.
Two weeks ago police destroyed the galit-- the workers' newspaper.
They smashed the press.
That man making the speech--
He's the leader of the A.B.C. Society-- the largest and most dangerous of the student groups.
They want the king out.
They want suffrage without limitation.
I don't care what they want.
I want to know who they are.
- Speaking out is a crime.
- Marius Pontmercy.
- Rents a room above the Cafe Musain.
- Being poor is the worst crime of all.
If you commit these crimes, you are condemned for life.
Concentrate on him.
Our government has no mercy, no pity, no forgiveness.
- And it has no work for us!
- And there's no work.
And because there is no work our children are starving.
Tell me, why are we powerless to save the people we love?
Tell me why!
- The king lied!
- The king betrayed us.
We were promised the vote.
Do we have the vote?
Where is the republic our f athers died for?
- Where?
- Here!
It's here, my brothers.
It lives here in our heads.
But most of all... best of all... it lives in our hearts.
We are the republic!
Where have you been?
I told you not to leave the cab.
I was just going out for some air.
- Who's that?
- I don't know.
- He was making a speech in the street.
- Come.
We're going home.
Thank you.
Thank you.
You again. I looked this time.
I'm sure you weren't at mass.
I was, Father!
- Get out of the line!
- Mademoiselle, they won't let us in.
It's all right, Father.
Let them through.
- We made extra today.
- How are you, Gavroche?
Thank you. No one is as kind and beautiful as you--
Gavroche, you're such a convincing liar.
I fear for your mortal soul.
- Who are your little friends?
- Not friends. Theses are my babies.
I found them wandering the street.
Don't I make a good f ather?
You'd make a better f ather, Gavroche, with a real coat.
Wait a moment.
My friend wants to know if you'll take a walk in the park with him.
Here you are. Bring your babies back tomorrow and I'll give them jackets.
- Thank you, sir.
- Thank you.
He never leaves her alone.
He's not a f ather. He's a jailer.
Go on. Here they come.
- Go.
- Come on, boys. Hurry up.
Let's go home.
May we go for a walk?
It's so sunny and mild.
I'm tired.
Would you read to me in the garden?
Why don't you go lie down?
I'll go for a walk.
- Alone?
- I'm going have to walk alone someday.
Someday, not today.
- Why don't you sit in the fiacre--
- Stop playing games!
- I'm not playing games.
- Are you disobeying me?
I'm your father! Get in.
It's Thursday.
Madame Toussaint made your f avorite dessert.
What do you say, Cosette?
Strangers can be dangerous.
Will that be all?
Will that be all?
Yes, thank you, Toussaint.
- You're not, you know.
- Pardon?
You're not my father.
That is, you never said you were until you became so angry today.
That was the very first time you said it.
- Yes. You're right.
- Well?
Are you my f ather?
I promised your mother
I'd take care of you.
I know you think I worry too much.
- But strangers can be--
- All right!
- What's the matter?
- I don't want to hear that speech again!
I know there's something shameful.
It must be me.
- My child, no!
- Or you!
You're the shameful secret.
Maybe both of us. It doesn't matter.
I can't go out or talk to people--
- Stop this, Cosette.
- I think you're lying.
I know the secret.
You want me here with you all the time-- night and day... because you're lonely, and you want me to be alone forever!
You're right. I'm not a f ather.
I don't--
I just want to protect you, that's all.
The world isn't a safe place, believe me.
You're the only person I have.
This is the only way
I know how to do it. I'm sorry.
- It's all right.
- Come. Have your meal.
- I won't be long.
- Fine.
Toussaint will save it.
- Hello.
- Hello.
- What's your name?
- Marius.
- And yours?
- I'm Cosette.
I have something for you.
Thank you.
I can warm up your soup.
I'm coming.
I'll be here... tomorrow night, outside.
See you tomorrow.
Any guns?
- Maybe this is moving too f ast.
- Revolutions should always be rushed.
Progress doesn't have time to waste.
But this is pathetic.
Two weeks, what have we got?
Barely enough guns for ourselves.
Then we'll do what revolutionaries have always done:
- Tear up the streets and throw stones.
- Come on, Marius! Throw stones?
They won't attack with sticks!
Well?
We have two kegs of gunpowder stored in the back room. Guns are another story.
- Is there a plan?
- No one can agree when to make a move.
They argue about whether the people are ready.
- But the truth is, they're scared.
- These puppies seem harmless.
We should move you to another group.
Thank you.
What about this Marius?
Anything on him?
He's in love. But he has to go to the square... to the food tent, to get a glimpse of his beloved.
- Who is the father?
- I know you like me to be thorough.
So I checked.
He's behind the charity.
I didn't find out much, only his name:
Lafitte.
You know him?
I don't think so.
Aren't we going for our walk?
Not tonight, Papa.
I want to finish my book.
But we missed it last night, and you've been in all day.
- You need your exercise, my dear.
- I'm too tired.
- Are you all right?
- Yes, of course.
I have my book, and Toussaint is here.
Good night, my dear.
Your letter was beautiful.
It was really beautiful.
- Tell my everything.
- Everything? About what?
About you.
There's nothing to tell.
I'm a very simple girl.
I live a very simple life.
I grew up in a convent with other girls, of course.
My father lived there too.
My f ather's a very good man.
I grew up in his love.
His love was my home, if you know what I mean.
And then I met you.
And what about you?
- You're a genius, aren't you?
- Genius.
I'm a poor student... no brighter or smarter than anyone else.
Your speech was wonderful.
I didn't breathe while you talked.
I was afraid I'd miss a word.
This week was the same as last-- every night?
Inspector, they're in love.
It's perfectly nauseating.
She sneaks out the door, and they're together till dawn.
They even stay out there when it rains.
I haven't caught the gun supplier.
I've caught pneumonia.
- And the father knows nothing?
- This, too, isn't a surprise.
I admit the whole experience has disillusioned me.
I certainly don't plan on having any children.
Especially not a daughter.
Can I be reassigned?
Perhaps I could infiltrate some nice anarchists.
- With a roof over their heads.
- Yes, I'll handle this.
You're relieved.
Take two days off and report to me.
- You'll be reassigned.
- Thank you.
Just out of curiosity, sir, what are you going to do?
From what you've said, M. Lafitte is respectable and well-off.
- Yes.
- A little softhearted perhaps.
But a churchgoer--
Ioving f ather and so on.
Absolutely. The whole neighborhood speaks well of him.
He deserves to know his daughter's been seduced by a dangerous radical.
Toussaint, leave your cooking, and come sit in the garden.
It's a glorious day.
- There's someone here to see you.
- Who is it?
- Insp--
- It doesn't matter.
Inspector Javert, from the police.
- Could you w--
- I'll wait.
- Who was that?
- That wa--
- Yes?
- Was a gardener.
- But why say you're away?
- There's no time to explain.
Tell him I've gone away for a week.
If he asks questions about your past... say you have a headache and excuse yourself.
- All right? No details.
- You're frightened.
No. Please, just go.
Try not to be nervous.
He'll sense it.
Stay calm and composed.
My father instructed Madame Toussaint to say he's out when he's on a trip... so no one will know when there's two helpless women here by ourselves.
Isn't it ridiculous that he worried about it with you-- a police inspector?
- When will he return?
- Oh, a week.
Hard to say.
I'm going to leave him this note.
Do you have an envelope?
Right here.
I knew a Lafitte.
Where did your people come from?
Here. Paris.
Probably no relation.
This is for your f ather's eyes alone.
And I'd appreciate it if you gave him the letter yourself.
What a horrible man.
How do you know him?
- There's no feeling in his eyes.
- What does this mean?
"Your daughter has been seduced... by a dangerous radical named Marius Pontmercy.
She betrays you every night!"
- I don't know.
- Don't lie to me!
Have you given yourself to this person? Is it true?
- Do you see him every night?
- Go ahead! Hit me!
Is that why I should tell you-- because you'll hit me?
Tell me the truth!
How dare you ask for the truth when you only tell me lies?
Why does a policeman frighten you out of your wits?
Who is he? Who are you?
You don't understand.
You've ruined me.
You've ruined us.
You're right. I don't understand.
How can I when you won't tell me the truth?
What is it?
Who are you?
All right. I'm not going to lie.
It's true. I love Marius.
I'm not ashamed.
I only have a corner of a bench to be with him.
But that corner is mine.
It's my life.
Is that what's going to ruin us?
Please tell me what this is all about, Papa.
Please.
Please tell me what is it.
Please.
What is it?
I--
I am a convict.
When I was young... just your age...
I was very poor.
I was starving.
One day I stood in front of a window.
A window full of bread.
There was just glass between me... and not being hungry anymore.
It was so easy.
So I broke it... and took what I wanted.
Then they caught me... and put me in chains for almost 20 years.
They did things to me--
I can't tell you about it.
And I did things, there in jail.
Terrible things.
I became an animal.
They took my dignity.
They took everything from me.
Inspector, where do you want me tomorrow?
Should I go back to the Cafe Musain?
Not right away.
Mingle with the crowd at the square.
- See where it takes you.
- All right.
Lafitte-- the softhearted gentleman-- did you find out about his background?
Yes, sir.
He's from Vigau, born and raised.
Lafitte and his daughter Cosette lived there until ten years ago.
- You didn't say her name was Cosette!
- You didn't ask.
- No one here, sir.
- The place is empty, sir.
No one and nothing.
Clean as a whistle.
He moves fast.
Yes, he does.
But there's a way to find him.
- Marius, have you seen my babies?
- Not now.
Not tonight. We have to plan tomorrow's action.
Tomorrow we're not having an action.
We're having a revolution.
We can't tolerate this! We can't allow the king to bury Lamarque as his hero!
- I promise. One hour.
- No!
Marius, this is not a game!
- Tomorrow you have to mean it!
- I mean it.
- Do you?
- Yes. We'll plan tactics when I return.
When these bastards try to bury Lamarque we'll bury them instead.
You hurry back.
After tomorrow you can make love to her as a free man.
Maybe.
"Go to 18 Rue De I'Ouest."
Why?
He has to leave, and I have to go with him.
- What's wrong?
- His life is at stake.
- His life? How?
- It's a secret.
I can't give it away.
I was an orphan. He saved me.
He gave me everything I have.
I can't leave him right now.
- That means I'll never see you again.
- Listen!
I know what we can do.
We'll talk to him.
He'll understand. He'll agree.
You can come with us to England!
England? Cosette, are you crazy?
Tomorrow we're going to fight!
We're going to restore the republic!
I can't run away now!
Why do you have to go to England?
Why now?
Why do you have to go now?
He needs me.
He took care of me, and now he needs me.
I understand.
Marius, please.
Don't be sad.
When do you Ieave?
Tomorrow. We can leave Paris because of Lamarque's funeral.
He's not sure. He said we might leave the next day.
I'll be here tomorrow night.
Promise me you'll meet me here.
Well, it's obvious we have them outnumbered.
There are 24, 000 troops in the city... and they can be reinforced by another 30,000 in two days.
So the question is where to deploy them.
My informers tell me the most critical moment... is when Lamarque's funeral procession passes through the square.
That's where they'll start the fighting.
Well, we won't fight them for every inch.
We'll surround them.
It's frightening, Papa.
Why are they so angry about this?
Because Lamarque was a hero who fought for the republic.
Why is the king giving Lamarque a state funeral?
He's trying to claim Lamarque as his own hero.
It's a lie.
It's the final insult.
That's why they're angry.
Long live the republic!
- Lamarque is ours!
- Jump on!
Lamarque is our hero!
Come on, everybody! Pull!
Long live the republic!
To the barricades!
Get out!
Javert, your information is as good as gold.
But the idiots of the municipal guard... ignored your advice about the arsenal.
Javert, why are you dressed like that?
Because I'm on the trail of someone who's very dangerous.
It will be an important arrest, sir.
Possibly the most important of my career.
Indeed. Who is it?
I'd rather not say until I've got him.
Well, at the very least, show me where you're going.
Past the perimeter. Here.
There are dozens of barricades in this part of the city.
Anything could happen.
We have no control in this area.
It's under control, sir.
As soon as it's dark we'll go through the barrier. Hundreds are fleeing.
Police don't care who leaves. They're more concerned about people coming in.
So it's a perfect opportunity.
Cosette, please!
How bad is the fighting?
I didn't go anywhere near it.
I went the other way.
- What are they saying?
- No one really knows what's happening.
The streets are full of barricades, and everyone says something different.
Whatever the truth is, a lot of people will die tonight.
Is it too dangerous for us to wait here until the morning?
You saw the barricades.
I promised I'd wait.
Even if he can't come,
I have to wait.
- It hurts this much?
- I'm sorry.
I've known him for only a few weeks.
That's what you're thinking.
That I'm only a silly girl, that he's little more than a stranger.
But that's not how I feel.
I understand.
I do.
Papers.
Right.
Marius, not tonight.
One hour. I'll be gone one hour.
- I found my boys!
- Well done, Gavroche.
The law is here to protect you, Cosette... from criminals like this scum.
Is Valjean here? Is he alone?
I'll never tell you anything.
Do you know who and what you're protecting?
Didn't he tell you he's really just a common thief?
- I know who he is.
- Oh, yes? Did he tell you who you are?
Did he tell you you're a bastard child?
Did he tell you your mother was a whore?
Give it to me. You'll be breaking the law. There'll be no turning back.
Who are you?
Chief Inspector Javert.
If you surrender now, things will go better for you and her.
Surrender? I'm taking you to f ace the people's justice.
At the barricades?
You fool. Don't you know your revolution has no chance?
If we die, you die with us.
Good-bye, Marius.
I love you, Cosette.
Go on!
He came to say good-bye.
He loves me, Papa.
Take her to our old house.
It's going to be all right.
I promise you.
So here we are.
I was right.
You know him?
When we have a spare bullet, we're going to kill him.
What are you doing here?
Where's Cosette?
Waiting for you in the house where you fell in love.
- Go to her.
- I can't.
- Go to her.
- Not now.
She's your future.
If we can't win here, then none of us have a future.
You have love.
That's the only future God gives us.
Go.
Gavroche! Get back!
- I need bullets!
- Gavroche! Get back here!
Come back!
- Get back here!
- Gavroche! Come back!
Papa!
- Let's do it now.
- You proud of your work?
You're next.
Let me do it.
You kill him in the alley.
We don't want his blood in here with ours.
A knife. That's right.
- It suits you better.
- Why, Javert?
Why couldn't you leave me alone?
I'm nothing! I'm no one!
Yes. But you've managed to beat me.
I'm not trying to beat you!
- I want to live in peace!
- Then hurry up and do it.
Your friends need you.
That way, through the gate.
You'll be safe.
- You're going to shoot me in the back.
- I'm letting you go.
You'd better hurry.
They won't be merciful.
Go on.
You should kill me.
I won't stop.
Understand?
I won't let you go.
You should end this.
Kill me.
You're dead, Javert.
- Everybody, get back!
- Move it on through!
On the back wall there!
Surrender, men!
- Surrender!
- Surrender or be shot!
Stand.
Turn and follow me!
You men in there, take that doorway!
Come on. Do it! Jump!
Let's be quick about it!
Long live the republic!
- You two, look on the roof.
- Yes, sir.
Get some ladders. Hurry!
- This way.
- He's smarter than that.
He'll go downhill to the river.
Come on.
It's all right.
It's all right. Come on.
Come on. Help me.
You must help me.
Push.
Is he alive?
Careful.
- He needs a doctor.
- To make him healthy for a firing squad?
Come on, Javert. You know there'll be an amnesty in a few days.
- It's me you want.
- Yes.
Arrest me. Let him go.
- Is that all you care about?
- You've caught me.
That's what you care about.
Let him take the boy where he wants.
Then bring him back here to me.
He'll live. Toussaint--
- Find a doctor.
- Yes, monsieur.
Take some money.
Promise him any amount he wants.
- Yes, monsieur.
- Go!
I promised I would give you this.
It was your mother's.
She was a good woman.
I Ioved her, Cosette.
I've told you everything.
Take care of him. Live a happy life.
I made an arrangement, my dear.
I have to go.
- Promise me you'll be happy.
- No! Not like this, Papa!
This is right, my dear.
I stole something. I did.
I stole happiness with you.
I don't mind paying.
Go to him.
He's your life now.
Bring him here.
That is an important memo for the prefect.
It will explain what I've done with the prisoner.
Make sure he sees it before breakf ast.
I'm glad I had time to myself.
I needed to think... about what you deserve.
You're a difficult problem.
- Move to the edge.
- Why aren't you taking me in?
You're my prisoner.
Do what I tell you!
You don't understand the importance of the Iaw.
I've given you an order.
Obey it.
Why didn't you kill me?
I don't have the right to kill you.
But you hate me.
I don't hate you.
I don't feel anything.
You don't want to go back to the quarries, do you?
Then for once we agree.
I'm going to spare you from a life in prison, Jean Valjean.
It's a pity the rules don't allow me to be merciful.
I've tried to live my life without breaking a single rule.
You're free.
[Thunder Rumbling]
[Panting]
[Thunderclap]
God save the Queen!
[Man] "I have sent for a Mr John Brown from Balmoral.
"Her Majesty has mentioned him on one or two occasions...
"as being a most devoted outdoor servant to Prince Albert...
"during his last days there.
"The depths of the Queen's sorrow remain impenetrable.
"She has now restricted herself to a regime...
"of such ferocious introspection...
"that we are all at our wits' end.
"The household continues at her instruction...
"to observe the rituals now so familiar to her.
"in a vain attempt to render vivid...
"that which can never be revived.
"Family and staff expend all their efforts...
"in endeavouring to draw her out of this state of unfettered morbidity,
"but to no avail.
"We must hope, therefore, that this Mr Brown...
"would appeal to the Queen's...
"sentimental though deeply held view...
"that all Highlanders are good for the health.
[Gasping]
Sorry, ma'am.
"He is arriving with the Queen's pony this afternoon,
"by which time it is hoped Her Majesty will be in a fit state...
"to consider riding out.
"As to that decision, along with all others,
"we remain, as ever,
"prisoners of the Queen's grief.
Ever your devoted husband,
Henry."
Windsor.
Congratulations,
Your Royal Highness.
- Boy, I hear.
- Yes.
- Excellent. Excellent.
- Albert Victor.
"Eddie" for short.
- What do you think?
- A fine choice, sir.
Excellent.
How many?
The royal family and senior members of the household, ma'am.
- Just those?
- Yes, ma'am.
[Bell Chiming]
[Silverware Clinking]
[Clock Ticking]
[Clearing Throat]
We're expecting Brown this afternoon, ma'am.
Whom?
That's a very pretty shawl you're wearing, Alex.
The colour suits you well.
But you're not eating enough.
One must not let vanity overrule one's appetite.
Yes, ma'am.
[Horses Whinnying In Stable]
We were due at a quarter past 1:00. You're late.
Her Majesty's routine at Osborne House is not as you will remember it.
The household remains in full mourning, and no one is permitted to raise their voice under any circumstance whatsoever.
The Queen breakfasts at 9:30, lunches at 2:00, takes tea at 5:30 and dinner at 8:45.
No one's allowed to leave the building while the Queen is at home.
On rare occasions when she's out, you may ask permission to leave, but only with my consent.
You're to be ready to walk the pony at any time after 10:00.
You'll clean the Queen's outdoor things... and do any odd jobs as and when she requires.
How will I know?
I'm sorry?
- How will I know what the Queen requires?
- You'll be sent a message.
- And who will bring it to me?
- Her Highness's equerry.
I'll need a man who knows where I am.
- Oh, I don't think it'd be difficult to find you.
- That's not good enough.
- Then we'll have to see what can be arranged.
- Aye. Do.
As I'm sure you'll remember from Balmoral, you do not speak while in Her Majesty's presence, unless Her Majesty addresses you directly.
Mr Brown, ma'am.
Mr Brown is here, ma'am.
- Mr Brown.
- Ma'am.
- You're here safely?
- Aye, ma'am.
- You are well?
- I am.
- And the pony?
- She's well too.
Your family sent cards.
It was much appreciated.
I'm glad of it.
My husband was always very complimentary in speaking of you.
He would have approved, I'm sure, of my calling on you in this way.
I trust it does not inconvenience you too much.
I have no family, ma'am.
Only my brothers and sisters.
Yes.
You have a brother in service here, do you not?
- I forget his name.
- Archie.
Yes.
That will be company for you.
Yes.
[Gasps]
Honest to God, I never thought to see you in such a state.
You must miss him dreadfully.
You do not...
He...
Get him out!
Get him out of here!
Get him out!
Get him out!
So, the day they arrived, she greets the sultan and his family with barely a word and retires to her chamber.
Now, the sultan, he's not used to state occasions without a head of state, and he's standing in the lobby waiting for someone to tell him what to do.
But the court is under strict instructions not to talk in the corridor, so nobody speaks to him, not a living soul, for the whole afternoon.
So now it's dinner, and everyone's standing around the table, still not a word, waiting for Her Majesty to arrive.
One hour goes by, two.
The sultan is getting a wee bit peckish, to say the least.
Finally, his wee laddie breaks for the cold meats and stuffs a slice in his mouth.
Oh, the uproar when she heard.
- You'd have thought somebody had stolen the crown jewels.
- So?
[Sighing] So there are rules.
Things you do and don't do.
All I did was tell the woman how I feel, for God's sake.
- You don't tell Her Majesty how you feel.
- I speak as I find, Archie.
Not down south you don't.
- So, what did Ponsonby do when she started shouting?
- [Slams Drawer Shut]
[Sighing]
I thought he nearly ruptured his truss.
Prince Leopold? Now isn't he the one who sits around bleedin' all day?
So what does his valet do?
Bring out his bandages for him?
It's better than shovelling horseshit.
Now, if it's promotion you're after, you should've picked one of the healthier ones.
She's hardly a full hamper herself.
It's only grief that's made her that way.
Three years, John? Is that not a bit long to be grieving?
- She loved him.
- Come on, man.
- There's love. Then there's...
- What?
- [Pitcher Thuds]
- You know what I mean.
I don't think I do, Archie.
There's love, and there's behaving like you do... because there's nobody to tell you not to.
So, which one of us was she flirtin' with?
The good-looking one.
Obviously doesn't have enough to do.
You work the system right, you could ask her yourself.
Just be thankful you're not working for the household.
The Queen never lets them out of her sight.
But wee spats like us can slip through the net easy.
I'm no wee spat, Archie.
[Laughing]
[Maid]
Don't just stare at him.
[Neighing]
Who is that?
- It's Mr Brown, ma'am.
- What is he doing there?
He appears to be standing by his horse, ma'am.
I made no request to go out riding today.
How long has he been there?
I don't know, ma'am.
He was observed earlier, I believe.
Sir Henry, Mr Brown is standing in the courtyard.
- I've no wish to go riding.
- I'm very sorry, ma'am.
I can't imagine...
He was certainly given no instructions.
Please make sure it does not happen again.
Of course. At once.
- What on Earth did you think you were doing?
- Awaiting my orders.
You do not report for duty unless the Queen requests of it.
You know that very well.
I didn't come all this way to sit on my arse.
You'll await your orders like everyone else... unless you prefer a repeat of yesterday's little excitement.
No.
I beg your pardon?
I thought I made myself perfectly clear.
You do not leave your room until Her Majesty requests it.
You tell Her Majesty from me... if her husband was here today, he'd have her outta the house... and gettin' some air into her.
What the hell's the point of me bein' here otherwise?
Go inside at once.
Is that the Queen's request?
Yes. It most certainly is.
[Clicks Tongue]
- [Horse Neighing, Whinnying]
- Mr Brown?
Yes, ma'am?
You have been told repeatedly not to stand in the courtyard... unless requested to do so.
Yes, ma'am.
Then why do you persist in doing it?
Because I believe
Her Majesty's wrong.
If ever a poor soul needed some fresh air, it's her.
The Queen will ride out if and when she chooses.
And I intend to be there when she's ready.
Prince Albert was going to build a bench here.
He thought it one of the best views in Osborne.
Aye, it's a fine spot, ma'am.
He thought so, yes.
In everything I do and everything I say,
I try to think as much as possible... what he would do or say if he were here now.
My private secretary wishes me to return to public duties.
If Prince Albert was here, he'd tell him a thing or two.
Sir Henry's not alone.
They all wish it.
The same people who refused to grant my husband the title of "King"... because he was deemed of insufficient rank.
I have some letters in my saddlebag.
I'd like to read them.
I cannot read them like that.
You will hand them to me as I require.
[Chattering]
[Chattering Stops]
Mr Carter, the head butler, sits there.
Not any more he doesn't.
This is my place.
- By whose authority?
- My own.
The order of seating at the upper servants' table... is arranged personally by the Queen herself.
Now that's a tautology, lad.
If you say the Queen has arranged something, there's no need to say she's done it personally.
It's understood.
- [Murmuring]
- [Man] Thank you.
And you're the Queen's dresser,
I believe.
Assistant, sir. Yes.
- What's your name?
- Mary Taylor, sir.
Have I seen you up at Balmoral, Mary?
I hope to go up next year.
Tell me, Mary. What is the Queen reading for recreation these days?
Lord Tennyson, sir.
[Murmuring Stops]
Ah!
Am I the only one eating?
Lord Clarendon arrives by invitation at 11:00, followed at 12:00 by a picnic on the grounds to celebrate
Princess Alice's birthday.
The chancellor writes to say that by happy coincidence, he will be in Cowes this weekend, and he asks if Your Majesty might grant him an audience.
Why?
He thought, perhaps, Your Majesty might wish to be informed... of the latest developments in government.
No, I shall be out walking.
Then, perhaps, Your Majesty might consider it opportune... if the Prince of Wales were to meet him on your behalf.
On no account.
Mama, I really do think it's time we made ourselves a little more...
[Clears Throat] available.
I think we must accept... that our position in the country is not entirely unrelated... to the continued absence of the monarchy from public life.
I thought, perhaps, we might consider a small gesture of some kind.
- Gesture?
- I thought a dinner for our ambassadors, perhaps.
No dinners, Bertie.
Why are you dressed for outdoors?
- It's so infernally cold in here.
- Cold is good.
Is that not so,
Dr Jenner?
[Gasping]
Uh, I'm sorry, ma'am.
- Cold is good!
- Oh, excellent, ma'am. Excellent.
But perhaps if Her Majesty... were to consider accompanying her newfound physical vigour... with the benefits of mental activity.
Why am I being lectured in this way?
- Oh, forgive me, Your Majesty.
- I will not tolerate anybody lecturing me...
- about the responsibility of monarchy.
- Mother.
Least of all my son!
It was his irresponsibility that drove my husband to his grave!
If it is inconvenient to Her Majesty, then perhaps she might consider allowing the Prince of Wales...
Would you believe they sent me so many boxes to taunt me?
Dr Jenner writes that my nerves are in an extremely fragile state, and yet they continue to hound me with box after box... after box after box after box.
[Sighing]
I wish to take the princesses for a swim.
The turns I have been taking in the grounds have proved most beneficial to me, and Brown thinks saltwater will do me good.
Don't putter, children. Swim!
You could buy that lot for garden ornaments... and still get change from ten guineas.
Lift your foot, woman!
[Brown] Walk on.
[Clicks Tongue]
[Man]
This nation is fortunate... insomuch as it is not governed by force... but by a chain of traditions... that have been cherished from generation to generation.
Because in them... in our traditions... are embodied all the laws that have enabled us to create... the greatest empire of modern time!
[Cheering]
And even though we have amassed great capital, and even though we have established an industry... with no parallel in the world.
Yet all these mighty creations... are as nothing... compared to the invisible customs... which shape our lives.
[Cheering]
To those honourable gentlemen of the opposition that seek to destroy... the essential elements of this country...
I say, let them remember...
England cannot begin again!
[Shouting]
Have you seen this?
Should we take it seriously?
- The cartoon, or Her Majesty's absenteeism?
- Well, both.
The question is:
Do we need her?
- Congratulations.
- Too kind. Thank you so much.
Thank you.
Surely you're not suggesting we dispense with the Constitution?
My dear Stanley, a prime minister with only a handful of friends... must respect public opinion.
- Congratulations, Prime Minister.
- Thank you.
Gossip counts.
Lord Aberdeen was right.
This country is not governed by wisdom but by talk.
Oh, granted, it wouldn't take too much... to winkle the old girl out of mourning, but if public opinion is against her, it doesn't do to appear too close.
- So?
- We'll see which way the wind blows.
[Whooping]
[Shouting]
My heart's in the Highlands!
My heart is not here!
My heart's in the Highlands, chasing the deer!
One box of biscuits, one box of drop tablets. one box of pralines,
16 chocolate sponges.
It's the same order every week. Does one of them even bother to check it?
The woman's goin' to Balmoral tomorrow... without the one wee luxury she actually enjoys.
Look, someone'll send it on ahead.
Oh, aye, but will they?
It's not your problem, what she eats, John.
The woman's surrounded by fools.
She's supposed to be packed, dressed and ready... tomorrow mornin', half past 7:00.
If it's up to any of them, she'll still be gettin' dressed at 8:00.
She's got an army of people to get her up and out.
But I'm the only one she trusts.
She'll blow hot and cold on you,
John. She always does.
- You ought to be careful.
- I get 90 pounds a year.
Plus another 70 for a pile of old tartan I'd be wearin' anyway.
That's as much as a page of the back stair gets, and that's a job for toffs.
## [Bagpipes Playing]
I'm Her Majesty's
Highland servant!
Indoors and out.
There's no stoppin' me now.
## [Bagpipes Continue]
Oh, God, the pipes.
- What are those?
- What?
- Those over there. There.
- Ah... [Speaking Scottish]
[Speaking Scottish] How can I possibly say that with a straight face?
I'm thinking of publishing my Highland journals.
- Are they worth readin'?
- I'm told so.
- By whom?
- Sir Henry Ponsonby tells me they're charming.
What does he know about the Highlands?
He has been attending at Balmoral for many years.
Well, that hardly makes him an expert.
His remarks were directed at the quality of writing, not at subject.
I don't groom a horse to have it admired by others.
I groom it because it needs grooming.
I do not do it for others, but Ponsonby thinks they are good.
Just say what you have to say, woman!
What other people think shouldn't matter to you.
Of course I shall say what I have to say. I always do.
Well, if it's a good opinion you're lookin' for, he's the very man to oblige you.
What Mr Ponsonby was appreciating was their literary merit, a skill not intimately associated with a knowledge of grooming.
Literary appreciation does not begin and end with Tennyson.
[Sighing]
I mention you in them.
In particular, the occasion when Albert was alive.
The royal carriage overturned during a storm, and you demonstrated such loyal service... in returning the Queen and princesses safely to Balmoral.
For friendship.
She'll be gone between 8:00 and 6:00 on Friday... visiting the Grant family at Glasalt.
In order to make the journey there and back in one day, she must have no distractions the night before.
She'll take a light supper in her private drawing room and retire early.
She'll need to sign dispatches before she retires.
That can wait until the weekend.
- They're important papers!
- It can wait! Anything else?
Are you sure Her Majesty is up to such a long journey?
She's only just recovered from a severe head cold.
If I didn't think she was up to it,
I wouldn't let her go, would I?
Surely it is for the gentleman to decide when to stop.
It is a disgusting habit.
It should be discouraged.
- Yes, but isn't midnight a little excessive?
- It's quite late enough.
But, Mama, the room was built expressly for that purpose.
It has been a smoking room by tradition ever since Father built it.
Brown's responsibilities are onerous enough already.
He has far too much to do during the day without having to stay up all night... waiting for you to go to bed.
The smoking room will be closed and the lights put out at 12:00.
- Mama.
- And that is my last word on the matter.
Well, I'm sorry, but I really do think it's intolerable... the gentleman of the house should be dictated to by a servant.
It's the Queen's decision.
I beg your pardon?
Mama!
I think you should go now.
You've tired your mother enough.
[Brown] There's really no need for this, you know.
- I'll not have her seein' it like it is.
- It's the last thing she expects.
That's as may be, John, but I just wish she'd warned us she was comin'.
Had she warned ya, you'd be throwin' water on the fire and hiding knitting under cushions.
- You can't stop a wife from bein' house-proud.
- [Chuckling]
- All right, show her in.
- Fine.
They're ready for you now, ma'am.
- I hope they didn't go to any trouble, John.
- Ah, well.
Ma'am.
Mr Grant, how good it is to see you.
- Your Majesty.
- Mrs Grant.
- How's your knee?
Has the pain eased a little?
- Not so bad, ma'am.
Good.
Oh, and here are
Douglas and John.
Haven't you grown?
Growing all the time, ma'am.
- Would you care to sit, ma'am?
- Thank you.
I know that.
That's Cairn Lochan.
- We picnicked there once,
John, did we not?
- Aye, we did, indeed, ma'am.
[Chattering]
Thank you so much.
Ah, the greasy pole.
Don't be facetious, dear.
Remember your position.
It's my position
I'm thinking of.
I see the Prince of Wales is here.
I hope he's got his mama's permission.
- Oh, Salisbury.
- Madam.
Why is the Queen penny-wise and pound foolish?
Because she looks after the Browns... and lets the sovereigns take care of themselves.
And in your opinion, is she foolish?
- Well... What I mean to say...
It's hardly right, is it?
- What?
Well, the Queen and Mr Brown.
La superstition met le monde entier en flammes.
I beg your pardon?
Has anyone seen this, uh, Mr Brown?
He is her personal servant,
I believe.
He follows her wherever she goes.
He would hardly make a very good personal servant if he did not.
Excuse me.
It's not my best china.
I mean, it is my best china now, but the family set got stolen last summer.
-I'm sorry.
-Of course, it was no one on the estate.
More like one of the lads out from Braemar.
Or further even.
I'll fetch the salt.
Mr Disraeli.
- Ma'am.
- Your Royal Highness, what a pleasure to see you here.
Have you met Mr Lyle?
He's in sugar.
I don't think I've had that pleasure.
Mr Lyle, the fascinating thing...
[Woman Laughing]
No doubt you've heard the rumours.
I take no account of gossip, Your Highness.
My concern is the reputation of the monarchy.
Of course.
I fear the influence he has on her.
The man's word is not to be credited.
He is an arriviste of the very lowest water.
You know, she's having a bust cast of him... in Nero Marquino marble.
I'd talk to her myself, but she won't listen to me.
She must be persuaded by someone she respects to abandon this... ridiculous favouritism... before... a situation develops.
A situation?
Look, I don't imagine you frequent the republican clubs, but the fact that neither you nor I are members... should not blind us to the significance of their existence.
The Tory party has always been our party.
I'm flattered you think so.
I tell you, if we don't stick together on this, you could very well find yourself first president's opposition.
[Speaking Latin,
Indistinct]
Yes. Quite.
I really don't think we can overstate the seriousness of this.
What did he want?
To know when he'll be King.
So Grant and myself are riding over Lochnagar... on the worst imaginable night.
The rain is coming down in sheets, and all we can think about... is gettin' home for a wee drink.
Suddenly, through the gloom,
Grant sees a couple of poachers, gives me the shout, and we were off, gallopin' down the hill after them.
We chased them right down to the loch side.
He got there first, leaps off his horse like a man possessed, grabs the two unfortunate men by the throat against the stack.
He was shoutin'. He was swearin' at the top of his voice.
He looks into the eyes of the smallest one, and he says,
"Why are you poachin' on royal land?"
And the poor wee man looks up at him, completely terrified and says,
"Because we've come up in the world."
[Brown]
Whoa!
Your Majesty, thank goodness you're safe.
I'll have a bath prepared immediately. I recommend
MacDonald's African embrocation.
Ah, pipe down, man.
The woman's fine.
We stayed a little longer than expected with Mr and Mrs Grant.
- It was most agreeable.
- We were expecting you to return by 6:00.
- Now I'm back.
- And we had a wee nip of whisky.
- To keep out the cold.
- Aye.
Thank you, John.
She's drunk.
Distinct flushing around the cheeks.
She was drunk,
I tell you.
No, she wasn't.
- Surely not.
- Don't even think it.
## [Fiddlers Playing A Reel]
Pandora's Box.
[Snoring]
## [Bagpipes Playing]
## [Bagpipes Continue]
[Gasping]
Thank you.
- Which one is he?
- The tall one.
- Got him?
- Aye.
- [Chattering]
- [Man] I think it's over here.
What is it, John?
I won't be long.
Where'd he go?
I've lost him.
Don't know if there's much worth writing about. Hard to tell.
Is this close enough for you, boys?
Go on! Get out!
Go on! On your way!
- Back where you belong!
- Come on!
You filthy scavengers!
Leave her alone!
You hear?
If I catch the miserable by-blow... who told those people the Queen's whereabouts,
I'll cut his balls off and hang them out to dry on Jock Wemyss, so I will.
What happens to John Brown is his business, but the Queen's security will never be compromised!
- What action...
- You'll talk when I'm finished.
That kind of disloyalty will not be tolerated in this house. Is that clear?
- Is that clear?
- [All] Yes, Mr Brown.
[Dr Jenner]
"Court circular: Balmoral.
"On Tuesday,
Mr John Brown attended...
"a display of sheep dipping by local farmers.
"On Wednesday, he attended a seance,
"where he was pleased to listen to a recital of 'Auld Lang Syne'...
"by Mr Robert Burns himself.
"On Thursday, Mr John Brown walked on the slopes,
"accompanied by family and friend.
"At tea, he partook of haggis,
"and in the evening, he attended a recital...
"of bagpipe music through the ages.
After a light supper,
Mr John Brown retired early."
If I find you had anything to do with this, I'll have you sacked.
I believe that decision rests with Her Majesty.
Don't think
I can't persuade her.
I don't doubt the Queen was highly amused.
She's always had a very healthy sense of humour.
This is a slur on her good name.
Inasmuch as the article is about yourself,
I think you must now accept that the public has a right to its interest in you.
Nobody has rights over me.
We are, all of us, subject to forces... beyond our control,
Mr Brown.
Even you.
You'll regret saying that.
[Chattering]
[Man]
Order!
Order! Order!
Order!
The results of the vote to the motion to disestablish the Irish Church.
Order!
Ayes to the right: 313.
Nos to the left: 265.
Mr Speaker!
I table a motion in furtherance of the bill... to disestablish the monarchy!
[Disraeli]
We're going to lose.
Gladstone's got his party facing the same way for the first time in years.
We need help.
[Sighing]
Where is the old girl?
- Who?
- Mrs Brown.
It's questionable whether there's any advantage to be had from that direction.
- She's never been less popular.
- Aye, in the press, perhaps, but she's sold more copies of her
Highland journal in three months... than Punch will ever sell in a year.
- It's time to wheel her out.
- She's refusing to leave Balmoral.
Oh, what's the excuse this time?
Princess Louise is too ill to move.
Frankly, the Queen is rather upset about the recent spate of bad publicity.
- You're smiling.
- Oh, um, trying to imagine
"rather upset."
Forgive me, gentlemen.
I'm late.
Not at all, Dean. It's very good of you to spare the time.
- I came as quickly as I could.
- You've seen the latest cartoon in Punch, I take it.
I beg your pardon? Oh.
One of our madder brethren in the House was calling for... the disestablishment of the monarchy.
- Good Lord!
- Oh, I'm sure it won't come to that.
It is now a matter for each man's conscience.
I was just telling Lord Stanley how vital it is... that the nation should feel the visible influence of the sovereign... as a reminder that Parliament... well, indeed, my own ministry... depends on the will of the Queen.
I couldn't agree with you more, but I am only Dean of Windsor.
- I don't understand what...
- We hear from Balmoral... that Mr Brown has been interesting Her Majesty... in some of the forms of worship associated with... low-church Presbyterian.
What can we do?
Oh, several things.
- Read it.
- Again?
Read it!
"The Times wishes to join the rest of Her Majesty's loyal subjects...
"in expressing its deep joy at the news... that the Queen is soon to come out of mourning."
- Who told them that?
- I have no idea.
- Why not?
- l... Forgive me, ma'am,
I am no wiser than yourself.
No one should think themselves wiser than me!
It is not for any of the Queen's subjects... to presume to tell Her Majesty when and where she should come out of mourning.
It is the Queen's sorrow that keeps her secluded.
It is her overwhelming amount of work and responsibility... work that she feels will soon wear her out entirely.
- Your Majesty...
- Is it not enough that she is uncheered and unguided... that she should also have to suffer these malicious rumours?
I am not a fool.
I know there are those in the establishment too afraid to attack me, so they attack my dearest friends.
Sometimes...
I feel Brown is all I have left of Albert.
And now they attack Brown too.
I will not give him up to them!
[Clock Bells Chiming]
- I wish to see my mother.
- She's busy.
- Then convey her a message.
- She's away to Windsor tomorrow.
Talk to her there.
Tell her the Prince of Wales wishes to speak with her urgently... about matters concerning the press.
Are you deaf as well as stupid?
What did you say?
I said, "Are you deaf as well as stupid?"
Do you know who you address, sir?
Whom you address.
- Get out of my way!
- Why don't you just leave us alone?
[Man]
Where do you want this one, sir?
[Chattering]
- You, boy! What's your business here?
- Under-porter, sir.
Well, don't stand where you shouldn't.
[Horse Neighing]
[Bell Tolling]
Hey, Barney.
- Mr Brown, sir.
- It's a cold one out there tonight, Barney.
Yeah.
Have you looked at this hoof?
She was limpin'. I think there might be a stone in it.
- Ye-Yeah, l-I d-did.
- Good, man.
- Then she's all right?
- Yeah.
Good. She's a good girl.
Aren't ya?
Yeah, she's a lovely girl.
- And you know the Queen's riding her tomorrow?
- Yeah.
You all right, Barney?
Oh, aye.
Come on.
Come on, you.
Come on. Okay. There.
- [Gasping]
- [Men Laughing]
[Doors Opening]
Well?
Mr Brown is unable to attend today.
Why?
- I believe he is unwell, ma'am.
- Unwell?
I understand he was in a fight.
- Has he been hurt?
- I believe not, ma'am.
I understand... he'd had rather too much to drink.
You may go.
[Gasping]
And she sent no word down?
They said you were drunk.
Why don't you tell her the truth?
She'll think it's her fault for keepin' me.
- What the hell are you doing?
- I'm getting dressed.
- You've got three broken ribs.
- I've got my duties to attend to.
Don't be an idiot. You're in no fit state to go anywhere.
- She'll be worried about me.
- She'll get over it.
[Grunting]
I can't let her down now, Archie.
And when was the last time she put herself out for you?
Look, John, whatever she says to you now, in the end, you're a servant.
I am much more than that.
She may say that to you, but the woman can say what she wants, can't she?
- Just watch your tongue!
- Come on, man.
I'm tellin' you what you already know.
- You know nothing about her.
- When are you gonna see it, John?
She doesn't give a damn about you!
From the Queen.
"My lips me give a message better of Christmas love...
"than e'en this letter.
To my best friend, J.B.
From his best friend, V.R."
Best friend!
- Aye.
- She means it!
She'll drop you.
When she's done with you, she'll drop you.
- Get out.
- [Sighing]
Get out.
Get out.
Get out!
Out!
[Sir Henry] ...to be followed by a visit from Lady Bridport.
She is keen to secure a place for her niece as maid of honour.
- I'm tired.
- Um, there is one other matter.
- What is it?
- I have a letter, ma'am.
From whom?
From Princess Helena and other members of the royal family.
My family is quite capable of communicating with the Queen in person.
What do they want?
They are demanding the dismissal of Mr Brown on grounds of drunkenness.
You wish to see me, ma'am?
My husband tried always to make me think more subtly.
Of course, he taught me so much, and I can never repay my debt to him... or the love I feel even now.
But in truth,
I think I am someone... who can only feel things... when they are alive to me.
And for that reason,
I know I do not have a subtle mind.
I know that.
But I work hard, and I... try to do my duty.
However,
I have noticed of late... that... my feelings of grief... are not so strong, and I find myself leaning... more... on the comfort of living friends.
Friends close to me now.
Your Majesty, a settled resignation... is more lasting proof of affection... than active grief.
If the Good Lord sees fit to bring one into contact... with... congenial fellow beings, one need not analyze one's reaction too deeply.
To allow oneself to be comforted... by someone else... need not imply disloyalty to the memory of the loved one.
Sir Henry?
Please tell the princess and other signatories to this letter... that the Queen will not be dictated to... or made to alter in any way... what she has found to answer for her comfort.
- Do I make myself clear?
- Ma'am.
You may go.
I would like to get down.
[Groaning]
I was told you were in a fight.
Yes, ma'am.
Has someone seen to those bruises?
Yes, ma'am.
Ma'am.
Having considered my position here in court,
I have come to the conclusion that in Your Majesty's best interests I should resign.
I do not accept.
I had foreseen that you would not.
But Your Majesty should understand... that I will not be changed in this.
- I leave for Deeside...
- The Queen forbids it.
I cannot allow it... because I cannot live without you.
Without you, I cannot find the strength... to be who I must be.
Please.
Promise me you won't let them send me back.
I promise.
[Disraeli] Yesterday,
Gladstone talked for three hours... on the Irish Church bill.
I am as guilty as the rest of underestimating his reforming zeal.
Tory days may be numbered, but I fancy there yet remains... one last hope of deliverance.
Wheresoever the blame lies, we must now close ranks... and defend
Mrs Brown's England.
As for my interminable journey... to the land of Calvin, oatcakes and sulphur, no prime minister made greater sacrifice... than attempting to run the country... six hundred miles north of civilization.
## [Singing]
# Embracing... ##
How dare the Irish break with the Anglicans!
If Albert were alive today, he would never allow the crown to give up church patronage.
No.
The Irish must be told very firmly to stay exactly where they are.
It's the thin end of the wedge, Mr Disraeli.
Next you will be telling me that the crown no longer governs this nation.
Your Majesty remains at the very epicentre of governance.
As for your people, look no further than the sales... of your
Highland journals... to see in what affection the nation holds their Queen.
Why, you sell even more copies than Mr Dickens.
But I lack your prose,
Mr Disraeli.
Oh.
Of course,
I understand your concern.
You miss your people, and they miss you.
- Then they may read about me.
- Indeed.
And for that, they are eternally grateful.
- Is that not enough?
- In so many ways.
And yet, it is... your presence they crave.
A figurehead.
I never thought to be bullied by you, Mr Disraeli.
You, I thought, understood a widow's grief.
Forgive me, ma'am.
I cannot speak for the nation, only for myself.
As prime minister,
I confess I miss your presence.
But that is an expression of my own selfish desires, and I should not burden you with it.
I stay here because I am happy.
Is that such a terrible crime?
No, ma'am.
Time for your walk.
- This is my good John Brown.
- Yes.
I've asked him to show you a little of Highland life... while you're with us at Balmoral.
What brings you here?
A man can refuse only so many invitations from his Queen.
It was remiss of me not to come earlier.
And what do you know of the Highlands?
[Chuckles]
I am a blank sheet.
- Do you hunt?
- Mmm, occasionally.
Daresay we could have you taught.
To shoot, perhaps, but not to kill.
If you hunt, you hunt to kill.
Well, then,
I'll do my best.
[Thunder Rumbling]
Always remember, keep it very tight to your shoulder, absorb the kick with your body, aim for the head... bang!
Imagine it's Gladstone.
Yes, quite.
[Grunting, Sniffling]
Thank you.
- Back door, west wing?
- Checked and locked, sir.
- Side door, west wing?
- Checked and locked, sir.
- Front door, west wing?
- Checked and locked, sir.
- Side door, east wing?
- Checked and locked...
- Louder, girl!
- Checked and locked, sir.
- Kitchen, lower house?
- Checked and locked. Sir.
- Back and upper corridors?
- Checked and locked, sir.
Front door.
Checked and locked.
Did you see any
Irish assassins today, Mr Brown?
We heard the ponies were Fenian sympathizers.
Or was it the stag?
There's not a soul in here... who cares about that wee woman's safety except me!
She would be dead in a ditch... if I wasn't here to look out for her!
- You hear that?
- [Laughing]
[Groaning]
[Thunderclap]
What's this?
It's a diary.
- Be careful who sees it.
- What do you take me for?
- You should have someone look at ya.
- I'm all right.
Just need to rest up a wee while.
[Groaning]
Oh.
You don't need to stay.
The place is a mess.
[Brown Moans]
Can't move to tidy.
- That's what the maids are for.
- I don't need some prattler goin' through my things.
Why don't ya give yourself a rest, John?
She's other people to look out for her.
She needs me, Archie.
Can't do without me.
Told me to my face.
[Inhaling]
[Exhaling]
How can I stop now?
[Gasping]
- You sent for me?
- I've been called back to London.
My last day.
I thought I might take a walk up Lochnagar.
[Disraeli] "Princes and lords are but the breath of kings.
A honest man's the noblest work of God."
You must miss such magnificent views.
I don't think about it.
Oh. Forgive me.
I've called you out, and you should have been resting.
- I'm fine.
- But you are injured.
- It's nothin'.
- Still, someone must attend to it.
- Your wife should not have let you out.
- I'm not married.
Oh.
- [Grunting]
- This is the top.
[Sighing]
I confess I sometimes feel as if I'm not married myself.
I see my wife so little.
But I'm forgetting the rewards.
The look on their faces when one walks into a room... still gives one a ridiculous thrill.
- Well, I wouldn't know.
- Oh, surely.
What I do,
I do for my Queen.
Was there never ambition?
Maybe, once.
Oh. I envy you.
- Why?
- Oh, to have achieved one's ambition... or to have reconciled oneself to its limits... is a lifetime's work.
- I do what I do.
- For Her Majesty.
- Aye.
- But yourself? What about John Brown?
I told ya.
I serve my Queen.
And no other aspiration?
To see her safe.
You will not be unaware... of the threat now posed by the republicanism?
Why do you think
I've kept her here?
Ah, but therein lies the paradox.
It is her very isolation that encourages the malcontents.
The longer she is away, the stronger they become, and who, honestly, can provide security against that?
However many doors you lock, someone will always get in.
Even here.
So?
The truth is, the Queen would be safer... doing her duty and returning south to her public.
John Bull loves her, and John Bull is her best defence.
Her mind is set.
You'll never change it now.
She trusts you, John.
[Sighing]
They don't see it.
See what?
The danger. I keep tellin' them, but they don't see it.
- They're not as watchful as you.
- They're too busy thinking about themselves.
A greasy pole.
- No loyalty.
- No, um,
Iove.
I promised to protect her... from people like you.
[Chuckling]
For once in my life, I'm not the issue.
- She'll never understand it.
- Oh, in time she will.
She'll think
I've betrayed her.
But others will know that you acted for the greater good.
I received a letter today from Mr Disraeli.
Parliament are calling for my return to public duties.
He insists the country expects me to preside... over the opening of the new session.
I refuse to offer sustenance to enable his weakening grip.
Besides, you know how much
I would hate it.
It frightens me.
John?
We can't always have what we wish.
"Duty"?
You talk about "duty"?
When duty and safety are served by the same ends, then, aye, I do!
I cannot believe you're saying this.
You who I've relied on all this time?
- Have I ever lied before?
- You stand there and tell me it is my duty!
- After all you promised me?
- I've broken no promise!
You're forcing me to do the very thing you know I'd fear most.
For God's sake, woman,
I'm tryin' to see you safe!
I will not hear any more about my safety!
You made me a promise, and now you've broken it!
When I took you out riding, come rain or shine, because I knew it was right for you, when I got the bairns off your back just to give you a bit o' peace, when I saw you safe from home to home when you didn't even know if I was there, all I ever thought about was you!
- Then why send me back to them?
- Because I have to!
Will you not listen to me, woman?
Do not presume to talk to your Queen in that manner.
Dr Jenner,
I feel unwell.
I shall retire to my chamber.
- Please attend me presently.
- Ma'am.
[All]
Ma'am.
May I say how glad I am to see
Your Majesty so much recovered.
Where is my son?
Prince Albert is at Windsor, ma'am.
Why is he not here?
- He is sick, ma'am.
- Then why are you not with him?
You ordered all members of the royal family to attend you at Balmoral.
What's the matter with him?
He has typhoid fever, ma'am.
No. You are mistaken.
Prince Albert, my husband, had typhoid fever.
I asked what was wrong with my son.
The same, Your Majesty.
Why was I not informed?
I did not consider it wise in the circumstances... to tax your nerves.
How ill is he?
Alex?
He is not well, ma'am.
I must go to him.
We must leave at once.
[Chattering]
[Chattering]
[Watch Ticking]
Better.
If the Good Lord should see fit to spare my son,
I will order a Mass to be celebrated at St. George's.
The people must share with their Queen... her prayers and hopes for their future King.
The Queen will be riding to St. George's on the 5th.
I recommend Her Majesty use a covered carriage and a full horse guard.
In the event of any disturbance,
I will insure...
I will ride to St. George's in an open carriage.
It is time the Queen was seen by her public.
[People Cheering]
[Cheering]
No!
[Albert]
And so there he is, Arthur O'Conner, all seven stone of the man, paddling madly towards us through a sea of horse guards, waving something that looks vaguely like a pen!
- [Laughing]
- I thought he must be one of
Mother's ardent readership... in search of the royal indenture.
[Laughter]
I believe I saw him first, and then I alerted Brown.
I'm not convinced that he wasn't taking a snooze on top of the steps.
- [Laughing]
- So we had our man pinned down, and I must say that Brown acquitted himself admirably.
Of course, the gun turned out to be a fake, but, uh, well, you know, nonetheless it was, um...
[Clears Throat]
- Yes, um, well done.
- [Guests Murmur In Agreement]
I intend Brown to be rewarded with a special medal cast in gold.
It will be called the "Devoted Service Medal."
- [Albert] Mm.
- [Applause]
[Clinking]
A toast.
[Albert]
Victoria Regina!
[Guests]
Victoria Regina!
I saw your face there as well, Sir Henry.
I think that you were sneaking a bit behind the carriage.
[Albert Continues Talking,
Indistinct]
[Guests Talking,
Laughing]
[Disraeli]
The people of England have expressed, in a manner which cannot be mistaken, that they will uphold the ancient monarchy of England.
Go to your homes.
Teach them these truths.
A land of liberty, of prosperity... of power... and of glory!
[Cheering]
[Brown] We should not live in expectation of contentment.
Fifteen years of vigilance will not guarantee peace of mind.
Yesterday, intruders were again reported in the south wing.
I believe my prompt arrival may have averted any crisis, but it was a timely reminder.
It is a great comfort to me that my efforts... in securing the Queen's safety over the years have not been in vain.
Certainly Her Majesty sends me no word that she is dissatisfied, and I feel sure that if she were unhappy, she would have found the occasion to speak to me in person,
- [Clattering]
- as she has so often done in the past.
- [Knocking]
- What is it?
[Man]
North woods, sir!
[Thunderclap]
God save the Queen!
[Gunshot Echoing]
How long has he been this sick?
A few days, ma'am.
Why was I not told earlier?
[Knocking]
You should never have gone out in such foul weather.
Someone has to look after ya.
It could have been someone.
It was before.
Yes. Yes, it was.
My ministers are as impertinent as ever.
Dispatches so numerous they come in a trunk.
Sometimes, I do believe, they will never stop.
Endless letters.
I know I've not always been... the loyal friend that you deserve, John.
And here, even now, I'm... feeling desperate with the thought of losing you.
Don't be silly, woman.
[Gasping]
[Water Splashing]
[Sniffling]
Not too near.
[Sobbing]
[Dr Jenner]
Cause of death was pneumonia.
[Sir Henry]
Not too protracted, I hope.
A few days.
When he heard, the Prince of Wales... threw the bust over the wall of the north tower.
Took four hours to gather the fragments.
Queen wishes to publish an account of him.
Dear, oh, dear.
- We think she can be dissuaded.
- Hmm.
Have you had a glance at the diary?
- Yes.
- Quite.
I think I best take it back.
Oh, of course.
Where did you find it, by the way?
Oh, some young page was boasting about having seen it.
- Lucky.
- [Chuckles]
Well, no rest for the wicked, Henry.
No. Indeed.
Wouldn't be on the first floor, would it?
Ambulance!
Yeah. Yeah, here you are, love.
In 'ere.
It's the old fella.
He's collapsed on the couch.
Let's have a look at him, eh?
This is his grand-daughter.
You were here when this happened, were you?
Yeah, I just come in and found him on the couch.
What's his name?
Dave Carr.
Dave!
Dave!
Is he gonna be all right?
Dave? Dave?
No response there, Dave.
No response, yeah...
How's he doing, love?
He's okay at the moment so let's just keep our fingers crosse.
Does he have any other close relatives at all?
There's my mum. She lives in wales, so, I mean, she doesn't see him often
Her and me dad have split up.
Paul, make the hospital.
He's just gone on us, mate.
Oh, God! Have we lost him?
Oh, God, Dot!
It's all right...
(THE MINER
MORE PIT CLOSURES)
(The Socialist
LABOURS' FIFTH COLUMN)
(ALL INTO ACTION NOW!
DEFEND SPANISH REPUBLIC!)
In February a coalition of socialist, republican and other left wing parties were victorious in the general election.
They proposed a series of democratic reforms.
The big landowners, industrialists, churchmen and army officers feared the growing power of the working class.
July 18th.
There was a military uprising led by the Fascist General Franco against the democratically elected government.
Government supporters formed militias to defend themselves.
Organised by trades unions and political parties, they went to fight for their democratic rights against the Fascists.
This, this is... this is the... one of the militias going to the Zaragosa front in, in Aragon.
You can see all the cars.
They've got the name of the workers' organisation... because they've all been nationalised, they've all been taken over by the workers.
That is the Union of, of the Railway workers.
This is the CNT... the anarchists' union.
As you can see... the support the whole of Barcelona is on the streets but with very few guns.
Most people haven't got guns.
You can see young, old, men, women.
These are the fascists.
The General, the defenders of privilege.
And this is what they are doing to us.
They are killed and left there... just for being trade unionists.
Every defeat for us is a defeat for you.
Every step that takes Franco closer to poser in Spain also takes the fascists closer to power here.
If Franco wins the war... it would be a major boost for fascists everywhere.
And before long, comrades... they will drag all freedom-loving people down to barbarism and, and war.
Comrades, whether Spanish or English, or American or Chinese we are one class of people with the same aspiration... the same hope for a just and equal society.
I want you to join with us... make our fight your fight.
Let's come together... let's come together...
Let's take up the slogan.
No Pasaran.
They shall not pass.
No Pasaran. No Pasaran.
No Pasaran.
No Pasaran.
You've got our support.
We're right behind you.
We wanna fight.
No Pasaran.
Kit...
I'm going to go to Spain.
What, just like that you're going to Spain?
Well, not just like that but...
It'll take a while to organise.
I'll go to Barcelona, sort it out from there.
Why you? Why have you got to go?
Because I can.
I haven't got any kids or nothing.
I mean, you know... what am I doing here, Kit?
I'm on fifteen bob a week on the dole.
Y'know, there's millions of us, out of work.
I'm on, you know, demon-strations, hunger marches just...
I know. I've been there with you.
I know. But I want to do something.
And you can't do it here?
If we've got to do it, we've got to do it now.
We've got to stop them otherwise it's not, it's going to be too late, Kit.
We'll have no future here.
I can't spare you.
Come here.
Dear Kit... well I made it.
It was a bit tricky and the sea was rough.
I was glad to get off that ship.
But Larry, who smuggled me aboard, turned up trumps.
He got us ashore, in one piece, at Marseilles... and put us on the road to Spain.
And then I hitched a lift in a couple of lorries to the border.
It seems there's no organisation here to help volunteers like me you've just got to make your own way.
With no passport, crossing the frontier wasn't easy and I had to walk across the Pyrenees.
I must have climbed for miles.
My boots are all shot to pieces and my feet are steaming.
I was scared stiff but we made it.
Would you like to sit down?
Would you like to sit down?
Madam, could you please move the chickens?
Now I'm in Spain and everything is so bright it hurts your eyes.
I've 'copped' the train for Barcelona.
Maybe I'll see some action.
He said that they could use your feet as a weapon against Franco.
What do you do here?
Oh, I've come to fight for the Republic.
Good. The more that come the sooner we'll win.
Do you want a drop?
Thanks.
Salud!
Gracias.
Smoke? Smoke?
Oh, with pleasure.
My name is Bernard.
Bernard Goujon.
Pleased to meet you. David Carr.
Bernard.
D'you smoke, lads?
Do you have papers, documentation?
Yeah, I've got my Party card.
My Com, Communist Party of Great Britain membership.
Yeah, I've got it here.
Look, it's like that.
See.
It's for a comrade of the POUM.
The what?
The POUM, P-O-U-M
Never heard of that?
No, never heard of the POUM.
It's Spainish workers' Party.
Revolutionaries.
Tickets, please.
He's with us, boss.
He's come to fight the fascists.
Welcome in Spain.
Thanks very much.
The Trade Union is controlling all the line.
Thanks.
Thanks.
So it's a present for you.
Oh, don't have to pay?
No, no, don't have to pay.
Thanks very much. Thanks, comrade.
Gracias.
Left, right, left, right...
Alto!
Halt!
Turn to right. Alto!
Turn to right. Alto!
Hey, dickhead. Make up your mind.
Shut up. I'm in charge here.
I'm pissed off with this.
This is important pick it up immediately.
You pick it up. I'm off.
Where are you going, love?
Don't call me "love".
Comrade, comrade...
I am going to Madrid. Understand?
They take things seriously there.
This is vital for the revolution for both men and women.
We've got to have discipline we'll never win without it.
Where are we going going to get to with this...
This is just the beginning.
I want a gun.
You'll get to fight...
Please trust me...
Get back in the line... what are you lot gawking at?
Let's have some energy.
I've seen more life in a sick note.
Right! Halt!
In Germany I was a pastry cook.
Pastry...
Yeah, pastry cook.
And you, Gene, what was your job?
Eleven years on the sea. Bosun.
Bosun?
Yes.
I've just spent six days on the sea and it was not for me.
I was, went from Liverpool to Marseilles and I was sick all the time.
So... I'm not a sailor.
I was a servant. A cleaner.
Servant. For an English family.
On the first day everything starts they went running to England so they left, they left me alone in Barcelona.
I'm free for the first time of my life.
Salud, camaradas.
Thank you, thank you.
You got the weapons?
Yes.
Antiques.
Antiques?
German, Mauser, 1896.
Single load.
How many?
Thirty.
Okay. All right.
Be better using a big stick.
Okay.
Get these off and take them over there into the 'store place'.
When did you learn about guns?
Five years in French Army,
I was sergeant.
Comrade. Where you from?
Italiano. Milano.
Italiano? So you know fascism?
They're bastards.
Que?
Do you need some help?
No, I'll do it myself.
Vale, leona.
Aye, aye, soft ollies.
Are you taking the piss?
Want to change?
Come here!
Sit down. Sit down, please.
Garibaldi, come here.
My name's Rafael Poccetti, Captain.
I know. But I need Garibaldis more than I need Poccettis.
Sit down, please.
Leona, tu tambien.
Okay.
In the other side of the hill are the trenches.
Our trenches.
And beyond them is the enemy.
And the only good soldier in Franco's Army is a dead one.
My name is Vidal and I'm your Captain.
We are the POUM and we organise this section of the, of the front.
To the west of us are the anarchists.
And we fight together, comrades in arms to defeat, to destroy the fascists and make the workers' and peasants' revolution.
Understand?
Don't forget it.
You are welcome here because you are my speaking squad English.
Okay?
We are proud to have you fight with us in our side.
Hey, David... look.
The whores are also at the front.
Yeah, but they're better looking than the ones back home.
Yeah?
Good morning, Coogan, your reinforcements are here now.
I thought it was Sunday.
Dear Kit. Well, I'm a soldier now with the POUM Militia.
It's a People's Army.
Just ordinary men and women fighting for a cause not like the Army back home.
There's no salutin'.
We elect the officers, and everything's discussed and voted on
It's socialism in action.
I'm in a special section... it's mainly internationals but some Spainish... and the common language is English, so we get by.
An Irishman called Coogan is in charge.
We're all on the same pay ten pesetas a day which is kept for us for when we go on leave.
And we also get a packet of fags a day, which isn't bad.
It's a huge operation, about twenty thousand militia on this front alone.
I'm not in the communist brigade, but it doesn't matter cos we're all fightin' the same enemy.
Viva Franco!
Viva Espana!
Fascists bastards. Rot in hell!
Sons of bitches!
Fascists, you've got no balls.
The food here's fuckin' brilliant!
The food here's fuckin' brilliant!
I'm going to shove a bullet up your arse.
Hey, rich bastard, you'll die with nothing.
I'm going to shove a bullet up your arse!
You must be used to this weather coming from your godforsaken town.
It never stops fuckin' raining!
You been, have you?
Yeah, five years, Manchester.
Staring at the poxy rain through prison bars.
What d'you get put down for?
Fightin' the Brits.
Murderer...
Murderer of a free nation.
Are you all right?
Yeah, yeah, yeah!
There's all sorts here...
French, German, Yanks,
Spanish of course, and a Scot by the name of Jimmy.
All good lads.
The front line doesn't seem to move.
We watch the fascists, and they watch us.
Lots of hanging about waitin' for something to happen.
Digging trenches, going out on patrol, sentry duty.
But worst of all is the lice.
They're worse than the nits back home.
They send you mad. They lay their eggs in the lining of your trousers and you can't get rid of 'em.
You're forever scratching.
The food's not great... it's usually bread and beans which gives us all a problem...
I could murder some cabbage and ribs.
The local women do the cooking.
It's strange to see women in the trenches fighting alongside the men.
But no need to worry, Kit, none of them could hold a candle to you.
Max...
You know what we said the other day when we came down... about Blanca being a whore.
You know, a prostitute.
Who? Who?
Who?
You said that Blanca was a prostitute - a whore!
Yeah, yeah. Sure.
Good one.
Good one?
Good one!
Yeah!
Yours are winding me up.
Everybody knows... except you.
Maite...?
True.
You know, David, Blanca has told me some stories... crazy ones. Hard life...
Hard life... hard one!
In fact, Jose can tell you, you know.
He knows her very well, you know, because...
She knows how to do it... she's good and cheap.
Good and cheap, yeah.
Leave him alone.
David, it's the right moment.
Listen, she likes you, I tell you.
Good luck!
All right?
Yeah.
Do you want a cigarette?
No, thanks.
So, I mean, I was just thinking if you're not busy later on you might want to... you know, go for a walk with me.
You know...
I don't understand you.
Maybe me and you, you know, like... with, with Coogan.
When we saw you the other day...
Coogan is my man.
D'you understand?
Yeah. Si.
Before the war we live together.
We join in the militia together.
Yeah, I'm sorry, I got... we fight together.
Sorry about that.
Sorry. Yeah.
I'll see you later then.
You shower of bastards!
You... I'll have a fuckin' word with you in a minute!
Have a nice time?
Have a nice time?
Yes, I did, thank you very much.
Marcel!
David?
Look.
Uh?
Fascist prisoners.
No!
An officer as well.
How many?
Besides the officer, there's...
Lawrence, Coogan, Jimmy.
I wonder where they found them?
I dunno.
This fucking senora wants a word with you.
Him and his sons, we found them behind the lines.
Doing a recce or something.
Anyway, they were lost.
At ease.
What's your name, lad?
Jose.
Jose?
Are you hungry?
Take them and get them something to eat, Jim.
And where are you going?
I've some questions for you.
I don't have to answer.
I'm a professional soldier.
Support the government elected by the people.
It's not a real government.
Muy bien...
How many soldiers in your command?
Have you got machine-guns?
Artillery?
Do your soldiers obey you?
Of course... we're a real army.
(FRANCO CLAIMS MALAGA
MANY KILLED AT MADRID)
(MADRID HEAVILY BOMBED SHELLS
CRASH INTO HEART OF CITY)
(NAZI PLANES FIRE ON CIVILIANS
IN STREETS)
Mail.
No.
No.
No. Sorry.
Coogan, over here.
Oh, great.
Pigat...
Are you alright?
Pigat!
Pigat!
Pigat!
Pigat!
Where are you going?
What's wrong?
Leave me alone. I want to go home.
What's wrong?
I'm going home, okay?
Why?
I've got things to sort out.
You're crazy... you can't just leave like this.
I came here willingly and I'll leave when I feel like it, okay?
No, it's not that easy.
You can't just go when you want to.
There's a discipline here.
My woman's fucking another man.
Who'll sort it out?
You? Vidal?
Okay.
What are you going to do?
String the son of a bitch up by his balls.
And what good would that do?
Tell me, what good would that do?
Make me feel better.
Stay here... with your companeros.
I came here for her, for my daughter, the future.
You've got a daughter?
She was two last month.
What's her name?
Lidia.
Look... If we don't win this war there'll be no future for anybody.
Right?
Not for Lidia, not for your wife, not you, not me, not anyone.
Do you understand?
The photos'll give you some idea of how cold it was.
But what they don't show is how the rain turned everything into freezing mud.
We seemed to spend all our time searching for firewood anything that'd burn and keep us warm.
This Coogan fella's a bit of a wild one. Ex-IRA.
He's always first on patrol and last one back.
He knows what he's doing, but he does take chances.
His girlfriend's called Blanca.
She's in our section.
She's a bit of a character an' all.
Sharp as a razor.
They're not always hanging on to one another, but everyone knows they're a couple.
The worst thing about being here is doing nothing.
It seems we're just sittin' around and talkin' and arguin' politics all the time.
I come all this way to fight fascists and I can't get to grips with them.
Still... at last things are warming up a bit, not just the weather either.
Tomorrow's a big day.
We're attacking a village held by the fascists.
Think of us.
Lots of love, David.
Take off your sacks!
Vamos alla, valientes!
David, come on!
What's going on?
No! No!
Chuck us a cartridge.
Hey, chuck us a fucking cartridge!
There's women down there!
Danny, you can't be serious.
Give us a fucking cartridge!
Danny, you can't put their lives in danger.
Coogan! Coogan!
Fuego!
Don't shoot!
Speak to me!
Speak to me.
Speak to me!
This is the pig that was shooting from the tower.
Quiet!
Su rifle aun esta caliente.
I'm going to ask one simple question.
Have you fired this rifle?
No!
Tell me the truth.
Have you fired this rifle?
No!
There's the proof.
What's this then?
Kill him!
He informed on five comrades from the Union, and they're dead now.
Yeah, kill him.
What happened?
They took my husband and shaved my head.
Why? Why?
Because my husband was in the militia.
Y no lo pudieren coger.
Eran anarquistas.
They were young anarchists.
Somebody say to the priest in confession where they were.
He told this to the fascists.
He knew the fascists kill them.
Murderer!
We've got to kill him.
Delato a nuestros companeros!
And we'll see you in three days...
Two or three days.
I'll stay here with twenty men for three days.
Very nice indeed.
Very nice.
I'm happy you appreciate French good taste.
Hola chico!
Gracias, amiga.
Blanca...
I just want you to know how sorry I am for what happened.
I should have opened fire but I didn't and, and they got him.
That's all there is to it.
The thing is, he was a good man.
You know, he was a brave man.
We're all going to miss him.
Yes, I know.
I know. I...
Oh, come on... come on... when I met him the first time... he was playing... how do you say...
The guitar?
No.
Yeah, the smaller one.
Banjo?
Yeah.
He was playing banjo.
In bars and cafes.
I'm sorry, Blanca, you know, it's my fault. And I...
No.
No, I'm...
I'm responsible because...
No.
You didn't kill him.
Fascists did.
He said he just wanted, like, bullets and I said that, like,
I wouldn't...
It could have happened sooner or later to any of us.
We feel a great sorrow today, but it must not halt our efforts.
Our companions have not died in vain.
Josefina, Sebastian, Teresa all of you we all fight for the same things as they did.
And we shall continue it's what they would have wanted.
They're here with us, fighting for the same cause.
We shall leave them in the ground, but the earth is ours now, comrades, and from this place we must draw the strength to fight on.
The battle is long and our foes are many.
But we are more, we shall always be many more.
Tomorrow is ours, comrades.
The struggle goes on.
They shall no pass.
We shall overcome.
Viva la revolucion!
Viva!
Muerte al fascismo!
Muerte!
Come on, sit down...
Friends...
Don Julian's house is now the house of the people.
Let's start the meeting.
Who's going to speak?
Teresa.
We must collectivise.
The men at the front have no food and the people in the village have been left with next to nothing by the fascists.
The village hasn't got enough food.
We must collectivise as soon as possible.
We must get food to feed our people and the comrades fighting for us at the front.
I'm in agreement with the collectivisation of Don Julian's lands or re-distribution in all its forms, but each to his own little bit... no?
Wait... Jose, speak.
I work my land my own way... it's not much, all that I have...
I started working it and... shit...
I've thrown everything into it.
Miguel. What would you like to say?
I'd like to say to our friend here that it's very good that he wants to work his own land, but how much better it would be if we all worked it together.
When the harvest is ready, are you going to eat all the wheat and all the potatoes?
You are not to say so... we need everything to be able... to keep the revolution going.
The revolution has to be done this way.
Don't wait for tomorrow.
Jose, it's not only a question of land.
Hay que hacer una sociedad nueva!
Un momento, Miguel, que Aniceto habia...
Yo habia pedido la palabra, y a nosotros nos dejais de lado.
The revolution is like a pregnant cow, if we don't help out... the cow and its calf will be gone and the children will be left hungry.
Remember that comrades, boys, died in this battle.
We must collectivise.
Do you understand me?
The people must eat.
This struggle we've started has to continue.
There are those who are the way they are and there are those who know how to work and people who don't...
I've got what I've got because I work.
Hold on. Paco's turn.
It's fundamental that improve our harvests... we must grow more.
Othere villages have done it by working all the land as one.
With a tractor you can do five times more work in one day than you can with a mule.
Un momento. No hablemos todos juntos. Un momento.
Sebastian.
There's evidence from other villages that it's working.
I believe we have to take over private property.
No one's got anything.
We could pool all our resources and depending on each person's situation we could share it out.
If you need a cow, you'll get one.
We've all got four or five kids... and we've all buse a gut working, just like you.
Hey! Momento!
Momento, companeros... we've got militia comrades here who may know what's happening elsewhere... they've helped us here.
Teresa...
Pepe's right.
Our friends from the militia will have seen what's happened in other villages.
This is an open meeting you can speak, too.
Your opinions are as welcome as any of ours. Please speak.
It's your village. You have to decide. It's your decision.
Okay, this is what I think, and if anybody disagrees they should just say so right out.
Si. Okay. You should take this estate, this house, this land and divide it up amongst the people in the town right away.
Okay. The decree passed by the Republican Government in October allows for that.
Okay. It says all property owned by individuals involved in the insurrection will be confiscated.
Si, si.
The problem's different here... all the landowners help Franco.
We must collectivize all the lands.
You understand?
Todas las tierras, hay que colectivizar no solo dividir.
I understand that.
I understand that.
I'm not, I'm not a friend of the landowner. Okay?
I'm not here to defend landowners.
Okay?
But what are you going to do when you have a guy like, what's his name, Pepe?
What are you going to do when you have a guy like Pepe who has... he's a tenant farmer and he has a couple of acres of land... or a tradesman who doesn't want to be part of your collective? Okay?
These people are anti-fascists.
What do you do then?
It sounds really great on paper, but in reality it won't work... because it's going to pit the peasants against the anti-fascists. Okay?
You're fighting now and it's going to endanger your food production.
Lawrence, I think that private ownership of land must be totally given up, forgotten, cancelled... because it maintains people in a capitalist mentality.
I agree. Okay.
I agree with, I mean,
I'm not here to argue for, for private property.
I know the definition of private property.
I know what it does.
Okay, I'm not arguing that.
This is not the time for these textbook arguments on socialism or land reform.
We have to defeat fascism, that's the priority.
Are you suspecting this man to, to speak about the textbook of... socialism?
No, I'm not!
Well, I'm,
I'm agreeing with him. Okay?
I'm agreeing with the collectivisation, all right?
But these people cannot collectivise anything if they're dead. Okay?
Well, this is, is your opinion.
My opinion!
They asked for my opinion.
No, but in my village, the people didn't wait for the government to give them the land.
They took it themselves.
Nadie espero a que les dijesen que tenian que hacer con la tierra, la cogieron ellos mismos.
I want you to think beyond this village, okay at a much bigger picture.
Okay. I have no doubt that the Spanish people, on their own, could have 'licked' Franco.
But you're not fighting just Franco, you now have Mussolini and Hitler on your back.
Okay. With the exception of Russia and Mexico... the rest of the world has turned its back on you. Okay?
They refuse to sell the Republic arms.
Okay. These are capitalists, these are capitalist countries!
They're capitalist countries, and if you want their help you have to moderate your slogans cos you're scaring them away!
I'm from Germany.
We wanted revolution and what happened?
We'd been the strongest movement in Europe... the best organised workers' movement.
There were six million of us in unions and what happened?
Hitler...
The socialists and the communists told us... to make our revolution later.
But I say make the revolution now.
When people see as the village sees that you can be in charge of your life, your land, when collectivisation becomes a reality, it'll be possible for people in Germany, Italy, to follow our example.
These people think they have, they think they have something, but they have nothing!
But we have to show to the people that, that we have... we're poor but we're alive and we've got power now, we don't have to be seized by fear.
We're alive, we'll die when our time comes, but...
All French working people are, are looking to us in Spain, probably all around the world and I think it is not the right time to fight, to fight each other but together.
Now all of us know the price of the freedom and we, we've lost a lot of friends.
Gene, your kedas are very seductive but I've got one question for you.
Who are you trying to appease... foreign governments, foreign bankers?
What is a revolution?
It's nothing other than a radical change in privilege, wealth and power.
What's going to happen, what'... the only way we'll appease, the only way we'll appease these people when the ideas are diluted and watered down till they mean absolutely nothing.
Now I think you're dead right when you say when you say that they must look beyond this village, and must look at what's happening outside.
Okay, but not only to foreign bankers and foreign governments.
What we must look to as well is that outside these windows, as we speak, on this land are two million landless peasants.
From the day they were born they had absolutely no hope other than a life of misery.
And unless we harness that energy now the ideas will be dead, there'll be no change and this will all be in vain.
Ideas are the basis of this.
Jimmy...
Jimmy, those people will be dead never mind the ideas!
If Franco comes in, you know, if Franco wins this war he'll just kill a million of those people.
They're nothing to him.
They're just a piece of shit!
That's obvious, I agree with that.
Exactly. So, unless we win the war, there's no point in having the ideology.
The ideology does not exist in, in like, in a book.
It exists, has to exist in place.
It'd have to be real, for real people.
I say that we have to take risks.
What do we do?
Misery, hunger, hopelessness.
Franco might come back and kill us but I say it's worth it to continue collectivising and improving the quality of our lives.
Let's vote!
All those in favour of collectivisation.
All those against.
Friends, the vote is to collectivise the land.
You all right? Want a hand?
Yeah.
I thought maybe your foot was hurtin'.
It's okay, thank you.
No problem.
Hola.
Hola.
And you talk about being poor.
Who?
You. With Coogan that night.
We were just talking about when we were kids.
I tell you what poor is.
Two pesetas a day for agricultural labours if you're lucky.
Peasant families living in caves or sandpits that is poor.
That is why we need the revolution.
Don't laugh!
I'm not laughing.
I saw you!
I wasn't laughing!
D'you want a hand with that?
Oh, I can see you've got one.
Don't say any more!
What I'm saying, Kit, is that I'm not the man I was.
I feel like I'm standing on higher ground, if you see what I mean.
I can see further and, and I notice things
I hadn't even thought of before.
Like I, I left Liverpool with a daft romantic idea but in war people get killed.
Fellas like Coogan... and the women and kids who died in this village that's all part of me now and I'll never shake it off.
Fascist planes dropped leaflets on us yesterday saying how they was winning the war.
Well, myself, it's hard to know what's going on in the rest of Spain.
But here, on the Aragon front, we're holding our own.
And if only we had decent arms.
Who knows?
Perhaps a line of Russian tanks will come rolling over the hill.
Some hope, eh?
Pigat, Garibaldi, Roca...
Listen...
Max...
Come here.
Companeros, listen please.
I have to go to the Command Post for a very important meeting with the General Staff of the Column.
And I say, very important because we are going to discuss about our integration in the new Popular Army.
There is no choice.
The government in Valencia says no more militia and say we all must become part in the new communist led Popular Army.
Okay? So, if we refuse they continue to withhold arms.
To keep arms from us.
Do you understand?
Let's take a vote, no? Votamos?
I have something to say, please.
Please.
Excuse me a moment, please.
This is probably the last time that we can vote on something as a militia. All right?
Please.
Maybe we could integrate to the new Popular Army and get the weapons join together and be still in the militia too.
You're a dreamer, Pigat.
It's impossible.
Look, I think we have, we have to try to see the reality of the situation here. Okay?
Who's ever gonna give us guns, the Russians or whomever they're not going to give them to us if they don't think that we know how to use them and that we're not properly trained.
So it makes sense that the best training is going to come from a regular disciplined army.
That's obvious. I can't see what's wrong with that at all.
Everything is wrong.
The creation of the new army with its saluting and discipline and military hierarchy will destroy the revolutionary spirit of the people. Okay?
And it's exactly what Stalinists expect.
What?
That makes no sense, Bernard.
Absolutely.
The Communist Party was set up for revolution.
Why would they want to suppress the revolutionary spirit?
It is no more revolutionary.
Look, the militia is the heart of the struggle.
Stalin fears us because he wants to sign treaties with the west and he already did, did it with France.
So, to sign treaties, to reach an agreement... he needs to be respectable and reassuring.
Okay?
So, if he supports us and the revolution we are making... he will lost his... respectability.
That's the reason why we are a real threat for Stalin and also for the other countries.
I don't know, Bernard, I... what you are saying might be right,
I don't know.
I don't know. Okay.
But I do know we're not going to win this war with a bunch of amateurs.
You may be an amateur, I'm not!
Jesus Christ!
We've done, we've done okay up, up to now, Gene.
We could have done better with guns.
We saved Valencia,
Madrid, Barcelona... and we lost Toledo,
Malaga and more... we've got to be clear about one thing here.
There's blackmail going on.
If we accept those arms, they come with conditions.
They're not interested in partners, they want stooges.
Let's vote...
Let them know what we think.
Do we support our General Stafe when they insist on keeping our own revolutionary organisations?
Si?
Everybody?
Si.
It's a clear majority.
Now watch.
Put the bullet in here.
Yes?
Understand?
That's it.
You take off the catch and it's ready for firing.
Si...
Come on then, "Mr Laurel".
Remarkable resemblance. Remarkable.
Even down to the blank expression.
There you go.
You need to hold the rifle harder against your shoulder.
Fire.
Whey!
How's your shoulder?
You're afraid of the rifle.
Si.
Yes.
Hold it firmly like this.
You mustn't jerk the trigger.
Squeeze it like a woman's tits.
Understand?
Have you ever squeezed a woman's tits?
Yeah.
Yes? I'll bet you have.
Hold on a minute.
Fuck!
Come quickly.
I know.
Are you okay?
Get a stick.
A stick!
Hey, hey, try to keep calm.
Is he all right?
Yeah, yeah! I'm all right!
We must get him to the hospital.
What happened? What happened?
Fucking rifle blew up in my face.
Jesus! Piece of shit!
Jesus!
Are you satisfied now?
This is the shitty equipment you voted for!
Don't you have anything better to say?
Please give him some peace.
Don't you see?
Yeah, I can see. I see a stupid idealist with a death wish.
Can't you see what's going on here?
It's over!
It's kaput! It's finished.
Jesus, easy, easy man!
Oh fuck! I've had it!
I cannot stay here watching people die of stupidity!
I can't do it! I've had it!
I'm getting out of this! Fuck it!
David, if you had any fucking brains you'd do the exact same thing!
Davey, let me see your eyes.
Are your eyes okay?
Yeah.
Oh, you daft bastard!
How's that?
I'm all right.
Open your eyes.
I'm all right.
Open your eyes.
Easy...
How far is this place?
About four miles.
They patch you up and send you to the hospital in Barcelona.
When you get out of the hospital... you'll need somewhere to rest for a while before you come back.
Yeah.
I know a place, a pension in Barcelona where the people from the POUM stay.
Would you like the address?
Yeah, that'd be great.
Thanks.
You stay there yourself, this pension?
Yeah, sometimes.
I know the old lady.
You stay there.
Tell her my name.
I will.
I'll say: "Blanca sent me. Can you give me a nice room, please?".
Look after yourself, Blanca.
I'll see you soon.
Is this boarding house around here?
The Pension Adela?
Hello.
Do you have a room for me?
Who are you?
My friend Blanca sent me...
I like having English people, they are clean and tidy.
This is my room?
This is yours.
Si.
Hola.
Hello.
How are you?
Great. What are you doing here?
You're not pleased to see me?
Yeah. Yeah. Just shocked.
How's your arm?
Oh, it's much better now.
I had the stitches taken out two days ago.
What are you doing here?
Bernard gave me seven days leave.
I thought I would surprise you.
You definitely have, without doubt.
I bought some wine.
It's on the table.
I'll be with you in a minute.
All right, yeah.
Help yourself.
Pour a glass for me.
Si, claro!
Please.
How's Bernard?
He's fine.
You know.
Women aren't allowed to fight any more.
New rules.
Yeah, I heard.
I can be a nurse.
I can drive a truck.
I can be a cook.
But I mustn't shoot a gun any more.
I must know my place as a woman.
Maite is going to be a cook.
No!
Yes.
She will... she will be the worst in the militia.
Well that's without doubt.
It doesn't sound at all like her.
Things are changing very quickly.
Yeah? What did Vidal say about the whole thing?
No... please.
I don't want to talk about it.
All right.
Today I want to forget it all... bullets, trenches... politics, killings, betrayals.
I want to feel human for a change.
Salut.
Salut.
Take off your shirt.
What?
Come on.
Take off your shirt!
All right, all right.
All right.
It's got buttons, you know.
Take care.
What's going on?
The police from the old days.
And now they are back.
No guns for us at the front... and here in Barcelona the police have guns sticking out of their arse.
I'll make some coffee.
Do you have some matches?
What?
No matches.
Yeah, there's some matches in my bag.
What is this?
What?
This?
We get no uniforms like this in the militia.
Look...
I meant to tell you.
I'm not in the militia any more.
I've joined the International Brigade.
I leave for Albacete on Friday.
Stalinist!
Come on. Come on.
You vote!
You vote to keep the militia!
Yeah, but... things are different now.
I've changed my mind.
It's because of Lawrence?
No!
He left the day after!
No, it's not because of that!
I'm a member of the Communist Party.
I've never hidden it.
But you fought with us!
With the POUM!
Yeah, I fought with the POUM.
And look at the fuck that happened to me.
I've got a big piece of metal in my arm.
But you know perfectly well why!
You know they refuse us arms!
David! The Stalinists are betraying the revolution!
I don't believe that.
Go to La Batalla.
Talk to them there.
I haven't got to talk to
La Batalla.
I've been in hospital,
I was talking to others.
Our leaders have been expelled from the government.
That's politics.
That's the way politics works.
No! They are trying to ban us.
Say we are, we are social fascists!
And you know, you know this!
You know our papers are banned, journalists arrested and here they even talk about torture chambers.
Camaras de tortura!
I don't know that, do I? I'll wait till I see it with my own eyes.
But you don't see it!
You don't want to see it.
Why you didn't tell me yesterday?
I was going to tell you.
I meant to tell you, just...
Liar!
Come on, look. I've tried but...
Blanca...
I came to Spain to fight for socialism, to fight for the Republic!
And the best way
I can think to do that is with the International Brigades.
And if, if what you're saying is true then I'm sure there's a good reason.
There's an explanation of some sort.
Of course it's true!
And there is an explanation.
It's called Stalinism!
Look, what are you going to do now?
I go back to the front, where my real comrades are.
Oh look, come on! Blanca!
For fucks sake, Blanca.
Listen!
Blanca!
Look after yourself, will ya?
Please.
(GERMAN EAGLES
ON GUERNICA BOMBS)
So that's why I'm in Barcelona.
It's dead complicated, Kit, and difficult to explain.
The problem is the struggle seems to be falling apart in front of our eyes.
No-one trusts anyone any more.
Anarchists and POUM are pulling one way, communists in another.
It's mad. All I can do is believe the Party.
They must know what they're doing.
JOINT PLANS TO
BREAK MADRID FRONT
The city is like a powder keg waiting to go off.
Trucks of assault guards everywhere.
And now there's trouble at the telephone exchange which is run by the anarchists.
The police just took it by force.
They say the anarchists are sabotaging the war effort by interfering with government business.
There's fighting in the streets, barricades going up all over the place.
There's shootin's.
Comrades against comrades.
Fascist must be laugh that, that's all.
David.
The attack of the telephone exchange is a declaration of war against the working class... what are the POUM up to?
A general strike has been called in all industries except those producing weapons...
Plants, machine shops, warehouses... are stopping work.
The barricades of liberty have risen again in every part of town!
Arm yourselves to defend the revolution!
You should be killing fascists not one another!
What are you saying?
We've got nothing to eat.
D'you hear?
We've got to put food on the table.
Please get out of the way.
Sorry, friend.
I'm sorry.
Bastards!
Hey, you, Stalin's sidekick.
What division were you in?
The Karl Marx Division.
And you? The Third Division?
No, you bastard. We're from the Durutti Division, the best.
You don't even know who's your enemy. You idiots!
You idiots!
You have betrayed the revolution.
That's a lie.
You are the ones who have broken the anti-fascists front.
I've been at the front and I know.
Are you English?
Yeah. You?
Where are you from?
Manchester.
Fucking hell, I'm from Liverpool.
What you doin' here?
Don't know.
Why aren't you over here with us?
Why aren't you over here with us?
I don't fucking know.
We can smell food, fascists.
What are you cooking, bastards?
Sausages and beans. Are you hungry?
You bet!
Then here you are.
No more. Never.
We're not enemies.
My friend, Martin, returned from the front dying of hunger.
It's a disaster.
Which front?
Aragon.
When it's decision time, everyone is the boss.
They say they don't even know how to load the guns.
Get away!
They say the militia women aren't killing fascists, they are fucking them instead!
They fuck them.
They do nothing.
They're crap.
They're a disaster, they take
4 totally inexperienced men.
That's a lie.
I'm from the front.
I'm in the militia.
You're in the militia?
You're in the militia?
He can't even speak properly.
What? What are you saying?
Listen, you're a fucking kid.
You know fuck all.
Do you understand me?
Yes, a kid.
You don't know nothing.
You've seen fuck all.
What's going on?
Son of a bitch!
Quiet! You fucking know-nothing, you little snotty-nosed little kid!
What's going on? That's enough.
Are you mad, or what?
What do you think is going on?
If the leaders of the POUM and CNT get together, we're fucked.
That's what's happening!
They need to come from abroad to tell us that?
At least it's good that they're here.
Lazarus.
Yeah. Back from the dead.
Is that you?
Yeah. Gone but not forgotten, eh?
Has vuelto?
Si.
Roca! Andres!
Que tal amigo?
Yeah.
Are you a spy of the communists?
Si.
Fucking English. You're welcome.
Good to see you.
We have a new cook now.
Maite! Maite!
Fucking shit, the woman's doing the cooking...
Hola, amigo!
David!
David!
Si!
What are you doing here?
I came back for something to eat.
Oh great!
I heard you'd taken over the cooking.
No, seriously, what happened?
No, seriously, what's on the menu?
Seriously...
Fucking beans!
Go to hell, Pigat.
It's terrible!
Hola.
Fine.
And you?
So so.
What are you doing here?
Did you see with your own eyes?
Yeah.
Oh yeah, I saw a lot of things with my own eyes.
Things I didn't want to see.
All right?
Yeah...
Bueno.
Amiga.
I'm glad to see you again.
Si, si. Yo tambien.
The party stinks, Kit.
And I never thought the day'd come when I'd have to say that.
It's evil and corrupt.
In Barcelona I saw good comrades snatched off the streets and executed others disappeared into torture chambers, and it's still going on.
Stalin is just using the working class like pieces on a chessboard to be bartered, used and sacrificed.
Things have changed while I've been away.
Some of the old faces are missing because they couldn't stomach all the in-fighting and all-in-all we've taken a bit of a battering.
It's rumored we're going to make a big attack soon and still no weapons, no support.
But this one we're going to win.
Despite everything, our spirits are high.
Keep cover!
Viva!
Medico!
Medico!
We have had many casualties.
They're bombing us...
Liste... where's the cover you promised?
What kind of position is this?
Nobody's come.
You don't understand anything.
Nobody's come.
We can't hold on.
Those fucking Stalinist bastards.
This should have been over hours ago, mate.
They should have fucking taken that hill hours ago.
Trust them just to make a fucking point.
They've dumped us, Davey!
Madruga.
Si...
Ammunition!
Wait...
I'm waiting!
I'm not going anywhere, am I?
See we're hemmed in here, mate.
They know where we are.
Where are they?
Wher's the asaltos?
Never mind in fucking reserve!
We're fucked here... we can't hold this position any longer.
We must stay here.
No. We can't. We don't have any weapons. We don't have... we must show them what we are, Bernard.
Listen, they know exactly what's happening here.
Nobody's sending arms or the army.
We will die alone, here, and you will do their game.
We are fighters.
Bernard, we are fighters!
It's an order.
We're fucked here...
This is madness.
You've got to hold on.
Yes, sir.
Retreat immediately.
Why are you giving me this order when you've just told me to hold the position?
All right?
I also want to know... listen... why we've been risking our lives here waiting for the promised reinforcements. All right?
Whatever you say, sir.
Madruga, Andres, come here and the rest, quickly.
Garibaldi, Roca, we're going back to our old positions.
Come on, Roca.
Bernard, to the left with Jimmy.
David, cover this flank. Come on!
Quickly, orderly, orderly... go with them...
Come on, David.
All of you get back.
Come on... back...
Come on...
My fucking leg!
Blanca, come here.
Orderly. Orderly, there's a bad one, quick!
Stay with them.
Come on, Jimmy!
Be brave.
Oh, my leg!
Mira, mira, the cavalry have come.
If they've come to fight, they're a bit late for that one, aren't they?
Hey, Gene. Gene!
Gene... what are you doing here?
Gene, what are you doing here?
Take it easy.
Bernard, keep everybody calm.
Stay where you are!
Quiet, everybody.
What the hell's going on?
Listen.
Drop your weapons on the ground, immediately.
Obey the order!
What's going on, Lawrence?
Listen.
Es una orden.
What's the meaning of this?
Can we know why?
Officer, get your men to obey.
I refuse.
Obey my orders!
From now on this unit is disbanded.
You can all go home, except for the following who are under arrest.
Quiet!
Juan Vidal
Bernard Goujon
Miguel Angel Campos
Rafael Jimenez
Ni locos... what are we accused of?
The POUM is now illegal.
Your newspaper has been banned and your leaders arrested.
What charges?
Conspiring with the fascists... collaborating with Franco!
Is this conspiracy?
Is this conspiracy, Colonel?
Jesus!
It's a lie... it's a lie... while we've been getting fucking shot...
Don't look at the ground look at me face to face.
It's not a relection on you it's your leaders.
It's a Stalinist plot.
The fucking government's a load of bollocks!
Sietamo, what about Sietamo?
Alcubierre?
Come on, Gene, what about the people...
Lecinena?
Casetas de Quisena? Tierz?
Navales?
They're all places liberated by the POUM.
Were they fascists who did that?
What about fucking Coogan and the others, who died?
Are we all fascists all of a sudden?
Were these places liberated by fascists, too?
It was the men of the POUM who defended Madrid.
Were these places liberated by Franco?
Quiet! Obey my orders!
Prepare to fire!
Take it easy!
Take it easy!
Quiet!
What shall we do with the wounded?
Madruga, quiet!
You're under arrest.
Do as he says.
What happened in Barcelona with our comrades? Murderers!
They're going to shoot you...
Murderers!
Control your men, Captian.
Control your men, Captian.
Fight with us against fascism.
Fascist bastard, come here and say that face to face with us.
Come here.
Coward, coward, come here.
Blanca!
They have to do this.
Come here.
Coward, come here!
They have to do this.
You're being tricked.
You're being tricked by your own leaders!
You're being lied to!
Fight with us.
They're tricking you.
You are tricking us!
No, the leaders of the POUM are tricking you!
You are tricking us!
Lawrence, open your eyes!
Come here, coward.
They have proof.
Come here! Come here!
Blanca...!
Silence...
You idiots. God Almighty!
Silence...
Murderers...
Vidal... what the fuck did you do that for?
We've fought for nothing, comrades.
Why did you do that?
Why did you do that?
You bastards...
Murderers...
Murderers... we've fought for nothing, comrades.
Lower your guns.
Death to Stalinism!
Long live the revolution...
Open your eyes!
Long live the revolution.
Down with fascism.
Thank you very much.
We buried Blanca in collectivised land.
She would have liked that... even though the Stalinists came four weeks later and broke up the commune.
At least the earth belonged to her for a short while.
I'm trying to get home, Kit, but it won't be easy.
They have a "wanted" list ad, as a so-called deserter and supporter of the POUM, my name's on it.
There are no "safe" houses and we spend our time hiding out in building sites and living rough.
Some of the most sincere and dedicated fighters against fascism have been murdered.
But if you get this letter... understand that I regret nothing.
Revolutions are contagious, and had we succeeded here... and we could have done.
We would have changed the world.
But never mind... our day will come.
We shall leave them in the ground, but the earth is ours now, comrades, and from this place we must draw the strength to fight on.
The battle is long and our foes are many, but we are more... we shall always be many more.
Tomorrow is ours, comrades.
Can I just say something a minute?
The other day, I found this.
It was amongst, like, my granddad's papers.
And I just thought it was, like, fitting for him.
It's a poem by William Morris, and I'd just like to read it out.
"Join in the battle"
"wherein no man can fail"
"For whoseo fadeth and dieth"
"Yet his deeds shall all still prevail"
RABBI: Savree maranun verabonun verobotay
Baruch atah Adonai eloheynu melech ha-olam
Boray p'ree ha-gafen
Baruch atah Adonai eloheynu melech ha-olam
A-sher kid'shanu b'mitzvo-tav
V'ratza va-nu v'shabbat kaddsho
B'ahavah oov-ratzone hin-cheelanu
Zee-karon Pma-ah-say
Way-sheet kee hoo yom
T'cheelah Fmikraay kodesh
Zaycher leetzeeat mitzrayim
Kee vanu vachatah v'ohtahnu keydashta mekol ha-ahmim
V'shabbat kadd-shcha b'ahavah oov-ratzone
Hin-chal-ta-nu
Baruch atah, Adonai m'kaddaysh ha-Shabbat
Name?
Horowitz, Salomon.
(MANY PEOPLE
TALKING INDISTINCTLY)
Schneider, Sarah.
MAN 1: Birnbaum, Olga.
Over there. Over there!
Kommen Sie doch.
Isak Hudes.
Zucker, Helena.
MAN 2: Zucker, Helena.
Hirsch, Salomon?
Hirsch, Salomon.
Hauptman, Chaim!
Weisman! Weisman, Marcus!
Feber, Ludwig!
MAN 3: Feber, Ludwig.
Elsa Bauman.
Josef Klein.
MAN 4: Klein.
Davidowich, lgnacy.
Paula Biffer.
Nadel, Rachela.
Steiner, Gertruda.
Steiner, Hilda.
(GUESTS CHATTERING
INDISTINCTLY)
MAITRE'D: Jerzy, you know who that man is?
I don't know.
Let's get together, please.
Smile. Good.
Yes, sir.
Bring them over a round of drinks.
Very good, sir. And who shall I say they are from?
You can say they are from me.
From the gentleman.
Where?
Do you know him?
Find out who he is.
Yes, sir.
Agnieszka, I would give anything to hear you sing tonight.
(SIGHS) But I know you won't.
You embarrass me.
What's he doing?
Stay here.
How are you doing?
You'd leave a woman alone at the table in a place like this?
Sweetheart, you're the picture of loneliness.
Oh.
Mmm, what a lovely fragrance.
You are breaking my heart.
An extra chair, please.
Vodka for my friend.
And for the lady?
Pernod.
Im Grunewald, im Grunewald ist Holzauktion
lst Holzauktion
lm Grunewald, im Grunewald ist Holzauktion
MAN: Come to the table, girls! Drink with us!
Ist Holzauktion
Links um die Ecke 'rum, rechts um die Ecke 'rum
berall ist heute Holzauktion
Come to us! Marry us!
Der ganze Klafter
Ssholz kostet 'nen Taler
'nen Taler, 'nen Taler
Der ganze Klafter Sholz kostet 'nen Taler
'nen Taler. ..
Thank you.
I'll tell you what
I mean by cooperative.
Two days after the law is passed that all Jews have to wear the star, the Jewish tailors are turning them out by the gross in a variety of fabrics at three zloty each.
Tell me about your cellar wines.
I have an excellent German Riesling.
1937. Mmm, French.
A Bordeaux. Chteau Latour, '28, '29?
No, I'm sorry.
It's as if they have no idea what kind of law it is.
As if it's the emblem of a riding club.
A Margaux, '29?
No, no, we don't have that.
Burgundy then? A
Romane-Conti, '37? Yes.
It's human nature.
"We'll do this to avoid that."
That's what they have done since thousands of years.
It's what they do.
They weather the storm.
But this storm is different. This is not the Romans.
This storm is the SS.
Wem Gott will rechte Gunst erweisen
Den schickt er in die weite Welt
Wem Gott will rechte
Gunst erweisen
Den schickt er in die weite Welt
Faleri, Falera
Faleri
Falera-ha ha ha
Faleri, Falera
Den schickt er in die weite Welt
Martin.
Yes, sir.
Who is that man?
That's Oskar Schindler!
Faleri
Falera-ha ha ha
Den schickt er in die weite Welt
Faleri, Falera
Den schickt er in die weite Welt
MAN ON LOUDSPEAKER:
An alle Juden!
Ab sofort ist es alien
Juden untersagt...
Fleisch auf koschere Art zuzubereiten.
Meldung an alle Juden.
Ab sofort...
Rabbi...
Private property cannot be confiscated.
How long are the schools going to be closed?
I do not know.
"Article 47, pillage is formally prohibited."
You don't know anything!
I am familiar with the Hague Convention.
Religious...
They come into our house and tell us we don't live there anymore.
It now belongs to a certain SS officer.
Please. I only know what they tell me.
And what they tell me changes from day to day.
Aren't you supposed to be able to help?
I mean, what if I just took this thing off?
What are they going to do about it?
They will shoot you.
Why don't you stop this silly talk?
Itzhak Stern!
I'm looking for Itzhak Stern.
Are you Itzhak Stern or not?
I am.
Where can we talk?
There's a company you did the books for on Lipowa Street.
Made what?
Pots and pans?
By law, I have to tell you, sir, I'm a Jew.
Well, I'm a German.
So there we are.
A good company, you think?
Modestly successful.
I know nothing about enamelware. Do you?
I was just the accountant.
Simple engineering though, wouldn't you think?
Change the machines around, whatever you do...
You could make other things, couldn't you?
Field kits, mess kits.
Army contracts.
Once the war ends, forget it, but for now it's great.
You can make a fortune, don't you think?
I think most people right now have other priorities.
Like what?
I'm sure you'll do just fine once you get the contracts.
In fact, the worse things get, the better you'll do.
Well, I can get the signatures I need.
That's the easy part.
Finding the money to buy the company, that's hard.
You don't have any money?
Not that kind of money.
You know anybody?
Jews, yeah. Investors.
You must have contacts in the Jewish business community, working here.
What community? Jews can no longer own businesses.
That's why this one's in receivership.
But they wouldn't own it.
I'd own it. I'd pay them back in product, pots and pans.
Pots and pans.
Something they can use.
Something they can feel in their hands.
They can trade it on the black market, do whatever they want.
Everybody's happy.
If you want, you could run the company for me.
Let me understand.
They'd put up all the money,
I'd do all the work.
What, if you don't mind my asking, would you do?
I'd make sure it's known the company's in business.
I'd see that it had a certain panache.
That's what I'm good at, not the work.
Not the work.
The presentation.
I'm sure I don't know anybody who'll be interested in this.
(EXHALES) Well, they should be, Itzhak Stern.
Tell them they should be.
MAN ON LOUDSPEAKER:
Achtung! Achtung!
An alle Juden.
Ab sofort ist es verboten...
PRIEST RECITING: Vere dignum et justum est, aurum et salutary,
nos tibia semper et unique gratis agree:
Domino sancta, Pater omnipotent, sauterne Deus...
I've got a client who'll sell marks for zloty at 2.45-to-1.
Wool, mink collar.
It's a nice coat.
She'll trade it for ration coupons.
Wicks, for lamps.
You have a truckload of wicks?
What am I going to do with a truckload of wicks?
Nine by 12, nine by 14.
I don't know.
Big, beautiful, Persian.
Past.
What?
You don't recognize this?
It's shoe polish.
In metal containers?
You asked for shoe polish.
In metal containers. This is glass.
In metal containers.
It's not what I asked for.
What's the difference?
What's the difference?
What's the difference?
OTHERS: Shah!
My client sold it to his client, who sold it to the German army.
Only by the time it got there, because of the freezing cold, it broke. All 10,000 units.
Mmm, ooh, ooh, ooh.
This is not my problem.
This is not his problem.
This is not your problem?
This is not my problem.
All right.
The German army wants to find out where it came from.
I am going to make sure they find out.
Now it's your problem.
You, be quiet!
Metal containers.
Hello.
Pardon me for interfering, but that's a nice shirt.
Nice shirt.
Do you know where I can find a nice shirt like that?
PRIEST: ...laudare, benedicere et predicare.
Like this?
It's illegal to buy or sell anything on the street.
We don't do that.
We're here to pray.
PRIEST: Jesum Christum
Dominum Nostrum...
Do you have any idea how much a shirt like this costs?
Nice things cost money.
PRIEST: ...adorant Dominationes, tremunt Potestates.
Coeli coelorumque virtutes ac Beata Seraphim
socia exultatione concelebrant...
How many?
I'm going to need some other things, too, as things come up.
This won't be a problem.
From time to time.
MAN ON LOUDSPEAKER:
Achtung! Achtung!
OFFICER 1: Name? Adresse?
OFFICER 2: Formular ausfllen!
OFFICER 1: Weiter, weiter!
OFFICER 2: Nicht drngeln!
Kommen Sie hierher!
SteHen Sie sich doch an!
MAN ON LOUDSPEAKER:
Achtung, Achtung!
Alle Juden sind verpflichtet...
im abgesonderten jdischen Bezirk zu wohnen.
Nichteinhaltung der Meldepflicht bei der Einwohnerbehrde...
verstt gegen das Edikt 44/91 und fhrt zur Anzeige...
beim Militrgericht.
This is obviously the right place.
How are you doing?
Goodbye, Jews!
Goodbye, Jews!
Goodbye, Jews!
GIRL: Goodbye, Jews!
Goodbye, Jews!
Goodbye, Jews!
This iz the vechteka, Moyshe.
Ojciec.
Nyne, this kan neash zyane.
Oh, my God.
Oy, God. Oh, my God.
Oh, my God.
It could not be better.
It could be worse.
How? Tell me.
(SHOUTING) How on Earth could it possibly be worse?
MAN: Dzien dobry.
Dzien dobry.
Dzien dobry.
Dzien dobry.
Dzien dobry.
Dzien dobry.
Hey, Goldberg.
Poldek.
What's this?
The Judenrat has its own police now.
You don't say.
Ordnungsdienst.
I'm a policeman now, could you believe it?
It's hard to believe.
No, it's not hard to believe.
It's a good racket, Poldek.
The only racket here.
Look, maybe I could put in a good word for you with my superiors.
Your superiors?
Come on, they are not as bad as everyone says.
Well, they're worse than everyone says, but it's a lot of money.
A lot of money.
Give me my housing assignment.
Come on.
You look funny in that hat, Goldberg.
You look like a clown, you know.
STERN: He's a very important man. Just give him two minutes of your time.
Since when did time cost money?
Just sit down and listen.
Please. Sir?
For each 1,000 you invest,
I will repay you with...
Two hundred.
Two hundred kilos of enamelware a month, to begin in July and to continue for one year.
After which time, we're even.
That's it. It's very simple.
Not good enough.
It's not good enough.
Not good enough?
Look where you're living. Look where you've been put. "Not good enough."
A couple of months ago you'd be right.
Not anymore.
Money's still money.
No, it is not.
That's why we're here.
Trade goods, that's the only currency that'll be worth anything in the ghetto.
Things have changed, my friend.
Did I call this meeting?
You told Mr. Stern you wanted to speak to me.
I'm here.
I've made you a fair offer.
Fair would be a percentage in the company.
(LAUGHING) Forget the whole thing.
Get out.
How do we know that you will do what you say?
Because I said I would.
You want a contract?
To be upheld by what court?
I said what I'll do.
That's our contract.
...mielismy racje.
Piec, szesc, siedem,
osiem, dziewiec.
The standard SS rate for Jewish skilled laborers is seven marks a day, five for unskilled and women.
This is what you pay the Reich Economic Office.
The Jews themselves receive nothing.
Poles you pay wages. Generally, they get a little more.
Are you listening?
What was that about the SS?
The rate? The what?
The Jewish worker's salary.
You pay it directly to the SS, not to the worker.
He gets nothing.
But it's less.
It's less than what
I would pay a Pole.
It's less.
That's the point I'm trying to make.
Poles cost more.
Why should I hire Poles?
An enamelware factory over at Lipowa Street.
It's owned by a German.
But it's outside the ghetto, so you can barter for extra goods, for eggs,
I don't know what you need, with the Polish workers.
You can't get it here.
Also, he's asking for
10 healthy women for the...
I am healthy.
Bring your sister, okay?
(SHOUTING ORDERS
IN GERMAN AND POLISH)
Chodz.
You need to convince them you have a trade, something valuable to the war effort.
Like what?
What if you don't?
I'm a musician.
Your name goes on a list.
And they put you on trucks...
No, no, that's not true.
You're a musician?
Yeah.
I'd find a good hiding place if I were you.
I'm not going to hide like some animal.
There are places to hide.
Der Nchste!
I'm a graduate of the University of Lviv.
I used to work at the hydroelectric station in Roznw.
MAN: Blauschein.
I'm gonna get the necessary papers because this carol is no good anymore.
You can stay in this line all day, you'll still get one of these.
They are no good. You'll have to leave the line now, then you'll get a blue card, a Blauschein, to say that you are an essential worker.
I'll get these papers for you at Pankiewicz.
Pharmacist. Just there, look.
Guess who is here?
GOLDBERG: Poldek!
Enjoying the weather, Poldek?
Enjoying the lines?
Need some shoe polish?
In a metal container maybe?
Not essential? I think you misunderstand the meaning of the word.
No Blauschein, sir. Stand over there.
Move. Next!
What do you mean,
"Not essential"?
I teach history and literature.
Since when it's not essential?
He's a metal polisher.
It was not right?
It's very good.
He's 53 years old.
It's too new.
Mmm. Thank you.
You're crazy.
You left it in your drawer.
How many times have I told you?
Your work certificate you keep in your pocket at all times.
And you leave yours in your drawer.
How many times I've told you?
I'm a metal polisher.
Take the round sheet of tin, dip it in soap emulsion, then place it centrally in the press.
We obtain the soup pot.
The soup pot.
Soup pot.
Grosz, Mrs. Grosz, stay together.
Sir,
I have 10 work permits here for the Deutsche
Emailwarenfabrik cosigned by Mr. Bankier and myself.
FOREMAN: if it's carbonized, clean it with a file.
But don't touch both the electrodes at the same time.
You'll get electrocuted.
Here, have a try.
Roll the metal under the press, but be very careful unless you want your fingers to become part of the teapot.
Occupation?
I'm a writer.
I play the flute.
But Moses is a skilled metalworker.
He can make tin pots.
He can make tanks.
He can make whatever
Mr. Schindler asks.
He's highly skilled. Give him your card.
Moses, give him your card.
FOREMAN: Now, dip the basin with the tongs into the enamel solution.
And after swiveling it around, carefully place it aside to drip dry.
And whatever he asks you, allow me just to represent you and speak for you.
Don't say a word.
SCHINDLER: Filing, billing, keeping track of my appointments, shorthand.
Typing, obviously.
How is your typing?
Uh, all right.
Please.
You need a secretary.
Pick one.
I don't know how.
They're all so qualified.
You have to choose.
PHOTOGRAPHER: Prosze sie ladnie usmiechac.
 Big smile. Big smile.
Uwaga.
(PLAYING STATELY MUSIC
ON PIANO) if you would, look after my guest.
SCHINDLER: Boxed teas are good.
Coffee, pt, kielbasa sausage, cheeses, Beluga caviar.
Yes.
And, of course, who could live without German cigarettes?
Get me as many as you can find.
And some more fresh fruit.
The real rarities, oranges, lemons, pineapples.
I need several boxes of Cuban cigars. The best.
Yes. And dark, unsweetened chocolate.
Not in the shape of ladyfingers, the chunk chocolate.
Big as my hand, you sample at wine tastings.
Yes.
We're going to need lots of cognac.
The best, Hennessy.
Dom Prignon champagne.
Get L'Espadon sardines,
and, oh, try to find nylon stockings.
SCHINDLER: It is my distinct pleasure to announce
the fully operational status of Deutsche Emailwarenfabrik.
FOREMAN: Patrz jakies szmaty!
Manufacturers of superior enamelware crockery,
expressly designed and crafted for military use.
Utilizing only the most modern equipment,
D.E.F.'s staff of highly skilled and
experienced artisans and journeymen
deliver a product of unparalleled quality,
enabling me to proffer, with absolute confidence and pride,
a full line of field and kitchenware
unsurpassable in all respects by my competitors.
See attached list and available colors.
Anticipating the enclosed bids will meet with your approval
and looking forward to a long and mutually prosperous association,
I extend to you in advance my sincerest gratitude
and very best regards.
Oskar Schindler.
Yeah, I need 700 gross from here for next Thursday.
Nine hundred, no, make it 10 for Wednesday.
All this stuff here goes to Madritsch's factory on
Tuesday of next week.
SCHINDLER: My father was fond of saying,
"You need three things in life,
a good doctor, a forgiving priest, and a clever accountant."
The first two,
I've never had much use for.
But the third...
Just pretend, for Christ's sake.
Is that all?
I'm trying to thank you.
I'm saying
I couldn't have done this without you.
The usual thing would be to acknowledge my gratitude.
It would also, by the way, be the courteous thing.
You're welcome.
Get out of here.
SCHINDLER:
Klonowska, who is it?
She's so embarrassed.
Look at her.
You know something?
You would like her.
Oskar, please.
What?
I don't have to like her just because you do.
You would, though.
It doesn't work that way.
You've done well here.
You look wonderful.
Be careful of the step, miss.
Mrs. Schindler, Marek.
It's not a charade, all this?
How could it be a charade?
The clothes, the car, the apartment.
Wait a minute.
Take a guess how many people are on my payroll.
Oskar.
My father, at the height of his success, had 50. I've got 350.
Three hundred and fifty workers on the factory floor, with one purpose.
To make pots and pans?
To make money. For me.
Does anyone ask about me?
Back home? Everybody.
All the time.
Hmm.
They won't soon forget the name
Schindler here, I can tell you that.
"Oskar Schindler," they'll say.
"Everybody remembers him."
"He did something extraordinary."
"He did something no one else did."
"He came here with nothing, a suitcase, and built a bankrupt company into a major manufactory."
"And left with a steamer trunk."
"Two steamer trunks full of money."
"All the riches of the world."
Hmm.
It's comforting to see that nothing's changed.
You're wrong, Emilie.
There's no way I could have known this before, but there was always something missing.
In every business I tried, I can see now, it wasn't me that failed.
Something was missing.
Even if I'd known what it was, there's nothing I could have done about it, because you can't create this thing.
And it makes all the difference in the world between success and failure.
Luck?
War.
Should I stay?
It's a beautiful city.
I asked you if I should stay.
It's up to you.
Promise me, Oskar, no doorman or maitre d' will ever presume
I'm anyone other than
Mrs. Schindler, and I'll stay.
Goodbye, darling.
I could try to read this, or I could eat my lunch while it's still hot.
We're doing well?
Yes.
Better this month than last?
Yes.
Any reason to think next month will be worse?
The war could end.
What?
There is a machinist outside who'd like to thank you personally for giving him a job.
Every day he comes. He's very grateful.
It'll just take a minute.
Mr. Lowenstein?
I want to thank you, sir, for giving me the opportunity to work.
You're welcome. I'm sure you're doing a great job.
The SS beat me up.
They would have killed me, but I am essential to the war effort, thanks to you.
That's great.
I work hard for you.
I'm sure you do.
I'll continue to work hard for you.
That's great. Thanks.
God bless you, sir.
All right.
You are a good man.
He saved my life.
Yes, he did.
God bless him.
Yeah. Come on.
God bless you.
STERN: I'm sorry, Herr Direktor,
 but you're running very late.
This is for the Obersturmbannfhrer, sir.
And this is for his niece, Greta.
It's her birthday.
Greta as in Garbo.
By the way, don't ever do that to me again.
Go, go, drive!
Don't bow.
Did you happen to notice that that man had one arm?
Did he?
What's his use?
Very useful.
How?
Very useful! Success!
Achrar kach loe nedah...
OFFICER: Besen und Schaufeln werden ausgeladen
jeder nimmt sich eine und dann wird die Strae gereinigt.
We'll be late for work.
CZURDA: You shouldn't think of them as yours, Oskar.
You need to understand that some of the officers here don't give a damn about production.
To them, it's a matter of national priority that Jews be made to shovel snow.
It's got nothing to do with reality, Oskar.
You know it and I know it.
Jews shoveling snow, it's got a ritual significance.
Come with me.
I am an essential worker.
Essential worker?
Yes.
I work for Oskar Schindler.
Essential worker for Oskar Schindler.
A one-armed Jew?
Twice as useless!
Yes, yes.
I lost a day of production, Rolf.
LOWENSTEIN:
I work for Oskar Schindler.
Danka, look at the snow. Look at the snow.
Look at the snow!
I lost a worker.
I expect to be compensated.
File a grievance with the Economic Office.
It's your right.
Would it do any good?
Of course not.
A big shot from the SS Budget and
Construction Office came to lunch, and he told us that to believe the
Jewish skilled worker had a place
in Reich economics was a treasonable idea.
A one-armed machinist, Oskar?
He was a metal press operator.
Quite skilled.
Herr Direktor?
Shit. I don't believe it.
Stern, is that you?
No, it's Poldek.
It's about Stern.
SOLDIER ON PA: Leave your luggage on the platform.
Clearly label it. Given name first, then your surname.
Do not bring your baggage with you.
It will follow you later.
Leave your luggage on the platform.
Clearly label it.
MAN ON LOUDSPEAKER: Lassen
Sie Ihr Gepck am Bahnsteig.
Stern?
He's on the list.
He is?
Well, let's find him.
I'm sorry.
You can't have him.
He's on the list. If he were an essential worker he would not be on the list.
I'm talking to a clerk.
What is your name?
Sir, the list is correct.
I didn't ask you about the list.
I asked you your name.
Klaus Tauber.
Tauber.
Hauptscharfhrer, this gentleman thinks a mistake's been made.
My plant manager is somewhere on this train.
If it leaves with him on it, it'll disrupt production and the Armaments Board will want to know why.
MAN ON LOUDSPEAKER: Achtung, dieser Zug fhrt jetzt ab.
Is he on the list?
Yes, sir. Itzhak Stern.
Well, the list is correct, sir.
There is nothing I can do.
What is your name?
SOLDIER ON PA:
Close and secure all doors.
My name? My name is Kunder.
This train is now leaving.
Kunder.
Hauptscharfhrer Kunder.
K-U-N-D-E-R.
And what's yours?
Schindler.
S-C-H-I-N-D-L-E-R.
Gentlemen, thank you very much.
I think I can guarantee you you'll both be in Southern Russia before the end of the month. Good day.
CONDUCTOR: Zamykac dokladnie drzwi.
Dokladnie zamykac drzwi.
Stern!
Stern!
Stern!
Itzhak Stern!
Stern! Itzhak Stern!
KUNDER: Stern! Stern!
Itzhak Stern!
Stern!
Sir?
Stern!
Herr Direktor.
My apologies.
Stop the train!
He's here!
I apologize.
Stop the train!
Stop the train! Stop it!
Sign here.
Initial there.
Makes no difference to us, you understand.
This one, that one.
(TRAIN WHISTLE BLOWING) It's the inconvenience to the list.
It's the paperwork.
I somehow left my work card at home.
I tried to explain them it was a mistake, but...
I'm sorry, it was stupid!
What if I got here five minutes later?
Then where would I be?
Sacrean, sacrean end tzukeer.
Tzukeer end sacrean.
I woke up from a dream this morning.
I was broke and sharing a room with 12 people I didn't know, only to discover I was broke and sharing a room with 12 people I didn't know.
(CHUCKLING) You laugh about it?
I have to laugh.
You are living behind walls.
The walls I can deal with. It's the restrictions to my life I'm tired of.
Those walls keep them out.
That's all I care about.
I like it here. There's a kind of, I don't know, ancestral squalor to it all.
You are a slave to these people.
No one envies us anymore.
I'm smart.
Oh, yes, you're smart.
You're a real genius.
You had your chance.
Today, today I actually found time to organize a thought.
I can't remember the last time I did that.
When's the last time we did this?
When's the last time we stood around and talked?
No one ordered me onto a truck today.
No one took my business away from me.
You don't really have a business to take.
There's nowhere down from here.
This is it.
This is the bottom.
The ghetto is liberty.
This street divides the ghetto just about in half.
Right side, Ghetto A, civil employees, industrial workers, and so on.
Left side,
Ghetto B, surplus labor, the elderly and infirm, mostly.
Which is where you will want to start.
Do you have any questions, sir?
Ja, why is the top down?
I'm fucking freezing.
KUNDE: We expect a labor force of 25,000 to 30,000.
Segregated, of course. The men in the barracks near the quarry.
The women on the other side of the wire.
GOETH: My place is where?
There, sir.
There?
Yes, the villa.
You call that a villa?
Their synagogue, can you see it?
That's not a villa.
We're planning to turn it into the camp stables.
It's a house.
GOETH: What's that over there?
KUNDE: Kindergarten.
Fifty-one.
And we have a dentist, shoemaker, practical physicians.
There they are, sir.
(SNIFFS) Hmm.
One of you is a very lucky girl.
There is an opening for a job away from all this backbreaking work at my new villa.
Uh...
Which of you has domestic experience?
Ja, on second thought, I don't really want someone else's maid.
All those annoying habits I have to undo.
(CHUCKLES) I don't want to give you my cold.
What's your name?
Helen Hirsch.
What?
Helen Hirsch.
What? I can't hear.
Helen Hirsch.
Ja.
WOMAN: Take it all down!
OFFICER: To work!
WOMAN: Take it down!
It is not safe!
She says the foundation was poured wrong.
She's got to take it down.
I told her it's the barracks, not the fucking Hotel Europa.
Fucking Jew bitch engineer.
You fucking bitch!
Herr Kommandant.
The entire foundation has to be torn down and re-poured.
If not, there will be at least a subsidence at the southern end of the barracks.
Subsidence, and then collapse.
And you are an engineer?
Yes.
My name is Diana Reiter.
I'm a graduate of civil engineering from the University of Milan.
An educated Jew, like Karl Marx himself.
Unterscharfhrer!
Jawohl?
Shoot her.
What?
Herr Kommandant,
I'm only trying to do my job.
Ja, I'm doing mine.
But, sir, she's foreman of construction.
We are not going to have arguments with these people.
Okay.
No. Shoot her here, on my authority.
It will take more than that.
GOETH: I'm sure you're right.
Take it down, re-pour it, rebuild it.
Like she said.
We have more to see, but we have only one more hour of light.
GOETH: Today is history.
Today will be remembered.
Years from now, the young will ask with wonder about this day.
Today is history, and you are part of it.
Six hundred years ago,
(SINGING MORNING PRAYER) when elsewhere they were footing the blame
for the Black Death,
Kazimierz the Great...
Ke laolam chasedo
...so-called, told the Jews they could come to Krakow.
They came.
Not that fat. No, less.
They trundled their belongings into the city.
Yes, a bit less.
They settled.
They took hold.
They prospered in business, science, education, the arts.
They came here with nothing.
Nothing.
And they flourished.
For six centuries there has been a Jewish Krakow.
Think about that.
By this evening,
those six centuries are a rumor.
They never happened.
Today is history.
Absitzen und in
Zweierreihen antreten!
Kameraden! Schneller!
I think we will start with Ghetto B.
SOLDIERS: Hopp, hopp, hopp, hopp!
All right?
Start from both sides?
No, no, I would like you to start there.
The right side?
The right side, yeah.
And then move around.
All right.
MAN ON LOUDSPEAKER: Beschriften Sie es deutlich.
Es wird Ihnen nachgeschickt.
Lassen Sie Ihr Gepck stehen.
Beschriften Sie es deutlich.
Es wird Ihnen nachgeschickt.
SOLDIER: Aufmachen!
Lakoom.
Loe ani loe yodahat olay kaday lehachnese at hayladeem mitachat la shoolchan.
Mitacht la meeta.
Bohow.
SOLDIERS: Hopp, hopp, hopp, hopp!
(SOLDIERS SHOUTING
IN GERMAN)
SOLDERS: Runterkommen!
SOLDIER: Rauskommen, Juden!
SOLDER: Na platz!
Gold, Chaim!
Platz Chodi.
Gold, Chaim!
Yes, Chaim Gold.
Shoot him.
Nie zabijaj! Nie zabijaj!
SOLDIER: Ziehen Sie warme Kleidung an und begeben Sie sich zum Platz...
Keine Koffer! Keine Koffer!
Gehen Sie durch!
Keine Koffer! Keine Koffer!
Hey, little boy.
Wie alt bist du, he?
Na, wie heit du?
Wie heit du, eh?
Keine Koffer, hab ich gesagt!
Packt keine Koffer!
Keine Koffer!
Rber zum Platz Chodi!
Koffer hier lassen!
Blauschein.
Platz Chodi!
Was soll der Koffer hier?
Alles rber zum Platz Chodi!
(RUNNING FOOTSTEPS
APPROACHING)
We're getting out through the sewers.
I have to check if they're clear.
Mila, pack some things.
Nothing bigger than this.
I can't go in the sewers. I told you I won't go in the sewers.
You can go. Yes, you can.
I won't go in the sewers.
SOLDIER: Move! Over there!
Over there! Move!
Your card, Jew!
Define Papiere, Jude!
That line.
Deine Karte!
Ich geh nicht rauf wegen Deiner verdammten Karte!
Deine Scheikarte!
Was soll denn die Scheie?
Bist du denn verrckt geworden?
Mit diesem Scheigewehr httest du mich erschieen knnen!
Du hast so nah an mir vorbeigeschossen!
Was heit hier Entschuldigung. Du bist woh!
Verrckt ge Worden!
SOLDER: Zurckbleiben!
Zurckbleiben!
Nicht sprechen, nicht sprechen!
Einfach zu den Lastwagen gehen!
Weiterlaufen! Weiterlaufen!
Nicht sprechen!
Komm her, du Judensau!
Bleib stehen, hab ich gesagt.
Bleib stehen!
Chodzcie tu szybko!
She's good as dead.
Leave her.
Give me a moment.
Just let me bring her inside.
(MAN ANNOUNCING
IN GERMAN ON PA)
You can join her or join the line.
Women to the left!
Wilhelm!
Rose!
Men to right. Women to the left.
Women to the left.
Let me go!
I won't leave my husband!
Women to the left, and men to the right.
Promise me, be safe.
Your government is in the wrong country!
Mama! Mama!
Mila!
You have a Blauschein.
Blauschein doesn't matter anymore, they are cleaning out the ghetto.
There is not enough room for you.
What are you talking about?
We tried it before. There's more than enough room.
I changed my mind!
Mama!
Oh, look at the space in there.
Now look at me.
You are just scared.
I can fit the girl, but not you.
Mama, I'm coming out!
Stay where you are.
I'd rather you be here than who knows where.
Mama!
Herr Kommandant!
Very good saluting.
I respectfully report
I've been given orders to clear the bundles from the road, so there will be no obstructions to the thoroughfare.
Finish and join the lines, little Polish clicking soldier.
Mrs. Dresner?
Yes.
Oh, you are a friend of my son's.
Don't worry, I'll go quietly.
I'll be no trouble.
No, get under the stairs.
They'll be done searching soon.
You'll be safe there.
Please hide. Please.
...warmed by the sun.
Hide under the stairs.
BOY: I've searched the building.
There's no one here.
Also, gehen wir zum nchsten Block.
Einverstanden.
Danka!
Mama!
Hello, Adam.
Hello, Danka.
Come with me. I will put you in the good line.
(SOLDIERS SHOUTING
IN DISTANCE)
Do you know the saying, "An hour of life is still life"?
You are not a boy anymore.
I'm saying a blessing for you.
(CHILDREN'S CHOIR SINGING
OYF 'N PRIPETSHOK)
Oyfn pripetshok brent a fayerl
Un in shtub iz heys
Un der rebe lerent kleyne kinderlech
Dem alefbeys
Un der rebe lerent kleyne kinderlech
Dem alefbeys
Zetzhe kinderlech gedenktzhe tayere
Vos ir lerent do
Zogtzhe noch amol un take noch amol
Komets alefo
Zogtzhe noch amol un take noch amol
Komets alefo
Ofyn pripetshok brent a fayerl
Un in shtub iz heys
Un der rebe lerent kleyne kinderlech
Dem alefbeys
Oh, please, let's go.
Let's go, please.
Come on.
Zetzhe kinderlech gedenktzhe tayere
Vos ir lerent do
Zogtzhe noch amo!
Un take noch amol
Komets alefo
Zogtzhe noch amol un take noch amol
Komets alefo
Markieren.
Markieren.
Nie! Prosze pana, niech pan...
GIRL: ...nie znajdziemy!
Was ist das? Ist das Bach?
Nein, nein. Mozart.
Mozart?
Ja.
Das wollen wir heute noch schaffen?
Nee, schaffen wir nie.
Nee, schaffen wir nie.
I wish this fucking night were over.
OFFICER: Appell! Fnferreihen!
Antreten!
Halt, alle anstellen!
Los, los, Fnferreihen!
Mtzen ab!
Namen verlesen!
Wer aufgerufen wird, hebt seine
Hand und ein deutliches Jawohl!
MAN: Jawohl.
Keller, Fanni!
Jawohl.
Adalbert, Hermann!
Jawohl.
Faber, Dorothea!
Jawohl.
Goldstein, Pola!
Jawohl.
Warmberger, Markus!
Jawohl.
Edelstein, Max!
(SOLDIERS CONTINUE
SHOUTING NAMES)
Appell abtreten!
Do pracy!
The worst is over.
We are workers now.
OFFICER:
Keine Mdigkeit vorschtzen!
Oh, God, Amon.
(OFFICER SHOUTING
INDISTINCTLY)
MAN ON LOUDSPEAKER: Sofort in der Baracke zurckmelden!
OFFICER: Komm du mal schn her! Komm du schn!
Na komm! Na komm!
Amon, you're such a damned fucking child!
Wakey, wakey.
WOMAN: Make coffee.
Make it yourself.
MAN: The SS will manage certain industries itself
inside Plaszow.
A metalworks, brush factory,
another for reprocessing
Jewish clothing
from the ghettos for use by bombed-out families back home.
But it's private industry like yours that stands to benefit most
by moving inside the wire of
Commandant Amon Goeth's camp...
No, no, no. Sit, sit. Julian, how are you?
Good to see you, my friend.
Oskar Schindler.
Leo John.
Franz, good to see you.
Hello, Oskar.
Glad you could join us.
My pleasure. Julius.
How are you?
You lost weight.
Only in the shoulders.
Please, everybody, sit down.
How are you doing?
Oskar Schindler.
We started without you.
Fine. I miss anything good?
I was explaining to Herr Bosch and Herr Madritsch some of the benefits of moving their factories into Plaszow.
I meant the food.
Since your labor is housed on-site, it's available to you at all times.
You can work them all night if you want.
Your factory policies, whatever they've been in the past, they'll continue to be.
They'll be respected.
I have to know, where do you get a suit like that?
What is that? Is that silk?
Of course.
Ja.
It has a nice sheen about it.
Thank you.
Very nice.
I'd say I'd get you one, but the man who made it is probably dead.
I don't know.
SCHINDLER:
I go to work the other day.
Nobody's there.
Nobody tells me about this. I have to find out.
I have to go in.
Everybody's gone.
No. (SIGHS)
No.
They're not gone.
They're here.
They're mine! Every day that goes by, I'm losing money.
Every worker that is shot costs me money.
I have to find somebody else.
I have to train them.
We are going to be making so much money that none of this is going to matter.
It's bad business.
Thank you.
Leave the bottle.
Take that.
Lena, thank you.
Scherner told me something else about you.
Yeah? What's that?
That you know the meaning of the word "gratitude."
That it's not some vague thing with you like it is with others.
You want to stay where you are.
You've got things going on the side.
Things are good.
You don't want anybody telling you what to do.
I can understand all that, you know.
I know you.
What you want is your own sub-camp.
Do you have any idea what is involved?
The paperwork alone, and then you've got to build the fucking thing.
Getting the fucking permits is enough to drive you crazy.
Then the engineers show up, they stand around, they argue about drainage, foundations, codes, exact specifications, parallel fences four kilometers long,
1,200 kilograms of barbed wire, (CHUCKLING)
6,000 kilograms of electrified fences, ceramic insulators, three cubic meters of air space per prisoner.
I'm telling you, you want to shoot somebody.
I've been through it, you know? I know.
Well, you know. You've been through it. (SPITS)
You could make things easier for me.
I'd be grateful.
SOLDER: Aus dem Weg da!
SOLDIER: Weitergehen!
Weitergehen!
Where's Stern?
Goldberg and Chilowicz, make sure I see my cut from the factory owners in this camp.
Leaving you to take care of my main account, the Schindler account.
He wants his independence.
I gave it to him.
But independence costs money.
This, you understand?
Look at me.
Don't forget who you are working for now.
MAN: Jawohl!
SCHINDLER: Make sure he stays.
He's a slippery bastard!
We need more wine.
More wine!
Stand on my friend.
Don't let him leave.
(GUESTS CHATTERING
AND LAUGHING)
Was passiert denn in einem Leben
Prost! Prost!
Thank you, Herr Direktor.
Prost, Herr Direktor!
What are you doing?
What? Scratching my head.
Makes them think we have lice. Helps make them keep their distance.
Do you have lice?
Do you have your notebook?
The calendar on my desk has the birthdays of our SS friends' wives and children.
Don't forget to send something.
Record payoffs to the Main Administration and Economics Office, the Arm...
Slowly, Stern, slowly.
The Armaments Board, Governor
General's Division of the Interior and Chief of Police as "fees."
And make them on the first of each month, as opposed to individual payoffs to our SS contacts.
The list is in the lower drawer of my desk, which you...
"First of month..."
SS contacts list, lower drawer of my desk, which you handle as cash contributions to legitimate charities sent, of course, to each official's office.
Dealings with our black market contacts listed as suppliers in the legitimate ledger are more complicated.
Forget it.
What do you mean, forget it?
You can't forget it.
It gives me a headache.
It gives me a headache!
I couldn't get you out of here.
I'll be all right.
Anyway, I'm here almost every week.
Wednesdays, usually.
I'll look in on you, see how you're doing.
Here, put these in your pocket.
Come on.
Herr Direktor, don't let things fall apart.
I've worked too hard.
Thanks for... Good luck.
Achtung, Mtzen ab!
Work!
An die Arbeit!
What are you making?
Hinges, sir.
I've got some workers coming in tomorrow.
Where the hell they from again?
Yugoslavia, Herr Kommandant.
I've got to make room.
Make me a hinge.
Yes, sir.
Keep going, you're doing well.
Oh, that's very good.
But I'm a bit confused, and perhaps you can help me.
What I don't understand is that you've been working since I think, what, about 6:00 this morning?
Yet, such a small pile of hinges.
(GUN CLICKS) Oh, Christ.
May I try that, sir?
Check the angle lever.
Maybe it's bent.
No, no. You wouldn't hear a click if it was the angle lever.
Maybe it's the pin.
Maybe the pin shaft is greasy.
Ja, come on.
What did I just say? Here.
Herr Kommandant.
I beg to report that my heap of hinges was so unsatisfactory because the machines were being recalibrated this morning.
I was put on to shoveling coal.
Strange, huh?
Yeah.
Thank you, Muek.
Ah, Lisiek. Don't touch the leather, it's just been oiled.
Rottenfhrer.
Oh, for me?
Oh, thank you very much,
Herr Direktor.
STERN: Herr Direktor!
Herr Direktor!
Herr Direktor.
He was making hinges slowly.
So the man can turn out a hinge in less than a minute.
Why the long story?
Hmm?
Thank you, sir.
You're welcome.
Nobody knows who stole the chicken, hmm?
Tell him about the chicken.
A man walks around with a chicken and nobody notices this.
Save yourselves.
Tell him about the chicken.
Still nobody knows.
It was you.
You committed this crime.
No, sir.
But you know who, though.
Yes.
Who?
Him!
He's very gifted.
Yeah, sure.
Bring him over.
Sir. Thank you.
Thank you again, Herr Direktor.
You're welcome again.
It's an honor to work for such a great company.
It's great to have you.
I promise to learn everything there is to know about enamelware production.
That's great.
Hello? Miss Elsa Krause is here.
I only need five minutes.
She wants to speak to the Herr Direktor.
Yes.
He won't see you.
Please, sit down.
Pernod? Cognac?
No. No, thank you.
So, what can I do for you?
They say that no one dies here.
They say your factory is a haven.
They say you are good.
Who says that?
Everyone.
My name is Regina Perlman, not Elsa Krause.
I've been living in Krakow on false papers since the ghetto massacre.
My parents are in Plaszow.
Their names are
Chana and Jakob Perlman.
They are older people. They are killing older people now in Plaszow.
They bury them up in the forest. Look,
I don't have any money.
I borrowed these clothes.
I'm begging you. Please.
Please bring them here.
I don't do that.
You've been misled.
I ask one thing.
Whether or not the worker has certain skills.
That's what I ask and that's what I care about.
My father is an importer, not a metalworker.
Such activities are illegal. You will not entrap me! (CONTINUES ARGUING)
Cry, and I will have you arrested.
I swear to God!
People die.
It's a fact of life.
He wants to kill everybody?
Great!
What am I supposed to do about it?
Bring everybody over?
Is that what you think?
Send them over to Schindler.
Send them all!
His place is a haven, didn't you know?
It's not a factory.
It's not an enterprise of any kind.
It's a haven for rabbis and orphans and people with no skills whatsoever!
You think I don't know what you're doing?
You're so quiet all the time.
I know, I know!
Are you losing money?
That's not the point!
So the point is?
It's dangerous!
It's dangerous to me!
You have to understand. Goeth is under enormous pressure.
You have to think of it in his situation.
He's got this whole place to run.
He's responsible for everything here, all these people.
He's got a lot of things to worry about.
And he's got the war which brings out the worst in people.
Never the good, always the bad.
Always the bad.
But in normal circumstances he wouldn't be like this. He'd be all right.
There'd just be the good aspects of him, which...
He's a wonderful crook.
A man who loves good food, good wine, the ladies, making money...
Killing.
He can't enjoy it.
Bejski told me the other day, somebody escaped from a work detail outside the wire.
Goeth lined up everybody from the missing man's barracks.
He shot the man to the left of
Bejski, the man to the right of him.
He walked down the line shooting every other man with a pistol.
Twenty-five.
What do you want me to do about it?
Nothing, nothing.
We're just talking.
"Perlman."
Perlman!
Husband and wife.
Jakob and Chana Perlman!
Have Goldberg bring them over.
SOLDIER: Mtzen ab!
Appell abtreten!
(GUESTS SINGING DRUNKENLY
IN GERMAN)
I'm sure this will be better than those rags, Lisiek.
Herr Direktor, I was just helping
Lisiek to find something to clean the stains from the
Herr Kommandant's bathtub.
Go clean it.
Pardon me, Herr Direktor.
You don't have to report to me, Helen.
You know who I am? Hmm?
(WHISPERING) I'm Schindler.
Of course.
I have heard, and you have been here before.
Here, why don't you keep this someplace?
Go on, take it.
I get extra food here.
Well, if you don't want to eat it, trade it.
Or give it to Lisiek.
Why not build yourself up?
My first day here, he beat me because I threw out the bones from dinner.
He came down to the basement at midnight, and he...
He asked me where they were.
For his dogs, you understand.
I said to him,
I don't know how I say this.
I never could say it now,
I said to him,
"Why are you beating me?"
He said, "The reason
I beat you now is because you ask why I beat you."
I know your sufferings, Helen.
It doesn't matter.
I have accepted them.
Accepted them?
One day he will shoot me.
No, no, no, he won't shoot you.
I know. I see things.
We were on the roof on Monday, young Lisiek and I, and we saw the Herr Kommandant come out of the from door and down the steps by the patio, right there below us, and there on the steps he drew his gun and he shot a woman who was passing by.
A woman carrying a bundle.
Through the throat.
Just a woman on her way somewhere, you know?
She was no fatter or thinner or slower or faster than anyone else, and I couldn't guess what had she done.
The more you see of the Herr Kommandant, the more you see there is no set rules that you can live by.
You can't say to yourself, "If I follow these rules, I will be safe."
He won't shoot you because he enjoys you too much.
He enjoys you so much he won't even let you wear the star.
He doesn't want anyone else to know it's a Jew he's enjoying.
He shot the woman from the steps because she meant nothing to him.
She was one of a series, neither offending or pleasing him.
But you, Helen.
It's all right. It's not that kind of a kiss.
Thank you.
Shh.
Here.
Right. The wine.
Wonderful party, Amon.
Thank you.
Why do you drink that motor oil?
Hmm? I send you good stuff all the time.
Your liver's going to explode like a hand grenade.
You know, I look at you.
I watch you.
You're never drunk.
(SNIFFS) Oh, that's...
That's real control.
Control is power.
That's power.
SCHINDLER:
Is that why they fear us?
We have the fucking power to kill, that's why they fear us.
They fear us because we have the power to kill arbitrarily.
A man commits a crime, he should know better.
We have him killed, and we feel pretty good about it.
Or we kill him ourselves and we feel even better.
That's not power, though.
That's justice.
It's different than power.
Power is when we have everyjustification to kill, and we don't.
You think that's power?
That's what the emperors had.
A man stole something, he's brought in before the emperor, he throws himself down on the ground, he begs for mercy.
He knows he's going to die.
And the emperor pardons him.
This worthless man.
He lets him go.
I think you are drunk.
That's power, Amon.
That is power.
Amon the Good.
I pardon you. (LAUGHS)
GOETH: What do they want?
STERN: I don't know, but they're in my office now reviewing our books.
As my accountant, tell me, should
I be alarmed that the auditors are reviewing my books?
Well...
Or have you done your job properly?
You needn't be alarmed.
I needn't be alarmed.
(GASPS) I'm sorry, sir.
Do you know how much this saddle is worth?
Do you know how much it costs?
All right.
All right.
Stern, what the hell are you doing following me around?
MAN ON LOUDSPEAKER:
Baracken eins, elf
fnfzehn und zwounddreiig am Appellplatz melden.
She was smoking on the job.
Tell her not to do it again.
I have to report, sir.
I've been unable to remove the stains from your bathtub.
What are you using, Lisiek?
Soap, Commandant.
Soap? Not lye?
Go ahead, go on, leave.
Leave, I pardon you.
I pardon you.
WOMAN: Although I am not a rabbi, in these circumstances
I pray to the Almighty that he will forgive me if I intone the blessings.
Baruch atah hashem ehloheinu melech haolam
Asher tzivanu al haraayot
V'asar aleinu et haarusot
V'hitir lanu et han'suot
Al y'dei chupah v'kidushin
WOMAN SINGER IN CLUB:
Milosc tak pieknie tlumaczy
Zdrade i klamstwo i grzech
Choc bys ja przeklal w rozpaczy
Ze jest okrutna i zla
Milosc ci wszystko wybaczy
Bo milosc moj mily to ja
So...
This is where you come to hide from me.
I came to tell you that you really are a wonderful cook and a well-trained servant.
I mean it, if you need a reference after the war,
I'd be happy to give you one.
It must get lonely down here when you're listening to everyone upstairs having such a good time.
Does it?
You can answer.
But what's the right answer?
That's what you're thinking.
What does he want to hear?
The truth, Helen, is always the right answer.
Yes, you're right.
Sometimes we're both lonely.
Yes. I...
I mean,
I would like so much to reach out and touch you in your loneliness.
What would that be like,
I wonder? I mean...
What would be wrong with that?
I realize that you're not a person in the strictest sense of the word, but...
No, maybe you're right about that too, you know, maybe what's wrong isn't...
It's not us.
It's... No, it's this.
I mean, when they compare you to vermin, and to rodents, and to lice...
I just...
No, you make a good point.
You make a very good point.
Is this the face of a rat?
Are these the eyes of a rat?
Hath not a Jew eyes?
Ci wszystko wybaczy
Bo milosc moj mily
I feel for you, Helen.
To ja
No, I don't think so.
You're a Jewish bitch.
You nearly talked me into it, didn't you?
Didn't you?
Bravo.
GUESTS: Hoch!
Hoch! Hoch!
Bravo!
MAN: Bravo!
GUESTS: Hoch!
Hoch! Hoch!
On behalf of the workers, sir,
I wish for you a happy birthday.
Happy birthday
Well, the staff, please.
Thank you very much for the lovely cake.
Thank you very much.
Tell them thank you from me.
To ostatnia niedziela
Dzisiaj sie rozstaniemy
The trains arrived and the people were driven out with clubs.
They were lined up in front of two big warehouses.
One was marked "Cloak Room," and the other "Valuables."
And there they were made to undress.
A Jewish boy handed them pieces of string to tie their shoes together.
They shaved their hair.
They told them it was needed to make something special for U-boat crews.
And then they were herded down a big corridor to bunkers with Stars of David on the doors and signs that said
"Bath and Inhalation Room."
SS gave them soap.
They told them to breathe all the time because it's good for disinfecting.
And then they gassed them.
Mila, why soaps?
So that they would agree to go in, I think.
Come on, Mila, stop it. Your bedtime stories are scaring everyone.
Yeah. You know it's ridiculous.
I cannot believe it.
I didn't say I believed it.
I said I heard it.
From who?
From somebody who heard it from someone who was there.
You know, if they were there, they would have been gassed.
Yes.
It doesn't make any sense.
We're their workforce.
What sense does it make to kill your own workforce?
To go to all this trouble of assembling a workforce only to...
No, it can't be true.
We are very, very important for them.
WOMAN 1: Yeah, we do now.
Good night.
WOMAN 2: Good night.
WOMAN 3: Good night.
Sweet dreams.
MAN ON PA:
Attention, attention.
Everyone who is alive
is to come to the Appellplatz.
Attention, attention.
We have to go to the Appellplatz.
Everyone who is alive...
MRS. DRESNER:
The list makers are here.
...is to come to the Appellplatz.
There is going to be a selection.
Attention, attention.
Everyone who is alive
is to come to the Appellplatz.
Meine Herren.
Raz!
Dra!
Raz!
Dra!
...die Hunderttausend
Ungarn kommen...
(SPEAKING GERMAN
INDISTINCTLY)
OFFICER: Alle in einer
Einzelreihe aufstel/en!
You could afford to lose some weight, Amon.
And you've got to cut down on the cognac.
Morning.
What's going on?
It's another semi-annual physical.
There.
Oh, I've got another shipment coming in of...
What are they this time?
Hungarians.
Ja, Hungarians.
We've got to separate the sick from the healthy to make room.
SOLDEIR: Teraz! Teraz!
Gute Nacht Mutter
Gute Nacht
Das darf nicht
bis zum Abend dauern!
WOMAN: Let me help you.
SOLDER: Zack, zack, zack!
WOMAN 1:
We've got to go out there.
WOMAN 2: Don't go.
Look alive, Rebeka.
Gute Nacht Mutter
SOLDER: Naokolo!
Predzej! Predzej!
SOLDER: Naokolo! Naokolo!
Gute Nacht...
That's my mechanic.
Whose bright idea was it to get rid of him?
Ruszaj sie! Naokolo!
Szybciej! Szybciej!
Trzymaj ubrania!
Gute Nacht
Otworz usta.
Zajrzymy do gardla.
Wez gleboki oddech.
Jeszcze. Jeszcze.
Unies ramiona.
Obroc sie. Przykucnij.
(SOLDIER SHOUTING
INDISTINCTLY)
SOLDIER: Formowac kolmune!
Du hast verziehen mir
Du hast gewacht
No, no, no.
Wait, go away. She can work.
Come here. Look, separate the sick from the healthy.
Those who can work and those who can't.
She can work.
You can work, you can come.
SOLDIER: Ruszac sie! Szybciej!
Es war einmal ein kleines Bbchen
Das bettelte so wunders
Mamatschi schenke mir ein Pferdchen
Ein Pferdchen wre mein Paradies
Daraufbekam der kleine Mann
Ein Schimmeipaar aus Marzipan
SOLDIERS: Stehen bleiben!
Stehen bleiben!
Die sieht er an er weint und spricht
Solche Pferde wollte ich nicht
Mamatschi schenke mir ein Pferdchen
Ein Pferdchen wre mein Paradies
Mamatschi solche Pferde wollte ich nicht
Es war einmal ein kleines Bbchen
Das bettelte so wunders
Da kam das Christkind reingeflogen
Und schenkte ihm was er begehrte
Those not selected for transport, put your clothes back on.
HUJAR: Go back to the barracks.
Return to the barracks.
MAN: Go back to the barracks.
Oh, my God!
Ein Pferdchen wre mein Paradies
Mamatschi solche Pferde wollte ich nicht
Olek? Olek?
MRS. DRESNER: Danka?
Olek? Olek?
Olek! Olek!
Olek?
Danka?
Danka?
Olek?
OFFICER: Ab in die Baracke!
In die Baracke mit euch!
I didn't see him!
They're hiding. I'm telling you, they're hiding.
I know Danka. She knows a good place.
She took all of them together.
(WHISPERING) SOLDIER:
Zurck in die Baracken!
...mein Paradies
Mamatschi solche
Pferde wollte ich nicht
Find your own hiding place. There's no room for you here. Go away, quick!
Get out.
This is our place. Get out!
Oskar!
Amon. Gentlemen.
Why didn't you call me?
I tried to call you.
Here, Hujar, move.
Quite a picnic, huh?
Madritsch. Oskar.
They're running a little late, you know?
It's taking longer than I thought.
A drink?
Something cold. Bowle.
The Bowle.
Oh, another beautiful day.
Cisza! Spokoj!
Die Beladung der
Transportwagen ist beendet.
Wir sind abfahrbereit.
Wody! Wody!
Wasser... Wasser.
Wohlsein.
Oh, thank you.
What do you say we get your fire hoses out here and hose down the cars?
Thank you.
(CHUCKLES) Indulge me.
GOETH: Hujar.
Yes, sir.
Go bring the fire hoses.
Where's the fire?
SCHINDLER: In the windows.
That's it, that's it.
On the roof. That's it, good, good.
In the window, in the window.
Come on. Come on.
That's it, more, more.
That's it, that's it.
More, more.
This is really cruel, Oskar.
You are giving them hope.
You shouldn't do that.
That's cruel!
Come on, try and reach the far end. Look out.
MAN: (WAILING)
Water! More water!
I've got some 200-meter hoses back in Emalia.
I have 20 meters at home in my garden.
We can reach the cars at the end.
What? What?
Hujar.
Yeah, sure.
Don't forget the roof.
On the roof on the other side.
Scharfhrer, every time the train stops you open the doors, you give them water, yeah? Jawohl.
This car! This car!
SCHINDLER: I'm not saying you'll regret it, but you might.
You should be aware of that.
We will have to risk regret.
All right, sure. It's a nice day.
I'll go for a drive with you.
What about you?
I violated the Race and Resettlement Act.
Though I doubt anyone can point out the actual provision to me.
I kissed a Jewish girl.
Did your prick fall off?
GOETH: He likes women.
He likes good-looking women.
He sees a beautiful woman, he doesn't think.
I mean...
He has so many women.
And they love him.
Ja, they love him. I mean, he is married, Ja, but he's...
All right, no. She was Jewish.
He shouldn't have done it.
But you didn't see this girl.
I saw this girl.
This girl was, woof...
She was very good-looking.
They cast a spell on you, you know, the Jews.
When you work closely with them, like I do, you see this.
They have this power.
It's like a virus.
Some of my men are infected with this virus.
They should be pitied, not punished.
They should receive treatment.
This is as real as typhus.
I see this all the time.
It's a matter of money? Hmm?
You're offering me a bribe?
A bribe? No.
No, please. It's a gratuity.
Heil Hitler!
Hello, Amon.
Sit down.
We give you Jewish girls at five marks a day, Oskar.
You should kiss us, not them.
God forbid you ever get a real taste for Jewish skirt.
There's no future in it.
They don't have a future.
That's not just good, old-fashioned, Jew-hating talk.
It's policy now.
MAN: Ja, schn gefangen! Gut!
Nochmal, ja! Schn!
SOLDER: Also los! Bewegung!
Schneller hier!
Zack, zack, zack!
Beweg deinen Arsch!
Das geht auch schneHer!
Bewegt euch!
Schlaft nicht ein!
Nur die ganzen Fetzen, nicht das Gemse!
Komm, das kannst du mit den
Hnden machen, fass da vorn an!
Die Kleinteile lass liegen!
So ist es! Walhalla!
Walhalla luft hier!
GOETH: Can you believe this?
As if I don't have enough to do, they come up with this?
I have to find every rag buried up here and burn it.
The party's over, Oskar.
They're closing us down, sending everybody to Auschwitz.
When?
I don't know. As soon as
I can arrange the shipments.
Maybe 30, 40 days.
That ought to be fun.
SCHINDLER:
I've been talking to Goeth.
I know the destination.
These are the evacuation orders.
I'm to help organize the shipments, put myself on the last train.
That's not what I was going to say.
I made Goeth promise me he'll put in a good word for you.
Nothing bad is going to happen to you there.
You'll receive special treatment.
The directives coming in from Berlin mention "special treatment" more and more often.
I'd like to think that's not what you mean.
Preferential treatment, all right?
Do we have to invent a whole new language?
I think so.
You're staying, I take it.
In Krakow? What on Earth for?
What for? You have a business to run.
Of course, you'll have to hire new workers.
Poles, I guess.
They cost a little more, but...
What are you going to do?
You ran my business.
No, I'm going home.
I've done what I came here for.
I've got more money than any man can spend in a lifetime.
Some day, this is all going to end, you know.
I was going to say we'll have a drink then.
I think I better have it now.
Bible says And it still is news
Mama may have Papa may have
But God bless the child
That's got his own
That's got his own
Yes, the strong gets more
While the weak ones fade
Empty pockets don't ever make the grade
Mama may have Papa may have
But God bless the child
That's got his own
That's got his own
Money, you've got lots of friends
They're pounding on your...
GOETH: I don't understand.
You want these people?
"These people"?
My people, I want my people.
Who are you, Moses?
Come on, what is this?
Where's the money in this?
Where's the scam?
It's good business.
It's good business in your opinion.
Look, you've got to move them, the equipment, everything to Czechoslovakia.
Pay for all that and build another camp.
Doesn't make any sense.
Look, Amon...
It's good for me.
You're not telling me something.
I know them. I'm familiar with them.
I don't have to train them.
You're not telling me something.
It's good for you.
I'll compensate you.
That's right.
It's good for the army.
Yeah, of course.
You know what I'm going to make?
What?
Artillery shells. Everyone's making artillery shells.
Tank shells, they need that.
Tanks shells, ja.
Everybody's happy.
Everyone's happy, except me.
You're probably scamming me somehow.
If I'm making 100, you've got to be making 300.
And if you admit to 300, then it's 400, actually. But how?
I just told you.
You did, but you didn't.
Ja, all right, don't tell me.
I'll go along with it. It's just irritating I can't work it out.
Look, all you have to do is tell me what it's worth to you.
What's a person worth to you?
No, no, no, no.
What's one worth to you?
Poldek Pfefferberg.
Mila Pfefferberg.
And...
Uh... Stagel, Stagel...
Paul.
Paul Stagel.
STERN: Doctor.
The investors. I want all of them.
Yes, sir.
Fischer. Ismail Fischer.
Fischer, Ismail.
Josef Scharf.
One moment, sir.
I'm sorry, sir.
Come on, Stern.
Scharf, Scharf.
The children.
All the children.
STERN: Herbert Stier.
SCHINDLER: Thank you.
How many?
Four hundred, 450.
More, more.
Feigenbaum, Jakob.
Wolf. Wolf Wein.
Feigenbaum, Lutek, Jakob...
Nacha. Yes? Nacha.
Nacha, that's right.
SCHINDLER: And Wolf.
How many?
More.
SCHINDLER: You can do the same thing I'm doing.
You might even make money at it.
MADRITSCH: I don't know.
Come on, Julius, I know about the extra food and clothes you give them.
Paid for out of your own pocket.
If we make a combined approach, we could get more than 4,000 out, mine and yours.
Oskar...
We could relocate them in something like safety, in Moravia.
I don't know.
How many cigarettes have you smoked tonight?
Too many.
For every one... (COUGHS) you smoke, I smoke half.
I've done all I can.
I will not accept that.
No, Oskar, I can't do any more.
I will not accept that.
No.
How many? How many?
850, give or take.
Give or take what, Stern?
Count them. How many?
That's it.
You can finish that page.
What did Goeth say about this?
You just told him how many people you needed and...
You're not buying them.
You're buying them? You're paying him for each of these names?
If you were still working for me,
I'd expect you to talk me out of it.
It's costing me a fortune.
Finish the page and leave one space at the bottom.
You...
The list is an absolute good.
The list is life.
All around its margins lies the gulf.
Oskar, there's a clerical error here at the bottom of the last page.
No, there's one more name
I want to put there.
I'll never find a maid as well trained as her at Brinnlitz.
They are all country girls.
No.
No.
One hand of 21.
No.
If you win, I pay you
7,400 reichsmarks. No.
Hit a natural, I make it 14,800.
No.
If I win, the girl goes on my list.
I can't wager Helen in a carol game.
Why not?
Wouldn't be right.
She's just going to Auschwitz
Number Two, anyway.
What difference does it make?
She's not going to Auschwitz.
I'd never do that to her.
No, I want her to come back to Vienna with me.
I want her to come to work for me there.
I want to grow old with her.
Are you mad?
Amon, you can't take her to Vienna with you.
No, of course I can't.
That's what I'd like to do.
What I can do, if I'm any sort of a man, is the next most merciful thing.
I shall take her into the woods and shoot her painlessly in the back of the head.
What was it you said for a natural 21?
Was it 14,800?
Schindlerjuden to these tables!
Say your names clearly.
We are the family Dresner.
Juda, Jonas, Donata, and Chaja.
We are Rosners.
Henry, Manci...
And Leo.
And our son.
I am Olek.
Maria Mischel.
Chaim Nowak.
Wulkan, Markus.
Michael Lemper.
Itzhak Stern.
Rebeka and Joseph Bau.
Rosalia Nussbaum.
Wilhelm Nussbaum.
Jakob Levartov.
Farber, Rosa.
Farber, Andrzej.
Sara.
Friehof, Fischel.
Mietek Pemper.
Poldek and Mila Pfefferberg.
Horowitz, Dolek.
Adam Levy.
Marcel Goldberg.
Klipstein, Isak David.
Altmann, Eduard.
Grunberg, Miriam.
Luftig, Eliasz.
Hilmann, Eduard.
Erna Rothberg.
Zuckermann, Jetti.
Helen Hirsch.
The worst is over.
Men to this transport and women to this transport.
Be careful. Men to this transport and women to this transport.
Watch your step. Men to this transport and women to this transport.
Wonderful, Olek, wonderful.
You know how we make ice into water?
Olek, get another one!
MAN: Alle in einer
Einzelreihe aufstellen!
You'll be pleased with the level of efficiency I get from these workers.
Budzyn, under my command, was the envy of every other commandant in the labor camp system.
The prisoners, however...
Excuse me.
They would have rather been somewhere else.
SCHINDLER: The train with the women has already left Plaszow and will be arriving here very shortly.
I know you've had a long journey.
But it's only a short walk further to the factory, where hot soup and bread is waiting for you.
Welcome to Brinnlitz!
MRS. DRESNER:
Beans in cholent?
MILA: Beans are the best part.
DANKA: I don't like beans.
Beans and meat and potatoes and bread.
That's not the way you make cholent.
Eggs in cholent?
Yes!
DANKA:
I don't like cholent.
MRS. DRESNER:
No, you don't.
What do you like?
I like caviar.
REBEKA: One day on the fire...
Alle vorm Wagen in Position bleiben.
Alle in der Gruppe zusammenbleiben.
Wegbleiben vom Wagen!
Wegbleiben vom Wagen!
Wegbleiben vom Wagen, hab ich gesagt!
Schneller!
Dalli, dalli, dalli!
Was ist da hinten los!
SOLDIER: Schnell!
SOLDER: Los, raus mit euch.
Zack, zack, zack! Raus!
Dreiig, fnfunddreiig, vierzig, fnfundvierzig.
SOLDER: Aussteigen!
Where are the list makers?
Where are the tables?
Raus mit euch!
Hopp, hopp!
...bagaze w wagonach!
Dalli! Rausgehen!
Schneller!
Zostawcie bagaze w wagonach!
Schneller!
Los, ein bisschen schneller!
Mama, where are we?
They're in Auschwitz.
The train was never routed here.
A paperwork mistake.
POLISH WOMAN:
Szybciej! Szybko!
GERMAN WOMAN:
Die Schuhe werfen!
Schneller! Schneller!
Ubrania skladac!
Pod prysznic!
Zieht euch aus! Bewegung!
Bewegt euch! Stellt euch auf und zieht euch aus!
Rozbierac sie tam szybciej!
Schneller!
WOMAN:
Szybko sie rozbierac.
Dostaniecie mydlo i recznik i pojdziecie pod prysznic do dezynfeckji!
Szybko sie rozbierac!
Schneller!
Zabierajcie to mydlo i szybko!
Zieht euch schneller aus!
Bewegung!
Szybko! Szybko!
Sofort hinein! Schneller!
Pojdziecie pod prysznic!
Szybko!
Schneller!
Hinein zum Bad!
Schneller!
Schneller! Schneller!
Szybko! Szybko!
Tu wchodzic!
Blick hinunter!
Die Hand auf die Schulter!
MAN: How old are you, mother?
WOMAN: Sixty-eight.
Cough for me, mother.
They say to fall against the fence is a kindness.
Don't kill yourself against the fence, Clara.
If you do, you'll never know what happened to you.
How old are you, mother?
Sixty-six, sir.
Sir?
Good morning.
A mistake has been made. We are not supposed to be here.
We work for Oskar Schindler.
We are Schindler Jews.
Who is Oskar Schindler?
He had a factory in Krakow.
Enamelware.
A pot maker.
How old are you, mother?
You are not the only industrialist who needs labor,
Herr Schindler.
I remember earlier this year,
IG Farben ordered a trainload of Hungarians for its chemical factory.
The train came in through the archway and the officer in charge of the selection went immediately to work and sent 2,000 of them straight away to
Special Treatment.
It is not my task to interfere with the processes that take place down here.
Why do you think I can help you if I can't help IG Farben?
Allow me to express the reason.
I'm not making any judgment about you.
It's just that I know that in the coming months, we're all going to need portable wealth.
I could have you arrested.
I'm protected by powerful friends.
You should know that.
I do not say I am accepting them.
All I say is, I'm not comfortable with them on the table.
I have a shipment coming in tomorrow.
I'll cut you 300 units from it.
New ones.
These are fresh.
The train comes, we turn it around.
Mmm, yes, yes.
It's yours.
I understand.
I want these.
You shouldn't get stuck on names.
That's right. It creates a lot of paperwork.
Zoldinger, Ernestina!
Waldergrun, Hilda!
Waldergrun, Leonora!
Laast, Anna!
Pfefferberg, Mila!
Dresner, Chaja!
Dresner, Dan ka!
Nussbaum, Sidonia!
Rosner, Manci!
Hirsch, Helen! Grosz, Chaja Sara!
Seelenfreund, Estella!
WOMAN SOLDIER: Schneller laufen!
Schneller laufen! Schneller!
Schneller! Schneller!
Mach schon! Voran!
Los, los, los! Schneller!
SOLDIERS: Schneller!
Bewegt euch!
Bojcie sie! Bojcie sie!
No! No! No!
WOMAN SOLDIER: Mdchen, los jetzt aber!
Jetzt aber Tempo!
Danka! Danka! Danka!
No! No! No!
Hey! Hey! Hey!
What are you doing?
These are mine! These are my workers!
They should be on my train!
They're skilled munitions workers!
They're essential!
Essential girls!
Their fingers polish the insides of shell metal casings.
How else am I to polish the inside of a 45 millimeter shell casing?
You tell me.
You tell me!
Back on the train!
Back on the train!
Under Department "W" provisions it is unlawful to kill a worker without just cause.
Under the Businesses
Compensation Fund lam entitled to file damage claims for such deaths.
If you shoot without thinking, you go to prison, I get paid.
That's how it works.
So, there will be no summary executions here.
There will be no interference of any kind with production.
In hopes of ensuring that, guards will no longer be allowed on the factory floor without my authorization.
For your cooperation, you have my gratitude.
Come on, come.
SOLDIER: Mensch, seit Jahren hab ich so etwas nicht mehr gesehen.
SCHINDLER: Come on, boys, come.
Guck dir mal die Buddeln an!
PRIEST: Et dimitte nobis debita nostra...
sicut et nos dimittimus...
CONGREGATION: ...quotidianum da nobis hodie.
Et dimitte nobis debita nostra...
sicut et nos dimittimus...
debitoribus nostris...
No doorman or matre d'will ever mistake you again.
I promise.
...sed libera nos a malo
Itzhak.
This is Itzhak Stern, my accountant. Itzhak...
You must be
Mrs. Schindler.
It's a pleasure to meet you.
Emilie has volunteered to work in the clinic.
Very generous of you.
I know.
We need to talk when you have a moment.
This is my wife, Stern. I don't keep any secrets from my spouse.
Oskar, please, attend to business.
It's much more attractive.
Madam.
Hello.
What is it? We've received an angry complaint from the Armaments Board.
The artillery shells, tank shells, rocket casings, apparently all of them have failed quality control tests.
That's to be expected.
Start-up problems.
This isn't pots and pans.
This is a precise business.
I'll write them a letter.
They're withholding payment.
Sure, so would I, so would you.
I wouldn't worry about it. We'll get it right one of these days.
There's a rumor you've been going around miscalibrating the machines.
They could shut us down, send us back to Auschwitz.
I'll call around, find out where we can buy shells.
Pass them off as ours.
I don't see the difference.
Whether they're made here or somewhere else...
You don't see a difference?
I see a difference.
You'll lose a lot of money.
Fewer shells will be made.
Stern, if this factory ever produces a shell that can actually be fired,
I'll be very unhappy-
WOMAN: Hello, madam.
How do you do?
How are you doing, Rabbi?
Rabbi!
Good, Herr Direktor.
Sun's going down.
Yes, it is.
What day is this? Friday?
It is Friday, isn't it?
Is it?
What's the matter with you? You should be preparing for the Sabbath.
Shouldn't you?
I've got some wine.
In my office. Come.
RABBI LETARTOV: Savree maranun verabonun verobotay
Baruch atah, Adoshem eloheynu, melech ha-olam
Boray p'ree ha-gafen
WORKERS: Amen.
Baruch atah, Adoshem eloheynu, melech ha-olam
A-sher kid'shanu b'mitzvo-tav v'ratza va-nu
V'shabbat kaddsho b'ahavah oov-ratzone hin-cheelanu
Zeekaron Pma-ahsay v'raysheet
Kee hoo yom t'cheelah Pmikraay kodesh zaycher leetzeeat mitzrayim
Kee vanu vachatah v'ohtahnu keydashta mekol ha-ahmim
V'shabbat kadd-shcha b'ahavah oov-ratzone hin-chal-ta-nu
Baruch atah, Adoshem, m'kaddaysh ha-Shabbat
Gut Shabbos.
(WORKERS RESPOND) Gut Shabbos.
SCHINDLER: What?
Do you have any money hidden away someplace that I don't know about?
No.
Why? Am I broke?
Uh...
Well...
WINSTON CHURCHILL ON RADIO:
Yesterday morning, at 2:41 a.m.,
at General Eisenhower's headquarters,
General Jodl signed the Act of Unconditional Surrender
of all German land, sea and air forces in Europe
to the Allied
Expeditionary Force
and simultaneously to the Soviet High Command.
The German war is, therefore, at an end.
(KNOCKING AT DOOR) But let us not forget for a moment...
I think it's time the guards came into the factory.
Japan, with all her treachery...
The unconditional surrender of
Germany has just been announced.
At midnight tonight, the war is over.
Tomorrow you'll begin the process of looking for survivors of your families.
In most cases, you won't find them.
After six long years of murder, victims are being mourned throughout the world.
We've survived.
Many of you have come up to me and thanked me.
Thank yourselves.
Thank your fearless Stern and others among you who worried about you and faced death at every moment.
I'm a member of the Nazi Party.
I'm a munitions manufacturer.
I'm a profiteer of slave labor.
I am a criminal.
At midnight you'll be free, and I'll be hunted.
I shall remain with you until five minutes after midnight, after which time, and I hope you'll forgive me,
I have to flee.
I know you have received orders from our commandant, which he has received from his superiors, to dispose of the population of this camp.
Now would be the time to do it.
Here they are, they're all here.
This is your opportunity.
Or you could leave and return to your families as men instead of murderers.
In memory of the countless victims among your people,
I ask us to observe three minutes of silence.
RABBI LEVARTOV: Yitgadal veyitkadash shemey raba
Be'olma di'vera chir'utey veyamlich malchutey
Ve'yatzmach purkaney vi'ykarev meshichey
Bechayeychon u'veyomeychon u'vechayey di chol beyt yisrael
Ba'agala u'vizman kariv ve'imru amen
WORKERS: Amen.
Yehey sh'mey raba mevorach le'olam u'le'olmey olmaya
Yitbarach ve'yishtabach ve'yitpa'ar ve'yitromam ve'yitnasey
Ve'yithadar ve'yit'aleh ve'yiythalal
She'mey dikudsha b'rich hu
Yehey sh'lama raba min shemaya ve'chayim tovim
Aleynu ve'al kol yisrael ve'imru amen
WORKERS: Amen.
Thank you, Mr. Jereth.
Thank you, Mr. Jereth.
STERN: Open wide.
Thank you, Mr. Jereth.
Thank you, Mr. Jereth.
As soon as peace occurs,
I want...
I want that cloth distributed to the workers.
Two and a half meters each.
Also, each person is to get a bottle of vodka.
They won't drink it.
They know its value.
Likewise those Egipshi cigarettes we organized.
It'll be done.
Everything you ask.
We've written a letter, trying to explain things in case you are captured.
Every worker has signed it.
Thank you.
It is Hebrew, from the Talmud.
It says, "Whoever saves one life, saves the world entire."
I could have got more out.
I could have got more.
I don't know.
If I just...
I could have got more.
Oskar, there are 1,100 people who are alive because of you. Look at them.
If I'd made more money.
I threw away so much money.
(SOBBING) You have no idea.
If I had just...
There will be generations because of what you did.
I didn't do enough.
You did so much.
This car.
Goeth would've bought this car.
Why did I keep the car?
Ten people right there.
Ten people.
Ten more people.
This pin...
Two people.
This is gold.
Two more people.
He would have given me two for it, at least one.
He would have given me one, one more.
One more person.
A person, Stern.
For this.
(SOBBING) I could have gotten one more person, and I didn't.
And I didn't!
You have been liberated by the Soviet Army!
Have you been in Poland?
I just came from Poland.
Are there any Jews left?
Where should we go?
RUSSIAN OFFICER: Don't go east, that's for sure.
They hate you there.
I wouldn't go west either, if I were you.
We could use some food.
Isn't there a town over there?
CHORUS: Avir harim tzalul kayayin Ve-reiach oranim
Nisa be-ru'ach ha'arbaim
Im kol pa'amonim
U-v-tardemat ilan va-even
Shvuya ba-haloma
Ha-ir asher badad yoshevet
U-ve-liba homa
Yerushalaim shel zahav
Ve-shel nehoshet ve-shel or
Ha-lo le-khol shirayich
Ani kinor
Yerushalaim shel zahav
Ve-shel nehoshet ve-shel or
Ha-lo le-khol shirayich
Ani kinor
Heil Hitler.
Eicha yavshu borot ha-mayim
Kikar ha-shuk reka
Ve-ein poked et Har ha-Bait
Ba-ir ha-atika
U-va-me'arot asher ba-sela
Meyalelot ruchot
Ve-ein yored el Yam ha-Melach
Be-derech Yericho
Yerushalaim shel zahav
Ve-shel nehoshet ve-shel or
Ha-lo le-khol shirayich
Ani kinor
Yerushalaim shel zahav
Ve-shel nehoshet ve-shel or
Ha-lo le-khol shirayich
Ani kinor
15 sous!
I get in free.
Royal Household Cavalry.
You?
I don't pay!
I'm a musketeer.
It's the last time. Stay in the pit!
Come on.
You'll see great actors...
Montfleury, Bellerose... the chandeliers!
What's the play?
Clorise.
Who's it by?
Baltazar Baro.
A masterpiece!
To think I saw them play Rotrou here.
And Corneille.
Le Cid.
I was over there for the premiere.
Just give one snip to the lace.
Ragueneau! My friend!
Cakemaker to poets!
You're too kind.
Quiet, you patron of the arts.
He supplies all of us on credit.
Being a poet myself...
Some have said it.
For a little ode or sonnet, I pay...
A tart?
A tartlet, say.
What did it cost you to come here tonight?
4 fruit flans, 15 cream puffs.
Cyrano's absent. I'm surprised.
Why?
Montfleury's performing.
That ton of truffled pork?
He's playing Phedon.
Does it concern Cyrano?
Surely you know.
Cyrano warned him to quit the stage.
He's not playing?
He is.
Mr. Cyrano will not come?
I'm betting on it.
You're going?
Yes, I'm thirsty.
Stay a while longer. She'll come.
The lady's not coming today.
The bottle calls, I'm on my way.
I'm a stranger in Paris.
I must know her name.
Ask her then.
I daren't. The shame, the embarrassment...
O God, there she is!
Madeleine Robin or Roxanne.
Refined, Precieuse...
One of these preciouses...
Oh no!
An orphan and cousin to the notorious Cyrano.
A strawberry mouth in peach-flesh.
So fresh, she'd give one cardiac rheumatism.
Who's that? Tell me, I scared.
That's the Comte de Guiche.
Her lover?
He wants to be.
But one thing stands in his way.
What thing?
He's married to Richelieu's niece.
So he wants to see her married to that grim monsieur.
The viscount Valvert, so indulgent.
Roxane says no but de Guiche is potent.
He tortures the poor bourgeoise.
I wrote a poem Showing what an evil swine he is.
He must hate me for it.
The ending was cruel.
You're going?
Good night.
The play! The play! The play!
The French Academy.
Look! Porcheres, Colomby
Bourzeys, Bourdon...
Arbaud.
Many an eternal name in the hall of fame.
Let me go, I'll tell you a secret.
Well?
Ligniere, your friend.
Yes?
His life nears its end.
The victim of his song sends 100 men to do him wrong.
A hundred?
Against one.
One poor poet.
Go and warn him!
Where will they be?
At the Porte de Nesles.
No Cyrano. I lose my bet.
So much the better.
Montfleury! Montfleury!
Happy he... who far from court and city... ah, how good... breathes the essence of the vernal wood
And who, when the breeze sings melodies
Rogue! Didn't I order you off for a month?
What?
Who's that?
Cyrano!
I win!
King of fools... off the stage!
Moosieur...
You hesitate?
Play on!
Worry not.
Happy he who far from court and city...
Well? Do I have to take my stick, you clown and plant a wood over your gown?
Happy he...
Get off the stage!
Happy he who far from court...
I'm losing my temper.
Help me, gentlemen.
Carry on acting.
One word more, and I'll lambast your fat cheeks!
Enough!
Gentlemen, quiet please or my cane will take its ease.
Montfleury! Continue!
Discontinue, unless he needs disembowelling!
Off with him!
Monsieur...
Lug your guts away, salami, or stay... and I'll remove you slice by slice.
In insulting me you insult the Tragic Muse.
Montfleury! Montfleury!
Throw Cyrano out!
Consider my scabbard, pray.
She loves my sword, begs him stay.
Leave the stage!
Does anyone have anything to say?
Clorise! Play on!
Baro's play!
Sing the again and there'll be a massacre!
You're no Samson!
Fall silent!
I hereby challenge you all.
I'll take names.
Step forward young heroes, each in turn.
Come along...
Who wishes to head the list?
You, sir? No?
You?
No?
I'll give the first a funeral as his due.
Raise your right hand all who wish to die.
My naked blade offends your eye?
No names?
No hands?
Good. Let me speak then.
I wish to see theatre cured... of this inflammation.
Here's the lancet!
My lords...ladies and gentlemen!
Flock of muttonheads!
Bravo! Good! Bravo!
Let's have no bravos.
The famed thespian whose paunch you love so much felt sick.
He had to leave.
Bring him back.
No!
Yes!
What's your reason, sir?
Why show such enmity to Montfleury?
Two reasons, one will suffice.
Firstly, he's a terrible mouther grunter, grimacer and posturer who weighs down heavy on his lines.
Secondly, well that's my secret
You deprive us without a scruple of a great play!
Old mule!
The work is worth less than nought.
I silenced it without a thought.
Lord in heaven! Our Baro!
What of the money to pay back?
Bellerose, those are wise words.
I do not wish to see Thespis' robe full of tatters. Take this and go.
You're mad! That famous actor has the Duc de Candale as protector.
Do you have a patron?
No patron?
No name to protect you?
I said no twice. Must it be a third?
My patronness here keeps her word.
Turn and walk!
But...
Why are you looking at my nose?
Does it disgust you?
Not at all.
Is it soft and dangling?
I did not look at it.
And why did you not look at it?
Sickened you, did it?
Is the colour all wrong?
Is it obscene?
Not at all.
Why then do y ou criticize?
Do you find it too large in size?
It's terribly small, minuscule.
What was that?
Is that an insult? My nose is small, eh
Oh, God!
My nose, sir, is enormous!
Cretinous moron a man ought to be proud proud of such an appendix.
A great nose may be an index of a great soul - kind, endowed with liberality and courage... like mine, you rat-brained dunce unlike yours, all rancid porridge.
It would be grotesque to fist your wretched mug... so lacking as it is... in pride, genius the lyrical and picturesque in spark, spunk, in brief: in nose.
So take a boot instead to your backside
Help! Call the Guard!
A warning... to you who find my coutenance a source of sport.
Be you noble, my swift response is different altogether.
I strike with steel...and not leather!
He's a bit of a bore.
A braggart.
Who shall it be, gentlemen?
Nobody? Wait, you can leave it to me.
You...
That thing of yours... is ... very big.
Very.
That's all?
Yes.
Nothing more? There are fifty score varieties of comment. Nay, more.
Just change the tone. For example:
Aggressive: ''A nose in such a state
I'd amputate.''
Friendly: ''It must dip in your cup
You need a crane to hoist it up.''
Descriptive: ''A rock, a bluff, a cape!''
''No, a peninsula in size and shape!''
Curious: ''What is that oblong?
''A writing desk or am I wrong?''
Gracious: ''Are you food of birds?
''You provide a gothic perch for them...''
''to rest their feet.''
Truculent: ''A smoker? I suppose...''
The fumes gush out from that nose like a chimney on fire.''
Kind: ''It will drag you in the mire head-first with its weight.''
Tender: ''I'll have an umbrella made to give it some summer shade.''
Pedant: ''The beast of Aristophanes the hippocampocamalelephunt...''
''had flesh and bone like that up front''
Drama: ''It bleeds like the Red Sea.''
Impressed:
''What a sign for a perfumery.''
Lyric:
''Ah, Triton rising from the waters.''
''How much to view the monument?''
Warlike: ''Train it on the cavalry!''
Practical: ''Put that in a lottery for noses and it'll be first prize.''
And finally, with sighs and cries... in language deeply felt:
''O that this too too...''
''solid nose would melt.''
That is what you could have said or had an ounce of wit in your head.
But you've no letters save the three required to describe you: S.O.T.
Had you the wit required... to serve me before the crowd a dish of words... so proud... not a phrase would have passed your lips.
For although the words may fit
I'd never let you get away with it.
Valvert, leave him!
Arrogant, base nonentity without even a pair of gloves let alone the ribbons and lace a noble loves!
My elegance is interior.
I do not go out feeling inferior from an insult... which on the exterior leaves its mark of warning in libel and scruples in mourning.
I step out... smelling of scrubbed liberty and polished independance. Come see!
Let him be!
About gloves, you have me there.
I had one left over from a pair, which a was very attached to.
I left it planted on someone's cheek.
Cad, villain, clod...flatfooted fool!
And I'm Cyrano Savinien Hercule de Bergerac.
Buffoon!
What is it now?
I must...relieve these cramps.
It's lack of exercise.
Are you all right?
My sword has gone to sleep.
So be it!
With what joy... she wakens to that sound.
Poet, eh?
Yes, a poet.
Even when rattling ironmongery
I'll compose a ballade extempore.
A ballade?
I'll hit you on the final line.
No!
No?
''Ballade of a Fencing Bout...
''Between de Bergerac and a Foppish Lout.''
What is that doggerel?
It's the title.
Silence!
Quiet!
Wait. Let me choose my rhymes.
Good. Ready.
0 bare my head from crown to nape and slowly... abandon my cape
Then finally I strip my steel.
A thoroughbred...from head to heel.
Disdainful of the rein or bit.
I pull a lyric wheel but at the poem's end...
I hit!
Come, be burst...you purple grape.
Come and lose your peel.
Show, you ribboned ape the fat your folderols conceal.
A pretty peal.
Is that a fly?
Your blood will congeal.
For, when the poem ends, I hit.
I need a rhyme to hole the shape.
I'm going to wind the reel.
My rod is ready to rape.
The sharp tooth awaits its meal.
Not yet.
I stop a bit... awaiting the deal.
The poem ends and I hit.
Envoy!
Prince, pray to God and kneel.
Will you quit?
I cut, parry... off you reel!
The poem ended... and I hit!
Where will your life lead you?
You've so many enemies.
Wonderful.
You gave your gold away.
A year's pay.
All spent on one glorious day.
How will you live now?
I don't know.
A stupid action.
But a glorious gesture.
What rules the life you lead?
I forced myself to play many parts.
That was my way.
And now?
I'll take the simplest excel in everything, be the best.
So be it. Now tell me why you hate Montfleury so much.
That paunch!
One night I saw him touch a lady with his eyes.
Like a slug slithering over a rose.
What? How can that be?
The one I loved.
The one I love.
You never said anything before.
Whom I love?
Just think a moment.
I can never be loved even by the ugliest.
My nose preceeds me by fifteen minutes. Whom do I love?
It should be clear.
I love the prettiest far and near.
The prettiest?
The finest, the wittiest, the seetest, the wiset.
It's clear now.
Diaphanously.
Your cousin?
Yes.
Roxane.
Wonderful! Tell her you love her!
Tonight you're with glory covered.
Look and tell me what exuberance
I have with this protuberance.
I'm under no illusion.
True sometimes, bemused by the night
I see far off in the silver light a lady on the arm of her knight.
I dream of walking out in the silver glow with a lady so.
I get carried away.
I pray.
I forget all then see my shadow on the wall.
My friend...
My friend... why should Fate allot such ugliness, such loneliness?
You cry?
Oh no, that would be intolerable.
A tear on this nose, horrible!
I saw Roxane's face tonight.
For your duel it was ghostly white.
Your skill and courage ravished her.
Now dare to speak.
So she can laugh at me?
There's nothing I fear more.
Do they want you?
Her maid!
Sir, your cousin wishes to know if you can meet in private tomorrow.
She has things to say.
To me? Oh, my God.
After mass, where could you talk?
Where? I...er...Oh, my God.
Quickly please.
Patience!
Where?
At Ragueneau's...the pastrycook.
Where?
In...oh, my God... in the rue Saint-Honore.
She'll be there. You be there. At seven
I'll be there.
She wants to see me!
So goodbye to sorrow?
It means I exist for her.
Are you calm?
Calm? I'm gripped by lightning and thunder!
I need an army to tear asunder!
So much power, so much defiance take off the dwarfs and bring on the giants!
What?
We're trying to sleep! Less noise!
Grumblers, eh?
Why do they complain?
Ligniere!
Cyrano!
What's wrong?
He's afraid to go home.
Fancy that! Why>
A warning...a hundred men...
Because of a song I wrote...
Going to get me when
I go through the Porte de Nesles.
It's no my way.
I'm hiding here. They've let me stay.
A hundred? You'll sleep at home.
Come on. Follow and witness my deeds.
A hundred men?
That's what my force needs.
Why do they mount this attack?
He's a friend of de Bergerac!
Silence the God within you, Ragueneau.
The oven beckons.
Well, it must be so.
Your rolls are like an ill-tuned fiddle
Place the caesura right in the middle.
Your crusty house needs a roof on it.
Arrange your poultry on the endless spit... in neat alternatives: the chickens there... the lordly turkeys here.
Make a pair of rhymes in opposition sweetly set.
Poultry can be poetry. Don't forget.
Crust is the body, sugar the wire.
I thought of you.
A heavenly lyre!
Drink to my health.
Here comes my wife! Hide the money!
Do you like it?
It's ridiculous.
Paper bags? Well...
Thank you.
Heavens!
You've torn my books apart!
My friends' poetry, rent from my heart!
I put the rubbish to use.
Sacrilege, woman!
You insult our poetic Muse.
You defile verse.
It's all it's good for!
What would you do with prose?
Ah, my boy.
What do you want?
Three pies.
Here we are, good and hot.
Please...wrap them up.
In a bag?
Well of course.
''Like Ulysees, the day he left Penelope...''
Not that one.
''Blond Phoebus...'' No!
Make your mind up.
All right, all right!
Children...
Give me the poem and you'll take six pies home.
''Phyllis!''
Butter has smeared her sweet name.
''Phyllis''
What time is it?
Oh, my God!
Seven o'clock.
What a fight that was last night.
Which one?
In verse!
Ah, the duel.
In verse!
He's obsessed.
''At the poem's end...''
Not again!
''I hit. At the poem's end...''
Lovely! ''At the poem's end...''
The time?
Seven o'clock.
''I hit''. What a ballade!
Have you hurt your hand?
It's just a graze.
Some trouble or other?
No trouble.
I think you're lying.
Can I be alone with someone here?
I'm afraid not. My poets are coming.
For their first meal!
You'll be all right here.
Here they are!
Brother poet!
Tell her, I can't...
Write to her then?
That's it. Write a letter and leave.
Eat your fill.
The lyre sustains the poet!
A recipe in verse. Listen my friends!
Yes, yes, we're listening.
Breakfast?
Dinner.
''A Recipe for Making Almond Tarts''.
Poised on steady legs your poet begs several eggs.
Froth them to a mousse and introduce lemon juice.
Add milk of almonds sent down by Zeus.
Place your pastry, not too hasty in your tart plate.
Lightly glide around the side.
Slowly pour your mousse into the pastry base.
Bake in the oven till blond.
Melting mouths and hearts you have...
Your almond tarts!
Do you like cakes?
Terribly so.
Good. Take a couple of sonnets and fill them with eclairs.
Do you like cream puffs?
Yes!
Fresh pastries?
I love them.
Now go and eat outside.
But...
Come back when you finish.
Roxane...
This is indeed a blessed moment.
Often you ignore whether I still breathe or not.
But now you've come to say what?
First, thank you.
For what?
That viscount, that fop from whom you made a pretty crop.
A lord in love with me...
De Guiche? wanted me to marry.
A feeble disguise.
I fought then, cousin against such lies... not for my nose but your bright eyes.
The other thing is...
But before I mention it...
I have to rediscover the almost brother of our games way back.
When you spent the summer in Bergerac.
Little Roxane was called Magdeleine.
Was I pretty then?
You weren't plain.
You'd hurt your hand up a tree
I'd play mother and gruffly say:
''What's this scratch, pray?''
Oh, what's this?
No! Put your hand flat.
Still, at your age?
Where did you do that?
At play, near the Porte de Nesles.
A fight?
Hardly, it was just an argument.
Tell me, while I clean the wound how many were they?
Almost a hundred.
Tell me!
No. You tell me your story if you dare tell it now.
Now, I dare.
I breathe the perfume of the past.
Yes, now I dare.
I'm in love with someone.
He doesn't know.
Well, not yet.
But he will know very soon.
And he loves me too, but timidly from afar, without a word.
Give me your hand. How hot it is.
Love is on those lips of his.
And just think, dear cousin he's a soldier too and in your regiment.
He's a cadet in your company!
He seems so intelligent and clever.
He's proud, young, brave and handsome.
Handsome?
What's wrong?
Nothing.
It's just... just...my hand hurts.
Have you spoken?
Never.
He's a cadet?
In the Guards.
What's his name?
Christian de Neuvillette.
He's not in the Guards.
He is. From today on.
I've finished, sir.
Read the wrappers then!
My dear girl, you who love elegance and fine language what if he's a brute or savage?
His curls are those of a classical hero
His brains may be curly too, you know.
What if he's a fool?
I'll die on the spot.
I came here to be told this?
I don't see how it concerns me.
No...Listen.
Someone told me about the Gascons in your company
And how we treat greenhorns such as he?
I'm scared for him.
So you should be.
When I saw you calm those brutes last night strong and proud with all your might
I knew you'd frighten anyone.
All right I'll protect your little baron.
You'll take care of him then?
You're such a dear friend!
You'll be his friend?
Yes.
He'll never fight a duel?
I swear it.
Oh, how I love you!
I have to go now.
You didn't tell me your story.
It must be incredible.
Tell him to write to me.
Oh, how I love you!
A hundred men?
Farewell. We're friends, aren't we?
He must write. A hundred men!
You must tell me about it.
A hundred! What courage!
I've been braver since then.
He's here!
Incredible!
Wonderful!
Unbelievable!
Thirty wounded!
It was worthy of an epic poem!
Brilliant!
Unheard of!
Homeric!
Our hero.
He's wounded!
Capdedious!
No!
Just scuffed.
Hug me!
Tell us the tale!
The tale of the fight!
The tale!
Enough!
What's the matter?
Nothing.
She spoke to you?
Is that true?
Bravo for this new feat.
The word's spread wide.
There speaks an expert.
These gentlemen confirm the truth of it.
We were there.
A hundred against one.
Are you one of these mad Gascons?
A cadet.
One of us!
These young men are the notorious
Captain?
Would you present the company to the count?
He's in a foul temper. Well?
Not today.
I'll do it in his place.
Go on then.
The Gascon cadets of Castel-Jaloux.
Liars and gamblers
Gamblers and liars unashamed... more noble than..
Their lines are long
Their tempers short.
The Gascon cadets of Castel-Jaloux.
Eagle-eyed, always game
Cat's whiskers, lion's might nearer they came in boots to make them lame but with a heart so light for they thirst for fame.
Sweet is their name in the great fight.
Ever ready to main they put foes to flight.
The Gascon cadets make cuckolds every night!
A gentleman's retinue needs a poet.
Will you be mine?
I don't join retinues.
My uncle, Richelieu, would approve.
I could help you.
Good God!
I suppose you've written a play?
Yes, a tragedy.
The title?
Agrippian.
Take it to him.
Really?
He'll only change a few lines of it.
Never, sir. My blood runs cold to think one could be so bold.
You're proud.
You've noticed, have you?
Look, Cyrano.
We found this on our way feathers of the fowl you sent away.
The victims' remains!
Their employer must be in a fury!
But who was he?
It was I.
They were to do the lowly task of punishing a drunken rhymer.
A true epic poet!
You dared...
Would you like to return these to your friends?
You thwarted the plans I made...
To murder?
Insolence!
Swords up! We're leaving!
Out of here! All of you!
Monsieur, have you read Don Quixote?
I've practically lived it.
Meditate on the windmill chapter.
Chapter thirteen.
If you fight with windmills...
Are my foes like the wind? their heavy spars may spin you down to the mud.
Or lift me to the stars.
You must admit...
I shall never be sated!
I like to displease and be hated.
With more calm, fortune and fame
What should I do?
Seek out a powerful patron to pursue?
Cling to him like a vine?
Wind around him to fawn and whine?
And rise through ruse instead of merit?
No thank you!
Compose, as a rule poems for usurers?
Play the fool hoping to see some minister give a smile that's not sinister?
No thank you!
Breakfast off a toad?
Grovel on the dirty road?
Wear the knees of my breeches through?
And kiss feet too?
No thank you!
Find genius in imbeciles?
And let out shrtill squeals of regret when my name is missing from some gazette?
No thank you!
Be scared of being thought paltry?
Prefer social visits to poetry?
Write placets and be introduced?
No thank you! No thank you!
But sing, dream...laugh... move on... be alone... have a choice... have a watchful eye and a powerful voice wear my hat awry... fight for a poem if I like and perhaps even die.
Nevre care about fame or fortune and even travel to the moon!
Triumph by chance on my own merit.
Refuse to be the clinging ivy nor even the oak or the lime.
Perhaps I'll not get far.
But I'll get there alone.
You act proud and bitter.
But I know that she refused your love.
Quiet.
The tale of the fight!
Later.
No, now!
There's a thing you should never mention like a rope in a house where a man has hanged himself.
Look at me.
You understand?
Oh, his...
A word not to say if you wish to live another day.
Even a gesture can anger him.
Using a handkerchief puts you in a coffin!
Captain!
How do we tackle boastful Gascons?
Show them Northern courage.
The tale at last.
Well, towards midnight,
I was on my way to meet them.
The moon was like a watch up in heaven.
But, suddenly a watchmaker long forgotten pushed a light could of cotton over the silvery case of the round clock
Darkest darkness fell on the dock.
The gloom was hiding my foes.
You could see...no further...
Than your nose.
Who is that man?
He arrived this morning.
Really?
Baron Christian de Neuvil...
Good...
I...
Good...
Where was I?
Mordious!
You couldn't see your toes.
I was thinking that for some drunken poet
I was about to hit a great man...
On the nose.
In the teeth...
Tooth for tooth!
Why should I stick my...
Nose.
Finger...in that pie?
For a man so great could break my...
Nose.
My fingers!
I thought: ''On, son of Gascony.''
I then found myself...
Nose to nose.
Face to face! with a hundred angry louts stinking of...
Nose-herb!
Onions and stale wine!
I pounced...
Nose down!
I disembowelled two!
Impaled a thrid!
A sword went ''sneet''. I replied...
''Snout!''
Damnation!
Everyone out!
The tiger awakes!
Leave me alone with him!
He'll hack him to bits!
Terrifying!
Crumbs of cadet.
Hideous!
Come to my arms!
You're brave.
Very brave. Good.
Come on. I'm her brother.
Whose?
Hers!
Roxane's!
Her brother?
Well, a fraternal cousin really.
Has she...
Told me? Yes.
Does she love me?
Perhaps.
I'm so happy!
This is a change of heart.
Forgive me...
He is a handsome devil!
She wants a letter...from you.
Oh, no! It's impossible.
Impossible? Why?
Because I'm a brainless fool.
The way you tackled me was not brainless.
I can find words for an attack.
It's simple, military wit.
But...with women I become tongue-tied.
Their eyes look kindly on me.
But your words destroy you.
I can't talk.
I can.
But it's the looks I lack, see?
Oh, to speak with elegance.
Oh, to be a handsome musketeer.
Roxane is precieuse, demanding charming. I need wit...and eloquence.
I'll lend you it!
And I'll borrow your good looks.
We'll be a hero for storybooks.
What?
Can you learn by heart what I teach?
You mean...
You fear chilling her heart...
Will you or won't you?
Your look scares me.
Will you?
What's in it for you?
It...
It...would amuse me!
A tempting challenge for a poet.
Together as one, we can do it.
I'll be at your side you my beauty, me your guide.
That letter she wants! I can't...
Here it is! It just needs signing.
Don't worry. You can send it.
In a poet's pocket, you often find the product of an active mind.
Take it, you'll see. Take it.
It's very eloquent.
Will it suit her?
Like a pair of gloves.
Her love is such that she'll believe this is for her.
Dear friend!
Well?
Most surprising.
We can mention your nose now?
A letter of love composed in my mind to you... a lady so kind.
My soul next to the paper I sit.
All I have to do is copy it.
I'm in your hands.
This paper is my voice.
This ink, my blood.
This letter...is me.
In your presence confusion grips... my heart.
My tongue is in a fetter.
If kisses could be sent by letter
You cold read my words...with you lips.
Far from this world...of brutal lies is a land for lovers who despise violence, wepping for the lost the lonely.
A land for lovers and for lovers only.
Roxane!
We have to go! We'll be late!
We'll miss the talk on the Tendre.
Stay outside!
I came to say goodbye.
You're leaving?
For the war.
This evening.
For the siege of Arras.
There's a siege?
My going leaves you cold.
Not at all.
I'm afraid it does.
Shall I see you again? And when?
Did you know I'm now colonel?
Of the guards.
The guards?
Your boastful cousin's regiment.
I'll avenge myself there.
The guards are going?
Of course.
What is it?
Sadness. Someone leaves for war... someone one holds dear.
You never said such words before.
You say them as I go!
You want revenge on Cyrano?
Are you for him?
No, against.
Do you see him?
Seldom.
I see him everywhere.
Your revenge is to send him to the war he loves!
That's banal.
I know what would hurt him more.
What?
Leave him to rot in his barracks while the others go off to war.
The only way to hurt a man like him is to strike at his pride.
Oh, woman!
Only a woman could dream up a scheme like that!
He'll eat his heart out in frustration.
You'll be avenged!
You love me then!
I should like to see this as a sign of love, Roxane.
It is.
I have sealed orders to be given to the companies within the hour.
This one for the cadets, I'll keep.
Ah, the battle-loving swine.
You play games then?
Sometimes.
I'm mad about you!
Tonight, I must be gone.
But leave one so dear
Near here, there's a convent to which I'll flee.
The Capucins will hide me.
People will think I've left.
But, in disguise
I'll come back to you, sun of my skies!
But your reputation...
And the siege...
Who cares? Say yes.
No!
Say it!
You have your duty.
Go now.
Christian stays.
I want you for my hero, Antoine!
Heavenly words!
You love...
I'm trembling.
I'm going.
Happy?
Yes, dear friend.
We're going to be late!
Don't worry. They'll wait.
Cousin!
Ah, Cyrano...
Who are you looking for?
What?
Are you looking for someone?
Yes, I'm looking...for Christian.
He writes all day but, on seeing me, runs away.
Oh, help me, please.
What does he write about?
His passion stirs my mind.
His words leave me blind.
Come, quickly.
Coming.
Oh, how I love him!
Is he so eloquent?
More than you.
An expert in words of love?
An expert, sir, inspired from above.
Lysimon!
Oh, Felixerie.
Barthenoide!
Dearest Uranie!
Go and find him!
I want to hear words to charm my ear.
I want to hear him say the sweet words he wrote today.
Come on!
I must go.
The monkeys are waiting.
Look, the knocker's muffled.
It's silenced so its bevel won't disturb us... the little devil.
Ready your memory to be wreathed in glory.
What's that?
The words you'll say.
She wishes to hear you.
There's no time to waste.
Learn this. Make haste.
Learn it!
I won't learn a thing!
I'm tired of using your words.
I know she loves me.
I'll speak alone.
Really?
I can do it. I'm not stupid!
You've taught me a lot. I'll manage.
Anyway,
I know enough to take her in my arms.
You're on your own!
Wait! Don't go!
Mouth, a marvel when you smile.
Mouth, whose words are honey-cake.
Leave the admiring world awhile.
Kiss the dreaming gods awake.
Lovely eyes whose precious glance
Sets hearts shimmering like a lake.
Mirror of the stellar dance,
Lips, the marvel of all lips
Flowers that the bee-mouth sips.
Mouth whose breath is summer bliss.
Store of pearled perfection, this
Was made to kiss, to kiss, to kiss
Are you there?
It's me.
No, wait...
The air is sweet.
Night is here.
We're alone.
Come on.
Sit down.
Speak.
I'll listen.
I love you.
Yes. Talk to me of love.
I love you.
That's your theme.
Embroider it.
Embroider it.
Embroider it.
I love you so much.
Yes. And then?
And then...
I'd love you to love me.
Tell me you love me.
You give me milk instead of cream.
Say how you love me.
I love you...so much.
Unravel your feelings!
Your throat! I want to kiss it!
I love you!
Again!
No...
I don't love you.
That's better.
I worship you!
Oh, no!
Sorry! I'm so stupid!
It displeases me as much as if you were ugly!
Recover your eloquence.
Yes, I know.
Please...
You love me. I know. Now go!
Bravo!
Good night.
Who's there?
Who's throwing stones?
It's me.
Who?
I wanted to...
Oh, you...
I want a word.
You have no words.
I beg you...
That would be fatal to our love!
You love me no more.
Heavens, you say that... when I love more.
That's better!
Love grows, rocked in my soul as I fret
And that cruel child too it for...
A bassinet!
That's better!
But since it's cruel... should you not have stifled it in its cot?
I did try...the young child to seize.
But the new-born babe is a little...
Hercules.
Much better!
His first act was to hound out two snakes...
Pride and...
Doubt.
That's excellent.
But why are your words so hesitant? Why?
It's dark...
They grope in the darkness... looking for...your ear.
My words have not that problem.
It's normal they should find their way.
For it's upon my heart they prey.
My heart is large whereas your ear is small.
Besides, your words slip down speedily along the wall.
Mine are heavy like fruit on a bough.
They're arriving faster now.
They're used to the exercise.
I'm standing here in the skies!
One harsh word from so high could make my heart die.
I'll come down.
No!
Climb up here!
No!
Why...no?
Let us stay near... but talk without seeing each other...
Without seeing?
It's quite wonderful...in darkness.
You see a cloak of blackness.
I see a dress of summer white.
I'm but a shadow. You are a light.
I'm using my true voice.
Indeed, it is altered.
In this dark night... which protects me, I can be myself.
And I dare...
Where was I?
I don't know...all this...
Forgive my emotion.
It's this sweet, new sensation.
New, you say?
Yes, new. I can be honest.
Fear of mockery gripped my breast.
Mockery?
For my feelings!
My heart in modesty, cloaks itself in art!
Ah, ''art''. How I hate that in love!
It's a crime, in love, to play this pantomime.
There always has to come a moment...
And I pity those who know it not. when we a noble love attain but each pretty word causes pain.
So what word will you find for us when that moment comes?
All those, all those... which come. Everything, I throw away.
I'm stifling!
I love you. This is no game!
My heart cries your name!
I've loved you every passing pay.
Last year, on the twelfth of May you changed the style of your hair.
I was dazzled...by its bright flare.
Do you feel my soul rise up through the darkness?
Everything tonight is so wonderful so sweet.
I speak, you listen.
Me, at your feet!
Even in my sweetest dreams,
I never planned on this.
My purpose is fullfilled.
Now I can die.
My poem makers her tremble in the boughs.
I can feel the shaking of your hand come down along... this jasmine strand.
I tremble and weep.
I love you.
You have bewitched me.
Death may come for me.
This bewitchment is my doing.
I have done this!
I ask only one thing...
A kiss!
What? What do you ask?
Yes...I...
Too hasty!
Make the most of it!
Yes, true, I did ask...
For heaven's sake!
I know now I was too bold.
So...No!
Grant me not a kiss.
Why?
Quiet, Christian!
What did you say?
I'm grumbling at myself for going so far. I said:
''Quiet, Christian.''
Wait.
Get that kiss! patience!
Where are you?
We were talking of a kiss.
Yes, the word is so sweet.
Be silent!
How shall we define a kiss?
The seal set on a promise.
A promissory note... on the bank of love.
The O of love on waiting lips.
A secret with the mouth as its ear.
Eternity in the instant the bee sips.
A flower-scented host.
A way to know the other's heart and touch the portals... of his soul!
Stop, please!
Yes, I shall stop, madam.
Up you go!
I don't think I should...
Are you still there?
Mount, you animal!
Yes? What?
Magdeleine Robin...Does she live here?
Yes, I'm her cousin. What is it?
I have a letter for her.
What is it?
A letter.
You, here?
Who could write so late?
A sacred matter no doubt as a holy man...
De Guiche!
He dares?
I've stayed here for this night with you, my dear.
I'll come in secret. Wait...
I hope the lips which smiled of late...
Father!
Listen carefully to this
Richelieu must be obeyed whatever you may say or do.
That is why I send this note to you with this holy, intelligent and discreet brother.
He is to perform the marriage ceremony at once.
Marriage? To whom?
At once.
What is this?
Idiot. She's making it up.
You must marry Christian.
I know you don't like him.
Try to be brave.
Courage, child!
I was right not to be worried.
It was indeed a holy matter.
It's terrible!
Is it you?
Him.
He doesn't seem so terrible.
Are you sure?
Postscript:
Give the convent 120 pistoles.
What a holy man!
Resign yourself!
I am resigned.
We must marry.
We must obey.
Do you so wish it?
Yes or no?
I think so.
Hurry. De Guiche is coming.
You've fifteen minutes to do the wedding!
You'll be my witness. Hurry.
On your feet!
Witness to what?
Hurry! Candles! A cloth!
A crucifix!
The rings!
What rings?
And blessed laurel!
Who is this? Where did he fall from?
The moon!
What time is it, earthman?
Who is it? I can't see. Is he mad?
What time? What land?
What day? What season?
I'm confused.
I fell down from the moon!
Really!
I fell.
If you say so.
A madman, perhaps.
I don't mean metaphorically.
A century or a minute withal how long was my fall?
I was in that saffron-coloured ball.
What continent is this?
Be honest. Keep nothing from me.
God in Heaven!
Are you all black down here?
What?
Is this Algeria?
This is a mask.
So I'm in Venice, or Genoa!
A lady awaits me.
This is Paris then!
Amusing, isn't he?
You laugh.
Yes, but I want to pass.
So here I am in Paris.
I was brought by the rain to this.
I came through ether to get here.
My eyes are full of star-dust.
My spurs bear some planet's crust.
Here, on my doublet a hair from a comet's tail!
I slipped by Neptune's fork... and fell onto Libra's scales.
See? They point to my weight!
Go to hell, sir!
By heaven, do you doubt my word?
He's here!
Oh, my God!
Hurry father!
Why should we hurry a prayer.
That's enough!
Take that off!
My mask!
No more mask!
I'll tell you about the moon and the inhabitants of its rotundity.
Can you tell how I got there by means lighter than air?
Guess!
He's a madman.
The tide!
The moon pulls the sea so wide!
I lay on the sand after a dip.
The moon had my head in its grip for the air holds water in.
I rose straight up in the air like a cherubin.
I know that voice!
I must be drunk!
Fifteen minutes are over
I'll let you go.
The wedding's done.
Open up, it's Cyrano!
They've just exchanged rings.
A fine couple, my son, tanks to you.
Take leave of your husband.
What?
Your regiment's about to go.
For war?
Doubtless.
Not the cadets.
They're going.
Here's the order.
Run and deliver it, baron.
Obey, sir!
What are you waiting for?
Hurry up.
The wedding night can wait!
My sorrow is not as great as he believes.
You're leaving too!
Promise me you'll keep him out of danger.
I'll try...
Make sure he doesn't catch cold.
I'll do my best.
Make him faithful.
Well...
Make him write to me.
That, I can promise.
Wounded?
No. They're used to missing me every morning.
You're mad to risk death every day for a letter.
I promised he'd write.
But don't tell him.
If she knew he's starving... but still handsome.
Go and sleep.
Don't grumble. I told you:
I cross the Spanish lines when they're drunk.
You could bring back food.
I can't. I have to travel light.
We, the besiegers, are now the besieged
The shame of it!
Will you get some sleep?
When I finish.
What?
Another letter.
Calm down, lads!
Stop it! That's enough!
What is it?
They're hungry.
So am I.
My ears are rumbling.
Your stomach has no ears!
Richelieu feasts in Paris.
Send for a partridge.
I'll have veal!
Stewed mutton!
Braised beef!
Black pudding!
Duck pate!
Beans!
Pancakes!
With ham and mushrooms!
I'm hungry!
Food! That's all you think about.
Come here, Bertrandou shepherd that you were.
Play a tune from back home, just for me
A tune to set memories free.
Listen, Gascons... with the pipe to his mouth he takes us...back to the South!
It's he tune the goatherd fingers
The hill where mist still lingers
Listen...
There's the glade the heath, the forest way...
The little shepherd with his red beret.
The green of spring on the Dordogne.
Listen, Gascons.
It is all Gascogne.
You're making them cry.
Homesickness! A nobler hunger... than the hunger of the flesh!
You'll weaken them.
Really?
See? A roll on the drums is enough.
Alas, a Gascon.
A false one.
Gascons are supposed to be mad.
A sane Gascon is dangerous.
He's pale.
He's hungry, poor devil.
He's not suffering though!
Take your cards, peipes and dice.
I'll read Descartes.
He's green.
Skin and bones.
I'm mocked here. I know it, gentlemen.
You southern petty seigneurs have no respect for commanders.
Enough! I scorn your renown.
My battle tactics are known.
Yesterday with my men...
I charged three times.
And your scarf?
You heard then?
At the thrid charge
I was forced towards enemy lines.
I was in danger of being musketted.
When I had the idea of dropping the scarf... showing my rank.
Thus, I was able, unnoticed to leave the Spaniards attack again and beat them with my men.
What do you say to that?
That Henri IV would never against such odds, have let fall his white panache.
The attack was a success.
But you gave up the nonour of being a target.
Had I been there but our courage is different
I'd have taken the scarf up myself.
A vain Gascon boast!
A boast?
Lend it to me and I'll charge with it tonight.
A vain offer.
You know the scarf was left in the gun-blasted enemy sector.
Where no one... can fetch it!
Here it is.
Thank you!
I can give the signal
I was reluctant to send.
Who is it?
A Spaniard, my spy who'll tell them by and by.
He's most useful and, indeed... this very night, I'll lead my men to Dourlens for supplies.
You will stay.
But the Spanish...
They know. And at dawn...they'll attack
Hold them back for us an hour or two.
But to do that...
Kindly lay down your lives.
So this is revenge?
Take it to mean
I serve my king and vent my spleen.
Thanks for such candour.
You fight a hundred singlehanded.
You should be delighted.
Gascony cadets, farewell.
What's that?
Nothing.
You're lying. Show me.
Really?
Yes, show me!
It's your final letter.
To Roxane?
Who else?
Oh yes!
You've a winged messenger?
You can cross as far as Vimy.
Impossible.
You've been?
Yes...At night.
Often?
More than you think.
Every day?
Answer me!
Yes, every day.
Twice.
It so excites you, you risk death...
For you.
No! For her!
You never told me!
I understand...
You don't. You're wrong, Christian.
What's that circle?
A circle?
It's a tear!
The poet charms himself.
This letter, it was so moving.
I cried as I wrote it.
Where are you going?
We need a gun.
Take Le Bret and four or five men.
Where are you going?
Vimy.
He's mad.
During mass, we'll steal their food.
We'll die, but not of hunger.
Take this.
Hey, it's hot!
We've got the roast.
Coming?
Go without me.
How did you get here?
Via Vimy and the forest.
Madness!
The siege is so long.
You can't stay.
Why not?
He's right. Don't stay.
Spain is coming this way.
Let's fight!
You must go.
I want to see a battle.
I'm hungry.
The air is sharp.
What is there to eat?
Chicken, wine and pies.
Could you bring me that?
We have none.
All right.
Quail, trout, ham...Anything.
But where from?
My coach.
We must serve and carve.
I have a valued man with me.
Go closer, gentlemen go and see.
The bundles... are full of partridges! Catch!
Each case is a little larder.
Red or white wine?
Please
Have a little bread and wine.
Why are you crying?
It's too good.
Is our precieuse a heroine?
Monsieur de Bergerac, I am your cousin.
Where are the cadets?
Unbelievable! Have they deserted?
To your stations!
What's wrong with you?
It's the though of battle.
They're drunk!
Who? Us?
Get up! Battle stations!
Thank you, sir...
So kind...
What have they drunk? They're all mad!
Shoulder arms! Attention!
Greetings monsieur De Guiche.
There they are!
Leave at once!
Never!
Will you stay?
Very well. Bring me a musket.
What?
This lady is in danger!
Give him something to eat!
Food?
We've all had some.
I won't eat your leftovers!
You're improving.
I'll fight hungry.
Hear that Gascon accent?
Me?
He's one of us!
Stay here.
Where are you going?
Wait for me.
Why did you come?
Your letters.
A few words...
Quiet. You wrote so many.
Beautiful ones, deny it you might.
God, I love you since that night when, in a voice unknown... your soul came forth.
Those letters this month, you see, were you talking to me.
I read them and swooned.
I was yours. Your love burned.
Forgive my frivolity of loving first your beauty.
Later, your spirit charmed me and I loved both.
And now?
One side has beaten the other.
I love you for your soul.
Your beauty drew me towards the true reality.
Can't you see this as a victory?
You just can't believe it.
I just want to be loved for...
For what you've always been loved.
This is better.
It used to be.
You don't understand.
I love you for what you are.
Less handsome...
I'd love you still. Even without beauty
Don't!
I mean it.
What? Ugly?
Ugly, I swear.
You're pale!
She loves me no more.
What?
It's you she loves.
All she loves is my soul.
That means you. And you love her.
Me?
You do.
It's true.
Madly.
More than madly.
Tell her!
No!
Why?
Look at me.
Tell her!
No!
Stop tempting me!
I'm tired of being my own rival.
I want her to choose one of us.
You.
I hope so.
What is it?
Nothing. Get inside!
What did he say? He's going!
Perhaps he thought I lied.
And did you?
No. I'd love him...
Are you afraid to say it?
I don't mind. If he were ugly?
Even if he were ugly.
Even deformed?
Even deformed.
Were he ridiculous and grotesque would you love him?
More than ever.
My God.
So, perhaps, after all, happiness...
What?
Listen, Roxane...I want to...
He's not dead.
Roxane...
I told her everything.
It's you she loves.
No, Christian
Get her away!
Stay with me!
The fight is on!
His letter...
You alone knew him.
Wasn't he a marvellous spirit?
Yes, Roxane.
A supreme, lovable poet?
Yes, Roxane.
A sublime being?
Yes, Roxane.
A deep, saintly herat a magnificent and pure soul?
Farewell Roxane.
He's a duke now.
And a marshal.
He hasn't been for months.
Still in mourning?
As ever.
Still faithful?
That too.
Have you forgiven me?
I'm here.
Sister Marthe stole a plum this morning
That's very wrong.
Calumny is a sin.
It was tiny.
I'll tell monsieur Cyrano.
I've made him an angel cake.
He's a bad Catholic.
We'll convert him.
I forbid you to meddle with that matter
Don't torment him. He may stop coming.
But God...
Don't worry. God knows all about him.
He says, every Saturday:
''Sister, I ate meat yesterday.''
He says that?
Every time.
Last Saturday he hadn't eaten for two whole days.
Even dead, you love him?
It seems only part of him is dead.
Our hearts are together.
His love is alive, around me.
Ah, here's Le Bret.
Does he come often?
Your grace...
He won't be here until seven.
Who won't?
Cyrano.
Oh...him.
How is he?
Not well.
Really?
He exaggerates.
I foresaw it all: loneliness, misery!
His pamphlets make new enemies.
He attacks snobs and hypocrites cowards and fools.
Everyone in fact!
His sword inspires terror.
Don't pity him.
He knew no allegiance a free man in thought and deed.
I know. I have everything, he nothing.
But I'd gladly shake his hand.
Farewell.
I'll show you out.
Sometimes, I envy him.
When your life has been a success without having any real sins you feel a slight disgust within but no real remorse.
Just a faint discomfort.
The ducal robes of fur sweep up the stairs of state with a rustle of lost illusions and regret.
You're philosophical.
Monsieur Le Bret. May I have a word?
No one dares attack him, but he's hated
Someone said to me yesterday:
''Cyrano could die by accident.''
Warn him to be careful and stay indoors
A doctor, monsieur! Get a doctor!
Will you stay with him?
I'll be back.
The clock's struck. He should be here.
He'll come. He always does.
There he is!
I'm running out of wool.
These faded colours!
How can I match them?
Late for the first time in fourteen years.
I know. It makes me mad.
I was delayed, in fact by an importunate visitor.
An annoying one?
Yes, but not unexpected.
You sent him away?
Yes, I said:
''Sorry but today is Saturday.
''I have a regular aapointment to keep.
''I dare not miss it.
Come back in an hour.''
He'll have to wait. I won't let you go until it's dark.
I may have to leave earlier.
No teasing Sister Marthe?
Sister Marthe, come here!
Those lovely downcast eyes!
What's wrong?
Nothing.
I ate meat yesterday.
I know.
Yet you're so pale.
Come to the refectory later for a bowl of soup.
You will?
Is she converting you?
Oh, no. I promise I'm not.
Tell me the news of the week.
It's time for my gazette.
Saturday the nineteenth...
After eight helpings of ginger the King, by the lancet was put out of danger.
Sunday, the Queen gave a ball and burned seven hundred and sixty-three white wax candles.
Our troops vanquished
John of Austria on Monday
Four witches were hung.
The same day,
Madame d'Athis's dog had an enema
That will do!
Tuesday...nothing.
Lygdamire has a new lover.
Thursday: the court was in Fontainebleau.
Friday the twenty-fifth...
La Mancini, the dark one... said ''no'' at dawn and ''yes'' at dusk.
And Saturday...the twenty-sixth...
Don't worry, it's nothing.
Come on.
It's my wound from Arras... sometimes...you know...
My poor friend!
It's nothing.
It will go.
It's over.
We all have our wounds.
I have mine.
The old wound is still here, so keen.
The paper of his last letter has yellowed but still bears his tears and blood.
His letter!
Didn't you say that one day you'd let me read it?
You really want to? His letter?
I want to...Today...
Here you are.
Can I open it?
Open it.
Read it.
Roxane, farewell, for I must die.
Out loud?
Later today, I think, my dove.
My heart is heavy with unexpressed love
And I'm dying!
Never more, never more will my captivated eyes... that gaze...
How you read it! which adored such moments will no longer embrace your every movement.
I can see one now you often make when you hruch your hair away.
I cry out...
You read it in such a way
And now I cry out: ''Goodbye''.
You read it...
My dear, my darling... with a voice... my love... with a voice... which I've heard somewhere before.
My heart never left you.
I am and will be in the next world the one who loved you with all this soul.
The one...
How can you read now? It's dark.
It's dark...
It was you.
No, Roxanne, no...
The way you said my name...
No! It wasn't me!
It was you!
I swear...
I can see your generous imposture.
The letters were yours.
No!
The dear, mad words, yours.
The night voice.
I swear not!
That soul was yours!
I didn't love you!
You did!
It was him.
You loved me!
You're less sure now.
No, no, my dear love, I never loved you
So many things fade way to be reborn.
Why keep silent for fourteen years since on that letter the tears were yours?
The blood was his
Cyrano! You're here!
Good evening, my friends!
He killed himself to come.
That weakness earlier?
That's right,
I didn't finish my gazette.
On Saturday the twenty-sixth one hour before dinner
Monsieur de Bergerac was fouly and ignobly murdered.
What have they done to you?
Fate's a jester.
I always wanted to die in battle.
And here I am killed in an ambush from behind, by lackeys...with a beam.
So be it
I made a mess of everything
Even my own death.
Don't cry so, Ragueneau.
Go and get help!
No, no. Don't go. When you... come back, I'll be gone.
What do you do now, fellow poet?
No more cakes?
No, I work for Moliere.
My friends ruined me...
And your wife left you.
Moliere?
What do you do for him?
I snuff out the candles.
I'm leaving him though.
I'm so angry!
Yesterday, during Scapin a scene was by you.
All of it!
Yes, the famous monologue.
Moliere stole it!
He did well...
Was the scene a success?
They laughed and laughed!
My life's work has been to prompt others and be forgotten.
Remember that night when Christian came to your balcony?
That moment sums up my life.
While I was below in the dark shadows others climbed up to kiss the sweet rose.
It's only fair.
I say, as death has me in its hooks
Moliere has genius and Christian was handsome.
Sister! Sister! Help!
No! Don't call anyone!
Let them pray. The bell is ringing.
I've made you so unhappy.
I have! I have!
You? Of course you haven't.
I knew not womanly sweetness.
My mother found me ugly.
I had no sisters.
Later, I feared the mistress with mockery in her eye.
But thanks to you, I have had a female friend.
Thanks to you a dress crossed my life's path.
I love you!
Live!
It's too late, cousin.
I must go up...to the opaline moon.
Many of those I love are in exile up there.
I'll see Scorates...and Galileo.
Philosopher and scientist poet, musician and duellist and traveller in space.
Witty converstationalist and lover too, too unlucky in love
Here lies Hercule-Savinien de Cyrano de Bergerac who was all...and who was nothing.
I'm leaving now.
Sorry...
I can wait no more.
See?
The moon beam is here at my door.
No one must help me!
Only...
Only the trees!
He's coming.
I feel myself shod in marble.
Gloved in lead
As he's on his way
I shall go to meet him... sword in hand!
What?
It's useless? I know.
A man doesn't fight to win.
It's better when the fight is in vain.
Who are they all?
There's a horde of them.
Ah, I know you. All my old enemies!
Falsehood.
Cowardice.
Compromise.
I know you'll get the upper hand.
Never mind.
I'll fight on, and on, and on!
You take everything... the laurel and the rose too!
Go on, take them!
But, in spite of you one thing goes with me now
And tonight, when I at last God behold my salute will sweep his blue threshold with something spotless, a diamond in the ash... which I take in spite of you and that's...
My panache.
I wish I could be like her.
Also me.
But you're a servant girl, Maya.
I must go. She'll be waiting.
And I?
You can't go,
But I'll come and tell you everything.
So, Kama Sutra,
The greatest book of love ever written.
Kama means... love.
And Sutra means?
Lessons?
Very good.
So here we have it.
Lessons on love.
An ancient book on men and women and their relationship through life together.
Now, why do we study it, you may all ask, when it was written so many hundreds of years ago?
Because love remains as meaningful and mysterious today as it was then.
The Kama Sutra teaches us the many ways to use our body for love.
It also teaches us that the ways of love are much deeper.
But, of course, it tells us we must learn to use our body very well.
So... lift up your skirts and look at your... feet.
One doesn't pay much attention to one's feet or toes.
But believe me when I tell you... if you touch the toes and feet in a certain way... it can bring great pleasure to your lover.
Maya...
Maya, is that you?
Masi, why do I always have to wear
Tara's old clothes when she never wears mine?
What have I done in my past life to inherit you from your mad mother?
Just because Tara and Biki drank from my breast, they let you play with her.
So what if you bathe with Tara?
That doesn't mean you can become a maharan in yourself.
Be grateful they let you dance with her.
Maya.
Biki.
Just because you're a prince, you think you can spy on me?
One day I will be king, and you will be my Queen... and my slave.
I'm no one's slave.
Forever!
I want to know everything
Tara knows.
You are truly pagli.
My mad one.
Hips just like your mother.
When she danced one jhalak...
And the room would be still.
You'd better deserve those dancing bells she left you.
Very good, Maya.
You are doing the dance of enticement, Tara.
You are the one with the beautifuI eyes.
So, play with them.
You have to mesmerize with them.
Don't give up, princess Tara.
Come on, come on. Try.
Beautiful dancing, Maya.
Come, my princess Tara.
My darling.
This is for you.
New clothes?
For me?
I've never had new clothes.
Thank you, sahib.
Tara.
How is it?
It looks like leftovers.
You can wear it at my wedding.
I am going to be married
To the great Raj Singh.
Such a tender flower, still unopened.
Women, being of tender nature, want tender beginnings, eh?
The wisdom of the Kama Sutra is such, it teaches us not to rush.
For the first 3 days after marriage, the girl and the boy should abstain from sexual pleasures.
Oh, yes!
On the 10th night, the king will begin gentle love play to create confidence in you.
He will embrace you with the upper part of his body in darkness because he doesn't know you well.
You should at this time accept his embrace and allow him to put betel nut in your... mouth.
God bless the alliance of our two kingdoms.
Now let's see if the king's bride is worth her weight in gold.
Let's see.
He's coming.
He's so young.
Small price to pay for such beauty.
Let's hope she's worth it.
Tara, he likes you.
Go to your room.
And when will this flower open?
Oh, my.
I wait upon that night.
And what a night that will be.
Please come. Please come.
Come here.
Masi.
Oh, Maya.
That's her.
There she is - - my lotus woman.
Maybe that was my Padmini.
I found her.
I lost her.
Seeing things again?
What says the doctor?
Examining, examining.
Pulse tells all.
Hey, Maya.
Maya.
Easy on those sweets.
That's hot stuff.
Aphrodisiacs.
Put one in my mouth, Maya.
Open your mouth and close your eyes.
Yes?
Forgive me for disturbing you, great king.
Your name?
Maya.
Could you be anything but Maya?
I've brought you something.
Some malida to sweeten your tongue.
This is all need.
This is all need to sweeten my tongue.
Tara...
You' re leaving us...
Tara...
Ma.
Ma.
Ma...
Please get Maya for me.
I want to marry her.
This is for you, Maya.
Tara...
All my life I have lived with your used things.
But now...
Something I have used is yours forever.
Maya!
Maya.
I'll eave this place forever!
Maya.
Maya, listen to me.
Listen to me.
Think about it.
Biki loves you.
You will be almost like Tara.
You a princess and she a Queen.
I'm supposed to just say yes to everything?
To Tara's clothes, to her used dowry,
And now to her brother?
It is our destiny, Maya.
I'll make my own destiny, Masi.
Please.
Let me be.
She said no?
Thank God.
I could never show my face.
Daughter marries king,
Son marries servant girl.
Come, ma.
Come, ma!
You whore!
Please!
Stop, please!
Please, I beg of you, no.
Biki.
I'm so sorry.
Please.
Maya?
Maya.
Oh, Masi...
You had better go, my pagli.
Your mother's blessings are with you.
Go!
And take these bells with you, so the world will know the whore is coming!
For the blood.
I know about the blood.
Just put it underneath you at the time of the pain.
What pain?
Just like the tearing of a backtooth.
One moment there, one moment gone.
Enough.
She is ready for you, my son.
Your good luck charm.
One day you are your father's property...
The next day you are your husband's property.
Must be difficult.
Why not put that around me?
I promise I will not do it again if you embrace me.
I cannot.
You can.
You even want to.
No.
Please.
I will press the marks of my teeth and nails into your breasts
And I will say
I found you this way
And that another man had done it.
And what will you say then?
I will say I am innocent.
Who will believe you?
Maya.
Maya?
You just called me Maya.
Are you trying to read my mind?
No.
Did they not prepare you?
Didn't they tell you never to question your husband?
No!
Get me the chief courtesan!
My name is Jai.
Jai Kumar.
I am the royal sculptor,
And I saw you at the king's wedding.
You don't know this,
But you inspire my work.
I work in stone,
Like these temples.
It's hard to believe she's made of stone.
Why?
Stone has life.
Padmini.
It's not right.
Don't move.
Maya!
Maya!
I'm sorry.
Let me explain.
I work with my hands.
I didn't want to frighten you or embarrass you.
Why do you feeI so free to touch me?
And don't talk to me as if I was your servant.
I'm not your servant.
A servant is a master in disguise.
Where do you live?
Come, I'Il walk you home.
You do have a home to go to?
Listen, I know somewhere.
If you agree, I can take you there.
She is wonderful.
She teaches the Kama Sutra.
Everything I'm trying to understand
About love in my work, she knows.
Let me take you to her.
When you dance the dance of enticement
For a man,
You dance like he's the only one left in the world
Come on. Come on, try.
Play.
Rasa.
Jai Kumar.
And to what do we owe this honor?
This is Maya...
A new friend.
She needs a place to stay.
Come, Maya.
Join us.
Play.
So Tara was being weighed in gold,
And she insulted me before the kind, so I...
You what?
I went to the king's chamber, and I gave myself to him the night of his wedding.
Ohh. Was he as good as his father?
Oh, Rasa Devi,
The fuss, the shame.
Shame?
Now, that is an ancient word.
When the king I served as chief courtesan
Went to war,
The Queen, being the dutiful wife she was,
Washed his feet with holy water.
She drank the same water every day he was gone.
When he came back...
He rode straight to my door.
Do you think that honored the Queen?
Honor and shame
May be two sides of the same coin.
It's so beautiful here.
You are welcome to live with us here, Maya.
I prepare women.
Some become courtesans in the king's harem.
I teach my girls the Kama Sutra- -
That the art of love is much more than the act itself.
Come.
Rest.
You have it in you to be a great courtesan, Maya.
Reserved maybe for Raj Singh himself.
The king?
And why not?
No, Rasa Devi, never.
Hush.
We shall not speak of it again.
You stay here as a daughter.
And if you change your mind...
You come tell me.
I used to worship inside temples...
UntiI I saw that everything around me was holy...
The waterfall...
Stone...
Grass.
All pure spirit.
Now like a madman,
I worship everything I see... like you.
There's a story told about the neighboring king and his favorite courtesan.
This courtesan became pregnant at the same time as his Queen.
She gave birth to a son a few days before the Queen had a daughter.
The courtesan knew that her son would be considered
A threat to the throne, so the eunuchs would be dispatched to kill her child.
She was determined to save him.
It was diwali, and the potters came to gift their vessels.
Suddenly, the courtesan had an idea.
She begged one of the potters to smuggle her baby out in an unused urn.
Did the courtesan see her son again?
Yes, she did.
Every few years the boy would be dressed as a girl and smuggled into the inner court.
Why?
Men can't enter the harem.
So they dressed the boy up, and his mother would take him along secret passages.
They would spend a few hours together.
Then he would be smuggled out...
And the courtesan knew that it would be some time before she saw her child again.
A few years later she died.
Maya, come.
And this position is called twining of the creeper.
Now we add to this what the Kama Sutra calls the throbbing kiss.
And this is the way for both lovers to have the pleasure of kissing the lower lip at the same time.
This was gentle.
What about when love feels intense?
On the first union, for example, or when angry lovers are reconciled?
Or when one is intoxicated and full of energy?
How can we express our passion then?
Called by the Kama Sutra,
"the blade of the saw."
A woman who sees the marks of her lover's nails on her body becomes excited again.
Always remember, there should be variety in love sport.
Jai, your Padmini is there.
There, there. She's been waiting for hours. Go.
I forgot to return this to you the other day.
You touch me, and I don't know if it's about your work or...
About what?
Something else.
Don't ask me to name it.
Is what you do different from them, from the men in the street?
You're the same as them, aren't you?
You're accusing me of being the same as those men?
I'll take you somewhere tonight, and you can see for yourself.
But you will have to dress like a man.
Examining. Examining.
Leave. I'm going in as a commoner.
Can I have some wine?
Kumar.
Sahib?
You don't know me, Kumar.
Tonight I'm one of you.
Come here, you cheap little slut.
There is joy in 3 things - -
Eating meat, riding meat, and putting meat into meat.
I need a woman.
Chand Rabai, can you get me a young one?
May I entreat you to see a special flower of mine?
A virgin as yet unknown to men.
I had a virgin not so long ago.
A strange girl with a face like a Queen.
Sometimes I still long for her.
All the way from the Himalayas.
Padmini herself.
A fresh rose of the gutter
To bloom only for you.
Almost the face of a Queen.
I'll take her.
Enjoying? Huh?
Oh, Rasa!
You have seen how some men can be like animals, but it is not all men.
I don't believe Jai Kumar is like that.
And since when is woman simply a helpless animal?
Just like men, we are awake and filled with longing.
But - -
No buts.
Passion remains the spirit behind existence, Maya.
Nothing will ever change that.
It's how we use our passion that is of essence.
Now we must listen to what the Kama Sutra teaches,
That the true union between man and woman can take us beyond this animal lust into total trust and merging with the other, where each becomes both.
Imagine such bliss.
The story you told me about the courtesan and her son, it was you, wasn't it?
Jai.
I made some coconut rice for you.
I know you don't usually eat when you work.
Something's wrong.
What is it?
Tell me.
I'm working differently.
But that's good, isn't it?
She's beautiful.
Something about being with you has...
When I work,
I see you all the time.
You're with me at every moment.
Is that all you see in me, your work, a piece of stone?
What if I can't work properly without you?
You don't have to.
We can work together.
No. I've never needed anyone.
I've never need to rely on anyone.
We can't be together.
Don't fall in love with me.
You were the one that talked about love all the time.
And now it's facing you, you run from it.
Sometimes things don't make sense immediately.
I have known him a few years now.
He is used to being alone.
Be patient, Maya.
Be patient.
I loved being with him.
I would have done anything just to be with him.
What kind of love are you talking about, real love?
If you're looking for real love, you've chosen the hardest task of all.
The work for which all other work is but preparation.
But I was ready.
I wanted to give myself to him.
Love does not mean surrendering, losing yourself.
It is a call to ripen.
Don't look for straight lines,
Maya.
Life is never like that.
I want to understand properly,
Rasa Devi.
I want to learn about the rules of love and how to apply them.
And if I can't use them on the one I love...
I'll use them on the ones I don't.
Teach me.
I'm ready.
At all times and in all countries, there's ever been a little rivalry between the chaste and the unchaste.
But while some women are born courtesans, let's face it, every woman has got an inkling of the profession in her nature and makes herself agreable to the other sex.
One of the arts of courtesan is that while she involves herself in sex without love, she conducts herself as if love were indeed natural.
Because we all know that men love women who apparently love them.
But even courtesans should not always be welcoming because we must know that men are apt to despise things that are easily acquired.
You can hear all these rules, but remember once the wheel of love is set in motion... there are no rules and no order.
Salute the day!
Salute the hills and flowers!
Enough.
Is this the statue?
Whose is this?
It's mine, sahib.
Yours, Kumar?
So imbued is this stone with the warmth of woman.
I want to kiss the skin.
I have kissed the skin.
I have kissed this skin.
Who is she?
A young woman I found - -
Bring her to me.
I wish I could, sahib, but she disappeared.
Then we must find her.
Sahib.
As a reward for your most excellent work, Kumar,
You shall wrestle me.
Vazir, pay the man his weight in gold.
Sahib.
You made her wait.
Now you will have to wait.
Listen! Listen!
We are looking for the woman who inspired Jai Kumar.
Her skin, the color of freshly harvested wheat.
Her limbs long and languorous like the creeper.
Thank you.
Are you ready, my preciou s child?
I'm frightened.
I was frightened, too, the day they came for me.
It is good to be a little frightened because it means you feel things.
Come.
Another courtesan, my Queen.
Name?
Maya.
Maya?
Enough!
Tara!
How long do you expect to languish?
All day?
I was longing to see you.
Get out!
My son has an eye.
I trained him.
Yours?
Of course.
'Tis the usual custom.
The usual custom no longer applies.
If a courtesan is not elegantly attired, she will not exhilarate my husband.
Exhilaration is my department.
You get me something new, or we will keep your husband waiting.
And I'm sure I will be blamed for it.
He is full of lust, and she is in the eye.
Get her something new and quickly, Tara.
Sahib?
What news from the stars?
There is news of the shah, sahib.
Later.
Tell me the stars.
Jupiter, the sign of good fortune,
Is placed in your house of love and marriage.
An auspicious time for love.
Good.
Sahib, we must speak.
I said later.
Vazir, matters of state are your affair as love is mine.
Adjust.
Adjust, my child.
It's an old story.
He had her on your wedding night... just the way Rasa had my husband.
There are courtesans, and then there are wives.
There are dozens like her, but you are Queen.
The glory of God is in you.
Oh, it was a good night.
Kumar, whose artistry pleases my Gods, what ever you've heard, in the ring, we're equal.
With or without claws?
I can be lethal enough without them.
Good.
You do that again, you'll have no arms.
Forgive me, sahib.
Good fight, Kumar.
We have some work to discuss.
Will you join me tonight?
People say I think too much about women.
What is there more important to think about?
To our great king.
Started off a great warrior,
Ended as an insect sucking on a poppy flower.
Vazir.
Captured. You draw the fleeting moment.
Show me the eternal.
You did make love to Maya, then?
You know her name?
I know everything.
Answer me.
I'm waiting.
Work can only be an act of love.
You will go to China to fetch another, you clumsy son of a whore!
Yes, sahib. Right away.
I have found your girl, Kumar.
Sit, sit.
I tell you she governs me and winds me up at a whim.
My moods depend on her.
I want to open my eyes to her under me... in the morning.
You should be given an audience with her, Kumar.
I want you to carve her across the roof of my room...
But if I was God, I'd carve her across the bright blue sky.
Poison.
Bitter as bile.
But when taken from childhood, it makes you immune from enemies.
My Raj...
All my life...
I have lived with your used things.
Now all your life, you'll use mine.
So...
Tell me, are you happy now?
Tara...
I was young.
I had no idea then that what I did that night would change your life forever... and mine, too.
You got what you wanted.
He desires you.
At least one of us is happy.
Do you think that just because the king desires me, it makes me happy?
Does it not?
No, Tara, it does not.
Sometimes...
When I catch a glimpse of the world out side... trees, sky...
I wish we were free like when we were children.
Tara...
You meet again.
Enchanted.
What shall I do?
Will you dance?
I like this position.
I did not agree to sculpting by committee, sahib.
Allow me the honor of a...
An artist's privacy.
I love you.
You love only yourself.
How naive of me.
Maya.
Maya.
Forgive me, please.
I was afraid of losing control.
Maya.
You hurt me.
I belong to him now.
No.
I belong to you.
I made a mistake.
Take me back.
Jai...
I marry you...
You marry me.
I marry you...
You marry me.
Dr. Mani, we believe Queen Tara is hysterical.
We found her flushed and without breath.
Her body does not keep from twisting.
Have the spirits possessed her?
I want to know.
Her heart, please.
So?
Her pulse...
It's normal.
Examining.
Sahib.
It seems the opium has made you half a man.
You can not pass her over.
I've heard rumors that her own brother's being courted by the shah.
Invaders like the shah, with or without that hunch back are no match for my strength.
It is not you that are strong.
It is your neighbors that are weak.
The Gods protect me.
I will show you. Biki is nothing.
Just show me an heir from the Queen
Nothing!
Before I get a bastard from one of your whores!
Ha ha! Sweet brother-in-law, this is your home.
You can have anything you want.
Now, what can I offer you?
More music?
Oh. Boys.
Boys?
Do you insult me?
Oh, no, no, no, no, no, no.
Or is it time you had women?
Ha ha! I always wanted women.. ever since I... ha ha... stood up.
Women?
Certainly, women you shall have.
You shall have the pick of my harem.
How many do you want?
4? Ha ha ha!
Don't worry, we'll blindfold them.
And tie up their hands as well.
I write this in the interest of the people, who are being neglected by a debauched king.
Now take this to the shah.
Sahib.
He has insulted my sister and squeezes the common folk each day to feed his appetites.
He has put his affairs entirely in the hands of his prime minister, the Vazir.
I put myself in your royal hands as an ally.
Prince Bikram Singh.
I want to be alone.
I want to be alone with you.
Raj.
Just you and I...
Let me lie in your arms.
Give me some comfort.
Oh, please.
What?
I cannot.
Do you think you're the only woman?
I have hundreds waiting.
Go to them.
Once you wanted me.
I serviced you, that's all.
You have no power over me.
Go.
Go, now.
My love.
Oh, my love.
I can't continue this way.
This is the last time
I sneak in like some rat!
I'm his courtesan, that's all.
Beautiful women are a law unto themselves.
I no longer have any authority over her.
Life is strange.
Fight me.
Fight me, Kumar!
I want to sweat.
Claws!
And bleed.
Opium!
Strike!
Strike!
Why did you do this?
I cannot stand this anymore.
Because I love you, my work has a power that even I cannot explain.
What do I work for?
To arouse this king of ours?
We leave tonight.
As soon as it's dark, we'll find a way out.
Where's the whore with the heart of a vulture?
Where is she?
Were you invited?
I didn't ask him in, my love.
Did you?
You.
You offend me.
It is a crime to offend your ruler.
Ruler?
You reign, sahib. You do not rule.
You will die, Kumar.
You will die like the bastard commoner you are!
Take him away to the valley of stones.
No!
No!
No!
No!
No!
No!
What are you going to do?
What am I going to do?
Tara!
I hate you.
All my life you hated me!
You could have finished me off, but you didn't!
You know why?
Because I survived you.
I wanted to live.
Now you better survive me...
And your husband...
And any - - Anything else that happens to hurt you.
They took him.
Who?
Jai Kumar.
You love Jai Kumar?
We shall not surrender to despair.
This is really not so difficult.
I can show you how to dress.
I can show you how to mark him and touch him.
Men are not such a mystery.
First I will mark you.
He will know a woman made these marks.
It will excite him.
Maya.
Jai is going to be killed...
And I cannot stop it.
I will help you see him.
Now is the time.
The doctor will help you.
Thank you.
Our deepest gratitude, doctor.
Vazir?
Who is it?
Speak up.
Greetings, Raj.
Tara?
Maya's taught you well.
In the end... it always comes down to the wife.
The mark of a tiger's nail.
You are common to many women.
I would see you always...
So aroused by others...
Undressing them with your eyes.
How I loved you then.
And how I anguished.
You do hate me.
No, Raj.
I do not love you enough... to hate you.
Jai?
Jai.
Embrace me, my love.
You have to be very brave, my love.
They take you tomorrow.
And I will be with you always.
Always.
Maya.
Bind me to you with this hair forever.
I am yours.
Take me.
Cut this hair. It's yours.
My flower.
Jai...
You have my heart.
I love you.
You came back for me.
Even like this, I want you.
You have me.
But I ask only one thing.
Please free him.
Please?
Please?
Please. I'm begging you.
Please.
I will do anything.
No! I want more than this!
I want your heart.
In your heart, please, give him up.
If you free him.
If I free him, you must never see his face again.
Swear it on your mother's name.
I swear it.
You're a lying whore!
Jai Kumar will die!
And I will watch him die!
Sahib!
Sahib.
A box was left at the gate with a message from the shah.
He... he has entered our kingdom, sahib.
His troops are advancing upon us.
Vazir.
Call the Queen! Uhh... uhh...
Comfort me.
I need some comfort.
Maya!
Knowing love,
I will allow all things to come and go... to be as supple as the wind... and take everything that comes with great courage.
As Rasa would say to me:
"Life is right in any case."
My heart is as open as the sky.
Why must you be this way?
Why is there always a problem?
It's a good question.
Do you want to go home?
Do you want to turn around?
- Yes!
- It's the Himalayas!
How long have I been talking about the Himalayas?
- How long?
- Far too long.
Horst, when we get there, can you give me a hand, please?
- Yes, of course.
- Ingrid, stop it.
Let's try to make the best of this.
Where's this idiot who's supposed to meet us?
Move!
Mr. Harrer.
I have your tickets.
- I'm late. Take me to my train.
- No, you don't understand.
I am Peter Aufschnaiter.
I am leading the expedition.
- How do you do?
- Here's our celebrity!
Mr. Harrer?
May I say, Mr. Harrer, on behalf of the Reichssportsfhrer we are honored to have such a great German hero on the team.
Thank you, but I'm Austrian.
Yes, but I'm sure that as a distinguished member of the National Socialist Party, you would be proud to plant our country's flag on the summit of Nanga Parbat when you reach it.
Hans Lobenhoffer.
Lutz Chicken.
And a picture with your lovely wife.
And Mr...
Horst Immendorf. Family friend.
No picture necessary.
When is the little one due, Mrs. Harrer?
About the time my husband reaches the base camp.
Thank you.
Why don't you tell the entire stinking country our troubles?
I'm getting on that train.
Do you have anything you want to say?
Fine.
Go. Leave.
I'll see you in four months.
- Take good care of her, Horst.
- I will, Heinrich.
We will travel 5.000 miles.
When we reach India, we will head for the Himalayas
and the ninth highest peak on Earth,
Nanga Parbat.
Germany calls it "Unserberg"... 
Our Mountain.
Before us, four German expeditions attempted it.
All failed.
Eleven climbers were killed in storms and avalanches.
By now, the conquest of Nanga Parbat is a national obsession,
a matter of German pride.
July 29, 1939.
We have already made Camp Four at 22.000 feet.
Overhead is the Rekiak Glacier and a difficult climb up the icefall.
The baby must be at least one month old now.
I have been so confused and distracted.
I can't climb with my usual confidence.
Are you all right?
Shit!
- Are you all right?
- Shall we come down?
Lost a crampon!
Go ahead!
The weather's getting bad.
We should rope up.
- Did you hurt yourself back there?
- Just a scratch. I'll lead.
Rocks!
Look out below!
Hold me!
Have you got me?
Hold me!
You should have told me how bad that wound was.
I should take a look at it.
I could sew it up.
It's not your problem.
Actually, it is my problem.
- It's my life.
- What?
When you conceal a serious injury and put my life at risk,
I consider that my problem.
No, you put your life at risk.
I saved it, so shut up!
Please, it is not your place...
Shut up!
The next time you lie about an injury, Heinrich... you're off the team.
Try it.
August 4th, Camp Five.
Some fierce storms have passed.
My teammates are nervous about the avalanches,
so we've been holed up for days.
Aufschnaiter should take advantage of this lowland weather to make high camp.
But he disagrees with me. Fool.
It seems the others don't mind sitting here waiting,
hoping, doing nothing.
So much time to question one's self is not good.
I am beginning to think this whole expedition was a mistake.
Run! Avalanche! Get out!
Leave everything!
Put that down!
We are going down now!
If they're frightened of a storm, send them down to Camp Two.
I could summit on my own!
Always give the best man his shot!
He's trying to tell us he's the best man.
Give me two Sherpas.
I can make Camp Six by tonight and my final attack tomorrow!
- We are going down now as a team!
- I've earned that peak!
- I want that peak!
- As a team! That's an order!
That is an order! An order!
Follow me!
Dalai Lama photo. Good protection.
Take it, Si Hib.
It will protect you.
No, that means nothing to me.
Dalai Lama. Dalai Lama photo.
Si Hib, take it.
Good protection for you.
Good afternoon, Herr Harrer.
Well, let's hope that Germany retreats from Poland as quickly as you did from your mountain.
It might save you some prison time.
What is this? Who are you?
- I'm sorry, but you're under arrest.
- What charge? Failure to summit?
I'm afraid not.
You see, war has been declared between His Majesty's Government and Germany.
So all enemy aliens on British Empire soil are now prisoners of war.
- Stop, or I'll shoot!
- Hands up!
No, you don't understand!
I'm Austrian! I'm a climber!
I have nothing to do with your silly war!
I can walk myself.
This is an insult!
You think you have the last word, but you don't!
Pigs! All of you, pigs!
October 15, 1939.
Reaching prison camp,
I make a promise to myself.
I will be lying beside Ingrid before the summer solstice of the new year.
The Himalayas are right in front of us.
It will be easy to escape and get lost in them.
My fourth escape attempt brings me no closer to my goal.
How far did you get this time?
All I have achieved is a certain dubious celebrity among the prisoners.
If only my hand could express what is in my heart.
I hear the guards are mailing letters for you.
Yes.
Would you mail these?
Thank you.
Hey, Heinrich, have you read this book?
It was checked out to you.
- We need to talk to you.
- What about?
About this.
Impressive. When do you plan to leave?
After monsoon season. And you?
I see you've chosen my route through Tibet.
The few foreigners who have tried never came back. 
So, good luck.
- Would you like to come with us?
- Why?
After all, you are the authority on jailbreak around here.
- We could benefit from your experience.
- Please.
Stop this embarrassing charade.
Every time you escape, Heinrich, the patrols are doubled and tripled.
It is making life very difficult for the rest of us.
I prefer to travel on my own, but thanks for thinking of me.
The mailman has come.
Dear Heinrich:
Please sign the enclosed divorce papers and send them to my lawyer.
Horst and I intend to be married as soon as the divorce is finalized.
As for your letter, yes.
Your son, Rolf Harrer, was born while you were climbing the mountain.
He is now two years old and calls Horst "papa".
When he is old enough,
I will tell him
his real father was lost in the Himalayas.
It seems the kindest thing to say considering
you never wanted the child anyway.
Needless to say, I have no intention
of "resolving our differences" as you suggested.
They were resolved the moment you left Austria.
I'm sorry you have been imprisoned in India
and hope this dreadful war will soon be over for everyone's sake.
Ingrid.
I'm coming with you.
This is your plan?
In my humble opinion, this is ridiculous.
Then since you are so humble, we won't ask your opinion.
Open the charts. Turn around.
Keep your back to the gate.
Open the charts!
Keep talking. Wait for my signal.
We are clear. Okay.
Open the gates!
See to this. Open the gates!
I'm going off on my own.
So, good luck.
First escape from prison camp,
November 18, 1939.
Rolf Harrer... three and a half months old.
My 30th birthday, July 6, 1941.
Rolf Harrer... exactly one year, 11 months and 26 days.
Last escape from Dehra Dun.
Rolf Harrer...
Take two and sleep it off.
I'll send you a bill in the morning.
What are you doing here?
I missed you so much, Heinrich.
I thought I'd pay you a visit.
What about the others?
The Italians were caught outside Nelang.
Lutz and Hans got sick and had to turn back.
- Sorry to hear that.
- I'm sure you're heartbroken.
May I impose upon your generous nature and camp here tonight?
Be my guest.
Thank you.
It is very gracious of you.
- Good.
- What else do you have in there?
A ten-piece orchestra?
By the way, I heard the Japanese have retreated all the way back to Shanghai so even if you make it to the Chinese border, you may have difficulty catching up with them.
I don't care if they're repelled all the way back to Tokyo.
You should if you want to get back to Austria.
- But I don't.
- Don't what?
- Plan to go back.
- Why not?
No particular reason.
But, when you get there, tell my wife that two years in prison camp is roughly equivalent to four years of marriage.
And I'm glad to be free of them both.
I'm not going back either, not until this shameful war is over.
- And where are you headed?
- Tibet.
Then on to China, see if I can find some work there.
And you?
By my calculations, the Chinese border is 2.058 kilometers away.
Tibet is 68.
It's a long way to travel with such a heavy load.
No, just full of food.
- Precisely.
- Mine.
That's too bad.
Those mountains are treacherous.
There are glaciers to be crossed.
If you had roped up to me,
I could have kept you alive.
Considering your performance the last time we roped up,
I think I'm safer without you.
Of course.
But I think you are wrong about that Tibetan border calculation.
By my measurements, it is 65 kilometers.
Care to wager a kilo of food on that?
All you've got is some stale crackers, Heinrich.
But I'm right. I'll win.
Tibet, the roof of the world.
It feels as though we have ascended a medieval stone fortress,
towering above the center of Asia.
This is the highest country on Earth.
And the most isolated.
There it is.
Tibet.
- Exactly 68 kilometers.
- Congratulations.
Unfortunately, you've eaten all your winnings.
Yes.
Just smile and say yes.
It's better that way.
It's amazing what you learn in prison, isn't it?
Tibet.
- No foreigners allowed in Tibet.
- Oh, please!
No foreigner!
Oh, please!
Yes. Thank you. Of course.
No translation needed.
Some people are glad to see us.
Don't let it get to your head, Heinrich.
When the Tibetans clap hands, it means they are driving out evil forces.
We need to find food.
It is the prophecy. It says here, in the final testament of great thirteenth Dalai Lama.
"It may happen that, in Tibet, religions and government will be attacked by outside forces.
Unless we can guard our own country, monks and their monasteries will be destroyed.
The lands and property of government officials will be seized.
The Dalai Lama and all the revered holders of the faith will disappear and become nameless."
Now you understand why we are not welcome to foreigners here?
Yes, but you must understand we're not here to threaten or harm.
We just need food, and then we'll be on our...
His Excellency, the Garpon.
Your Eminence, we're happy to see you.
We wanted to apologize.
Apologize.
And give you this really special gift.
Please, from us.
Long live the Dalai Lama, His Holiness.
Thank you for the picture.
Go back to India!
Two days into Tibet's western frontier and we are graciously kicked out.
Our guides have strict orders to escort us
to the Indian border some 40 kilometers away
and to shoot us if we attempt escape.
Must mean hello.
As long as they don't try to kiss me.
We have to stock up. I'm broke.
Don't look at me.
We have to eat, Peter.
Know what time it is?
It is not negotiable.
My father gave it to me when I climbed Mount Blanc.
Everyone's climbed Mount Blanc, Peter.
If I had a watch like this,
I would trade it.
- Where did you get this jacket?
- North Tibet.
Communism soldier come from China.
Very nice.
They give food, money. Very nice.
Communism soldier.
You like military uniforms, yes?
I have German army boots.
For you. Yes?
German army boots. Wait.
Give me these, for the guards.
Look!
Like this. You like?
Very good. They're tough.
My friend, shall I show you how German soldiers march?
You must make this face.
Come! Yes.
Stop!
Excellent. Yes.
You, with practice.
Now, I will show you how German soldiers run.
Stand like this.
Guess what?
All clear.
Know what time it is?
You think I'm so happy to be traveling with you,
I should foot the bill?
You are such a big man you don't need to contribute?
You have a problem, Peter?
Remind me... what you said at the bazaar back there.
"If I had a watch like that,
I would trade it."
You do not have one.
You cheap, lying bastard!
You have three!
This is junk from some Italian prisoners.
I don't give a shit!
Haven't you ever heard of a principle?
What principle?
You want a watch?
Go ahead. Pick one.
- And keep your principles.
- Look at you!
Caught being a selfish brat and you're gloating!
You're acting like an old woman, Peter.
What do you want?
Try apologizing.
Try feeling a little remorse.
And if all else fails, try wiping that smirk off your face!
Take your stinking watch and shut up!
I don't need another boring sermon from some frustrated glorified tour guide.
No wonder you are always alone.
No one can stand your miserable company.
Please, take them.
It was wrong of me to hide them.
- Keep this.
- No.
I didn't deserve it either.
Go ahead.
He'll be three and a half years old now.
Pretty soon, she'll tell him
I was lost in the Himalayas.
Which is fine.
Why?
Better a dead father than a lousy father.
Write him a letter.
Let him know you're still alive.
New York.
Venice.
- Paris.
- Your Holiness, where are you?
It is time for your lesson.
Your Holiness, where are you?
It is time for your lesson.
Dear Rolf Harrer:
I'm a person you don't know,
a man you've never met.
But you are someone who occupies my mind
and my heart,
in this distant land where I have gone.
If you can imagine a hidden place tucked safely away from the world,
concealed by walls of high, snowcapped mountains,
a place rich with all the strange beauty of your nighttime dreams...
then you know where I am.
In the country where I am traveling, Tibet...
people believe if they walk long distances to holy places,
it purifies the bad deeds they've committed.
They believe the more difficult the journey,
the greater the depth of purification.
I've been walking from one faraway place to the next for many years...
as long as you have lived.
I have seen seasons change across the high plateaus.
I have seen wild kiangs migrate south in winter,
and sweep back across the fields when spring appears.
In this place, where time stands still,
it seems that everything is moving...
including me.
I can't say I know where I'm going,
nor whether my bad deeds can be purified.
There are so many things
I have done which I regret.
But when I come to a full stop,
I hope you will understand
that the distance between us is not as great as it seems.
With deep affection,
your father, Heinrich Harrer.
Get up.
My God!
I'll give you these.
Yellow head!
- No! Wait! We have nothing!
- Give me money!
We have no money!
Give me watch!
- Give me clothes!
- We have nothing for you!
Wait!
Where are you headed?
I have permit.
Lhasa. I have permit.
It is unseemly for the spiritual leader of Tibet to spy on people.
Only a month ago, we were certain of death at the hands of bandits.
And today, we have reached the gates of the forbidden city of Lhasa.
It is as difficult a goal as Mecca
and precisely as attractive because it is closed to all foreigners.
Even in our miserable condition
we feel the lure of Tibet's holiest city,
home of the Dalai Lama.
Only a few foreigners had penetrated its mysteries.
Oh, my God!
- Is it over?
- No, it is not over.
You are invited to stay for lunch, if you like.
We'd like that very much.
I am Tsarong. Welcome to my home.
I am Peter.
Lord Chamberlain, may I request an audience with the regent and ministers of the cabinet?
It's about two foreigners who came to Lhasa.
With respect, Rinpoche... if your intention is to stop the Chinese from recruiting political allies, then demanding that they stop trying to bribe monks... is not the most effective tactic.
I asked the opinion of the ministers, not that of a mere secretary.
Of course. Forgive me.
You may leave now.
Start translating the letter as written.
Of course.
Do you realize how many men could survive such an ordeal?
We should respect them.
If we return them to India, they'll surely go back to prison.
But they have no purpose here, Kungo Tsarong. 
No place to live.
I have invited them to stay at my guest quarters, assuming you would grant them permission to remain in Lhasa, of course.
Invited them to stay at your place?
But why?
Must one have reason to help those in need?
Beast.
I think she said you stink.
You do not need to introduce yourselves.
I know who you are.
I am Pema Lhaki.
Ngawang wishes to make a gift to you, so please take off your clothes.
Let's get started.
I don't have all day.
Well, this is most kind of Ngawang Jigme.
Who is he to be so thoughtful?
Secretary to the ministers of the government.
He wished to make you a gift of new clothes.
Please select your preferred article of clothing.
You're a seamstress?
I am a tailor, sir, the only tailor in Lhasa, who has been to Calcutta and can reproduce these silly costumes.
So, I pick?
Yes, choose whichever you like.
- And you can make any of these?
- Yes.
- Very good.
- Did you make this?
- Yes.
- Beautiful.
- Thank you.
- Do you like this?
Whichever you like.
I will have this handsome tweed jacket.
And this pair of sporting woolen trousers, please.
- Good choice.
- Thanks.
And you, sir?
- Perhaps you could choose for me.
- Thank you.
Please, sir, take off your chu-pa.
I would like to measure.
Stand still, please.
This way, please.
- Stand still.
- Sorry.
- No moving, please.
- I'm sorry.
That way, you will never fall.
It's perfect.
Still, walking up mountains is a fool's pleasure, Heinrich.
Not so foolish, really.
Look at this.
Go ahead.
That's after I climbed the Eiger North Face.
That's Olympics.
Gold medal. Not important.
Then this is another great difference between our civilization and yours.
You admire the man who pushes his way to the top in any walk of life, while we admire the man who abandons his ego.
The average Tibetan wouldn't think to thrust himself forward this way.
Gentlemen.
Mr. Aufschnaiter, Mr. Harrer.
- I'm sorry. Have we met?
- No, we have not.
I am Ngawang Jigme.
- Yes, of course.
- Forgive us.
Thank you for your generous gift.
It's wonderful. Thank you.
You are most welcome.
I am sure we will meet again.
Perhaps you could help us explain... why the ministers demand that the Chinese government
"cease making generous financial contributions to Tibetan monasteries."
Do our gifts displease your government?
I cannot speak for the regent nor the ministers, Excellence.
I am only a mere secretary.
Not for long, I presume.
Sit down.
A man of such obvious talent cannot be satisfied with just translating letters.
Your diplomatic skill... would be richly rewarded here.
Serving my country faithfully is reward enough, Excellence.
I ask permission to take my leave.
- Hello Heinrich.
- Hello.
It looks like we're both in need of a good tailor today.
Yes, there's a...
Please, take a seat.
Do you like these?
I'll buy them for you.
Thank you, but I don't eat much meat.
- Don't eat meat?
- He says they are knives from West.
You put them on your feet to cut meat.
They are ice skates.
You put them on your feet... to skate, to glide... sort of dance on ice.
- Yeah.
- Why?
- Why not?
- It's another fool's pleasure.
Let's get them.
How mu...
No, for this?
Ten.
And for this?
Did you see?
Did you see that?
- Did you hurt yourself?
- No, thank you. I'm okay.
Here we go. Up.
- You okay? Did you bang your head?
- No, I'm having fun.
- Just hold on me.
- Watch me!
- Do not look too much at the ground.
- All right.
- Look only into my eyes.
- Yes, all right.
Can I help you?
Here, take my hand.
- Are you happy?
- Very happy.
I try to picture you, Rolf,
and this is what I see:
a young boy who is strong and bright...
a boy filled with curiosity about life...
a boy who isn't afraid to learn from his mistakes.
Hello, married woman.
Hello, bachelor man.
- Heinrich.
- Peter.
Congratulations.
Well, come in.
The Japanese army is facing a growing challenge,
not from China's unified front,
but from the powerful Chinese Communist Army.
Under the control of Mao Tse-tung...
The rumor is that the Communists have taken over the whole of North and Central China.
Rumor? It's a fact, Peter.
Ngawang keeps me up-to-date on all China's war news.
So, how are things at Kungo Tsarong's?
Frankly, I wouldn't know.
I moved out five months ago.
Really? Has it been this long since we have seen you?
- Apparently it has.
- And have you been busy?
This is why I'm extremely busy, since I've been hired to survey the entire city of Lhasa.
Unfortunately, your place is too far out for me to include it on my map.
We like our privacy.
Yes, apparently so.
What about women?
Have you met anyone you like?
Women.
Since I failed miserably with an Austrian wife, an exotic failure with a Tibetan wife seems misguided.
But to answer your question, no, I haven't. 
You?
A friend's good fortune is a blessing, Heinrich. 
I'm sorry you resent ours.
You must be very lonely and sad.
The war is over!
Have the Communists won?
Your war, my friend.
Germany has surrendered.
- Where are you going?
- Back home. Austria.
Mr. Harrer, letter.
We miss you.
I miss you.
I miss you too.
"Dear Mr. Heinrich Harrer:
You are not my father.
Please stop writing me letters.
Rolf Immendorf."
Honorable Heinrich Harrer?
Honorable Heinrich Harrer?
- Yes?
- A letter for you.
The Honorable Heinrich Harrer doesn't want any more letters.
It is from the Great Mother of His Holiness, the Dalai Lama.
Thank you for coming, Mr. Harrer.
Thank you for inviting me, Great Mother.
Do you know the rules of protocol concerning my son?
Not exact... 
I know one bows and performs prostrations.
When you are in the presence of His Holiness, you must always be standing, bent in obeisance, hands folded in supplication.
If seated, you must always be seated lower than he.
Never look him in the eye.
Never speak before he does.
Always refer to him as "Your Holiness".
Never turn your back to him.
And never, never touch him.
He is the reincarnation of Avalokiteshvara, the Bodhisattva of Compassion.
After his recognition, he was renamed
Jetsun Jamphel Ngawang Lobsang 
Yeshi Tenzin Gyatso,
Holy Lord, Gentle Glory, 
Eloquent, Compassionate,
Learned Defender of the Faith,
Ocean of Wisdom.
His Holiness, the Dalai Lama, would like to meet you, Mr. Harrer.
As his advisors have not permitted a private audience with you,
His Holiness has asked me to bring you along to my monthly audience.
I'd be honored and moved.
Hello.
Yellow head.
Yellow head.
You have hair on your arms too?
And legs?
- How about you?
- Mr. Harrer.
It's an honor to meet you,
Your Holiness.
Do you like movies?
You know, I haven't seen a movie in about eight years.
- But as I recall, yes, very much.
- So do I.
- I'm glad to hear that.
- I have a movie projector. And films.
I want to build a movie house.
Here, at the Potala.
- With seats and everything.
- Seats would be advisable.
Can you build it?
- Excuse me?
- Can you build a movie house for me?
My advisors cannot disapprove, and you will be well paid.
And you will have to come here every day to build it, every single day.
When you are here, you'll visit me. 
We can have conversations on many topics.
I would like to learn about the world you come from.
For example, where is Paris, France?
And what's a Molotov cocktail?
And who is Jack the Ripper?
You can tell me many things.
I'm proud to be of service, Your Holiness.
What is the problem?
Worms.
Please, no more hurting worms.
- Please.
- Worms?
In a past life, this innocent worm could have been your mother.
Please, no more hurting.
It's impossible. Please, no more.
But you see, Tibetans believe all living creatures were their mothers in a past life.
So we must show them respect and repay their kindness.
And never, never harm anything that lives.
You can't ask a devout people to disregard a precious teaching.
Yes, but Your Holiness... with true respect, we can't possibly...
I'm sorry, but we can't possibly rescue all the worms, not if you want a theater finished in this lifetime.
You have a clever mind.
Think of a solution.
And in the meantime, you can explain to me what is an elevator.
Antarctica.
That's down below.
Here.
Fantastic.
England.
Don't look at me for help.
Here?
Shift.
Oh, I know him.
Honk. Hello!
Turn!
Brake!
The robe of a minister is so much finer than your old brown robe, isn't it?
Please.
Everyone, please.
You must be very clever to get such a good promotion.
I did not intend to be a secretary forever.
Apparently so.
Well, congratulations.
Evil omen!
From his headquarters in Peking
the Chairman, Mao Tse-tung, was triumphantly proclaimed leader
of the new People's Republic of China.
Chairman Mao vowed that the first task of the Communist regime
is to reunite the Chinese motherland.
He declared that the remote kingdom of Tibet
is an integral part of the Chinese territory,
and must join the great new republic.
"and must join the great new republic."
People's Republic of China is advised, the government of Tibet recognizes no foreign sovereign.
We are an independent nation.
All the Chinese officials will be expelled from the borders of Tibet.
We wish you a happy return to your homeland.
Have a safe and pleasant journey back to China.
May you have a safe and pleasant journey back to China.
We wish you a happy return to your homeland.
May you have happiness and prosperity.
Let me see.
You have a very long lifeline, unlike others here.
When we are facing the light, it's day, yes?
When we are in shadow, it's night.
So if the sun is just rising in Lhasa... that means it is just setting in New York City, perhaps.
That's why it can't be the same time in every place.
- Does that answer your question?
- Yes!
Tell me more.
What else do you want to know?
In a few moments, you will be entering the world of mass media.
I can hear news from all over the planet?
I don't know if they have live broadcasts from the Tonga Islands, but generally speaking, yeah.
Do you listen to news from your country?
From Austria?
No, not really.
Give me some light, Ku-Dun.
- Why? It's your home.
- Not anymore it isn't.
But don't you have friends and family there?
A few friends, no family.
Keep the light steady, Your Holiness.
Why? Is everyone dead?
Do you know there's another sentence construction aside from the question?
I was married, but I'm divorced.
What did you do?
I didn't want a child, so I ran away to climb a mountain.
You have a child, Heinrich?
Although I've never seen him.
All right. 
Let me show you how this thing works.
- Give it all you've got.
- Yes, Mr. Harrer.
Happy Christmas.
Thank you.
Happy Christmas.
Thank you, Heinrich.
- What is this special occasion?
- This is Christmas.
And this is for you, my friend.
Go on.
"I found it in a shop in the Barkhor.
It has traveled a long way and finally come back home.
Thank you for your friendship.
Heinrich."
It is incredible.
Thank you for saving my life.
... must be liberated from religious oppressors.
Tibetans must be reunited
- with their brothers and sisters
- Turn that off.
- of the great family of new China.
- I'm very sorry.
Foreigners control Tibet's corrupt government.
Our Tibetan comrades must be liberated from foreign imperialists.
Tibet's million serfs must be freed.
How many foreigners are there in Tibet?
You, Heinrich.
Tibet will be liberated.
He asked for you, Mr. Harrer.
They were destroying the village 
I was born in, Takster in Amdo.
It was terrible.
It was just a dream.
You had a bad dream. That's all.
But it was so real.
Where did it come from?
My mind could never imagine such terrible things.
I can't sleep.
I'm afraid the dream will come back.
A couple of insomniacs.
Tell me a story, Heinrich.
Tell me a story about climbing mountains.
That's one way to fall asleep.
Those stories bore even me.
Then tell me what you love about it.
What...
The absolute simplicity.
That's what I love.
When you're climbing, your mind is clear, freed of all confusions.
You have focus.
And suddenly the light becomes sharper, sounds are richer, and you are filled with... the deep, powerful presence of life.
I've only felt that way one other time.
When?
In your presence, Ku-Dun.
The Chinese have already secured much of the northern border regions.
They have ransacked a village, destroyed the monasteries, burnt scriptures and defaced holy relics.
We've been told they've even killed some monks...
- Which village?
- Takster in Amdo.
It's where His Holiness was born.
Go ahead.
When you were defense minister to the previous Dalai Lama, then you wanted to reorganize the army.
Can you do it now?
The People's Liberation Army is one million troops strong.
We have 8.000 men with 50 pieces of artillery, and a few hundred mortars and machine guns.
The task is hopeless.
Then you refuse the appointment, do you?
No. I accept it with honor.
You two gentlemen know about wars.
What type of weapon do you recommend?
It seems the Chinese troops are advancing toward our northern borders.
Where's His Holiness?
The glory of a British coronation.
Nowhere in the world is there anything half so wonderful.
Only once or twice in the life of each one of us comes such a day as this,
when we know that we are watching history in the making,
when we know that generations to come will look back on this day,
for May 12, 1937, will be one of the dates in history
that schoolchildren will learn about maybe a thousand years from now.
Every moment the thrill of excitement...
Do you think someday people will look at Tibet on the movie screen and wonder what happened to us?
The coronation coach moves forward.
I don't know.
Don't you have all the answers, Heinrich?
I don't.
On the same field where Tibetans traditionally gathered for picnics,
ground was cleared to build an airstrip,
so that the plane carrying three Chinese generals could land.
Nearby, the Tibetan army practiced its maneuvers.
Some of the soldiers wear ancient mesh armor.
They bring old muskets and spears as artillery.
The spectacle of a peace-loving nation, vainly attempting to create a military.
The fears of war on my friends' faces...
strike a deeply buried personal chord.
Echoes of the aggressions of my own country,
the will to overpower weaker peoples...
bring shame to me.
I shudder to recall how once long ago
I embraced the same beliefs,
how at one time I was, in fact,
no different from these intolerant Chinese.
The Tibetans say an enemy is the greatest teacher,
because only an enemy can help develop patience and compassion.
They believe with rock-like faith that the power of their religion
will protect them against these Chinese.
In preparation for the generals' visit,
sacred ceremonies are performed throughout Lhasa.
Sculptures of deities have been carved with great care in butter.
As the sun melts them, they become a reminder that nothing lasts.
The rising star of the cabinet,
Minister Ngawang Jigme,
made an offering of his own to greet the Chinese generals
and lead them through Lhasa.
Raising their flag is an honor the Chinese don't deserve.
When you are not strong enough to fight, you should embrace your enemy.
With both arms around you, he cannot point a gun at you.
Nothing in politics is a matter of honor, my friend.
History repeats itself, even in paradise.
General, we shall have our audience with His...
General, the monks have been making this mandala of sand for many days.
It is a symbol of enlightenment and peace.
General!
We do not sit lower than he does.
But, General, it is our custom.
I can sit down there.
Your Holiness, this is General Chang Jing Wu,
General Than Gua,
General Than Gua San.
They wish to have an audience with you.
May you have happiness and prosperity.
They are promising regional autonomy and religious freedom if Tibet accepts that China be its political master.
Until I attain my majority, the regent is the political leader of Tibet.
You should have requested an audience with him, to discuss these important matters of the world.
My experience of such things is limited.
I am a simple Buddhist monk.
All I know is the scripture and the words of Lord Buddha.
He said, 
"All beings tremble before danger and death.
Life is dear to all.
When a man considers this, he does not kill or cause to kill."
You must understand.
These words are ingrained in the heart of every Tibetan.
It is why we are a peaceful people who reject violence on principle.
I pray you will see this is our greatest strength, not our weakness.
I thank you for your visit.
An offering to the Enlightened Ones.
Religion is poison.
The Chinese have attacked the Tibetan frontier near Den-Go.
"Today at the dawn, 
84.000 troops of the 1st and 2nd Field Armies, under the overall command of General Chang Jing Wu, attacked the Tibetan frontier near Den-Go.
The Tibetan army believes an attack on Chamdo is imminent.
Ngawang Jigme, our newly appointed governor,
is preparing to send troops toward the Chinese column,
in order to stop their progression."
As you know, Chamdo is the gateway to Tibet.
If Chamdo falls, the whole of Tibet will fall.
If I did not know that, 
I would not have been appointed governor.
You do realize that our troops are committed to fighting the Chinese to the last man.
They would rather die than surrender.
Rest assured, there will be no surrender as long as I am in Chamdo.
Radio Lhasa.
Now.
We request permission to surrender.
- But there will be no surrender...
- I said, radio Lhasa.
Permission to surrender now.
We lost the war in 11 days, Heinrich.
This surrender is our death sentence.
And I'm afraid our friend
Ngawang Jigme has issued it.
He abandoned Chamdo and then destroyed the ammunition dump.
Without weapons and ammunition, there was no hope for the troops who wanted to fight.
Our guerrillas could have held the mountain passes for months...
even years.
It would have bought us time to make appeals for help to other nations.
Now it's lost.
They broke down the gates.
Hello, my friend.
We did what was the best for our country... for Tibet.
On the way to Lhasa, 
I would see Tibetans wearing these jackets.
"Chinese soldiers. 
Very nice.
Give food, clothes, money.
Very nice."
It's strange to me that something so harmless as a jacket could symbolize such a great lie.
After all these years, you still do not understand Tibetan ways.
To return a gift is unforgivable.
A man who betrays his culture should not preach about its customs.
There was a time I would have wished you dead, but your shame will be your torture.
And your torture will be your life.
I wish it to be long.
We pray that His Holiness, the Dalai Lama, will be granted the power to unify his people.
We humbly ask the Tibetan government to honor our request and let the Dalai Lama attain his political majority.
You have the entire palace in a panic.
I'm hiding from the world for a day.
Kind of difficult in a glasshouse, no?
It's The Moonlight by Debussy.
What else do you know about this song?
Him, him and him.
I hope you've received your invitation to the enthronement ceremony.
Yes. Thank you.
- It's next week.
- Thank you.
Do I look like an egghead?
No, they suit you.
We have a saying in Tibet,
"If the problem can be solved, there is no use worrying about it.
If it can't be solved, worrying will do no good."
So stop worrying, Heinrich.
You have to leave Tibet, Ku-Dun.
Your life's at great risk.
Forgive my presumption, but I made arrangements to get you out safely.
We should leave directly after the enthronement.
The Chinese would never expect it...
How can I help people if I run away from them? 
What kind of leader would I be?
I have to stay here, Heinrich.
Serving others is my path to liberation.
- Then I don't go either.
- Why not?
Because you are my path to liberation.
The Buddha said, 
"Salvation does not come from the sight of me.
It demands strenuous effort and practice.
So work hard and seek your own salvation diligently."
I am not your son... and I never thought of you as my father.
You were much too informal with me for that.
Do you ever think about him?
And what do you think about?
It's not the conscious thought really, Ku-Dun.
It's just always there.
When I crossed Tibet, he was with me.
When I came to Lhasa, he was with me.
When I sit beside you, he's... there with me.
I can't even imagine how I pictured the world without him in it.
Then you should go home and be his father.
I know.
You have finished your job with me.
But you have to stay for my enthronement.
I want you to see me in all my pomp and glory.
It'd be a pleasure, my friend.
From the government of Tibet to Your Holiness, the fourteenth Dalai Lama, we ask you to rule your people as the spiritual and temporal leader of Tibet.
By your prayers and wishes, I humbly accept.
Butter tea.
It was never my cup of tea.
- One was enough.
- Yes, we must follow the custom.
A fresh cup of tea is poured for the loved one departing.
It sits untouched, waiting for his return.
May all travelers find happiness wherever they go.
Without any effort may they accomplish whatever they set out to do.
And having safely returned to the shore, may they be joyfully reunited with their relatives.
Mr. Harrer... from His Holiness.
Hello.
- Hello, Horst.
- Hello, Heinrich.
Rolf, come out to meet him.
No, I don't want to.
May I?
Rolf, take your time.
Well done, son.
Well done.
[Fireworks Exploding]
 [Swing]
[Woman Singing]
 Vote for Mr. Rhythm 
 Raise up your voice 
 And vote for Mr. Rhythm 
 The people's choice 
 You'll be happy with him 
 Take my advice 
 And vote for Mr. Rhythm 
 I'm voting twice 
 Everyone's a friend of his 
 His campaign slogan is 
 Change your woes 
 Into a whoa-de-ho 
 Vote for Mr. Rhythm 
 Let freedom ring 
 And soon we'll all be singing 
 Of thee I swing 
 Now that's the platform we're running on 
 We promise to swing it from now on 
 Fellow citizens
All right, follow me 
 And vote for Mr. Rhythm Jamboree 
We've had some problem with Kerrey people ripping down our signs... but we're gonna take care of that.
- [Onlookers Laughing]
- Um, other than 
- [Man] They're gonna ask them not to.
- Yeah.
We also have a schizophrenic newspaper which, like... prints every shit possible on the front page and then apologizes in the editorial.
It's really bizarre.
The Tsongas sign on Route 3 lasted all of two days.
- It's gone now.
- [Laughter]
[Man] Those Harkin people are stealin' everyone's signs. It's amazing.
Short of, uh, calling for negative ads  although maybe  is there any effort underfoot to go after Tsongas?
Let's face it.
This guy cannot be squeaky clean.
[Man] Sure. Well, this is the question about that, and let's throw that out here.
The problem with attacking Senator Tsongas is 
I mean, we jokingly call him St. Paul.
It could really backfire against us to someone else's advantage.
- Absolutely.
- Um, and that's been 
That's what 
[Clears Throat]
[Man] And it'll look bad, because he's complimented him all along.
And then to come the last week and say that he's bad  I think it will look bad.
We have to do a better job of saying our differences.
We always seem to be defending.
We don't have to defend a damn thing.
We got the best  We know he's the best candidate, 'cause we've met him.
And if everybody in the state of New Hampshire met him... we wouldn't have a problem  we know that.
Thank you.
I'm glad to be with you.
I wasn't in the leather jacket group, but, uh... you know, I had a good time.
But I was a pretty straight kid.
I worked hard enough to make good grades... but I basically liked my music and my friends... and I had a heck of a good time when I was in high school.
We had a band in high school called
The Three Kings. I've still got a record.
You bet.
Thank you.
-  [Humming]
- [Laughing, Chattering]
[Man Chuckling] He likes me.
He may not like Clinton, but he likes me.
I'll bet you I said something you could take out of context.
- You weird guys gotta stick together.
- Mm-hmm. [Laughing]
"Clinton and Brown have little in common except off-the-wall campaign gurus."
[All Laughing]
"Clinton's is James Carville, a Cajun who wears jeans with bright shirts.
Brown's is a Frenchman named Jacques Barzhagi... who wears jeans with a black leather jacket and black beret, indoors and out.
Carville says of Brown,
'He's just not us.'
Barzhagi says cryptically,
'Let them spin. We will win."'
[All Laughing]
You know my mother and them hates that.
They say, "Why do they portray you like that?
We were nice people.
We sent our children to college.
You go up there and you act like some kind of weirdo." [Laughing]
I said, "Ma, they're not interested in the fact that you sent me to college."
- [Man Sneezes]
- Shh.
[Reporters Chattering]
Is that all right? Thanks.
Is that all right?
Little wobbly.
[Man]
Gennifer.
[Man #2]
Sit down.
Good afternoon.
This whole experience is not easy for me.
Yes, I was Bill Clinton's lover for 12 years... and for the past two years I have lied to the press about our relationship to protect him.
The truth is, I loved him.
Now he tells me to deny it.
Well, I'm sick of all of the deceit... and I'm sick of all of the lies.
- [Camera Shutters Clicking]
- [Reporters Chattering]
It's that way.
[Female Reporter] Mr. Clinton, what's your relationship with Gennifer Flowers?
There really isn't one, obviously.
[Chuckles]
I mean, the charges are false.
The, uh  Today she took money to publish a story... that she hired a lawyer to say was absolutely defamatory over a year ago.
And, uh, it's sad.
It's sad that this sort of thing could be published... in a newspaper like the Star which says Martians walk on the earth.
You'd never ask me if Martians walk on the earth.
[Male Reporter]
Will you comment on the tapes she has?
No. I can't. I haven't heard 'em.
[Flowers On Tape]
The reason I was calling was to tell you... that this last Wednesday, someone got into my apartment.
- [Man On Tape] Hold on a minute.
- [Flowers] Okay.
- [Man] So somebody broke in your apartment?
- [Flowers] Well, yeah.
There wasn't any sign of a break-in, but the drawers and things 
There wasn't anything missing that I could tell, but somebody had 
[Man] Somebody had gone through all your stuff.
[Flowers]
Had gone through my stuff.
[Man] You think they were -
But they didn't steal anything?
[Flowers] No. No. My jewelry -
I mean, I had jewelry here. It was still here.
[Man] You think they were tryin' to look for somethin' on us?
[Flowers]
I think so. I mean, why else? Uh 
[Man] You weren't missin' any  any kind of papers or anything?
[Flowers]
Like what kind of papers?
[Man] Well, I mean, any kind of personal records... or checkbooks or anything like that  phone records?
- [Flowers] Do I have any?
- [Man] Yeah.
- [Flowers] Uh-uh. I mean, why would I?
- [Man] I don't know. I just 
[Flowers] You usually call me, for that matter.
And besides, who would know?
[Man] Uh, but I just think that if everybody's on record denying it... you got no problem.
Hold on just a sec here, people.
- Where'd he go?
- [Reporters Clamoring]
[Female Reporter]
Do you have any comments... about the allegations from Gennifer Flowers and the tape recordings?
She was worried about being assumed to be guilty just because her name was brought in.
I said, "That's not true.
Even if your name gets used, in the absence of proof, nobody can prove you're guilty.
Don't worry about it. Tell the truth. Just tell 'em that you didn't do it." That's all I ever said.
- [Male Reporter] How do you know her?
- See ya.
[Male Reporter]
Thank you, Governor.
[Male Reporter] Did the governor at any time tell you on the telephone... to just tell the truth about what happened?
He told me to just deny it.
[Male Reporter]
Did Governor Clinton use a condom?
- [Reporters Snickering, Laughing]
- Jesus. Right here.
Right here.
Ladies and gentlemen  Ladies and gentlemen, we're gonna put this to a stop... if there are any further questions that are degrading, in my opinion, like that.
Now, right here, sir.
[Male Reporter]
You were paid by the Star.
Did anyone ever approach you from the Republican Party  perhaps another Democratic candidate  to urge you to tell this story publicly?
- Yes, they did.
- Who?
- I can't say.
- Wait. You're saying 
Wait, are you saying that somebody from another campaign 
Democratic Party or Republican Party  approached you to tell this story?
Was it the Democratic Party or was it the Republican Party, Ms. Flowers?
It was the Republican Party.
We knew we'd get attacks, but, I mean, you know 
We just couldn't believe the press would pick up a tabloid story that somebody 
I mean, we're at a new low in a way.
That's why it's so important.
But we are fighting back.
Somebody who's been through a lot of tough elections... is James Carville, who's known as the Ragin' Cajun in the business.
- [Scattered Applause]
- We'd like him to say a couple of words to you.
[Carville] Uh, we have a tough fight comin' right down the stretch.
It's gonna come out that Roger Ailes is behind a lot of this stuff before the election... that you been seein' about Governor Clinton.
- Okay? Ailes.
- [Man] Boo!
And of course Bush and Georgette Mosbacher and everything.
Let me tell you what's at stake in this election.
Every time that somebody comes along that's got some ideas  a Democrat comes along  the Republicans come up here and they ambush him.
Remember Muskie?
Okay?
That is standard procedure.
And here comes Clinton.
He comes to New Hampshire.
People here are hurtin'.
They want hope. They want somebody with vision. He gives it to 'em.
So what do Republicans do?
They get together with their wedge issues and they knock it off.
If they succeed this time, it's gonna be every time.
You are never going to get a presidential candidate. Okay?
You're never gonna get somebody to come up here and run for president... that's served 11 years as governor who's got any kind of experience.
Okay? And every time somebody comes up, they're gonna do it.
If we win this, then you have knocked this shit back forever.
- [Applause]
- Okay?
And every time that we get a Democrat that we can believe in...
Roger Ailes a-a-and Georgette Mosbacher 
You know that she's the secretary of the person closest to Bush.
You know what she said?
She can't wait till this election's over so she can get her Maserati and her jewels back.
That's the mind-set you're fightin' against.
And if they beat us back 
Paul Tsongas 
Look, he ain't gonna win anything, okay?
This is not about Paul Tsongas.
It's about George Bush and Roger Ailes and Georgette Mosbacher... and the whole sleazy little cabal of 'em that wanna keep hold of anything... and that wanna knock anybody off that we believe in... and anything that we care about.
And if we beat them and you're out there... and your knuckles get tired or your feet get cold or anything else... you think about that.
Because if they knock us off, then so what?
The next one that comes up, they gonna knock the next one off.
- [Applause, Cheering]
- And the next one and everything else.
And you know what kind of shit you're gonna get?
You're gonna get the kind of Supreme Court that you got.
You're gonna get the kind of four different positions on civil rights that you get from 'em.
You gonna get tax breaks for the wealthy.
You gonna get a guy that doesn't know what a grocery store scanner is. Okay?
So let's go. We got 
You know, we got six more days to go.
And don't forget who the real enemy is in here.
And don't forget what we're really campaigning against. Thank y'all very much.
[Applause, Cheering]
- Thank you.
- Good to see you.
How are you?
Nice to see you.
- Hello.
- [Girl] This is Ally.
Is that Ally? Oh, I'm so 
And what's your bear's name?
- [Girl] Kelly.
- Okay, good.
[Man] Four more years!
Four more years! Four more years!
[Bush] How are you? Good.
Nice to see you. Good to see you. Thank you.
[Female Announcer] Some say his campaign appears to slip further every day.
Arkansas Governor Bill Clinton remains tight-lipped... about a controversial letter regarding the Vietnam draft.
Ask the president when he gets off the plane... to call the Pentagon and ask how the letter got out.
W-W-Wait a minute.
What do we got here?
What is the Pentagon doing in the middle of a political campaign?
And what is the Pentagon doing leaking something... that we asked for November 6 that they didn't give us?
Now, Governor Clinton has a character problem, but I take it that your line of...
Governor Clinton has no character problem.
He's passed his character test.
Well, I mean, he has not denied that he has engaged in marital infidelity.
He denied a specific one.
- He has said that he had problems in his marriage.
- That's right.
And he has talked about the draft.
And to some people, it's a character problem.
Bill Clinton's passed his character test throughout his life and throughout this campaign.
And he's shown it through his commitments to real fights.
What he's gonna do in this campaign is focus on what's important to the American people  on jobs and education.
That's what the American people care about.
They wanna move into the future.
They don't want to be diverted by side issues... and they're not gonna let the Republican attack machine divert them.
- [Applause]
- I'm getting sick and tired 
I am  every single night... hearing one of these carping little liberal Democrats... jumping all over my you-know-what.
- And I can't wait for this campaign.
- [Applause, Cheering]
The friction in this is gonna be too much for Clinton to survive.
I think it's only really a matter of days before he'll have to get out... if not hours.
- Tell me your name.
- John Bickerstaff.
- John, Hillary Clinton.
- I'm the night baker.
I think if we could just keep one-on-one and one-on-one, energy, energy, energy...
- I think we can make it.
- You bet.
- [Woman] I bet they miss Arkansas.
- They do.
Well, it's a lot like home.
Don't you think it is?
- [Woman] I mean, it's what he's gonna do.
- That's exactly right.
That's the bottom line right there.
I don't wanna hear any more of this "read my lips" business.
- Not charisma.
- Ride the wave right to the White House.
Leadership.
Proven ability to change.
We will have the most influential woman on the presidents... in the history of the United States if I get elected.
My Valentine's Day girl.
[Applause]
[Man Singing]
 Say ohh 
 Ohh 
 Domino 
 Ohh, ohh 
 Domino 
All right!
[Man] The next president of the U nited States, Bill Clinton!
[Cheering, Applause]
Thank you. Thank you.
- Let me say that...
- [Crowd Chattering]
While the evening is young... and we don't know yet what the final tally will be...
I think we know enough to say with some certainty... that New Hampshire, tonight, has made Bill Clinton the Comeback Kid.
[Cheering, Applause]
[Woman Singing]
 Vote, baby, vote 
 Vote, baby, vote 
 Are you registered, baby 
 Vote, baby, vote
Vote, baby, vote 
 Vote, baby, vote 
 Are you registered, baby 
He is funneling money to his wife's law firm for state business. That's number one.
I don't care what you say about me... but you oughta be ashamed of yourself for jumpin' on my wife.
You're not worth being on the same platform as my wife.
I'll tell you something, Mr. Clinton 
Don't try to escape it.
- Ralph Nader called me this afternoon.
- I did not!
He read me the article from the Washington Post.
- Does that make it true?
- I was shocked by it.
I was shocked by it because I don't think someone in government 
- Hey, I get time. He used his time.
- [Moderator] Governor Brown 
- Governor, is that true or isn't it?
- The Washington Post this morning.
[Moderator] Is it true, or isn't it true,
Governor Clinton?
You're always trying to attack.
You never answer the question.
I found it very distasteful.
Because those two got into a dispute, you're all gonna use it on the news.
- And I'm out of the picture.
- [Reporters Laughing]
So I was gonna run in between them and, uh 
[Stephanopoulos] Acknowledging the report and how it's different.
And he said, "Yeah, that's true."
He seemed fine.
I just took it as a good sign,
'cause I don't think he would call back... if they weren't considering 
- Endorsing.
- Doing something.
I don't know about endorsing.
Doing something.
- That's really good.
- [Camera Shutter Clicks]
 [Swing]
[Woman Singing]
 Everyone's a friend of his 
 His campaign slogan is 
 Change your woes 
 Into a whoa-de-ho, oh-oh-whoa 
 Vote for Mr. Rhythm 
 Let freedom ring 
 And soon we'll all be singing 
 Of thee I swing 
Maybe they have an ad that's already in the can about Clinton and his environmental record.
You're not worried about his big, hardball, negative tactics... that have worked for them for 15 years?
- Um, it's all politics.
- Could start tomorrow.
- It's all politics.
- And you're convinced it won't work again?
I'm convinced that if they try it, we'll hit 'em back and they'll buckle.
What are we gonna do when George Bush attacks us?
I mean, there's the story of AndrewJackson  was in a duel with a guy, and the guy shot and knocked him down.
The guy started walkin'. He says, "Hold to, sir.
Sit still there for a second. It's my turn."
Why can't we attack George Bush?
Why can't we talk about the lowest economic growth in the last 50 years?
Why can't we talk about there being a political hack as drug czar in this country?
Why can't we talk about the fact that he has done nothin' about education... the environment  the deficit's outta control.
He said "no new taxes."
You can just go 
Why is it that I'm always asked...
"What are we gonna do when George Bush attacks us?"
Why don't you go ask George Bush what's he gonna do when we hold him accountable... for all the wrong that he's done to this country?
A-And you can segue, you know, right into Bush.
The idea is, he reeks of yesterday.
He has the stench of yesterday.
He is so yesterday, if I think of yesterday  if I think of an old calendar 
I think of George Bush's face on it.
Can you all have Marla come up to the war room on the 13th floor? Thanks.
- [Chattering]
- [Man] Okay.
Come on. Let's listen. Start with some modestly  modest news this morning.
- Stan Greenberg, where are you?
- Right here.
Um, there's gonna be a poll that's gonna come out... which we did jointly.
Uh, it's gonna show extraordinary changes on the favorabilities.
Uh, it shows us with, uh, um, favorable  with a net positive favorable  about 10 points more favorable 
Bush more negative  net negative, by about 10... and Perot even fave/un-fave at around 37.
So that represents a good six-point change or more.
Obviously we're doing something right.
 Let's give 'em somethin' to talk about 
-  Somethin' to talk about 
-  A little mystery to figure out 
-  Somethin' to talk about 
-  Let's give 'em somethin' to talk about 
The reason why we're here in New York is... we're afraid that we might get another lawyer as president.
New York is pro-choice!
New York is pro-choice!
- New York is pro-choice!
- Aristide, the people's choice!
- [Man Shouting In French]
- Aristide, the people's choice!
[Chanting Continues, Indistinct]
-  [Band: March]
- [Delegates Clapping To Beat]
I'm lost. I don't know where
I'm supposed to go next.
I got a lot of friends here, so I was talkin' to a lot of people.
Your ever-growing bald spot.
Keep up the good work. You should feel mighty good, what you've done the last 
- We gonna win this thing, my man.
- Damn right you're gonna win.
George Bush is the ultimate politician.
His political skills are awesome.
He may be a joke as a president, but as a politician,
I have a great deal of respect for him.
And, uh, you know, Ross Perot 
I mean 
[Man]
Okay? Nothing yet? Okay.
Yes? I don't hear anything.
- Got it?
- Hello? Hi. How are you?
George Stephanopoulos.
I'm director of communications.
Okay.
- [Receiver Hook Clicks]
- Hello?
How are you? Yes.
Okay.
I think it was terrific. Governor Clinton went out there and made an aggressive case 
Why don't he run the economy and not run his mouth?
He knows how to handle a crisis?
Good. You got one right now.
Handle it, partner.
The country's goin' el-busto.
Fix it.
If you can't, get out the way.
[Woman]
Please move out of the way.
[Male Reporter] Governor, why did you reject the offer by Ron Brown?
Look, we don't make deals.
We don't need quid pro quo.
We have a right to speak, and we'll speak in a thoughtful way... in the manner in which all our Democratic conventions have been conducted.
- [Male Reporter] Who will nominate you?
- [Male Reporter #2] Thank you very much.
Go ahead, Mark.
Mark goes in.
[All Chanting]
Let Jerry speak! Let Jerry speak!
Let Jerry speak!
Let Jerry speak!
- [Man] Is Stan Greenberg here yet?
- [Greenberg] I'm here, sir.
Okay. Let's get started.
Shh, shh. Let's talk about the hall.
I think what we need is some hand-done signs... that show the kind of themes that we want Clinton, you know 
Because hand-done signs are the signs the network will cut to.
If anyone wants to make their own signs, that's fine.
Scott, how many signs can we make between now and tonight?
Can you make 2,000 signs that are 
I am not at all convinced that a bunch of hodgepodge, handheld, homemade signs... are gonna make the impact visually... from both a television point of view and from a podium point of view... that a sea of the same kind of sign across the hall.
May I just add that the problem is that we have two kinds of signs.
We have thin, red signs  white-on-red signs  and then we have rectangular white-on-blue signs.
We have a mixed message out on the floor.
We went through this twice before at two other conventions... and that's basically the problem.
And also, Brown put out new signs last night that were white on red... in which the letters  the white letters  were bigger than our letters.
And so they looked better.
How are we gonna foll 
The other thing 
Harold raised a very important issue about delegates.
Whoa. Let's get one thing  Do we want a bunch of handmade signs or not?
- I mean, that's... I don't think that's 
- [Man] I'm not talking about 2,000 
No, wait a minute, Bob.
I was in the middle of a sentence, okay?
I'm not talking  You know, it's not the greatest policy issue this group will ever decide... but let's get a decision on it so that at least the visibility people... and John Hart's people have some direction on it.
I don't particularly care.
I just raise it as an issue.
[Man Over P.A.]
California proudly casts...
211 votes for Governor Clinton...
- [Cheering]
- 160 votes... for our former governor Jerry Brown...
- [Cheering Continues]
- And 35 abstentions.
[Woman Over P.A.]
Ohio.
Madam  Madam Sec 
[Delegates Chanting]
We want Bill! We want Bill! We want Bill!
No speeches!
- No speeches!
- [Woman] No demonstrations!
Who's on the line to Ohio?
Tell him to speak!
[Delegates]
We want Bill! We want Bill!
- [Ohio Delegate]
Madam Sec  Madam Secretary 
- We want Bill! We want Bill!
[Woman]
Yes, Mr. Chairman?
Madam Secretary...
Ohio wants change.
America wants change.
And Ohio casts 144 votes for the next president -
- [Man] Yes!
- Whoo!
Yeah! Yes!
[Delegates Chanting]
We want Bill! We want Bill!
We want Bill! We want Bill!
We want Bill!
We want Bill!
 ["Stars And Stripes Forever"]
Yes! Yes!
- [Cheering]
- Whoo!
[Perot]
Good mornin'. Good to see ya.
Now that the Democratic Party has revitalized itself...
I have concluded that we cannot win in November.
[Man]
Perot just pulled out. Out.
[Man #2]
Out. Perot's out.
Unbelievable.
The perception is that Clinton has succeeded... in pushing out one of his chief rivals in the presidential race.
But on the other hand,
Clinton campaign advisers... were counting on Perot to help them, especially in the South.
Perot, with his harsh attacks on President Bush... worked to soften up the incumbent... and that was perceived to be a help to the Democratic candidate.
How's that?
Any kind of political earthquake like this increases the intensity of coverage.
That means people are gonna see Bill Clinton tonight step into the vacuum.
There's only two candidates left in this race.
People are gonna tune in tonight to hear what Bill Clinton has to say.
It's gonna be electric in there tonight.
- It's gonna be unbelievable.
- [Woman] And he's gotta reassure 'em.
He's gotta say, "This is a two-way race and we're gonna kick the living shit out of 'em."
[All Chuckling]
[Carville] It's the people that are voting for Perot that we wanna focus on.
Well, would you do one specific Perot event... whether it is with volunteers or just those who signed petitions at different 
See, I agree with you that they're a different group of people.
If we have four or five people who flipped  four or five Perot state directors that flipped  that would be huge news  huge news.
- [Man] Just be careful.
- What about a "Ask Bill Clinton" thing... if we got a place and got a petition... and we called up all the people on the petition and asked 'em to do it.
[Chattering]
- [Audio Feedback]
- I have a statement by Governor Clinton.
"I was moved by Ross Perot's announcement today."
[Reporters Clamoring,
Shouting Questions]
- Governor Clinton!
- Governor Clinton, over here!
- Over here!
- [Clamoring, Shouting Continue]
[Woman]
Can you tell us what you said to Ross Perot?
I told him that I was deeply moved by his statement... very impressed by his campaign... and that I wanted to reach out to his supporters... because I thought they wanted the same sort of change I did.
And I appreciated his saying that Al Gore and I had revitalized the Democratic Party.
[Reporters Continue Clamoring]
[Female Reporter]
Will you change your speech tonight?
- Okay.
- His speech isn't done.
No. I just wanted to make sure that 
'Cause I keep tellin' the press it might be 3:30, it might be later.
Hi. This is George Stephanopoulos.
Hey, Jody. How are you?
Good, thanks.
The governor's right in the middle 
He's literally halfway through his speech  reading it.
Is there any way we can call later or is there anything I can tell him?
- How long do you want this embargo till?
- Till delivery.
Gotcha.
[Man On TV]
Bill Clinton does not believe in the 
- [Chattering]
- [Woman] There he is.
- Yeah? Is he ready? Let's go.
- Excuse me. Excuse me. Excuse me.
- Thanks.
- Your voice coach is 
- Okay. Let's go.
- [Man] Hey, Governor. Good luck to you.
- Thanks.
- [Man] George.
- It's his opening line.
- It's a great line.
- Ross Perot did you a big favor today.
- What?
- "Revitalizing the Democratic Party"?
- One, "Revitalizing the Democratic Party."
By doing this today, you have any idea how many gazillions of people are gonna watch this speech tonight?
[Man Talking, Indistinct]
[Cheering, Applause]
I end tonight... where it all began for me.
I still believe... in a place called Hope.
God bless you and God bless America.
 [Pop]
 If you wake up and don't want to smile 
 If it takes just a little while 
 Open your eyes and look at the day 
 You'll see things in a different way 
 Don't stop thinkin' about tomorrow 
 Don't stop lt'll soon be here 
 It'll be here better than before 
 Yesterday's gone
Yesterday's gone 
 [Continues]
 Why not think about times to come? 
[Bush]
My opponent won't remind you... that interest rates are the lowest they've been in 20 years... and millions of Americans have refinanced their homes.
[Cheering]
- [Delegates] George Bush! George Bush!
- My opponent says America is a nation in decline.
Of our economy, he says we are somewhere on the list beneath Germany... heading south towards Sri Lanka.
Well, don't let anyone tell you that America is second-rate... especially somebody running for president.
[Delegates Cheering]
He's like that on a lot of issues.
First on one side, then the other.
He's been spotted in more places than Elvis Presley.
[Delegates Cheering]
Liz?
I want to know if I can say this is the first time an incumbent president... has given an acceptance speech and not mentioned his economic record.
Okay?
You can say that. Yeah.
That's a good James line.
B-But can Clinton 
Can he say that?
- [Woman] Isn't it cute?
- What about if he just said...
"Look, if I thought for one minute he could do all that, I'd get out of the race."
Now, that 
There's somethin' there.
Say I'm gonna promise you
I'm gonna balance the budget.
Everybody in America's gonna get a tax cut.
Thirty-seven million people that don't have health insurance... We gonna cover all of you.
Anybody wants to go to any private school they wanna go to, we gonna pay for it.
Except there are 41 million kids now who go to school, and that's 
Shit, man. Don't 
Don't complicate the simple.
[Male Announcer] The convention poll bounce a seven-point increase... for the team of Bush and Quayle since a similar poll taken just a week ago.
Last week, he gave an interview 
Governor Clinton did  where he sounded as if he was getting ready to measure the drapes in the Oval Office.
Well, I got news for ya: Not so fast.
I believe that come November 3, my opponent and his saxophone... will be playing that old Buck Owens classic,
"It's Crying Time."
[Onlookers Cheering]
- Hey.
- [Woman On Phone] Hey.
- It's a good spot. Suggestion.
- Okay.
At the end, you go...
"Fact: Arkansas is the second-lowest tax-burdened state in the country."
You said, "This time we're not reading your lips. We're reading your record."
[Woman] "This time don't read his lips.
Read the record." Yeah.
Whatever. But instead of that, go back one more time and have him say, "Read my lips."
"No, sir.
This time we're reading the record."
[Woman] You can't. I'm just 
We have a time problem.
But that's just it. There's no less time to go back to him and say, "Read my lips."
[Stephanopoulos]
"Read my lips. No. Read the record."
[Woman]
Um, he takes longer than anybody.
[Carville Groans]
Then cut somewhere else.
Let's get three times of,
"Read my lips."
[Stephanopoulos] Where else can we cut?
"Now he wants you," not "asking you."
"Government spending in Arkansas, the lowest in the nation."
- [Woman] Which three facts?
- We're going with spending.
But in terms of scripts tonight, we're gonna test alternatives 
- one with welfare and one with spending.
- [Woman] Okay.
[Man] I think for recording, we should record the spending one.
Spending has priority.
If welfare's possible as a second shot 
Mandy, here's the way to save maybe a half a second or a second.
- [Mandy] Yeah?
- Under the second announcer... change the sentence to, "Now he wants you to believe what he says about Bill Clinton."
[Mandy]
Actually, what I changed it to was...
"Now he's asking you to believe his attacks against Bill Clinton."
- Fine. Either way. That's better.
- [Man] The other thing we could do, Mandy 
- [Mandy] Yeah.
- Maybe we could say 
Where we say, "No, Mr. President.
This time we're gonna read the facts"... maybe could just say,
"No. This time we're gonna read the facts."
- [Stephanopoulos] Better.
- [Mandy] Yeah.
"No, sir."
Maybe that's a Southern thing, but, "No, sir." "No  No, sir."
"No, sir."
But I just think it's very important we get at the end, we get that "read my lips."
I know that that will drive them  the voters 
It's the most famous broken promise in the history of American politics.
[Mandy] I'm just telling you that in the way it's set up to be factual... and, you know, big facts 
What visual were you thinking of with the fact?
[Mandy]
A big, you know, block of a fact sign.
Okay. Let's do that.
But let's just get this spot produced.
[Mandy]
Hey. I'm sitting in a studio. I'm doin' it.
- Talk to ya later.
- Bye!
I'll bet you one thing.
I just wanna say one thing. If this 
You need to call Mandy back and tell her to be sure that she gets that "read "
No. Not with me. To be sure she gets
"read my lips" in three times.
One day, in my time, in my political career 
Every time that you suggest something to a media person... their first reaction is,
"We can't do that."
Every time.
"Well, we can't do that."
It doesn't take you long to get to the second time though.
Yeah. I know. But just one time,
I would just like to say, "Let's do that."
Say, "Fine. That's easy, man.
What do you need? Here it is."
James, this idea was suggested a half hour ago.
Your script has been made in 20 minutes.
- She's in the studio producing it.
- The studio  producing it.
- That's 45 minutes.
- We've gone from a half hour... to a concept to a spot.
- What the fuck do you want?
- Okay. I'm a hog. I'm a hog.
I suppose we could've gotten on the satellite to get it out in 30 minutes!
You haven't even asked, but it'll probably be at the focus group tonight at 6:00.
And, you know, most campaigns, it takes 'em two days to get a spot out and run it. So okay.
You're right. You're right. Mandy's great.
Mandy's great. She's great.
- What was the last line?
- "Read my lips."
"No, sir. This time, we're gonna read the record."
- Uh-uh. Uh-uh.
- Uh-uh? Uh-uh?
- "This time we're gonna read the record."
- Uh-uh! U h-uh!
I like that. Who was the "uh-uh" man?
You were the "uh-uh" man?
- That little Greek is creative.
- You gonna call Mandy to give her the "uh-uh"?
I can't wait till you 
Can we listen to that?
 [Band]
 [Ends]
[Woman]
We're the people!
[Man]
That's pretty cool, man.
[Crowd Cheering]
[Gore] Depending on the outcome of this election... just imagine how you personally would feel... if you woke up and you looked out the window November 4 morning... and it was cold and gray and raining.
And you walked to the front door with sleep still in your eyes... and having trouble waking up, you open the door and pick up a newspaper... and it said, "Four more years of the same old stuff."
[Crowd Booing]
Unemployment around the country has gone up.
The number of jobs has gone down.
The trade deficit has gone up.
Personal income has gone down.
The budget deficit has gone up.
Consumer confidence has gone down.
Poverty has gone up.
The number of jobs has gone down.
Bankruptcies have gone up. Jobs down.
Fear up. Hope down.
Everything that oughta be down is up.
Everything that should be up is down.
They've got it upside down, and we're gonna turn it right side up.
[Cheering]
-  [Radio: Jingle]
- [Phone Ringing]
 KDKA Pittsburgh 
[Male Host] Caroline, you're on KDKA with James Carville.
- [Caroline] Hi.
- [Carville] Hi, Caroline.
[Caroline] I wanna know if James Baker III is doing Mary's dirt.
- Mary Matalin?
- Yes.
- No, indeed not. Mary Matalin 
- [Caroline] Well, where has she been?
- She...
- [Host, Caroline Arguing]
[Caroline] What I'm saying is 
Seriously, as a viewer...
I have  I have missed her, uh, on, uh, television and radio... and, uh  and in print.
Well, I don't wanna defend James Baker I I I, but he and Mary are good friends.
[Caroline Chuckling]
How about giving her the opportunity to?
Okay. I don't wanna get into the internal workings of the Bush campaign... but I certainly think that Mary, she loves the president.
We just disagree on that.
[Host] Is that one of those you can agree to disagree?
I mean, what a strange matchup that is.
Well, I don't know. Just as long as it works is all that matters to me.
[Carville Laughs]
[Host] Is there a little 
Do you date during the campaign?
No. It's kind of hard.
She's in Washington. I'm in Little Rock.
But, you know, she really does care and feels very strongly about the president... and I really do care and feel strongly about Governor Clinton and, uh 
- [Host] You care about her too.
- Yeah, I sure do.
But, you know, sometimes 
Look, I know plenty of times 
I bet you you've heard of a thousand people around this country... particularly in western Pennsylvania... used to get in a horse and buggy, a man and his wife... and they'd drive 20 miles in a horse and buggy and cancel each other's vote.
Everybody got an opinion. This is just the most American thing you can do.
- [Host Laughs] All right.
- Okay.
[Male Reporter]
Mary? Mary Matalin?
The demos in London 
You were talking about 
I am saying it is vintage Clinton... that it is a pathological pattern of deception.
He is an obsessive politician.
When he has been asked about his antiwar activities in the past... he has hedged, bobbed and weaved.
He has said to Frank White in his 1982 race,
"I don't know what he's talking about."
He has said in other races, "Oh, I just attended a few marches to listen to the speeches."
He organized. He marched.
He wrote. He spoke.
According to Father McSorley, he was a main antiwar organizer.
Why doesn't he just say that?
It's like the draft. Why didn't he just say he was trying to avoid the draft?
No one is questioning that. They're questioning why he always prevaricates on these issues.
If we cannot believe anything he has said about his past... how can we believe anything he's saying about the future?
- [Female Reporter] Mary, I 
- I gotta get to my plane.
[Man] I have a question for Mr. Carville.
Did Bill Clinton go to Moscow?
- Are two pages missing from his passport?
- [Laughter]
Did he organize antiwar rallies while he was in Moscow?
- Did he graduate from Oxford?
- [Guests Laughing]
Yes, he went to Moscow. He used to brag about it in speeches when he ran for office.
He went to Warsaw too and, I don't know, Oslo and wherever else.
And yet as a reporter from one of the big papers called me 
"Did he have a transmitter planted in his cavity while he was there?"
Wh-What diff Why do you ask me a question like that: "Did he go to Moscow?"
What difference does it make?
In 1970, Bill Clinton went to Moscow.
Okay.
An answer!
[Carville] But  What? It does. I mean, he's answered it a thousand times.
He's said that he went.
What  It's irrelevant to the question.
And that's my point.
- What did he do there?
- How the hell do I know what he did in Moscow?
I mean, I don't know what he did.
Maybe  I don't  You know 
[Stammering, Chuckling]
At that time in our nation's history, though 
[Laughing]
Some could have been heavily criticized for going to a country... that was supplying the enemies of the U nited States.
They were doing student exchanges.
We were playin' 'em in basketball, man.
What are you talkin' about?
I mean, come on.
I mean, we had track meets with these people.
The issue here isn't patriotism.
You can demonstrate all you want here at home.
But I can't understand... someone mobilizing demonstrations in a foreign country... when poor kids... drafted out of the ghettos... are dying in a faraway land.
[Announcer Speaking In Portuguese]
- Liz, do you speak Portuguese?
- Let me see if Jos does.
[Carville] Oh, this is too good.
This is too good.
[Woman] You don't even need to understand Portuguese.
- [Man Speaking Portuguese Continues]
- [Laughs]
[Carville] I mean, if the president don't buy American for his campaign 
Who do we give this to?
Hey, Collier?
Get me Susan Zirinsky's number, please.
 [Whistling
The Andy Griffith Show Theme]
With CBS.
Susan Zirinsky, please.
James Carville.
[Whistles]
- Huh?
- Who is she?
She's the  She's the woman that Broadcast News was -
- Oh, really?
- Hey.
I got something you might be interested in.
How would you like a videotape of a newscast on Brazilian television... that has 
We believe the script goes something like this... with appropriate visuals of printing presses.
"The Republican campaign..."
Is what?
What it is is that Bush is buyin' up to $10 million in printing in Brazil... and the Brazilian TV ran it.
It's these huge printing presses with Bush-Quayle material coming 
I mean, it's perfect for the news  for television.
Lathered, man. They just can't wait to get the tape. This thing'll 
Did we trans 
We have a translation?
Oh, CBS, they got 100,000 people.
They oughta speak Portuguese.
We have a rough trans 
It's just everything you want.
- You know where we got this?
- Yeah.
[Bush] When it comes to crime,
I just wish that Candidate Clinton... out around the country, the Doberman pinscher... would meet Governor Clinton, the Chihuahua.
[Shrieking Laughter]
[TV Reporter] The president said he thinks there will be a debate, but he couldn't say when... with next week in Louisville, Kentucky now apparently out.
[Whispers, Indistinct]
[Carville] Where's the tape?
Hey, Vicki, put the tape in the thing.
And this is wonderful in the South.
If you listen to the tape... Watch this, y'all.
- [Announcer Speaking In Portuguese]
- [Woman] This is it!
[Man] You thinkJames Lake had anything to do with this?
Yeah, why did he go to Brazil?
I wonder who paid for it.
- [Man] It's James Lake.
- [Stephanopoulos]
Brazil Gate. Rio Gate. Oh, man!
[Staff Laughing]
- [Laughing Continues]
- [Man] He got a very good deal.
Can I just throw a little cold water on this for a minute?
We don't know what the date on the tape is.
They show convention footage.
If these are convention signs 
This aired, and one of our people saw it two weeks ago and made the tape down there.
All right. All I'm saying is, it's possible. Possible.
[Greenberg] But they have pictures of the convention in them.
- Right.
- They just used  They used it.
What is it, poss 
What are you trying 
It's possible that they were printed in primary money.
- Well, that still 
- So what?
[All Talking At Once]
It's a big  You're talking taxpayer funds, and that's what you said 
- No. That ain't 
- You got matching money involved.
You have matching money.
You got matching money. Sure do.
It's a valid technical point, but it's just 
I don't think it's gonna 
[Man] I'd still find out exactly what we're dealing with.
- It's matching money.
- [Chattering]
You're being way, way too 
I will call and get the details.
- Who did the contract?
- Right.
- Do they have a contract?
- Mmm. That's tomorrow.
- Yeah.
- You know the date 
No. Hey. What did Barney Fife say?
"We'll handle it."
[Laughing]
That's tomorrow.
[Laughs]
You see, 'cause tomorrow, who got the contract... and how they did that, what guys have lobbying things in Brazil 
Yeah. There's no sense in this thing being a one-day story.
I don't believe. I think we gotta kinda ooze this thing out a bit.
I'll call and find out... call the source.
It's very sweet.
See about getting an uplink out of So Paulo.
See how hard it is, how many times you gotta hop it to get it up here.
Okay.
And we'll want to downlink this here in Little Rock.
[Whooshes]
This thing, I'm tellin' you 
I like the way this thing feels.
Campaign hard money.
Can we send someone to look and see... if they've sent any checks to this Brazilian company?
- Yeah.
- That 
Okay, this was a  This was aired during the Republican convention 
- So that's pri 
- which means that it was primary money.
- Still government money.
- It's still...
I have a feeling it's R.N.C., is what I've thought all along.
- No, it can't be R.N.C.
- It says Bush/Quayle.
- It can't be R.N.C.
- It says Bush/Quayle.
It's illegal.
- Let's hope it's R.N.C.
- The issue's moot.
All we got to do is go out and get the latest filing and see if there's a check.
I think we looked on it earlier.
We didn't find it.
We'll check now with updates.
It's possible it's a subcontract, you know, that 
In fact, it is likely that they've done this through their  maybe it was a media firm... and it was subcontracted through the media firm.
It's unlikely there's a direct check.
No, but somebody said, if you look at the translation... that they went to Ohio and Texas and California.
- Right, but it could be 
- And where they came was Rio.
- All we can do is check 
- [Laughing]
- They came to Rio.
- We gotta respond 
What should be our response to the Brazil thing?
[Greenberg] We're stunned.
We're speechless. We can't respond.
[Laughing]
What's his 60-second spot? What does he say about American jobs in his spot?
What is it?
What do people think about Bush?
He cares more about foreign things, and he cares more about rich people.
- Foreign.
- Yeah.
There's something 
We knew he spent a lot of time overseas.
Now he's spending a lot of taxpayer money over there, or something.
Foreign aid is something  something like that.
We knew he didn't care much about creating American jobs 
No, here it is.
He's finally got a jobs program.
Too bad it's for Rio.
[Chuckling]
[Carville]
Hey, what's the song about Rio?
What rhymes with Rio?
It's better than we even thought.
- The two highest business failures 
- Yeah?
Are New York and California in the piece.
Business failures in the country  leading in New York and California.
The two states they didn't go to for the printing is New York and California.
Goddamn.
Has she said what their reaction is yet?
- I just talked to her.
- Okay. All right.
[Stephanopoulos] It's leading the news, and she's sending me the script.
[Carville]
Okay.
Hey, Governor, how you doing?
All right.
Printing 
Print materials in Brazil.
Pictures of Yeah.
Yeah. They're gonna lead with it.
All right?
[Chewing Loudly]
Well, let's see what happens on the news.
Yeah, I can call to up there.
Just checked it out.
Every single penny spent in the U.S.
- Ours?
- Yes.
- Is somebody asking?
- Get a quote on that.
Did they ever call you back and say what the Bush reaction was?
Yes. You're gonna 
I called Mary, and she goes,
"Is this bad?"
[Laughing]
"Is this bad?"
I said, "Susan, you better tell her it's pretty bad."
They don't understand.
[Man]
Oh, they will.
If the president of the United States don't know where $65 million... of his campaign money goes... how can you expect to know where
$1.4 trillion of taxpayer monies go?
- Huh? Does that work?
- [Groans]
I think it's better just to say, you know 
Oh, my God, that is 
- [Carville] What's wrong? What's wrong?
- The guy's story is completely incredible.
He says that he did it on his own.
He dumped $40,000 on his own.
- Give me a break.
- Where are the signs then?
That's what she's trying 
The guy won't return her phone call.
- [Phone Dialing]
- Well, when I was talking to her... she said he was on another line and she'd call me back, so let's see.
They're bullshitting you. They 
But  But let me 
Okay. But the link is this 
They have printed materials that were printed in Brazil, okay?
What do they say happened to the materials?
Yeah, but if they can't produce the materials... then they either got 'em or they were given to 'em.
If they were given to 'em, that's a violation of F.E.C. Law.
Call me back. Bye.
Ladies and gentlemen, it's a tremendous honor and a privilege... to welcome back to the Ozarks... the president of the United States,
George Bush!
[Cheering]
[TV Continues, Indistinct]
[Carville]
What is the matter today?
Every time somebody farts the word "draft," it's on the front page of the paper.
It's not! Okay.
I'm gonna see how many stories there are on the draft... and how many stories there are on
George Bush's election year promises.
Okay?
Oh... Oh, oh, oh, oh!
A lot more. A lot more.
Okay. I'm gonna go back and see.
You know, George Bush mentioned the draft one time.
He mentioned it one time... and let's see how many stories that was written on the draft.
Oh, okay. Well, you said if you wanna say something, then say something.
I'm giving you an example of there's a lot more fascination... with the quote, "draft issue," unquote, or Gennifer Flowers... than there is with George Bush promising $16 zillion more... than he could ever spend in an election year.
I believe that on any number of things... that we are held to a different standard.
I think it is absolutely ludicrous... that no one ever asked George Bush about Iran-Contra.
Two cabinet secretaries saying Bush was lying.
No one ever said a damn thing.
You get this memo from Baker... about him knowing about  about Iraq having chemical weapons going.
And then there's no follow-up because,
God, you can't askJim Baker a question.
This man is down deep 
He's beyond being questioned.
He gives everybody tickets to the opera.
We can't question him.
You know?
This is not directed any more at the Washington Post.
I've had this conversation with everybody today.
You know, I am so goddamn tired... of this goddamn double standard... where the press lets these sons of bitches get away with murder... and every little thing that we do 
"Clinton's numbers don't add up!
Clinton's numbers don't add up!"
- That is so fucking true.
- You know?
It's so unbelievable.
If we say 50 plus 50 is 104, and they say 50 plus 50 is 104,000... they'll say, "Well, both of them are stretching their numbers a little bit."
- Hello? Yeah.
- [Laughs] Exactly.
Oh, the goddamn stories.
They're not going with the story.
The printing... The 
Printing the, uh 
Shit, you know.
[Carville] I think that they've given up on it now, Governor.
The Bush people said they got the guy wired, said, "Well, I just did it.
It was an offshore operation," you know?
So they're trying to nail him. So it's not dead, but it's just not going tonight.
[Woman On TV In Background, Indistinct]
That the guy just did it himself and he just spent the money himself... and they never authorized it.
Okay. Give me a call later, okay?
All right.
This morning Perot was on
CBS Morning News... claimed that he made a mistake by getting out of the race.
Perot volunteer army, despite the disconnection of the 800 number... was supplied with four million dollars in August.
He noted they're gaining some strength and confidence... thanks to his repeated hints about becoming an official candidate.
We lost some Perot people who went back over to the other side in a couple different states.
Um, on the creative chicken side...
- chicken tried to get into a Bush event today...
- [Laughing]
And he had a sign that said
"Poultry workers for Bush."
Got inside, flipped it. It said,
"Chicken George won't debate."
[Laughing]
[Laughing Continues, Chattering]
[Woman On TV In Background, Indistinct]
[Yawns Loudly]
Be like a hockey player and get the puck out of here.
[TV Continues]
- [Woman] Good-bye.
- Night.
He doesn't wear. He doesn't wear.
[Woman]
Good night.
And, yes, I want a debate.
I want a debate over issues and an argument over ideas... and I will stand on my record... and I won't let that Arkansas governor run away from his record either.
[Cheering]
[Carville]
Can you believe this shit?
You know, I mean, I just think that they're into this...
"We're the president" motif.
Hello? Yeah.
Well, no. Bush rejected the thing, so there ain't no position to have.
There's no debate.
- Yeah!
- [Chattering, Indistinct]
I'm wondering if there's gonna be a huge story... that they rejected to even meet with the commission.
It's another date certain.
Another debate that goes by.
Let's just get it out right away. If you can get it out tonight, it would be the best.
'Cause it'll be in the papers in the morning.
Yeah. I mean, so 
[Stammers]
Yeah, so tell them 
- Yeah, hold on. What?
- I want to talk to Clinton about it too... but Today show is willing to give us
10 minutes tomorrow just to... pop.
Here. Hold on. Just talk to Paul.
Here's Georgie.
- Just tell him what to 
- Hey. I just talked to the Today show.
We ought to be on this thing like stink on shit, man.
Four more years!
Four more years! Four more years!
Step to the sidewalk.
Four more years! Four more years!
Four more years!
Four more years!
Bush/Quayle '92!
 Vote, vote your choice on November 3 
 Yours is a very important voice and it should be heard 
Come on, America!
Vote, vote, vote!
- [Laughs] Thanks. Thanks.
- [Man] Give 'em hell, Bill!
[Man #2]
Governor.
Bill Clinton, number two on your ballot, number one in your heart. [Laughs]
I just  I just can't imagine why they agreed to positioning... that puts him at such a severe angle.
Nice tie. I can tell you're not a politician.
[Exhaling]
Well, thank you. My mother bought it.
I don't know the right lines.
- Part of my clothing allowance.
- How Midwest. That's great.
It's just a joke.
It's just a joke.
No. I like it.
I like that your mother bought it.
- My mother didn't buy it. My mother 
- Family values.
My mother should get such deals.
- Family...
- Should we get set up?
Well, we're stepping in as soon as they are done.
- Good.
- Yeah.
[Chattering Continues]
What is this? Is this an interview with the Secret Service guys?
All right.
Oh, now, don't embarrass me on the air.
[Laughs]
He's lookin' good, Mom.
Lookin' good.
Well, you're going to hear an awful lot of spinning.
One of those who will be doing some serious spinning from the right... is Mary Matalin... the deputy campaign manager for the Bush/Quayle campaign.
Ms. Matalin, let's talk about first the polls.
They are behind in the polls.
There's no way to deny that.
What is George Bush going to say tonight... that hopefully, in his case, will turn things around?
[Laughs]
Well, I think Mary Matalin's got a good career in fiction writing when this is over.
[Laughing]
[Man lmitating Al Gore]
Everything that's up is down.
[Laughing]
Paul, could you come to Atlanta and help me prepare for the debate?
[Man #2]
Wow. What a crowd.
I have never even heard
Stockdale open his mouth.
What a crowd.
The thought of preparing for someone who...
I don't even know what he speaks like is daunting, to say the least.
- Paul, give 'em 
- Give 'em a Perot.
- Give 'em a Perot. Come on, man.
- [Imitating Ross Perot] Well, okay.
It's very interesting, James. I find it's fascinating that y'all in national media 
Okay, y'all  you never want to talk about the deficit.
It's a crazy aunt in the basement.
We're gonna go down that basement... clean her out, sweep her out and whack her around a little bit... knock the bitch around.
The problem is, when you get under that hood... some son of a bitch in Washington slams that hood right down on you.
Hurts like hell.
-  Whatcha got cookin'? 
- [Laughing]
 How about cookin' somethin' up with me? 
These have turned into real shows, you know that?
Gettin' better.
The first thing is that since there are four debates... the first one is incredibly important.
And we want to establish ourselves as the folks that the press can trust... or they'll either go to their own research departments... which are pretty incompetent, or they'll come to the campaign.
So the less political sounding our responses are, the better.
George and James and Bruce will have to be in there spinning immediately afterwards.
Right.
So as we always say, you know, speed kills... and we will die in this debate if we're not there first with our answers.
- Where's Clinton going?
- [Moderator]
Governor Clinton, one minute, sir.
[Clinton] The mistake that was made was making the "read my lips" promise... in the first place just to get elected...
- knowing what the size of the deficit was.
- [Applause]
[Stephanopoulos]
Yes!
[Carville]
Perfect. Perfect.
You just can't promise something like that just to get elected... if you know there's a good chance that circumstances may overtake you.
[Moderator] All right.
Mr. Perot, the question is for you.
Perfect. Oh, yes. I love this.
In terms of being influenced by women and being a minority... there they are right out there  my wife and my four beautiful daughters.
- And I just have one son 
- [Carville] He lost  Uh-oh.
- So he and I are surrounded by women 
- Oh, wow.
Giving us  telling us what to do all the time.
- [Man] What?
- [All Groaning]
- Shh, shh, shh, shh.
- I want to make a very brief comment here, uh... in terms of Saddam Hussein.
Look at what Ambassador Glaspie said all through the fall and what have you.
And look at what she and Kelly and all the others in State said... at the end when they were trying to clean it up.
- We can't be this lucky.
- [Laughing]
This don't happen to me, man.
This don't happen to me.
Bush was on the defensive.
Bush was on the defensive.
Keep repeating "Bush was on the defensive" all night.
Okay. He was.
Hell, he was on the ropes.
- Which way we going?
- This way.
- Whoo!
- Let's go!
Whoo!
Let's go. Roll.
- Heads up!
- [Laughter, Chattering]
Little news!
Where's the 
Where are we supposed to be goin', Vicki?
We gotta find out what Bush said.
Jeff, do you have a walkie-talkie?
[Man]
Be careful.
I gotta find out what Bush said.
We're ready.
Talk to Jerry real quick?
Do you mind?
What did Bush say in the last second after Clinton did Baker?
He said, "That's what worries me."
Clinton said  the economic policy.
- Quick, before we, um 
- [Chattering]
Another good night for Bill Clinton.
Three debates, three wins.
Bush was on the defensive all night long.
I think he was put on the defensive by Bill Clinton over the economy... and by Ross Perot over Saddam Hussein... and Ross Perot over the mess in Washington, and he couldn't get out of it.
It's the record. It's the agenda.
It's the qualifications.
Governor Clinton and the Democrats don't like when we talk about character... but 54 of them thought character was a very big issue... when they rejected President Bush's nominee for secretary of defense... citing character insufficiencies because he flirted with women in elevators.
There's no doubt that George Bush's attacks on us have an effect.
The effect they're having is on George Bush.
Negative.
See?
They're working against Bush.
[Man]
They have no effect on your campaign?
Again now, don't take my word for it.
Look at every poll that you see.
This is not a sports event.
People don't get out their peanuts and hot dogs and rate these things.
They want to know 
Focus on the choice between these candidates and their philosophies.
And we have tried to do that in each debate.
We're not trying to create drama.
We are not a made-for-TV candidate.
Yes, Governor Clinton won on Geraldo-like activities.
That's his shtick.
He's a performer. He's a phony.
I mean, he walks into the audience.
He puts Geraldo to shame.
That's not our gig. We are a leader.
We are mature.
We have a breadth and depth of experience that's unrivaled on that stage... and that's all we've ever tried to do... and have been very successful in each of these debates doing... and you'll all be eating crow, because that's how the American voters look at this.
They don't need another Geraldo.
They need a leader in the White House.
- Here's ABC.
- Great.
Oh, Perot came in second, not Bush.
Hey, Trish, are you sure about this?
I heard Bush was second.
I hope it was Perot.
I just got it from 
I just got it from Ricki.
Great.
[Trish] CBS is something like 35, Clinton,
29, Perot, and then the balance is Bush.
I'm going to double-check that one.
- Bush came in third in both.
- As far as I know.
- One-third undecided, one-third weak.
- Right.
- That constitutes about 18% of the electorate.
- What was the other one-third?
Two-thirds were weak Clinton, and one-third undecided.
- Mm-hmm.
- Okay?
So in terms of our universe of folks, that was a strong showing for Perot.
[Applause, Cheering]
[Clinton]
James, thank you.
Thank you, Governor.
That was a pretty good little 
- [Woman] He's counting speaking fees.
- Kodak memories.
[Laughing]
Speaking fees.
- [Clinton] I didn't humiliate him after his morning television performance?
- No, no, no.
- No, no, we had the whole thing.
- Hi, Mama.
[Chattering]
He should do a page and a half... that says every time we've had it your way 
I mean, you had your chance.
We've tried it your way for the last 12 years.
It's time for a change.
But do it on every issue.
- Right.
- That should be tomorrow's rally speech.
Right.
Repeat it for jobs, for health care, for taxes, for everything, for education.
That's the refrain for the last three weeks.
Okay? Bye.
- [Carville Chattering]
- [Woman] Mary?
[Matalin]
Oh, the trip.
[Carville] The trip. I'm not 
I'm not gonna tell you, see, you know?
[Matalin]
You're not gonna tell me till we leave?
No, I'm just gonna tell you the day that we're leavin'... and how long that we're going for.
- You know?
- Do you like your newjacket?
- I love it.
- Did you ever meet Leslie Goodman?
- Hey, how you doin'? Good to see you.
- Hey, James. Nice to see you.
- You bet. You bet.
- [Man] James?
- Yeah?
- [Chattering]
- Okay, I'm comin' back. I'm comin' right back.
- Hi, guy. Hi, guy. Bye, guy.
I'm coming right back.
[Matalin]
You're in the Darth Vader camp now.
- Bye.
- Bye. I'll see you. Okay.
Okay.
[Woman] Bye, Mary.
Have fun on the train.
[Man] Hey, if we're the Darth Vader camp, who are you?
 [Country]
[Male Announcer]
With some of Perot's support eroding... polls show a virtual dead heat.
How can this  This guy is an idiot.
In tracking polls, we're going up in every one.
And these people  what are they, drunk?
[Man On TV]... predicting a Harry
Truman-style come-from-behind surprise 
[Men Laughing]
Turn Perot off. I don't want to look at him.
Just turn him off.
Who cares who knows what the polls are?
They have media polls out every day in this thing. I mean, why be  You know?
Mm-hmm.
I mean, I want people to know what the message is.
How can you tell 250 million Americans why you're running for president... if you can't tell 250 staff members?
 [Folk Rock]
 Not a chill to the winter but a nip to the air 
[Crowd Cheering]
 From the other direction 
 She was calling my eye 
 It could be an illusion but I might as well try 
 Might as well try 
[Woman On TV] The journey
Bill Clinton began 13 months ago... is now down to one endless final day.
He started a 4,000-mile trek to try to nail down key states.
[Fades]
[Carville]
Um, we'll, uh 
Tonight at 6:45 will be the final war room meeting.
[Man]
No.
[Laughing]
One more day.
[Man]
All right.
- [Man #2] Go get 'em.
- [Exhales]
Hey, Gary. Carville.
Give me  Give me 
Man, we can't lose North Carolina.
Who's gonna carry Georgia?
We gonna carry it?
Do you think so?
Don't worry about Georgia?
Really?
Goddamn, if we don't carry Georgia, we're going to look terrible.
I say if we lose Georgia, we lose the race.
[Clinton On TV]
I need your help.
[Crowd Cheering]
[Man On TV] The governor's voice is completely gone... and he will not be able to speak.
[Hoarsely] We fought for a year.
We've got two days to go.
My voice will be better by this afternoon... and I'll be there Monday,
I'll be there Tuesday.
Fight on. Don't give up. Go!
Stay focused. Talk about the things that'll matter to people.
You know?
"It's the economy, stupid." Okay?
- Wow.
- James.
[Stephanopoulos]
'64, James.
- Get out of here.
- [Laughing]
Just give it a whiff.
No, I'm not gonna give it a whiff.
I'm gonna give it a drink.
None of that whiff shit.
I'm gonna whiff it right down.
[Laughing Continues]
[Perot On TV]
And we want to close on our theme song.
Let's hit it, Ed.
- [Man]  We're crazy 
- [Cheering]
 Crazy for feelin' so 
[Male Reporter]
It was a very different kind of rally... ending a very different kind of campaign.
 We're crazy 
It's a campaign that cost at least $60 million.
[All Laughing]
[Reporter Continues, Indistinct]
[Carville] It is the most expensive single act of masturbation in the history of the world.
[All Laughing]
[Female Reporter] His voice almost gone,
Hillary Clinton has been pitching in.
[Hillary Clinton] We'll have to be real quiet to be able to hear him.
If you will be my voice tomorrow,
I'll be yours for four years.
[Cheering]
I thought of that, didn't I?
I'll take credit for it.
Steve Denari, who's the director of the I llinois Perot office... and he wants to talk to someone confidentially.
[Hums]
Read it to me.
Well, what does names, addresses 
I can send you a fax with names, addresses, phone numbers of who you had an affair with.
It wouldn't make it true.
Yeah, I just  Believe me 
[Carville I n Background] No, he wasn't, but I'm just gonna tell the son of a bitch 
Believe me that it's been looked at by every major national news organization.
Everything.
And it is completely bullshit.
If you went on the radio... and said that Bill Clinton is the father of an illegitimate black child... you would be laughed at.
People would think you're crazy.
[Carville Chattering]
We're not gonna lose.
We are gonna win.
He is gonna be president.
Well, no, but, I mean 
Don't think of it like that.
Let's take it at two levels.
Number one, of course it's not gonna matter.
But number two, think of yourself.
I guarantee you that if you do this... you'll never work in Democratic politics again.
Maybe you don't want to.
I'm not saying it matters.
You will be embarrassed before the national press corps.
People will think 
Nobody will believe you... and people will think you're scummy.
The alternative is you don't do it.
It causes you some temporary pain... with people who tomorrow aren't gonna matter... and you have a campaign that understands... that in a difficult time you did something right.
Um, and, you know, that's important.
I mean, it doesn't mean anything... and we can't do anything for you specifically or anything like that... but you know that you did the right thing... and that you didn't, um... dishonor yourself.
[Chattering, Shouting]
Oh, my God!
[Stephanopoulos]
Um, and finally, before I give him the floor... for what I hope isn't the last time... uh, I think we all know that, um... besides Bill Clinton, one person really gave this campaign focus.
And one person wrote what I call a haiku 
[Scattered Laughter]
About five months ago:
Change versus more of the same.
The economy, stupid.
I think if you did a Nexis, it would come up in about a thousand places.
- [All Laughing]
- And don't forget health care.
Um, you know,
I was kidding James yesterday.
I said he was about to pass... from a role of regular human being into the role of a legend.
[Murmuring, Chuckling]
And I think he really deserves it... because probably for the first time in a generation tomorrow... we're gonna win.
And that means that more people are gonna have better jobs.
People are gonna pay a little less for health care, get better care... and more kids are gonna go to better schools.
Um, and so, thanks.
[Cheering]
[Cheering Continues]
There's a simple doctrine.
Outside of a person's love... the most sacred thing that they can give is their labor.
And somehow or another along the way, we tend to forget that.
And labor is a very precious thing that you have.
And any time that you can combine labor with love... you've made a merger.
And I think we're gonna win tomorrow... and I think that the governor is gonna fulfill his promise and change America... and I think many of you are gonna go on and help him.
I'm a political professional.
That's what I do for a living.
I'm proud of it.
We changed the way campaigns are run.
[Camera Shutter Clicks]
Used to be there was a hierarchy.
If you were on one floor, you didn't go to another floor.
If you were somewhere on the organizational chart... there was no room for you there.
Everybody was compartmentalized.
And you people showed that you could be trusted.
Everybody in this room. Everybody.
And people are gonna tell you you're lucky.
You're not.
Ben Hogan said, "Golf is a game of luck.
The more I practice, the luckier I get."
[Laughing]
The harder you work, the luckier you are.
I was 33 years old before I ever went to Washington or New York.
I was 42 before I won my first campaign.
And I'm happy for all of y'all.
You've been part of something special in my life.
[Camera Shutter Clicks]
And I'll never forget what y'all have done.
Thank you.
[Cheering]
[All]
One more day! One more day!
One more day! One more day!
One more day! One more day!
[Cheering]
 [Rock]
All aboard!
 [Continues]
 [Man Shouts]
 [Continues]
-  [Man Shouts]
- [No Audible Dialogue]
[No Audible Dialogue]
 Yeah 
 Well, I'm gonna pick you up in my '88
Come here, sugar, don't be late 
 [Continues]
- Threw up a little bit.
- I knew it!
- That's good luck! That's good luck!
- No problem.
 [Continues, Scatting]
 Back to Little Rock, Arkansas 
[No Audible Dialogue]
[Singer] Thank you! Good night!
I love you all!
[Crowd Cheering]
-  [Ends]
- Thank you very much.
[Cheering Fades]
[Man Chattering, Indistinct]
- Well, come on. Let's put him on speaker.
- That's it, yeah.
Hey, your ugly friend wants to say hello.
Paulie?
[Man]
Hey, Bob.
- How are you, man?
- What's going on?
You pretty tired?
Pretty tired. Um 
But just, you know, when you get up there, and he says this is the last rally... or the last chance or whatever it was that he says 
- Shakes you up, right?
- Huh?
Shakes you up.
It was pretty hard, yeah.
I was pretty shaken up.
Paulie, I got up this morning.
As I was driving to work, I started to cry.
I couldn't keep it  I just can't 
I can't cope right now.
Right.
Man, I'm scared.
Because we're all gonna have to jump off a bridge.
Because, you know 
Because of the last two days.
Because of the last two days.
Yeah.
You know, it's kind of a mass thing.
We can all just drink some Kool-Aid.
Okay, man. Have a good flight.
See you when you get in.
Bye.
Hey, it's James.
What do you think?
[Woman On TV]
Dan Quayle came home to Indiana... where he has never lost a race.
You think it's gonna be tight in NewJersey?
Why was everybody else so optimistic earlier?
[Man] What was that mumbling about seven points?
Oh, CBS. We dropped overnight.
So now they're figuring out how we can lose.
- [Stephanopoulos Laughing]
- [Laughing, Scoffs]
I'm on the floor.
I'm literally on the floor.
I can't take it.
[Sighs]
[Stephanopoulos]
Oh, good. Yeah, yeah, yeah.
We tried hard.
We came up a little short.
- To those who embraced our crusade 
- [Stephanopoulos Laughs] Oh, God!
We say thank you.
To President Bush, who's won reelection, we offer our full support...
[Stephanopoulos]
Oh, God.
- Our prayers and our hopes for a better America.
- Shut up.
Throughout this campaign,
I've endeavored... to bring my message of change to the American people.
[Bob] Where's Derek Humphry when you need him?
[Carville] And over 42% of you people embraced that message.
- I am grateful to each and every one of you.
- Are we in favor of assisted suicide?
Hillary and I and Chelsea will never forget you... the way you welcomed us into your homes, your towns and your cities.
- [Chattering, Laughing]
- It is not that we... have lost this battle, it is whether we endure in a larger war.
[Laughing]
In a stunning come-from-behind upset that shocked pundits... political professionals, journalists, people around the world...
- George Herbert Walker Bush 
- Was reelected today.
Proved his political resiliency beyond any doubt whatsoever... and was reelected today over Bill Clinton...
[Phone Ringing]
Garnering 274 electoral votes, only four over.
But as they say, it's not horseshoes and it's not hand grenades.
And George Bush will return 
We repeat, George Bush will return to the White House for another four years.
- [Man] And what's the other one?
- Florida is now 42, Bush, 41.5, Clinton.
- That's what we're getting, so 
- It's started then.
- [All Talking At Once]
- You know what that means.
Uh 
Popkin talked to Warren, whatever, the head of V.R. S... and he's gonna talk to him in four minutes, but his initial impression is it's a landslide.
Could be up to 12, maybe 400 electoral votes.
[Laughs]
- What's this?
- We'll wait and see.
- Holy shit.
- What's this? Is this the new one?
Arkansas.
Connecticut's fine.
- Delaware's fine. Georgia's good.
- Georg 
- Wait, wait, wait. Georgia, fine.
- Georgia's good.
Iowa's done.
- Illinois is done.
- Illinois is a blowout.
- [Both] Indiana, we're ahead.
- [Woman] Indiana?
- Kentucky 
- Kentucky is five.
- Michigan is 11. New York's done.
- Holy shit. We're pulling away in Ohio.
- Oklahoma, we're up.
- Tied in Texas.
Tied in Texas.
It looks good.
Now let's just say that...
I like the text here.
Can you beep Wendy, please?
- Oh, you got it.
- [Whistles]
Looks pretty good.
Look at  Look at Indiana.
Wait, wait.
- Look at Indiana, 42-40.
- I know.
It doesn't matter if we win.
Those people are gonna shit. Oh, excuse me.
[Stammers] In the White House, how would you like to be 
[Whispering, Indistinct]
- [Whispering, Indistinct]
- Look at Texas. Go down to Texas.
- Even.
- Yeah, 39-39.
[Whispering, Indistinct]
- Perot's kind of holding, isn't he?
- [Stephanopoulos] He held.
Yeah, he held. His numbers held.
- I'm sort of surprised, frankly.
- This could be a landslide.
Probably don't have anything yet.
Let me  I gotta call Zell.
[Laughs]
[Stephanopoulos]
Goddamn.
- [Woman, Indistinct]
- We up?
- Up seven.
- Oh.
[Stephanopoulos]
This is very raw though.
[Man]
You know what? Huh?
- [Stephanopoulos] Hello?
- Nothing.
Is the governor there?
Um, well, if he wants to call, tell him things look, um, outstanding.
Really good.
[Carville]
Are you kidding me?
It's gotta be 10. Okay.
- [Chattering]
- [Phone Ringing]
[Chattering, I ndistinct]
[Ringing Continues]
[Carville]
We don't have Louisiana anywhere?
[Man]
Okay.
[Second Phone Ringing]
[Carville] Well, who's got 
You don't have them all on your computer?
- This all tracks.
- Yeah.
But if I call you at 3:00 my time... you can look in your computer and we can know everything.
Like, when I try to say it, it's gonna be hard.
I don't know. What do you say?
Mr. President-Elect?
I think you gotta say Mr.  I assume you just gotta say Mr. President.
You say, "Congratulations,
Mr. President."
That's weird.
This is the latest numbers at 2:00, okay?
California, we're up by 19.
Boxer's gonna win.
Colorado, we're up by 10.
[Ringing]
How long does he intend to talk?
This sounds like an awful long speech.
[Man]
Oh, yeah. It'll be an hour or two.
[Laughing]
[Greenberg] Can we go to the party before he finishes?
Oh, yeah.
Okay, let me just run through this.
- I think this is a pretty good structure.
- [Stephanopoulos] Okay.
Third, which is the real take-home point... and I really sold on them, which is this won't happen overnight.
- Yeah, we gotta do that.
- That's the most important point to make.
Yeah, I want a cold beer.
What kind of special today?
Well, the special today is pepperoni and black olive.
And also we've got that 50-cent draft
Busch beer, if you want that.
- [Laughing]
- No, I don't want Busch beer.
Give me the 
Shit, I ain't drinking no Busch beer.
Give me a Budweiser.
- [Laughing]
- Bud. And what would you like to eat?
Huh? I need a beer quickly.
Quickly, quickly.
No Busch beer.
Landslide.
[Laughing]
[Cheering]
Pennsylvania!
The governor walks out  or president.
[Chuckles]
God, I get shook up when I say it.
Walks out with Hillary and Chelsea.
They wave, they smile, they hug.
The Gores 
He then introduces the Gores.
They wave, they smile, they hug.
The Gores go sit down.
Hillary and Chelsea go sit down.
Governor gives his speech.
I can't imagine the headlines tomorrow.
I'm sorry?
The headlines tomorrow are gonna be 
We need  In that section, you've gotta add a sentence about the young people.
- And it would be nice to have the 83-year-old 
- What section?
This section here.
It's gotta be something specifically about how young people voted...
- in record numbers and changed 
- In record numbers. With record enthusiasm.
Their generation's gonna come 
It should come after the 83-year-old woman.
See if we can find a story in the catalog with a young person.
[Exhales]
We gotta get him something real soon.
These changes have to be made quickly.
We gotta get it right out to him.
- How do I get it to him?
- We'll take care of it.
You like "everything" better than "the country"?
[Man]
I'm sorry?
Do you like, "Together we can make the country and love everything it was meant to be"... better than "Together we can make the country and love the country it was meant to be"?
That implies an inadequacy with the country, doesn't it? The latter formulation?
Mm-hmm.
That's nice. That's real nice.
So just make that one change and get it back.
Yes.
- [Man On TV]... in Massachusetts.
- [Cheering]
- Thank you. Massachusetts.
- [Applause]
More, more, more, more, more, more, more, more, more...
- more, more, more, more, more!
- [Cheering]
More, more!
All right! Are we gonna party?
[Chattering, I ndistinct]
[Shrieks]
You're ahead with comfortable margins in the 10 largest states in the country... and it's just, uh  it's 
Texas, the last time we checked, you were two up.
Thank you very much.
And now we've really got to do something.
Great. Bye-bye.
[Mutters]
- [Man] Congratulations.
- Thank you.
Congratulations.
[Stephanopoulos Exhales]
- [Man] What, um 
- How do you feel?
It's still not  You know, it's getting 
I mean, I was pretty shook up talking to him.
[Man]
What did he say?
They were giddy. It's like it didn't 
I mean, they're just like 
Are you, like, happy or are you scared... or are you nothing or do you want to just, like, cry or what?
The crying was before.
Maybe it'll be later too.
No, it's just like... floating.
- James.
- What?
- On your chest in front of you 
- This one?
Your white one is totally unnecessary because that beige one in your hand 
Okay. This is the everywhere pass?
That is a very exclusive... There are only about five of those in existence.
- Okay.
- And it gets you backstage with the governor.
- Where am I supposed to meet them? What room?
- There are only about five.
- I-I-I 
- You don't know?
In the director's office of the State House.
But it's almost impossible to get there because there are so many... tens of thousands of people out on the street.
I'll meet you out here.
I'm just going to use the ladies' room.
[Carville] We don't know how we're gonna get there through the crowd.
 [Rock: Man Singing]
- [Carville] Excuse me, please. Excuse me.
- [Mandy] That one girl got in.
Excuse me. Excuse me, please.
Thank you. Thank you very much.
I'm very proud to have done this.
I'm as happy as I can be and I'm so proud.
We won Nevada big.
Governor, we're gonna 
I mean, it's looking like close to 400.
It's a landslide.
Ohio's not called yet.
North Carolina's not called yet.
But everything else 
I mean, Michigan 
Dead even in Florida.
You know, it's just unbelievable.
You oughta be the 
I mean, the happiest man in the world.
And I just gotta tell you,
I just appreciate this so much.
This was the best thing I ever did.
We can try. He's up there talking now though, you know.
He's up there giving his speech. Yep.
You don't?
But the one thing you gotta be 
We really want you to say whatever you want to say tonight... but you just gotta be careful about being too programmatic.
You should definitely be New Democrat, and we love Hillary's new patriotism thing... which he tried to put in there.
Also you gotta do at the end, he goes back to the announcement speech... which is very important.
But you know, just say what 
Speak from your heart tonight.
I mean, that's all that matters.
Say what you want to say.
I mean, this is your night.
Okay. We'll see you in a little bit.
Bye-bye.
- He's like 
- What, is he gone?
He's asking...
"I think we got Nevada!"
[All Laughing]
- Follow Richard.
- [Chattering]
- Follow Richard.
- Okay, Richard knows where he's going here.
He's pretty pumped.
I mean, it's unbelievable.
- He should be.
- Yeah.
What did he say when you said
"Mr. President"?
- He said, "Thanks."
- He said, "Yeah, yeah, yeah."
- "Yeah, yeah. How'd we do in Nevada?"
- [Both Laughing]
[Crowd Cheering, Applauding]
And finally I want to thank... the members of my brilliant, aggressive, unconventional... but always winning campaign staff.
[Cheering]
[Clinton]
And they have earned this.
 [Pop]
 If you wake up and don't want to smile 
 If it takes just a little while 
 Open your eyes and look at the day 
 You'll see things in a different way 
-  Don't stop 
- [Cheering]
 [Swing]
[Man]
 I swung the election, friends 
 That's no small order 
 You just blow notes and sweep all the votes 
 From Canada to the Mexican border 
 I started out with a bang 
 Below the Dixie line 
 My opening shot was burning hot 
 And every single vote was mine 
 From there I swung westward 
 Taking every state in my stride 
 My bandwagon swingin' 
 Everybody started in to ride 
 I won every town and state 
 Without exception 
 My friends 
 I swung the election 
 Now, to give you some idea 
 Of the reception I was accorded 
 I took a soundman along with me and had these scenes recorded 
 [Cheering]
[Chorus]
 Ladies and gentlemen 
 This is an honor for me 
 To introduce this famous man 
 I give you Jackson T. 
[Man]
 Now, my final rally swung the thing 
 'Cause I saved my best for the last 
 I'll give you just the highlights 
 Of this, my farewell blast 
 [Ends]
It is my sad duty to inform you that Eva Pern, spiritual leader of the nation, entered immortality at 8:25 this evening.
- You are not welcome here.
- He was the father of my children too.
They have a right to see him, to pay their last respects.
You are not his wife.
Your children are bastards.
No, no! He's my papa!
Oh what a circus
Oh what a show
Argentina has gone to town
Over the death of an actress
Called Eva Pern
We've all gone crazy
Mourning all day and mourning all night
Falling over ourselves to get all
Of the misery right
Oh what an exit
That's how to go
When they're ringing your curtain down
Demand to be buried
Like Eva Pern
It's quite a sunset
And good for the country ln a roundabout way
We've made the front page of all
The world's papers today
But who is this Santa Evita?
Why all this howling, hysterical sorrow?
What kind of goddess has lived among us?
How will we ever get by without her?
She had her moments
She had some style
The best show in town was the crowd
Outside the Casa Rosada
Crying, "Eva Pern"
But that's all gone now
As soon as the smoke from the funeral clears
We're all gonna see, and how
She did nothing for years
You let down your people, Evita
You were supposed to have been immortal
That's all they wanted
Not much to ask for
But in the end you
Could not deliver
Sing, you fools, but you got it wrong
Enjoy your prayers because you haven't got long
Your queen is dead
Your king is through
She's not coming back to you
Show business kept us all alive
Since 1 7 October 1 945
But the star has gone
The glamour's worn thin
That's a pretty bad state for a state to be in
Instead of government, we had a stage
Instead of ideas, a prima donna's rage
Instead of help, we were given a crowd
She didn't say much, but she said it loud
Don't cry for me, Argentina
For I am ordinary
Unimportant
And undeserving
Of such attention
Unless we all are
I think we all are
So share my glory
So share my coffin
It's our funeral too
Senor Magaldi?
It's seven o' clock. You'll be late.
Now, Eva Pern
Had every disadvantage
You need if you're going to succeed
No money, no cash
No father, no bright lights
There was nowhere she'd been
At the age of 1 5
As this tango singer found out
Agustin Magaldi
Who has the distinction of being the first
Man to be of use
To Eva Duarte
On this night of 1 000 stars
Let me take you to heaven's door
Where the music of love's guitars
Plays forever more
In the glow of those twinkling lights
We shall love through eternity
On this night in a million nights
Fly away with me
I never dreamed that a kiss could be as sweet as this
Now I know that it can
I used to wander alone without a love of my own
I was a desperate man
But all my grief disappeared
And all the sorrow I'd feared wasn't there any more
On that magical day
When you first came my way, miamor
To think that a man as famous as you are
Could love a poor little nothing like me
I want to be a part of B.A.
Buenos Aires, Big Apple
Just listen to that
They're onto you, Magaldi
I'd get out while you can
It's happened at last
I'm starting to get started
I'm moving out with my man
Now, Eva, don't get carried away
Monotony passed, suburbia departed
Who could ever be fond of the back of beyond
Don't hear words that I didn't say
What's that?
You desert the girl you love?
The girl I love?
What are you talking about?
She really brightened up your out of town engagement
She gave you all she had
She wasn't in your contract
You must be quite relieved
That no one's told the papers
So far
I want to be a part of B.A.
Buenos Aires, Big Apple
Would I have done
What I did
If I hadn't thought
If I hadn't known
We would stay together?
Seems to me there's no point in resisting
She's made up her mind, you've no choice
Why don't you be the man who discovered her?
You'll never be remembered for your voice
The city can be paradise
For those who have the cash
The class and the connections
What you need to make a splash
The likes of you get swept up
In the morning with the trash
If you were rich or middle class...
Screw the middle classes
I will never accept them
My father's other family were middle class
And we were kept out of sight
Hidden from view at his funeral
Do all your one night stands
Give you this trouble?
Eva, beware of the city
It's hungry and cold
Can't be controlled
It is mad
Those who are fools are swallowed up whole
And those who are not become
What they should not become
Changed, in short they go bad
Bad is good for me
I'm bored, so clean and so ignored
I've only been predictable, respectable
Birds fly out of here
So why, oh why, oh why the hell can't l?
I only want variety of society
I want to be a part of B.A.
Buenos Aires, Big Apple
Five years from now I shall come back
And finally say
You have your way
Come to town
But you'll look at me with a foreigner's eyes
The magical city
A younger girl's city
A fantasy long since put down
All you've done to me
Was that a young girl's fantasy?
I played your city games all right, didn't l?
I already know what cooks
How the dirty city feels and looks
I tasted it last night, didn't l?
Eva, beware your ambition
It's hungry and cold
Can't be controlled, will run wild
This in a man is danger enough
But you are a woman
Not even a woman
Not very much more than a child
And whatever you say
I'll not steal you away
What's new, Buenos Aires?
I'm new
I want to say I'm just a little stuck on you
You'll be on me too
I get out here, Buenos Aires
Stand back
You oughta know
What you're gonna get in me
Just a little touch of star quality
Fill me up with your heat
With your noise, with your dirt, overdo me
Let me dance to your beat
Make it loud, let it hurt, run it through me
Don't hold back
You are certain to impress
Tell the driver this is where I'm staying
Get this! Just look at me
Dressed up somewhere to go
We'll put on a show
Take me in at your flood, give me speed
Give me lights, set me humming
Shoot me up with your blood
Wine me up with your nights
Watch me coming
All I want is a whole lot of excess
Tell the singer this is where I'm playing
Stand back, Buenos Aires
Because you oughta know
What you're gonna get in me
Just a little touch of star quality
And
If ever I go to far
It's because of the things you are
Beautiful town
I love you
And
If I need a moment's rest
Give your lover the very best
Real eiderdown
And silence
You're a tramp, you're a treat
You will shine to the death
You are shoddy
But you're flesh, you are meat
You shall have every breath in my body
Put me down for a lifetime of success
Give me credit, I'll find ways of paying
Rio de la Plata
Florida, Corrientes, Nueve de Julio
All I want to know
I don't expect my love affairs
To last for long
Never fool myself
That my dreams will come true
Being used to trouble
I anticipate it
But all the same I hate it
Wouldn't you?
So what happens now?
Another suitcase in another hall
Take your picture off another wall
- Where am I going to?
- You'll get by, you always have before
Time and time again
I've said that
I don't care
That I'm immune to gloom
That I'm hard through and through
But every time it matters
All my words desert me
So anyone can hurt me
And they do
So what happens now?
Another suitcase in another hall
Take your picture off another wall
You'll get by you always have before
Where am I going to?
Call in three months time
And I'll be fine
I know
Well, maybe not that fine
But I'll survive anyhow
I won't recall the names and places
Of each sad occasion
But that's no consolation
Here and now
Where am I going to?
Don't ask any more
Good night and thank you, whoever
She's in every magazine
Been photographed, seen
She is known
We don't like to rush but your case has been packed
If she's missed anything you could give her a ring
But she won't always answer the phone
Oh but it's sad when a love affair dies
But we have pretended enough
It's best that we both stop fooling ourselves
Which means...!
There is no one, no one at all
Never has been and never will be a lover, male or female
Who hasn't an eye on
In fact they rely on tricks they can try on their partner
They're hoping their lover will help them or keep them
Support them, promote them
Don't blame them
You're the same
Good night and thank you, Emilio
You've completed your task
What more can we ask of you now?
Please sign the book on the way out the door
And that will be all lf she needs you, she'll call
But I don't think that's likely somehow
Oh but it's sad when a love affair dies
But when we were hot we were hot
I know you'll look back on the good times we shared
Which means...!
There is no one, no one at all
Never has been and never will be a lover
Male or female
Who hasn't an eye on ln fact they rely on
Tricks they can try on their partner
They're hoping their lover
Will help them or keep them
Support them, promote them
Don't blame her
You're the same
There is no soap
No soap like Zaz
No detergent, lotion or oil
With such power
In the shower
It's the mother and father
Of luxury lather
The talk of the bath
The great ointment
One little frolic
With new Zaz carbolic
You're scented
You'll be sent
Good night and thank you, Senor Jabn
We are grateful
You found her a spot on the sound radio
We'll think of you every time she's on the air
We'd love you to stay but you'd be in the way
So do up your trousers and go
Oh but it's sad when a love affair dies
The decline into silence and doubt
Our passion was just too intense to survive
Which means...!
This is a club I should never have joined
Someone has made us look fools
Argentine men call the sexual shots
Someone has altered the rules
Fame on the wireless as far as it goes
Is all very well, but every girl knows
She needs a man she can monopolise
With fingers in dozens of different pies
In June of '43
There was a military coup
Behind it was a gang called
The G.O.U.
Who did not feel
The need to be elected
They had themselves a party at the point of a gun
They were slightly to the right of Attila the Hun
A bomb or two
And very few objected
Just one shell
And governments fall like flies
Ka-pow, die
They stumble and fall
Bye-bye
Backs to the wall
Aim high
We're having a ball
The tank and bullet ruled
As democracy died
The lady's got potential
She was setting her sights
On making it in movies with her name in lights
The greatest social climber since Cinderella
OK, she couldn't act
But she had the right friends
And we all know a career depends
On knowing the right fella
To be stellar
Just one shell
And governments lose their nerve
That's how we get
The government we deserve
Now, the man behind the president calling the shots
Involved so discreetly in a lot of their plots
Was Colonel Juan Pern
Would-be dictator
He began in the army out in ltaly so
Saw Mussolini's rise from the very front row
And reckoned he'd do likewise
Sooner or later
Just one blast
And the tear gas falls like rain
They haven't a chance
The terrorists advance
But one guy doesn't dirty his hands
Pern was biding time out
In the slow lane
Suddenly an earthquake hit
The town of San Juan
They stumble and fall
Keep away from the wall
But one guy
Was having a ball
The tragedy a golden chance for Pern
He organised a concert
With incredible flair
In aid of all the victims
Such a grand affair
Politicians, actors
Stars of every flavour
It was January 22, 1 944
A night to remember, that's for sure
For that's the night
That Pern first met Eva
On this night
On this night
On this night of 1 000 stars
Let me take you to heaven's door
Where the music of love's guitars
Plays for evermore
Your act hasn't changed much
Neither has yours
I stand here as a servant of the people
As we come together for a marvellous cause
You've shown by your presence
Your deeds and applause
What the people can do
True power is yours
Not the government's
Unless it represents
The people
One always picks
The easy fight
One praises fools
One smothers light
One shifts
From left to right
Politics
The art of the possible
I've heard so much about you
I'm amazed
- For I'm only an actress
- For I'm only a soldier
- Nothing to shout about
- One of the thousands
- Only a girl on the air
- Defending the country he loves
But when you act
The things you do affect us all
But when you act
You take us away from the squalor of the real world
- Are you here on your own?
- Yes. Oh yes
So am I
What a fortunate coincidence
Maybe you're my reward
For my efforts here tonight
It seems crazy
But you must believe
There's nothing calculated
Nothing planned
Please forgive me
If I seem naive
I would never want to force your hand
But please understand I'd be good for you
I don't always rush in like this
20 seconds after saying hello
Telling strangers I'm too good to miss
If I'm wrong I hope you'll tell me so
But you really should know
I'd be good for you
I'd be surprisingly good for you
I won't go on if I'm boring you
But do you understand my point of view
Do you like what you hear
What you see
And would you be
Good for me too?
I'm not talking of a hurried night
A frantic tumble then a shy goodbye
Creeping home before it gets too light
That's not the reason that I caught your eye
Which has to imply I'd be good for you
Please go on. You enthral me
I can understand you perfectly
And I like what I hear, what I see
And knowing me
I would be good for you too
I'm not talking
Of a hurried night
A frantic tumble
Then a shy goodbye
Creeping home before it gets too light
That's not the reason
That I caught your eye
Which has to imply I'd be good for you
There is no one, no one at all
Never has been, and never will be a lover
Male or female
Who hasn't an eye on ln fact they rely on
Tricks they can try on their partner
They're hoping their lover
Will help them or keep them
Support them, promote them
Don't blame them, you're the same
Hello and goodbye
I've just unemployed you
You can go back to school
You've had a good run
I'm sure he enjoyed you
Don't act sad or surprised
Let's be friends, civilised
Come on, little one
Don't sit there like a dummy
The day you knew would arrive is here
You'll survive
So move, funny face
I like your conversation
You've a catchy turn of phrase
You're obviously going through
Some adolescent phase
So what happens now?
Where am I going to?
You'll get by, you always have before
Don't ask any more
At the watering-holes
Of the well-to-do
I detect a resistance to
Precisely
Our heroine's style
We're glad you noticed
The shooting sticks
Of the upper class
Give her an inch...
Aren't supporting a single ass
That would rise for the girl
...She'll take a mile
Such a shame she wandered
Into our enclosure
How unfortunate this person
Has forced us to be blunt
No, we wouldn't mind
Seeing her at Harrods
But behind the jewellery counter
Not in front
Could there be
In our fighting corps
A lack of enthusiasm for
Pern's latest flame?
You said it, brother
Should you wish
To cause great distress
In the tidiest officer's mess
Just mention her name
That isn't funny
Pern is a fool, breaking every taboo
Installing the girl in the army H.Q.
And she's an actress, the last straw
Her only good parts
Are between her thighs
She should stare at the ceiling
Not reach for the skies
Or she could be his last whore
The evidence suggests
She has other interests
If it's her that's using him
He's exceptionally dim
Dangerous Jade
We have allowed ourselves to slip
We have completely lost our grip
We have declined to an all-time low
Tarts have become the set to know
I'm only a radio star with just one weekly show
But speaking as one of the people
I want you to know
We are tired of
The decline of Argentina
With no sign of
A government able to give us the things we deserve
It's no crime for officers to do as they please
As long as they're discreet and keep clear of disease
We ignore, we disregard
But once they allow a bit on the side
To move to the centre where she's not qualified
We are forced to mark his card
She should get into her head
She should not get out of bed
She should know that she's not paid
To be loud, but to be laid
Slut
Dangerous Jade
This has really been your year
Miss Duarte
Tell us where you go from here
Miss Duarte
Which are the roles that you yearn to play?
Whom did you sleep...dine with yesterday?
Acting is limiting
The lines not mine
That's no help to the Argentine
Can we assume then that you'll quit?
Is this because of your involvement
With Colonel Pern?
She won't be kept happy by her nights on the tiles
She says it's his body
But she's after his files
So get back onto the street
She should get into her head
She should not get out of bed
She should know that she's not paid
To be loud, but to be laid
The evidence suggests
She has other interests
If it's her that's using him
He's exceptionally dim
Things have reached a pretty pass
When someone pretty lower class
Graceless and vulgar, uninspired
Can be accepted and admired
Dice are rolling
The knives are out
Would-be presidents are all around
I don't say they mean harm
But they'd each give an arm
To see us six feet underground
It doesn't matter
What those morons say
Our nation's leaders are a feeble crew
There's only 20 of them anyway
What is 20 next to millions who
Are looking to you?
All you have to do is sit and wait
Keeping out of everybody's way
We'll... You'll be handed power
On a plate
When the ones who matter
Have their say
And with chaos installed
You can reluctantly agree
To be called
There again we could be foolish
Not to quit while we're ahead
For distance lends enchantment
And that is why
All exiles
Are distinguished
More important, they're not dead
I could find job satisfaction in Paraguay
This is crazy defeatist talk
Why commit political suicide
There's no risk
There's no call for any action at all
When you have unions on your side
A new Argentina
The chains of the masses untied
The voice of the people
Cannot be denied
There is only one man who can lead any workers' regime
He lives for your problems
He shares your ideals and your dream
He supports you, for he loves you
Understands you, is one of you
If not
How could he love me?
A new Argentina
The workers' battle song
The voice of the people
Rings out loud and long
Now, I am a worker
I've suffered the way that you do
I've been unemployed
And I've starved, and I've hated it too
But I found my salvation in Pern
May the nation let him save them
As he saved me
A new age about to begin
We face the world together
And no dissent within
There again we could be foolish
Not to quit while we're ahead
I can see us many miles away, inactive
Sipping cocktails on a terrace
Taking breakfast in bed
Sleeping easy, doing nothing
It's attractive
Don't think I don't think like you
I often get those nightmares too
They always take some swallowing
Sometimes it's very difficult to keep
Momentum, if it's you that you are following
Don't close doors
Keep an escape clause
Because we might lose
The Big Apple
But would I have done what I did
If I hadn't thought
If I hadn't known
We would take the country?
Pern has resigned from the army and this we avow
The descamisados are those he is marching with now
He supports you, for he loves you
Understands you, is one of you
If not
How could he love me?
Release him.
(Child) Give it me!
Amelia.
Captain Greville, ma'am...
His Majesty's new equerry.
Captain Fitzroy?
Uh...
Could you show me...
Oh, God. Come on, Pa.
What's that one, Fred?
I discovered the other day
I'm...I'm bishop of Osnabruck.
Amazing what one is, really.
George!
Crown.
Your Majesty.
Ah, Lord Chancellor.
God, this place is as cold as a greyhound's nostril.
Lord Chancellor.
Papa!
Ahem.
Papa, Papa!
Lift me up!
Oh, hey. What's this, madam?
Hey? Ha ha ha.
Tickle, tickle.
Yeah. Ha ha ha.
Right.
The son is unwholesome.
And fatter, always fatter.
Fatter because he's not doing, what?
- Do you know England? 
- Yes.
Brighton, Bath, yes.
But you know its mills and manufactories?
Do you know its farms? 
Because I do.
Do you know what they call me? 
Farmer George.
- Do you know what that is? 
- Impertinent, sir?
No, sir. Love!
Affection.
Admiration! You ought to marry, sir, settle down.
Yes, grow up.
Good plain woman. 
That's what you want.
Then the people will love you, as they love me.
It is not good, this idleness.
That is why you're getting fat, sir.
Do not be fat, sir. Fight it!
Now who's got that blasted speech?
Stop! Who's got the speech?
- Here, sire. 
- (King) Lord Chancellor.
- Ready? 
- Yes.
Well, come on. 
Let's get it over with.
The king commands the members of this honourable House to attend His Majesty in the House of Peers.
Do you enjoy all this flummery, 
Mr Pitt?
No, Mr Fox.
Do you enjoy anything, Mr Pitt?
A balance sheet, Mr Fox.
I enjoy a good balance sheet.
(King) Whereas we, George III, in this year of our Lord 1788 do open this Parliament, giving notice that our will and pleasure is that the following bills shall be laid before this House...
A bill for the regulation of trade with our possessions in North America.
Ahem.
Our former possessions in North America.
A bill for...
You see that the king did not write his own speech, Mr Pitt.
The king will do as he's told, 
Mr Fox.
Then why not be rid of him?
If a few ramshackle colonists in America can send him packing, why can't we?
Petitioners for the king!
Petitions for the king!
Present your petition!
Open the gate!
Stay with the line.
Over there. Petitioners.
The petitioners, Your Majesty.
Oh. Yes.
Thank you.
Thank you.
Thank you.
- The knife! 
- Seize her!
(Soldier) Hold her, boy!
No. I'm not hurt.
His Majesty is unharmed!
I've a property due to me from the Crown of England.
The poor creature's mad. 
No, no, no.
Do not hurt her. 
I am unhurt.
Give me my property, or England will be drenched in blood.
Will it, indeed, madam?
Well, not with this.
It's a fruit knife.
Wouldn't cut a cabbage.
Oh.
Ah. Who are you, sir?
Oh, this is Captain Greville, sir, the new equerry.
Well, you are undressed, sir. 
Do yourself up, sir.
You're an equerry, not a scarecrow.
A property due to me from the Crown.
You murderous fiend!
Thank God I have you yet.
Do not fuss, madam.
The king has no wound, just a torn waistcoat.
One would consider that almost as vexing.
(King) What was that?
I was rejoicing, sir, that you are unharmed.
The Prince of Wales rejoices. Huh.
Me, too, Pa. 
God save the king... and so on.
Your Majesty!
Aha, Mr Pitt. Well, you had a lucky escape, what, what?
Aye, Your Majesty.
Yes, you. 
You're my prime minister.
If anything happened to me, you'd be out and Mr Fox in.
There's no danger of that, sir.
Right. Back to Windsor.
George!
Smile, you lazy hound. 
It's what you're paid for.
Smile and wave. Come on.
Smile and wave.
Everybody, smile and wave.
(Angrily) Smile and wave!
Arthur.
Pa's right.
I am getting fatter.
I don't mind that.
Oh? What do you mind?
That the world thinks 
I'm just your mistress.
That's what I mind.
You shall be queen one day... the whole bag of tricks.
I am determined.
I just don't want to be thought a Catholic whore.
George...
If you tried harder to get on with the king, you could tell him the truth.
And he'd forgive me, hmm?
You are a sweet... silly... creature.
Try, George.
Ha ha ha!
Come on, boy! 
Come on! Come on!
Pigs!
Come on.
(King) I say, these are fine specimens.
What are they, Tamworths, what?
If it please Your Majesty.
Yes. Oh, yes. 
They're a fine breed.
There's plenty of meat on them, hey?
(King) Big litter. 
Show me the youngster.
Yes, that's the one. 
Yes, I say. Hey, hey.
You know what you are?
You're a Tamworth.
Are they really?
Well, are they really?
(King) Hah hah hah hah hah hah hah!
Married yet, 
Mr Pitt, what, what?
No, sir.
Got your eye on anybody, then, hey?
No, sir.
A man should marry.
Yes, yes.
The best thing I ever did.
And children, you see. Children.
Great comfort.
This fellow we're putting in as a professor at Oxford.
Was his father canon of Westminster?
I have no idea, sir.
Yes, yes, Phillips.
That's the father. 
This is the son.
And the daughter married the organist at Norwich Cathedral.
Sharpe. Yes, their son is the painter.
The other son is a master at Eton, he married somebody's niece.
Your Majesty's knowledge of even the lowliest appointments never ceases to astonish me.
Ha ha.
What's happened to Mr Fox?
Such a dodger.
Reform!
Too many ideas.
Not like you, Mr Pitt. 
You don't have ideas.
Ah, well, you have one very big idea balancing the books... and a very good idea it is to have, too, and one with which 
I absolutely agree.
As I agree with you, 
Mr Pitt, on everything.
Apart from the place we mustn't mention.
The colonies!
They're now called the United States, sir.
Are they?
Goodness, me.
The United States.
Well, I haven't mentioned them.
I prefer not to, whatever they're called.
They are a fact, sir.
The vicar of Lichfield!
- Sir. 
- The vicar of Lichfield.
It was his niece that married the second son of the organist at Norwich Cathedral.
Good night, Mr Pitt.
Good night, Your Majesty.
# Greensleeves #
Fascinating stuff, what, what?
Let's have it again.
Your Majesty, Lady Townsend wishes to sit down.
Well, certainly not!
What?
Lady Townsend wants to sit down.
What for?
Because she is five months pregnant.
So? You've had 15 children.
If everybody who is having a baby wants to sit, the next thing will be everybody with gout!
Before long, the place will look like a Turkish harem, what, what?
Oh, that's enough.
Thank you, gentlemen.
Thank you.
(King) Ah, Greville.
Thank you.
- Yes, that's better, what, what. 
- Your Majesty.
You don't look at the king. 
Didn't they tell you?
- I forgot, sir. 
- Don't.
That's Lady Pembroke.
Handsome woman, what?
Daughter of the duke of Marlborough.
Stuff of generals. 
Blood of Blenheim.
Husband's an utter rascal.
Eloped in a packet-boat.
Yes.
Good evening, Mrs King.
Good evening, Mr King.
When we get this far,
I call it dandy, hey?
Yes, Mr King.
Ohh.
I ate a pear at supper.
Two pears, sir.
It's as tight as a drum!
Aah! Rrrah!
Ha ha ha.
Saving your presence, 
I will try a fart.
No?
Cold fish, Pitt.
Never smiles.
Yet he works hard, though.
Never stops. Drinks, they say.
They all drink.
His father, poor man... went mad.
Huh. Doesn't show any sign of that.
(Queen) Mmm.
Not at the moment, anyway.
Ohh!
Oh, the pain!
George! George!
Ohh! Oh! George! Oh!
Oh! Help me. Help us!
Help us!
Help!
(Doctor) He looks well enough.
I sent over some senna. 
Was that given to him?
Yes. The pain got worse.
Whereabouts was the pain?
Would it not be better to ask His Majesty?
How long have you been in waiting?
I cannot address His Majesty until he addresses me.
I cannot inquire after 
His Majesty's symptoms until he chooses to inform me of them.
Sir George, whatever his situation,
His Majesty is just a man.
You're the king's equerry with radical notions like that?
Good God!
With any patient, I undertake a physical examination only as a last resort.
It's an intolerable intrusion of a gentleman's privacy.
With His Majesty, it's unthinkable!
Sharp, sharp!
The king! The king!
Ah, Baker. Yes, a ninny, what, what?
You can tell him 
I am much better.
I had a pretty smart bilious attack, but it has passed.
Would it be possible to take His Majesty's pulse?
Would it be possible to take 
Your Majesty's pulse, sir?
Yes. Do it.
Now don't faff, sir. 
Hold it, man. Don't fondle it.
Were you responsible for the senna, Baker?
I prescribed it for Your Majesty.
Then you are a fool, Baker.
It's only a mild purgative, sir.
Mild? 14 motions, and you call it mild?
I could have manured the whole parish.
If 2 glasses bring the king low, can be the end of government.
Your Majesty was only to take three spoonfuls.
When did three spoonfuls of anything did any good?
Measure the medicine to the man. 
Pulse?
- It's very, very fast. 
- Good, good.
Your Majesty will probably feel better after a warm bath and its settling effect on the spirit.
Well you have one. Your spirit's more agitated than mine.
(King) Breathe this air, 
Greville. Breathe it!
Come on, lads. Keep up!
This is the way we deal with 
America. I'll teach you, sirs!
Take that, Mr Colonist!
And that, sir!
And that!
Fetch the queen.
No, no. That's not cricket. 
Don't hold the bat like that.
(Queen) What is he doing?
Over there. Out of the way.
- Run! 
- How's that?
Out!
- (All) Yay! 
- Oh, good God!
Well done. Well done, lads.
The following day, he rose before dawn, went round to the provost of Eton's lodgings, and battering on the door, roused the provost and commanded him to show him the chapel!
So?
Lord Chancellor, it was still dark.
Have we finished this catalogue of regal nonconformities?
Because I've heard nothing to suggest His Majesty's behaviour is in any way unusual.
He also harps on America... the colonies.
Captain Fitzroy, for the strongest reasons, both foreign and domestic... a degree of discretion.
And a hold on public functions. 
No levees or concerts.
Just, uh...just... Hmm?
(Chancellor) The cork's too tight in the bottle. That's it.
He must be the first king not to have a mistress.
15 children seem to me to indicate a degree of conscientiousness in that regard.
I'm talking of pleasure, not duty.
Actually, there was a mysterious illness once before in your father's time.
Government was at a standstill.
Well, it was of no consequence.
It was of no consequence because he recovered.
It was of no consequence because the Prince of Wales was a child of three and because Mr Fox and his friends were not perched in the rafters waiting to come in.
We consider ourselves blessed in our constitution.
We tell ourselves our Parliament is the envy of the world.
But we live in the health and well-being of the sovereign as much as any vizier does the sultan.
The sultan orders it better.
He has his son and heir strangled.
Ha ha ha ha ha ha ha!
- Cricket? Pa? 
- How's that?
- What, what? 
- Well played, hey, hey?
To watch it, sir, was quite distasteful. He was not himself.
Warren, what do you think?
I'm not the king's doctor.
No, nor ever will be.
He's more likely to go to my tailor than my doctor.
But, sir, this is not the same.
Could he be ill?
Um...
Yes.
Morning, sir.
(All) Morning, sir.
Ohh. Ah.
Sherry...
What would happen if the king were ill, hmm?
I mean, gravely ill.
Your Royal Highness would have to be declared regent.
Regent?
King in all but name.
With all the powers.
Subject to Parliament.
Charles, don't quibble.
(Charles) And certainly... all the funds.
Ha ha ha ha.
Just think of it.
Regent!
Prime minister.
America forgiven.
London rebuilt.
Parliament could be reformed.
A palace on Primrose Hill.
The slave trade abolished.
Yeah! Yeah!
Oh, yes. All that, too.
(Charles) Sir...
Is he ill?
Well, he's not well.
I know, I know.
One day.
One day.
It's 4.00.
Where are you, sirs?
What is this? 
The king is unattended.
Up with you, sirs!
Braun!
Fortnum!
Papandiek!
Where are you, sirs?
What's the matter, sir?
It is morning. 
That is the matter.
Not being attended to is the matter.
And don't mutter or mutter will be the matter.
What time is it, sir?
What is that to you?
The King is up.
When the King is awake, you're awake.
Six hours sleep is enough for a man, seven for a woman, and eight for a fool.
We've had three. 
We went to bed at 1.00.
Is that insolence, sir?
No, sir. Arithmetic.
Oh. What's your name?
Fortnum, sir.
Fetch me my breeches.
- Yours? 
- You know my name, sir.
Don't tell me what do and don't know. What is it?
Papandiek, sir. Arthur, sir.
Is it Arthur?
Yes, sir.
- And yours? 
- Braun, sir.
- And yours? 
- Fortnum, sir.
Well, come on, boys...
We're missing the best of the day.
(King) Come on!
Run! Look at the weather!
(King) # Awake my soul
# And with the sun ... #
Please, sir!
# Shake off thy...
(All) # Shake off dull sloth
# And joyful rise
# To pay thy morning sacrifice #
Where's that rascal Braun? 
He's not gone back to bed.
I'm here, sir.
Well, give me my shirt, man.
This is calico, a hair shirt.
Fetch me another.
Another shirt, a softer one!
Wake up, sir!
Attend, sir, attend!
Have you said your prayers this morning?
I started, sir, but I was interrupted.
Say after me...
- Our Father... 
- Our Father...
- Which art in heaven... 
- Which art...
- Hallowed be Thy name. 
- Hallowed...
Thy kingdom come...
Thy will be done...
On earth as it is in heaven...
On earth as it is in heaven...
Thy kingdom come...
Thy will be done...
Give us this day our daily bread...
(Queen) Our Father which art in heaven...
Hallowed be Thy name...
As we forgive them that trespass against us...
Hallowed be Thy name...
(Queen) Give us this day our daily bread...
And lead us not into temptation...
On earth as it is in heaven...
Give us this day our daily bread...
For Thine... is the kingdom... the power and the glory...
Deliver us...
Sir! Sir!
(Queen) Sir! No!
Sir, we are in company.
Mind your own business.
The King has fallen! Help!
Help him!
(Queen) Help the King!
George!
Agh!
Why, sir, you must rest.
I am the King. I cannot rest.
I must rule.
Half the day gone already.
Things to do - government.
(Papandiek) The government hasn't begun yet, sir.
The government's still in bed.
(Braun) The government is lucky.
- Do you love God, Arthur? 
- Yes, sir.
He loves us all, if only we'll let him.
Don't discuss the deity. 
It does not do.
Does not do? I'm the King.
What's the deity to me?
Piss-pot.
(Woman) Huh?
Piss-pot.
Your Majesty.
Right.
Unh.
Unh.
Do it, England. Do it.
Oh, it's wonderful.
Ahh, that's better.
Whew.
I'm obliged to you, madam.
Can't stop now.
On, England, on.
Look, it's blue.
Why are you dawdling? 
The King is unattended.
The King's water is blue, sir.
So?
It's been this colour since this business began.
What business? 
Don't be insolent.
We thought it might be important.
What's important is not to dangle about.
The King's half undressed and unattended... that's what's important.
Give me that.
Uh, Sir George.
- This is the King's water. 
- Well?
- It's blue. 
- So?
It's been blue since 
His Majesty's been ill.
Oh, God, another doctor.
Medicine is a science. 
It consists of observation.
Whether a man's water is blue or not is neither here nor there.
Well, there's one blessing.
At least he's stopped all the "What-whatting."
Lady Pembroke.
Mr Greville.
Her Majesty spoke favourably of you today, Mr Greville.
And we do not like Mr Fitzroy.
You will go far.
Captain Fitzroy.
I said no concerts, no public appearances.
It is by order of the prince.
His Royal Highness thought it might cheer His Majesty up.
Come on. If we're late, he will be mad.
Do you like music, Warren?
If it's played, sir, 
I listen to it.
Soothes the savage breast, do you think?
Not, I fear, in this case, sir.
Push off, you fat turd!
Yes, Your Majesty.
Now, what is this?
America, I suppose?
No, sir.
America's not to be spoken of, is that it?
For your peace of mind, sir. 
But it's not America.
Peace of mind?
I have no peace of mind.
I've had no peace of mind since we lost America.
Forests, old as the world itself... meadows... plains... strange, delicate flowers... immense solitudes... and all nature new to art... all ours... mine.
Gone.
A paradise... lost.
Her Majesty is waiting, sir.
I must ask you not to attend this concert, sir.
You are not fit, sir.
Not fit?
(Softly) To be seen, sir.
(King) Not fit?
(Pages) Sharp! Sharp! 
The King! The King!
Sir, I beg you!
(King) Not fit?!
Not fit?
I'll give him "Not fit."
Telling me? 
I'm the King, do you hear?
The impudence!
Well, I'm here now.
Play, damn you, play!
Ahh. Remember this one...hmm?
# Ba bum ba-ba bum
# Bum bum ba-ba #
Louder, sirs! Louder!
Lay it on, lads!
One, two, three, four!
Come on, let's hear you!
Give it some stick!
You! 
Put your heart into it, sir!
All right. Move over.
It's my turn.
Where are we?
Where?
This is child's play, man!
Oh, this is my favourite bit.
That's how to do it, see?
Come on, trumpets! 
Give it some heart!
Sir...
Sir, you're...
You are talking.
I'm not. I'm playing.
But, sir, you...
Not now.
Now, give it a good whipping!
Thrash it, you villains!
What's the matter with you?
Right.
There.
Yes, this is Handel.
I met him once.
Ordinary looking fellow.
I have his harpsichord.
Right, then. 
Let's be having you.
Elbow people... knee gentlemen... bending persons... hand kissers.
Ahh.
Fine cluster there, eh?
Go on. Look. Look.
Go on. 
You might learn something.
Good arse, too...
And warm, eh, I'll bet.
Ahh.
And what brings you to Windsor, sire?
I had heard Your Majesty was indisposed, but I see that...
Indisposed.
Is there any way I can assist?
Want to hump the old bird out of the nest, is it?
No, sir. There may be responsibilities I could share.
Want to get your fat hands on government, is that it?
Well, I'm old and infirm.
I'll not trouble you long.
I wish you the best of health, 
Father.
Wish me?
You wish me death, you plump little... cuckoo.
Hush, father, hush.
Hush?
Hush!
You dare to stop the King of 
England from speaking his mind?
Father, please!
Please!
Please, Papa! For God's sake!
No, Papa!
I'll choke the air out of you!
I'll wring his neck!
It was something he ate.
You fools! 
You'll all be put out!
We know your game, you monster!
As heir to the throne, Mr Pitt,
I know His Majesty bears a heavy burden.
I fear the time is coming when it is a burden we shall be forced to share.
Sir...
No, no. Mrs Fitzherbert has our entire confidence.
Ahh, Baker, how is the King?
Still demented, sir. 
And the pulse is 104.
Then he's not in command of his senses?
Nor likely to be...
If I may say so, sir.
(Prince) Since His Majesty's not fit to look after himself, we must do so.
In the future, you, Warren, will partner Baker as the King's physician.
I must insist that this arrangement be subject to the approval of His Majesty's ministers.
Insist? Approval?
A son's concern for his sick father?
What is the world coming to, Mr Pitt?
His Royal Highness is quite right.
This is a family matter.
Thank you...
Lord Chancellor.
(King) The children!
The children!
The children are asleep.
We must wake them up! 
London is flooded.
We must flee for higher ground.
Save Amelia, Adolphus, and little Octavius. Come. Come.
(Queen) Octavius is dead, sir.
Who's killed him - his brother? 
Yes, he would kill me, too.
(Queen) George...
(King) Hush, my baby! 
You're safe with Papa.
He just doesn't want you to get your feet wet.
Come. Come.
(Amelia) Mama!
Papa's not mad. 
No, he's not mad.
He's just lost himself, that's all.
We must get to the roof.
Sir... You are talking!
I know I'm talking!
I follow my words. 
I run after them.
I am dragged at locution's tail!
I have to talk to keep up with my thoughts.
(Amelia) I'm scared.
I thought he had taken you.
Who, sir?
The other George.
You were not in my bed.
I thought you had deceived me with the son!
Elizabeth come to my bed.
Elizabeth, you leave us!
All of you, go! Just go!
You, too. Go!
You want to talk?
Then talk. Talk away.
What do you do with him that you don't do with me?
At it like pigs, the pair of you, huh?
Those fat hands... that young belly...
Sir, for pity's sake...
Those warm thighs!
You harlot!
George, hear me!
Do you think that you are mad?
I don't know.
I don't know.
Madness isn't such torment.
Madness isn't half blind.
Madmen can stand.
They skip. They dance.
And I talk.
I talk and talk and talk.
I hear the words, so I have to speak them.
I have to empty my head of the words.
Something has happened.
Something is not right.
Oh, Charlotte.
Ohh...
Ohh...
I will not do this.
(Fitzroy) It's by order of the prince.
(Greville) I'm equerry to His Majesty, not the prince.
His Majesty is mad!
(Fitzroy) Your Majesty...
Can we never be solitary?
I told you to leave us.
I am talking with His Majesty.
- The floods? 
- Hush!
No, my dear. No. No.
Greville's right.
He's right to take precautions.
We must fetch the children.
Take them to the higher ground.
Save Amelia, Adolphus, little Octavius.
Now, bring the queen.
(Greville) Bring the queen!
I've been instructed by His Royal Highness to move Your Majesty's lodgings, ma'am.
Uh, Why? Where?
It is to assist 
His Majesty's recovery.
(Greville) Captain Fitzroy!
- Go, sir, go! 
- George!
Your Majesty is not to have access to the King's presence.
Not have access? 
But I am the queen.
Where are you taking him?
No! Stop!
George!
Tyrant!
Assaulted by both one's parents in the same evening.
What is family life coming to?
I was told that, in England, always the prince hates the king.
Is that why he's mad?
If he's mad, you've made him so by your idleness.
If I'm idle, it's because the King gives me nothing to do.
Do? Do what I do. I support him.
I have 15 of his children.
Be grateful to me for giving you a breathing space... no, a breeding space.
I'm sorry. 
That really is awfully funny.
Ha ha ha ha!
George. No, George, please.
Ahem.
Please let me stay with him. Please.
No, madam.
On what authority?
Medical authority, ma'am.
On the authority of a son, who cares for his sick father.
But I'm his wife. 
Don't I care for him, too?
Possibly, madam.
But in his current frame of mind,
I'm afraid His Majesty does not seem to care for you.
No!
Come, madam.
Let me show Your Majesty where they have lodged us.
This is Sir Lucas Pepys, 
Lord Chancellor, whom I've taken the liberty of consulting.
The more the merrier.
Are you familiar with 
His Majesty's condition?
I have spent a lifetime studying the anfractuosities of the human understanding.
An... what?
The mind, sir, and it's, uh... delinquencies.
If it were possible, 
I would value an early view of one of His Majesty's motions.
Yes. That could be arranged, couldn't it?
But what's the matter with him?
Persistent delirium... and the pulse sometimes rises to 110.
The pulse varies. 
It doesn't signify.
(Papys) I agree.
I've always found the stool more...eloquent than the pulse.
So, uh, what do you suggest?
An immediate purge.
Warren?
He needs blistering.
On the back to draw the humours from the brain.
Blistering on the legs to draw the humours to the lower extremities.
I agree... but he'll never submit.
Hello there, Georgie boy.
Not my skin.
Not my skin, please.
Oh, for pity's sake.
I'm the Lord's anointed.
God, unto whom all hearts be open, all desires known, and from whom no secrets are hid, cleanse... h-h-hearts by the inspiration of Thy Holy Spirit that we may perfectly love Thee and Thy Holy Name, through Christ our Lord! 
Amen! Amen! Amen!
My most merciful Father... stray from thy ways like lost sheep.
We follow too much.
God, help me. Help me.
Have mercy upon us... miserable offenders.
Do not touch me! I'm the king!
Go and tell the queen 
I am assaulted!
The queen!
Queen! Help!
He soils his clothes. 
Urine. Excrement.
He talks filth, the slops of his mind swilling over.
I am not a nurse.
If His Majesty cannot regulate himself, how should he regulate the country?
I shall be relieved when it is ended, one way or the other.
Omni felonious.
Omni victorious.
Happy and glorious.
Mr Pitt, Your Majesty.
Where?
Here, Your Majesty.
Stand close, Mr Pitt.
You'll have to speak up. 
I don't see very well.
There is a fog here... and...in my ear.
In my ear.
In my ears.
There have been questions in the House, sir.
In the House?
Parliament?
Well, do nothing, 
Mr Pitt. Nothing.
I'm not mad.
I'm...
I...
I can't see.
There is a mist.
Oh, the queen.
I missed her.
I... I... I...
I missed her.
Gone. Gone.
Gone. Gone.
The doctors thought it best, sir.
Gone.
Oh, doctor...
Oh...
Oh, Jesus Christ.
Come on.
Oh, God!
Oh!
Oh, God!
Honourable members would, 
I am sure, like to know
that I saw His Majesty yesterday,
and the only symptoms of his disorder
were a tendency to repeat himself
and a wandering from one topic to another... a characteristic that's shared by most of the converse of polite society... which, if judged severely, would warrant the consignment to bedlam of many in this House!
Ha ha ha ha! 
Ha ha ha!
(Speaker) Mr Fox.
Mr Pitt's consoling pleasantries should not deceive the House.
The king is incapacitated.
There are those who say he has lost his reason.
It isn't so!
- Nonsense! 
- In which case,
I propose a bill be drawn up to make the Prince of Wales...regent.
(Speaker) Order!
Order!
The motion before this House is that a bill be speedily drawn up to appoint the Prince of Wales regent of this kingdom!
The house will divide.
Thank you, gentlemen, for your support.
Sir, I must vote.
For the life of me, I can't see why they need to vote.
The king is incapable. 
It's known.
These are the nation's representatives.
Some come to Parliament in the hope that they might serve their country.
But most of them, being human, are here to fill their pockets.
Pitt and your father have done them very well... pensions, places... bribes.
Once it is plain that Pitt is finished and there is no more swill in the trough,
Your Royal Highness will be made regent.
Sir, I must join the line.
Gascoigne.
Sheridan.
Fox.
Very good. A majority of 30.
Rather good. 
A government majority of 30.
Government? 30?
You mean we haven't won?
Well, we didn't expect to win outright, not the first vote.
I thought they liked me.
They will, sir, they will, in time.
Time, always time.
Now is the time, Charles! Now!
And that's our boy.
God rot all royals.
Give us the wisdom of America.
But he will recover in time, surely.
What good is that? 
Once he's made regent, the prince will have him locked away in some Windsor hell-hole.
Mad or sane, no one will know.
You've been reading too many novels.
He has to recover soon, or we're done for.
(Woman) Mr Pitt.
Lady Pembroke.
Her Majesty understands that you are dissatisfied with His Majesty's doctors.
The king is no better.
Mr Pitt, my mother-in-law lost her wits, and a succession of physicians failed to recover them for her.
But one doctor was confident of her return to health.
Accordingly, she was placed in his care.
And is she recovered?
Entirely.
Rides to hounds, founded some almshouses, embroiders around the clock.
I've written down his name.
(Woman) Sir!
Thank you, Mrs Cordwell.
Look! Look! Look!
At last! At last!
- Mrs Cordwell... 
- This is my husband, come post-haste from Portsmouth.
Mrs Cordwell,
Captain Cordwell drowned off the Goodwin Sands three years since.
But he is very like.
Back to work, Mrs Cordwell.
Dr Willis?
I must have certain undertakings... authority over the patient, access to him at all times.
You will reside here at Windsor, and Parliament will have to be kept informed, so you will need to write bulletins.
They must be confident, optimistic.
The survival of the government depends upon it.
And, Dr Willis, you are my doctor.
Do you understand?
I'm the king's doctor, sir.
It is the same thing.
In here, sir.
Yes.
Do you know, Mr Greville, the state of monarchy and the state of lunacy share a frontier?
Some of my lunatics fancy themselves kings.
He... is the king.
Where shall his fancy take refuge?
We do not use the word lunatic, sir, in relation to His Majesty.
Oh.
Well, who's to say what's normal in a king? Hmm?
Deferred to, agreed with, acquiesced in.
Who can flourish on such a daily diet of compliance?
To be curbed... stood up to... in a word, thwarted exercises the character, elasticates the spirit, makes it more pliant.
It's the want of such exercise that makes rulers rigid.
Sharp, sharp! 
The king, the king!
This is the king, sir.
Whom I must cure.
...As straight as a ruler, straight as a ruler done by a ruler.
And another beside that until you have as pretty a ploughed field this side of Cirencester.
(Willis) I have a farm.
Put us out of our kingdom. 
We'd not want for employment.
Give me the management of 50 acres, and I could do it.
I said...
I have a farm, Your Majesty.
Ahem.
This gentleman, sir, has made the illness under which Your Majesty labours his special study, sir.
A mad doctor, is it?
I'm not mad, just nervous.
I shall endeavour to... alleviate some of the inconveniences from which Your Majesty suffers.
Inconveniences?
Insults.
Assaults.
And salt besides rubbed into these wounds. Look!
By your dress, sir, and general demeanour,
I'd say you were a minister of God.
That's true. I was once in the service of the church.
Now I practice medicine.
You've quitted a profession 
I've always loved and embraced one 
I most heartily detest.
Our saviour went about healing the sick.
But he had not 
700 pounds a year for it.
Ha ha ha!
Well, that's not bad for a madman.
I have a hospital in Lincolnshire.
Lincolnshire.
Yes, I know Lincolnshire.
Fine sheep there. 
Admirable sheep.
Pigs, too.
But I know of no hospitals.
My patients work, sir.
They till the soil, cultivate... and in so doing, they acquire a better conceit of themselves.
I'm king of England.
A man can have no better conceit of himself.
Do you look at me, sir?
I do, sir.
I have you in my eye.
No, I have you in mine.
You're bold, sir.
But by God, I'm bolder.
Don't look at me! 
I'm not one of your farmers!
You must behave!
Must? Whose must is this, your must or my must?
Get away from me, you bum sucker.
Lincolnshire lick-fingers!
Clean your tongue, sir.
I will not! I'll be a guest in the graveyard first.
Very well. If Your Majesty will not behave, you must be restrained.
When felons were induced to talk, they were shown first the instruments of their torture.
The king is shown the instrument of his to induce him not to talk.
Well, I won't, I won't.
I won't.
Bring him back. Bring him back!
What are you doing? 
This is the king!
Stop.
What are you doing, sir?
No. No. No. No.
This is the king, sir!
This is the king!
Bastard!
I'm the king! 
Take your hands off me!
This is the king!
Sit him down. Sit him down.
I'll have your hospital...
(Muffled) Help me! Help!
If the king refuses food, he will be restrained.
If he claims to have no appetite, he will be restrained.
If he swears and indulges in meaningless discourse... he will be restrained.
If he throws off his bedclothes, tears away his bandages, scratches at his sores, and does not strive every day towards his own recovery, then he must be restrained.
- I am the king of England! 
- No, sir!
You are the patient!
(Queen) Not permitted.
Not permitted!
We recommended him, and still it is not permitted.
None of them know him.
Come, Baker, for heaven's sake.
(Queen) He's not himself.
How can they restore him to his proper self, not knowing what that self is?
He's an angel of kindness and goodness.
Fortnum.
Sir.
What are you doing?
I'm going, sir, to Piccadilly, sir, to start a provision merchant's.
It isn't much, sir, but it's a cut above emptying piss-pots.
Braun.
Pepys.
Good news.
A fetid and a stinking stool.
Pepys.
The colour good, well shaped, and a prodigious quantity.
Mind you, the urine is a little dark.
Or is it the light?
Pepys, this Willis.
Yes?
A dangerous man.
Is he?
Not a proper doctor.
Not a member of the Royal College of Physicians.
Wants us out, Pepys.
No.
We must stick together.
And remember, one voice.
- One voice. 
- One voice.
What kind of fellow is he?
Parson.
Quack.
Has some modern ideas.
He'll need watching.
I've heard very good things about him.
He does a lot of it with his eyes.
You mean he actually looks at the king?
Yes.
Damned impudence.
Poor king. 
No queen. Must be very lonely.
Such a pity he's not nearer. 
Then you could go visit him.
Hmm.
You don't mean...here?
Good God, no.
Kew.
(King) Kew? Aah!
Throw him in.
- Come on, Your Majesty. 
- Come on, sir.
Stop struggling, Your Majesty.
God!
Stop!
I see you, sir.
No, sir. You do not see me.
Nobody sees me.
I am not here.
Easy!
(King) Take your filthy hands off me, you...
I have you in my eye, sir.
And I shall do so until you learn to do as you're told.
I'm the king. 
I tell, I'm not told.
I am the verb, sir. 
I am not the object.
Then till you can govern yourself, you're not fit to govern others.
And until you do so...
I shall govern you.
Govern yourself then, you goat. Pbbblllt!
Get him in the coach.
Then I am dead!
Coffin king!
I shall be taken out, murdered, and my genitals torn off and pulled apart by horses and my limbs exhibited in a neighbouring town.
Get him in!
(King) Aah! Oh, help me, please! 
Help me. Help.
Mr King.
- Come on, you little bugger. 
- Come on!
The queen will come, you said.
- In time, sir. 
- It was a lie!
An ordained minister lied.
That lie will have you out of that famous farm.
(King) Loose your tame lunatics across Lincolnshire, you liar.
Liar.
I'm here.
Here...
But I'm not all there.
Yes.
(Pitt) I used to sit with my father when he was ill.
I used to read him Shakespeare.
I never read Shakespeare.
I'm a clergyman.
They've killed the queen. 
Did you know that?
No, sir.
Oh, yes, sir.
Are you cold?
It is chilly, sir.
Oh, not for me.
I make the weather by means of mental powers.
Well, actually, it's not too bad about the queen because actually I never actually married her.
I was married to the tall one, Elizabeth.
Ah-ah! What are you saying, sir?
What do you mean?
Don't they speak German in Lincolnshire?
Allow me to translate, sir.
Her Ladyship is game for anything.
I just say the word!
- Skirts up... 
- Gag!
I'm in there, or she's down here...
You assured me you could cure him.
I can, sir, given time.
We do not have time!
- What are you praying for now? 
- The king.
You should pray for us.
Because... if he did die or stay mad...
George!
Who's to stop us saying we're man and wife?
(Man) Don't you know who the bridegroom was?
It is a year ago.
Did the bride not mention she was a Catholic?
Why should she?
Aha! Aha. Here it is.
The prince cannot marry without the king's permission, and he cannot marry a Catholic.
You performed an illegal marriage.
And he only gave me 10 pound.
Well, here's 10 pounds more. 
Keep your mouth shut.
Here! That's against the law!
I am the law.
Oh, long, long days, Elizabeth.
And longer for His Majesty.
In the drawing-room, gentlemen.
The doctors, Your Majesty.
Good afternoon, Your Majesty.
And, uh, how are we today?
Blisters have healed up very nicely, which won't do at all.
Mother of God.
Get off me, you barbarian!
Ahem.
Bulletin.
"Much better."
Ha. I can't see it.
(Willis) You doubt me, sir?
I'll write it.
Could we mention the stool this time?
Oh, the stool, the stool.
My dear Pepys, the persistent excellence of the stool has been one of this disease's most tedious features.
When will you get it into your head, one can produce a copious, regular, and exquisitely-turned evacuation every day and still be a stranger to reason?
I will not trouble the House with the detailed contents of the latest, and I may say, generally optimistic bulletin.
But honourable members would, 
I am sure, like to know that while His Majesty has had ups and downs...
His...his health continues steadily to improve.
Improve? That's a barefaced lie.
Ups and downs?
Ups and downs?
Mr Speaker, I can, with your permission, quote from a copy of the same bulletin handed to me by Dr Warren.
(All) Ooh!
Some of these ups and downs...
His Majesty's obscenities!
His blasphemies!
His interminable ramblings!
Suffice to say this optimistic bulletin concludes thus... that while His Majesty has had lucid intervals, he remains periodically demented... and incapable of rational thought!
I put to the House that we have been deceived too long over His Majesty's continuing illness!
(All) Yes! Hear, hear! Yes!
When will we see the bill appointing the prince regent?
In due course.
(Chanting) When? When? When?
It is still being drafted.
When? When? When? When?
(Chanting) When? When? When?
(Speaker) Order!
(Chanting) When? When? When?
Soon!
(Speaker) Order! Order!
(Speaker) On Mr Fox's motion to present the bill, the House will divide, ayes to the right, nos to the left.
They won, by three votes.
Then we've lost.
Bring in the bill. 
The prince must be made regent.
Well?
I'm praying, God damn it.
I'm almost ready to give you my support.
Now? We don't need you now.
I think you do.
Your boy's married.
She's just his mistress.
I haven't told Mr Pitt...
Yet.
What is it you want?
The good of the country.
To remain as Lord Chancellor.
Well, I'm sure that can be arranged, when, and if, we ever manage to get our hands on government.
The bill is ready, sir.
I'm a snail, Lord Chancellor, creeping towards the throne.
Even Maria is becoming impatient.
Only for His Majesty's recovery, sir.
Now the Lord Chancellor has come out in favour of Your Highness, the end is surely in sight.
I have always been in his favour.
Of course.
Although the present situation calls for a certain delicacy.
This is your father, sir. 
Be kind.
Rely on your oars, sir. 
The tide is with you.
The tide?
Rely on my oars?
George!
Your Royal Highness has but to wait.
Wait?
Ha. Wait.
Lord Chancellor, my life has been waiting.
I endeavour to cultivate languor, but it is difficult to be languid when the throne of England is pending.
People laugh at me.
What must I do to be taken seriously?
I tell you, sir, to be Prince of Wales is not a position...
It is a predicament.
She has more sense than he has.
It takes character to withstand the rigours of indolence.
Maria is not mentioned.
No, sir. It is a little early for that.
It will happen, Maria. 
I promise you.
Won't it, Thurlow?
Sir.
No.
No, this must not be.
The son in charge of the father?
He will be put away.
This is his death warrant.
Elizabeth...
I must see him, Elizabeth.
No, I...l cannot do it, ma'am.
Besides, if Her Majesty sees him, he-he-he-he still utters such improprieties.
About what?
About, uh...
About you.
Tell me.
I cannot say.
What is it His Majesty dreams of doing, Mr Greville, hmm?
Is it this?
Please, madam.
This?
Ooh!
Or this?
Yay hey hey!
Yay!
Whoa! Ooh!
Come on, lads. 
Race you to the door. Come on.
Come on!
I won!
Oh, Baker.
Baker, before you leave,
I have a secret mission for you.
I want you to hand over 
Gibraltar to Spain.
Get Minorca in return.
Can you do that?
I'm a physician, sir.
Well, then you should have no difficulty. Good afternoon.
Your Majesty.
Have you nothing to say to me, sir?
Say, madam?
What is there to say?
We were married for 28 years, never separated, even for a day.
You abandoned me to my tormentors.
They said it was for your own good.
My good? 
What do they know of my good?
George, they may not permit me to see you again.
A bill has been prepared to make the son regent.
Regent? Hmm.
Do you understand?
He is to rule in your place.
Regent?
The fat one?
Hmm.
His Majesty was not told, madam.
He must know.
George, you must know.
Come away.
Do you understand? The son.
The son?
The father pushed aside, put out, put away, ruled out.
The father not dead even.
By whose authority?
"The Prince of Wales should have full power and authority."
"All authorities, prerogatives, aides..."
Why was I not told of this?
The bill doesn't matter, sir.
Your Majesty...
This bill is to be presented today.
Sir, the Prince of Wales has a majori...
Greville, Dr Willis is right.
Take it away.
He's on the mend?
I say, that's good news.
Does anyone else know?
No.
It may be only temporary.
Well, I see no reason to disseminate the information.
We can decide just how ill His Majesty is when the bill is passed...
Eh, Warren?
Nearly there, Charles.
Where's Thurlow?
"These weeks are memories of those worser hours."
"I pray thee put them off." 
Go on, go on.
"I pray thee put them off."
"How does the king..."
- Lord Thurlow, sir. 
- The very man.
Yes, we're reading Shakespeare. 
Willis, give him the book.
Oh, King Lear.
Is that wise?
I had no idea what it was about, sir.
Now, I'm asleep, apparently, and Cordelia comes in and asks the doctor - Greville - how I am. Off we go.
Uh, who's Cordelia?
(King) You are.
Yes, but Willis can't do it.
He's a fine doctor but a hopeless actor.
Off you 90-
Ahem.
"Oh, you kind gods,
"cure this great breach in his abused nature.
"The untuned and jarring senses, oh, wind up,
"of this child-changed father."
That's very good.
Yes, the child-changed father's very good.
Yes, go on, Greville, it's you now.
"He hath slept long.
"Be by, good madam,
"when we do awaken him.
"I doubt not of his temperance."
"Oh, my dear father.
"Restoration, hang thy medicine on my lips
"and let this kiss
"repair those violent harms
"which my two sisters have in thy reverence made."
Well, come on, man, kiss me.
Not there, man. Here, here. 
It's Shakespeare.
Right. 
No, no. Push off again.
This is the moment when the king awakes, you see.
You ready?
That's it. Come on.
"How fares my royal lord?
"How does Your Majesty?"
"You do me wrong to take me out of the grave.
"Thou art a soul in bliss,
"but I am bound upon a wheel of fire,
"that mine own tears do scald like molten lead."
It's so true.
"Pray do not mock me.
I am a very foolish, fond old man."
"And to deal plainly..."
"I fear I'm not in my perfect mind."
Is that the end, Your Majesty?
Oh, good Lord, no.
Cordelia - that's Thurlow - dies, hanged, and the shock of it kills the king.
So they all die.
It's a tragedy.
Very affecting.
Well, it's the way I play it.
Your Majesty seems more yourself.
Do I?
Yes, I do.
Yeah, I've always been myself, even when I was ill.
Only now I seem myself.
And that's the important thing.
I have remembered how to seem.
What, what?
What did Your Majesty say?
What? I didn't say anything.
Besides, Greville, you shouldn't ask the king questions.
You should know that.
What, what?
Get him ready.
Look at his piss. 
We're back to lemonade.
It's still a bit inky.
That's yesterday's. 
This is today's.
Here, piss the elder, piss the younger.
(Coachman) Go on! Hyah! Hyah!
(Speaker) The matter before this house is a bill to provide for the care of His Majesty's person, and for the administration of the royal authority during the continuance of His Majesty's illness.
(All) Hear, hear!
(Man) Mr Speaker, we on this side of the House count ourselves fortunate that we have in the person of the Prince of Wales a young man of such character and aptitude.
What now?
And so, Mr Speaker, 
I would like to set out some measures of long overdue reform, and, yes, 
I may be bold to say it, necessary expenditure...
I've just been with His Majesty for two hours of uninterrupted conversation with him.
- He means he's talking again. 
- No, damn it!
Well, yes, but not 15 to the dozen, and not nonsense, either.
He's actually a damn clever fellow.
Had me reading Shakespeare.
Have you read King Lear? 
Tragic story.
Of course!
If that fool of a messenger had got a move on,
Cordelia wouldn't have been hanged,
Lear wouldn't have died, and it would have ended happily.
As it is, it's so damned tragic.
The point is, the king is better.
Better than he was?
No, better. The "What, what?" is back. Come.
No one, Mr Speaker, entertains a higher regard for His Majesty than I do.
But we cannot close our eyes to the fact that His Majesty has been overtaken by a terrible and I fear long-lasting illness that seems immune to all forms of medical treatment.
I...
We're...
We're very touched... by the concern... shown by our most loyal subjects...
And very - very happy to be amongst you all again.
Be assured that now that our strength has returned, we will once more... take up the reigns of government.
(Man) Long live the king!
How was that? 
Not bad, what, what?
# God save the king
# Long live the king
# God save the king
# May he live forever #
Papa! Papa! Hooray!
Pa, you're back! You're back!
Oh! Oh!
Come with me. Come with me. 
Mama is in the garden.
(Queen) Two hours late!
He does this on purpose.
He knows it is his lateness that always drives you mad.
Fear not. I shall strike a note of reconciliation.
Love, that's the keynote.
Their Royal Highnesses, 
Your Majesty.
Fred.
Pa.
George.
Oh, do, please...
How is Your Majesty?
Fat lot you care!
Love, George.
You smile, sir.
I'm happy to see my father his old self, in such good spirits, sir.
Good or bad, 
I am in control of them, sir.
When a man can control himself his spirits are immaterial.
When a man cannot control himself, he would do well to be sober!
- He would do well- 
- Ahem!
Marry, sir.
I am married, sir.
Somebody big. Somebody German.
Children, what, what?
I am married, sir...
Not without my say-so!
And I do not say so. 
I will not say so.
You are not married, sir.
Ahem.
If you have a cough, sir, take it outside!
(King) Put her away, sir.
Your debts will be paid, and you will have an income that is appropriate.
(King) Is it any wonder a man goes mad?
Doctors! 30 guineas a visit and travelling expenses, for six months of torture.
They would have a man pay for his own execution, what, what?
How much is he getting?
An annuity.
1,000 a year, sir.
Well, he's done me some service.
I think it is time has done you the service, sir.
Yes? Mmm, but what of the colonies, Mr Pitt?
America is now a nation, sir.
Well.
We must get used to it.
I have known stranger things.
I once saw a sheep with five legs.
(Man) Sacked?
Jesus!
- And me? 
- Forget what you've seen, majesty in its small clothes.
Wipe it from your memory.
He was ill. We knew that.
Yes, and now he's well.
Here.
Me, too.
I'm no longer in service.
You were kind to His Majesty during his illness, Greville.
I did what I could, 
Captain Fitzroy.
Colonel Fitzroy.
Did you not know that?
It seems unfair, I agree, but a word of advice.
To be kind does not commend you to kings.
They see it as they see any flow of feeling, as a liberty.
A blind eye will serve you better, and you will travel further.
Elizabeth.
His Majesty has yet to retire, Mr Greville.
I'm to leave tomorrow.
Yes.
You knew?
It's a pity. You seem such a promising young man.
Could I, um...
Mr Greville, please.
But...when...
It was what was required, 
Mr Greville. That was all.
(Outside) Sharp, sharp! 
The king! The king!
Thank you, Thompson.
Madam...
When I was ill, they tell me that
I said certain things.
I have no memory of them, sir.
Uh, it's not so much what was said as what was done.
So...
Did we? Did we, uh...
Your Majesty?
Um, did we... did-did, uh, did we ever forget ourselves utterly, because, if we did I should so like to remember, what, what?
No, sir. Your behaviour throughout was impeccable.
Hey, hey!
Like the kindest father, as well as the most generous of sovereigns.
Good, good.
Mrs King.
Mr King.
You're a good little pudding, what, what?
It was said, when you were ill, that... if you had led a normal life, this might not have happened.
A normal life?
Other women, sir.
Kicked over the traces, you mean.
No life is without its regrets.
Yet none is without its consolations.
You're a good little woman, Mrs King.
And we have been happy, have we not?
- Oh, yes, Mr King. 
- And shall be again.
Your Majesty, I shall be in the cathedral, should the ceremony prove to be too much of a burden.
You may tell Dr Willis that the ceremony will not be such a burden as the want of ceremony has been.
Presume not I am as I was.
I'm not the patient. 
Be off with you.
Back to your sheep and pigs.
The king is himself again.
We must try to be more of a family.
There are model farms now, model villages, even model factories.
Well, we must be a model family, for the nation to look to.
Yes, you must try to be more typical, Fred.
But, Pa, I want something to do.
Do? 
Well, follow in my footsteps.
That's what you should do.
Smile at the people, wave to them.
Let them see that we're happy.
That is why we're here.
Chingachgook.
How are you?
The Master of Life is good, John.
Another year passed.
How is it with you?
Getting along.
Yes, I am.
Nathaniel.
Hello, John.
Cleared another quarter, I see.
Yes, I did.
Alexandra.
Welcome.
Jack, how are you?
Hallo, Nathaniel.
How've you been?
Good. Thank you.
Where you boys been trapping?
West of the Cuyahoga.
Why is Uncas with you?
He should have settled with a woman, started a family by now.
Hey. Hey.
Hey, Uncas, look.
Mohawk field we saw was five mile long on the river.
Chief Joseph
Brandt's field.
You take much fur?
That we did.
Lots.
The Horicon's near trapped-out now.
Where are you trading your skins?
Castleton?
No.
Schuylerville.
Schuylerville, with the Dutch, for silver.
French and English want to pay with wampum and brandy.
So what is it, Jack?
What brings you here?
French and Indian army are heading south out of Fort Carillon...
...to war against the British.
I'm helping to raise New York's militia to fill the Crown's levy.
And the people here are gonna join in that fight?
We'll see in the morning.
Where're you boys heading?
We'll trap over the fall.
Winter in Can-tuck-ee.
Find a Delaware-speaking woman for Uncas.
She will say, 'You are the one. '
Bear him many children.
Then you can have a boy like me.
Never.
You are too strong.
Turn me old too fast.
That's what he's doing to his mama.
John Cameron, thank you for your hospitality.
Mohawk traded furs with les franais.
We got no quarrel with les franais.
Now les franais bring Huron,
Ottawa, Abenaki onto Mohawk land.
Now Mohawk will fight les franais and Huron.
I speak for the Twin Rivers
Mohawk of the Six Nations.
His Majesty, King George II, is very grateful for your support.
How far up the valley?
Up to Fort William Henry.
That's two nights and a bit from here.
Should be enough to remind you all that France is our enemy.
France is your enemy.
What did you say?
While we're at your fort, what if the French attack our homes?
What then, Lieutenant?
For your homes, for King, for country.
That's why you men ought to join this fight.
You do what you want with your own scalp.
Do not be telling us what we ought to do with ours.
You call yourself a patriot?
A loyal subject to the Crown?
I do not call myself subject to much at all.
I agree with some of what
Nathaniel and John say, but I believe England's still our sovereign.
I'll go.
We will go to fight the French.
My brother and I will volunteer up.
I'll fight with you, Jack.
I'm staying on my farm.
Any man who goes, his family's welcome...
...to fort up with us till he comes back.
Boys, my sense of it is...
...we have enough here to fill the county levy, and it's a fight we ought to make.
But first we got to get terms from General Webb.
Where are you meeting him?
We'll go to Albany.
Attention.
We speak for the men, not command them.
If they're not allowed leave to defend their farms and families...
...if the French attack the settlements, than no colonial militia is going to Fort William Henry.
They will report or be pressed into service.
Any of the boys worth having...
...can disappear into the forest.
They will be found.
And where does that leave you then?
Those men will be found, arrested...
I cannot imagine His Majesty, in his benevolence, would ever object to his loyal American subjects...
...defending their hearth and home, their women and children.
Does that mean they will be granted leave...
...to defend their homes if the settlements are attacked?
Of course.
You got yourself a colonial militia, General.
It is what we wanted.
Major Duncan Hayward reporting, sir, en route to Fort William Henry and bearing dispatches.
Safe journey, I trust?
Yes, and I didn't experience anything...
...so surprising from
Bristol to Albany...
...as that that I witnessed here today.
And what was that?
The Crown negotiating the terms of service.
I know.
One has to reason with these colonials to get them to do anything.
Tiring, isn't it?
But that's the lay of the land.
I thought British policy is
'Make the world England,' sir.
I see you're to serve with the 35th Regiment of Foot...
...at Fort William Henry under Colonel Munro.
I'll be marching the 60th to Fort Edward.
Explain to the Major, he has little to fear...
...from this General Marquis de Montcalm in the first place, and therefore scent need of a colonial militia in the second, because the French haven't the nature for war.
Their Latinate voluptuousness...
...combines with their Gallic laziness.
And the result is, they'd rather eat and make love with their faces than fight.
Might I inquire if
General Webb has heard...
...from Colonel Munro's daughters?
I was to rendezvous with them in Albany and escort them to the fort, sir.
You there, what does Munro call you?
The Scotsman has sent you one of his Mohawk allies to guide you.
Magua.
The Scotsman's daughters are at the Poltroon's house.
A company of the 60th will accompany you, and Magua will show you the way.
Dawn. At the encampment, 6:00 a. m. sharp. See to it you're there.
I'll take him for you, sir.
Cora.
Duncan.
How long have you been in Albany?
For days and days.
And yourself?
Just arrived.
By God, it's good to see you.
I don't know what to say, Duncan.
I truly wish they did, but my feelings don't...
Don't go beyond friendship.
Don't you see?
Respect and friendship.
Isn't that a reasonable basis for a man and a woman to be married
And all else may grow in time?
Some say that's the way of it.
Some?
Cousin Eugenia, my father...
Well, then, Cora.
In my heart I know, once we're joined, we'll be the most marvelous couple in London.
I'm certain of that.
So why not let those whom you trust, your father, help settle what's best for you?
In view of your indecision, you should rely on their judgment.
And mine.
Will you consider that?
Please consider that.
Yes.
Yes, I will.
Duncan.
By God, you've grown up.
We leave in the morning?
Yes, miss.
I shan't sleep tonight.
What an adventure.
Have you seen the red men?
A few.
I absolutely cannot wait to return to Portman Square, having been to the wilderness.
It's so exciting,
Duncan.
Alice?
Can we rest soon?
Absolutely.
You, there.
Scout, we must stop soon.
Women are tired.
Not here. Two leagues.
Better water. We stop there.
No, stop in the glade just ahead.
When the ladies are rested, we will proceed. Do you understand?
Excuse me.
What did you say?
Magua said, understand English very well.
Hold tight.
Come on.
Right. To the right.
Prepare your firearms.
As three ranks.
Make ready.
Make ready.
First and second rank, present.
Fire.
No, Duncan.
In case your aim's any better than your judgment.
Your wounded should try walking on back to Albany.
They'll never make a passage north.
Stop it. Stop it.
We need them to get out.
Why's he loosing the horses?
Why don't you ask him?
Too easy to track.
They'll be heard for miles.
We were headed to
Fort William Henry.
We'll take you as far as the fort.
We're walking out of here fast.
Unless all of you'd rather wait for the next Huron war party to come by.
Scout, I'd like to thank you for your help.
How much further is it?
Night and a bit.
Appears we're well away from them.
Maybe.
Maybe they ain't alone.
That Huron captain back there...
The guide?
He's a Mohawk.
No Mohawk.
He's Huron.
What reason did he have to murder the girl?
What?
The dark-haired one.
Miss Cora Munro?
Murder her?
He never set eyes on her before today.
She's only been here a week.
Blood vengeance?
A reproach or insult?
Of course not.
How is it you were so nearby?
Came across the war party.
Tracked them.
Then you're assigned to Fort William Henry?
No.
Fort Edward then?
Heading west to Can-tuck-ee.
There is a war on.
How is it you are heading west?
Well, we kind of face to the north, and real sudden-like, turn left.
I thought all our colonial scouts were in the militia.
The militia is fighting the French in the north.
I ain't your scout.
And we sure ain't in no damn militia.
Ottawa, two franais.
What did you say?
Mirrors, tools, the clothes.
Everything was inside.
They didn't take anything.
And moving fast.
And a war party.
Let us look after them.
Leave them.
Whoever they are, though they're strangers, they're at least entitled to a Christian burial.
They can't be left behind.
Let us go, miss.
I will not. I've seen the face of war before, sir, but I've not seen war made upon women and children.
And almost as cruel is your indifference.
Miss Munro, they're not strangers.
And they stay as they lay.
Why didn't you bury those people?
Anyone looking for our trail would see it as a sign we passed that way.
You knew them well?
You were acting for our benefit, and I apologize.
I misunderstood you.
Well, that's to be expected.
My father warned me about...
Your father?
Chingachgook.
He warned me about people like you.
Oh, he did?
He said, 'Do not try to understand them. '
Yes. And, 'Do not try to make them understand you.
'That is because they are a breed apart and make no sense. '
Why did they turn back?
Burial ground.
'Breed apart.
We make no sense?'
In your particular case, miss, I'd make allowance.
Thank you so much.
Where is your real family?
They buried my ma and pa and my sisters.
Chingachgook found me with two French trappers, raised me up as his own.
I'm sorry.
I do not remember.
I wasn't but one or two.
How did you learn English?
My father sent Uncas and I to Reverend
Wheelock's school when I was 10.
Why were those people living in this defenseless place?
After seven years indentured service...
...in Virginia, they headed out here...
'cause the frontier's the only land available to poor people.
Out here, they're beholden to none.
Not living by another's leave.
The name was Cameron.
John and Alexandra Cameron.
My father's people say that at the birth of the sun, and of his brother, the moon, their mother died.
So the sun gave to the earth her body, from which was to spring all life.
And he drew forth from her breast the stars.
The stars, he threw into the night sky to remind him of her soul.
So there's the Camerons' monument.
My folks' too,
I guess.
You are right, Mr. Poe.
We do not understand what is happening here.
And it's not as I imagined it would be, thinking of it in Boston and London.
Sorry to disappoint you.
No, on the contrary.
It is more deeply stirring to my blood...
...than any imagining could possibly have been.
Top of the next ridge.
The fort's downhill of it.
The men of the regiment will fetch water from the lake, build fires, and provide every comfort and desire.
I cannot wait to see Papa.
Fire.
Prepare. Point. Fire.
Open up.
I'm Major Duncan Hayward.
Captain Jeffrey Beams.
Didn't expect you to make it through.
Let's go to Munro.
Hello, boys.
Nathaniel.
I need to talk to you, Jack.
Uncas Thought you and Nathaniel weren't joining up.
We didn't.
Papa. Papa.
Alice. Cora.
Why are you here?
And where the hell are my reinforcements?
Get Mr. Phelps.
Told you to stay away.
Why did you disobey me, girls?
When? How? I...
My letter.
There was none.
What?
There was no letter.
I sent three couriers to Webb.
One called Magua arrived.
He delivered no such message.
Does Webb not even know we are besieged?
Sir, Webb has no idea.
And he certainly does not know to send reinforcements.
What happened to you?
On the George Road.
Attacked.
We're fine.
Are you all right?
Yes.
What will happen here, Papa?
We'll be all right, girl.
This Magua led us into it.
Eighteen killed.
These men came to our aid.
They guided us here.
Thank you.
Do you need anything?
Help ourselves to a few horns from your powder stores.
Some food.
Indebted to you.
Miss Cora, how are you?
Hello, Mr. Phelps.
Mrs. McCann will get some dry clothes for you.
Thank you.
Go with your sister, Alice.
It'll be all right, girl.
It'll be all right.
Might I inquire after the situation, sir, given that I've seen the French engineering from the ridge above?
The situation is, his guns are bigger than mine and he has more of them.
We keep our heads down while his troops dig 30 yards of trench a day.
When those trenches are 200 yards from the fort and within range, he'll bring in his 15-inch mortars, lob explosive rounds over our walls and pound us to dust.
They look to be 300 yards out.
If they're digging 30 yards a day, you have three days.
Damn. Damn.
This man here can make a run straight through to Webb.
Three days is not enough time to get to
Albany and back with reinforcements.
Webb's not in Albany. He marched the
60th to Fort Edward two days ago.
Webb is at Edward?
Yes, sir.
That's only 12 miles away.
He could have reinforcements here the day after tomorrow.
You, sir, pick your man.
Major Hayward will provide a diversion.
I'll draft out a dispatch.
Captain Beams will seek you out and give it to you later.
Something else. Cameron's cabin.
Frontier cabin.
Came upon it yesterday.
It was burnt out, everyone murdered.
It was Ottawa, allied to the French.
Aye.
So?
It was a war party.
That means they're gonna be attacking up and down the frontier.
Thank you, sir.
People here, Mohawks, settlers, have family out there.
That'll be all, sir.
Things were done.
Nobody was spared.
Those considerations are subordinate to the interests of the Crown.
A terrible feature of war here in the Americas, Major Hayward.
Best keep your eye fixed on our duty, to defeat France.
That hangs on a courier to Webb.
For my children are the children of the true faith.
My friendship and esteem is boundless.
Tomorrow, I will sing the war song with you...
...at the great council fire.
Magua, how are things with your English friends?
We're at one.
Join us.
Hear what Le Subtil has to tell us.
The English war chief, Webb, goes to Fort Edward with 60th Regiment.
He does not know that my father's army attacks Fort William Henry.
Magua was successful?
The other two couriers died in the forest.
By now, Munro would know his dispatch did not get through.
He'll send another.
Grey Hair will try.
Four or five, including two women, entered the fort.
The Grey Hair's children were under Magua's knife.
They escaped.
They will be under it again.
Why do you hate the Grey Hair, Magua?
When the Grey Hair is dead,
Magua will eat his heart.
Before he dies,
Magua will put his children under the knife, so the Grey Hair will know his seed is wiped out forever.
My engineers are advancing the trench through the night.
You may have your opportunity soon.
Miss Cora.
Gentleman looking for you.
Miss Munro.
Hello.
May I?
It will seep, and then it's going to draw.
Thank you, miss.
About done holding hands with Miss Munro?
We got some work to do.
What are you looking at, sir?
I'm looking at you, miss.
Munro refused to believe what happened.
He does not even want to hear it.
Well, he's gonna have to.
Get together by the west bastion.
Ian, Sharitarish, Ongewasgone and William.
Tight weave?
Silk.
Another 40 yards.
And how am I to know it wasn't a raid by common thieves?
The cabin was attacked by a war party fighting with the French.
They're sweeping south down the frontier...
...attacking farms and Mohawk villages.
All the men are stuck here.
I need proof more convincing than this man's opinion, before I weaken the fort's defenses by releasing the militia.
Chingachgook's of the same opinion about the raid.
Taken together, that's gospel.
Your fort will stand or fall depending on Webb's reinforcements, not the presence of the colonials.
I judge military matters here, not you.
Your judgment is not more important than their right, under agreement with Webb to defend their farms and families.
Major Heyward was there.
He was at John Cameron's. Ha saw what it was.
What exactly did you see, Major?
I saw nothing that would lead me...
...to the conclusion it was other than a raid...
...by savages bent on thievery.
You're a liar.
Major.
Montcalm is a soldier and a gentleman, not a butcher.
Easy for you to suppose.
It's their women and children alone on the farms, not yours.
You forget yourself, sir.
We're not forgetting Webb's promise.
British promises are honored, and the militia will not be released, because I need more definite proof than this man's word.
Nathaniel's word's been good on this frontier...
...a long time before you got here.
This meeting is over.
The militia stays.
Does the rule of English law no longer govern?
Has it been replaced by absolutism?
If English law cannot be trusted, maybe these people would do better...
...making their own peace with the French.
That is sedition I
That is the truth.
I'll have you beaten from this fort.
Someday I think you and I are gonna have a serious disagreement.
Anyone fomenting on advocating the leaving of Fort William Henry...
...will be hung for sedition.
Anyone actually caught leaving will be shot for desertion.
My decision is final.
Get out.
Cora?
I wanted to talk to you.
Talk with Duncan, Cora.
I must manage.
I cannot be an invalid schoolgirl.
Alice.
I'll see if Mr. Phelps needs anything.
I'm sorry.
I didn't mean to...
Cora, when we come together back in England...
...and are married and away from this place, what had to be done and said here will matter not at all.
I'm certain of that.
Duncan, I promised you an answer.
You've complimented me with your persistence and patience.
But the decision I have come to...
...is that I'd rather make the gravest of mistakes...
...than to surrender my own judgment.
Please take this as my final answer.
It must be no.
I see.
Yeah, Nathaniel, but you weren't ever for being here.
That's right.
I saw it that way than and
I see it that way now.
Ian, if I had kin in the settlements, hell be damn sure I'd belong gone.
What do we do about being under Crown law?
I believe if they set aside their law as and when they wish, their law no longer has rightful authority over us.
All they have over us then is tyranny.
And I will not live under that yoke.
So I will stay here no longer.
Anyone caught leaving the fort could be shot, so each man make your own decision.
Those who are going, be back in an hour.
Out the northern sally port.
Strike for the east side of the swamp...
...till you clear the French picket line.
Head north over the ridge, than come about southeast.
Fork left in Little Meadow and you're free of the outpost and skirmishes.
Should've gotten out of this long ago.
Got no families, Captain.
Figured we'd stay and give a hand.
I'll cover you from the top of the bastion.
You're not coming with us?
I got a reason to stay.
That reason wear a striped skirt and work in the surgery?
It does.
No offense, but it's a better-looking reason than you, Jack Winthrop.
Push hard, 'cause you got to clear the French outpost by dawn.
Good luck, Jack.
Ongewasgone, are you staying?
Yes.
There's too many French.
And so few of us to fight.
Not too many to die. But we've given our word to our English fathers.
You, sir.
As you were.
Stand off.
Take him.
As you were.
He saved us.
We're alive only because of him.
The man encouraged the colonials to desert, in this very room, and in my presence.
Sir.
He is guilty of sedition.
He must be tried and hanged like any other criminal, regardless of what he did for my children.
But he knew the consequences and he stayed.
Are those the actions of a criminal?
Duncan, do something.
He knew the penalty for his actions.
He ought to pay without sending you to beg.
You know he wouldn't send me.
You falsely spoke of what you saw.
What happened at the farm was as Nathaniel said.
But not with enough certainty to outweigh British interests in this fort.
And who empowered these colonials to pass judgment...
...on England's policies in her own possessions, and to come and go without so much as a 'By your leave'?
They do not live their lives by your leave.
They hack it out of the wilderness with their own two hands, bearing their children along the way.
You are defending him because you've become infatuated with him.
Duncan, you are a man with a few admirable qualities.
But taken as a whole, I was wrong to have thought so highly of you.
Cora.
Cora, I would do anything I could to keep you from being hurt.
But this man is guilty of sedition...
...and subject to military justice and beyond pardon.
Justice?
If that's justice, then the sooner French guns blow the English army out of America, the better it will be for the people here.
You do not know what you're saying.
Yes, I do.
I know exactly what I'm saying.
And if it is sedition, then I am guilty of sedition too.
They're going to hang you.
Why didn't you leave when you had the chance?
Because what I'm interested in is right here.
What can I do?
Webb's reinforcements will arrive or not.
If they do not arrive, the fort will fall to the French.
If that happens, stay close to your father.
Stay close to him.
The French officers will try to protect the officers among the English.
No. I will find you.
Do not.
Promise me.
The whole world's on fire.
What is it?
Remember what I told you.
Stay close to your father and the officers.
Colonel Munro, I have known you as a gallant antagonist.
I am happy to make your acquaintance as a friend.
And I yours, monsieur Le Marquis.
Please accept my compliments...
...for the strong and skillful defense of your fortress.
Under the command of a lesser man, it would have fallen long ago, given the superior numbers and materials.
Chance has allowed me to array against you.
Monsieur Le Marquis, I am a soldier, not a diplomat.
You called this parley for a better reason...
...than an exchange of compliments.
You have already done everything which is necessary for the honor of your prince.
But now I beg you to listen to the admonishments of humanity.
I beg you to consider my terms for your surrender.
Perhaps the general's glass can reach as far as the Hudson...
...and seize the size and eminence of the army of Webb?
My scouts intercepted this dispatch intended for you.
Capitaine de Bougainville.
'To Colonel Munro.
Sir, I regret to inform you...
'that I have no men available to send to your rescue.
'It is quite impossible.
'I advise you to seek terms for surrender.
'I remain.
Jerome Webb at Fort Edward. '
This is the signature of Webb.
And I know the temper of our men.
Rather than spend the war in a
French prison hulk in Hudson Bay, they'd fight to the end.
You've had your answer, monsieur Le Marquis.
Sir, I beg you not to sign the death warrant of so many...
...until you have listened to what I have to say.
Go on.
None of your men will see the inside of a prison barge.
They are free, so long as they return to England...
...and fight no more on this continent, and the civilian militia return to their farms.
Their arms?
They may leave the fortress fully armed.
My colors?
Carry them to England with pride.
Allow me to consult with my officers.
I have lived to see something which I never expected.
A British officer afraid to support another.
Webb can bum in hell.
And we'll go back and dig our graves behind those ramparts.
Death and honor are thought to be the same, but today I have learned that sometimes they are not.
Sir...
Monsieur Le Marquis,
I am deeply touched...
...by such unusual and unexpected generosity.
My fort is yours under the condition...
...that I be given till dawn to bury my dead, to prepare my men and women for the long journey ahead...
...and to hand my wounded over to your surgeons.
Granted, monsieur.
Is the hatchet buried between the
English and my French father?
Yes.
Not a warrior has a scalp and the white men become friends.
My master owns these lands, and I have been ordered to drive off the English squatters.
They have consented to go, so now I call them enemies no longer.
Magua took the hatchet to color with blood.
It's still bright.
Only when it's red, then it will be buried.
So many suns have set since
Magua struck the war post.
And where is that sun?
Magua is the son of his people...
...and he has come to lead many of them.
But Magua has power with his
Huron people and others here,
I know well.
Magua's village and lodges were burnt.
Magua's children were killed by the English.
I was taken as slave by the Mohawk who fought for the Grey Hair.
Magua's wife believed he was dead...
...and became the wife of another.
The Grey Hair was the father of all that.
In time,
Magua became blood brother to the Mohawk to become free.
But always in his heart, he is Huron.
And his heart will be whole again on the day...
...the Grey Hair and all his seed are dead.
Does the chief of the Canadas believe the English will keep the terms?
I fear having let them go, which I must,
I will only fight the same men again when I drive towards Albany.
But I cannot break the term of the surrender...
...and sully the lilies of France.
Monsieur, the fort is yours.
Left three ranks, make ready.
Aim, set.
Fire.
Present, fire.
Fire.
Fire.
Full company.
Grey Hair, before you die, know that I will put under the knife your children, so I will wipe your seed from the Earth forever.
Leave her alone.
When you fall into British hands again, I'll have you hanged.
Faster.
Head to the river.
Where are we going?
- - Nowhere.
I don't understand.
This is as far as we go
If we're lucky, they'll figure we beached...
...our canoes and headed cross land.
If we're very lucky, they'll figure we went over the falls.
Our only hope is that they pass us by.
If they do?
Take the south rim down the mountain.
It's 12 miles cross country to Fort Edward.
And if they don't?
You'll just have to forego the pleasure of hanging me.
Powder?
Gone.
Mine's soaking wet.
Our father...
Did you see my father?
From a distance.
Say nothing to Alice.
Get back.
Yes. Go ahead.
What the bloody hell plan is this?
I want you to go.
If we go, there's a chance there won't be a fight.
There's no powder.
If we don't go in that, there's no chance.
None. You understand?
Coward.
You've done everything you can do.
Save yourself.
If the worst happens...
You stay alive.
If they don't kill you, they'll take you north up to the Huron lands.
Submit, do you hear?
You're strong. You survive.
You stay alive, no matter what occurs.
I will find you, no matter how long it takes, no matter how far.
I will find you.
I don't speak Huron.
Do you speak French, Major?
Yes.
Translate for me into French every word as I say it.
I come to you unarmed and in peace to unstuff your ears, Sachem.
Let the children of the dead Colonel Munro go free.
Take fire out of the English anger...
...over the murder of their helpless ones.
Sachem, the French fathers made peace.
Magua broke it.
It is false that the French will befriends still to the Huron.
Would Magua use the ways of les franais and the Yengeese?
Would you?
Yes.
Would the Huron make his Algonquin brothers foolish with brandy...
...and steal his lands to sell them for gold to the white man?
Would Huron have greed for more land than a man can use?
Would Huron fool Seneca into taking...
...all the furs of all the animals of the forest...
...for beads and strong whiskey?
Those are the ways of the
Yengeese and the franais traders...
...and their masters in Europe infected with the sickness of greed.
Magua's heart is twisted.
He would make himself into what twisted him.
I am Nathaniel of the Yengeese.
Hawkeye, adopted son of Chingachgook of the Mohican people.
Let the children of the dead Munro...
...and the Yengeese officer go free.
This belt, which is a record of the days...
...of my father's people, speaks for my truth.
Tell him I'll trade him.
Me for her. Say it.
Stop it.
I am La Longue Carabine.
My death is a great honor to the Huron. Take me.
Did you tell him?
Yes.
Stop.
I said to take me.
Take me.
My compliments, sir.
Take her and get out.
Duncan... What are they doing to Duncan?
Where's Alice?
Alice.
Uncas.
Great Spirit and maker of all life, a warrior goes to you swift and straight...
...as an arrow shot into the sun.
Welcome him, and let him take his place...
...at the council fire of my people.
He is Uncas, my son
Tell him to be patient and ask death for speed, for they are all there but one,
I, Chingachgook, the last of the Mohicans.
Everybody wants to get on the Van Gogh boat.
There's no trip so horrible that someone won't take it.
The idea of the unrecognized genius...
slaving away in a garret is a deliciously foolish one.
We must credit the life of Vincent van Gogh...
for really sending this myth into orbit.
l mean, how many pictures did he sell? One?
He couldn't give them away.
He has to be the most modern artist, but everybody hated him.
We're so ashamed of his life that the rest of art history...
will be retribution for Van Gogh's neglect.
No one wants to be part of a generation that ignores another Van Gogh.
ln this town, one is at the mercy of the recognition factor.
One's public appearance is absolute.
Part of the artist's job is to get the work where l will see it.
l consider myself a metaphor of the public.
l am a public eye, a witness, a critic.
When you first see a new picture...
you don't want to miss the boat.
You have to be very careful.
You might be staring at Van Gogh's ear. lt's Willie Mays.
What do ya hear? What do ya say?
Nurse!
Oysters Rockefeller and a lovely Pouilly Fuisee, pour plasir.
We don't serve that here.
Fine, Gina.
A cheeseburger and a coffee.
That's Rene.
He writes for Art Forum.
He's a fucking rainbow.
You guys know what you want?
- Pancakes.
- Pancakes?
You want anything? l'll have some coffee.
Coffee.
Want some coffee?
No? Okay.
You can't have that in here.
- What?
- You can't have that in here.
Who? Her?
Hide it.
Now, that's entertainment.
Pancake table drawing.
You know, l'm a little busy right now, Benny.
Good night.
- What do you think?
- What?
- What do you think?
- lt's pretty good. lt's me.
All right, making a mess here.
Look at you. Get out!
Okay? Good-bye.
- Where are those pancakes?
- Lech, would you let him order?
Let him order?
You nuts? Out.
- Do l need this?
- Do l? Jesus Christ.
Here. l'm sorry.
- What's your name?
- Gina.
Gina.
Hey, Mom. l'm gonna get married.
You like it here? lt's okay.
Hey, Gina.
Can l walk you home?
Sure. l'm in a band. We're playing at the Mudd Club Thursday. l put you down on the list. l hate the Mudd Club.
You been camping out?
'Cause you look like you could use a scrub.
- l'm clean.
- Yeah?
Yeah. Smell me. l always smell good. l don't know why. l just do. l'll take your word for that.
Just come Thursday.
Nah. Too many party girls.
Party girls? l wouldn't know about this.
Can l call you?
Sure. l made this for you.
Thanks.
Willie Mays.
You know that Frankie thing?
We edited it.
Looks pretty good.
Looks really good. l'm thinking about... putting that drum mode on it... and making it into like a nice video.
You know, like a music video.
Press play on the box right there.
Press play on the box.
What, you don't like it with the music? l like it like this. lt's boring like this. lt's like looking at a painting.
You need the music, man.
You need sound.
The man just hit me, and l was on the ground. l was on the ground.
- Boom, for real!
- What did she say?
- Boom, for real!
- Boom, for real!
Your dad called.
He wants to meet you for lunch or something.
Hello?
- ls this the suicide hot line?
- Yes.
- My name is Joe. What's yours?
- Jean Michel.
Jean Michel.
What's that, French?
Haitian. l'm gonna blow my brains out.
Wait a minute. Talk to me.
- No, l'm gonna take these pills.
- What kind of pills?
Reds, blues, greens, whole fucking rainbow.
Trustees are harassing me.
- Are you in prison?
- No. This city's killing me.
Tell me about it.
You're talking to the right guy.
- How's it killing you?
- Boyfriend left.
l've been there.
Do you love him?
Not especially.
l'm alone. We all are here.
Respect, fools get.
Disrespect, l get.
l have respect for you just for making this call.
This is not an easy call to make.
You won't be so arrogant when the police arrive.
You okay?
What's that noise?
lt's my mother.
- French?
- Haitian. Rainbow.
- Killing me.
- Haitian. Trustees are harassing me.
- Talk to me.
- Reds, blues.
- You okay?
- Not especially.
- Reds, blues, greens. Haitian.
- French?
- Hello?
- Haitian.
- Police arrive.
- Hello? Talk to me.
- What's that noise?
- Trustees are harassing me.
You okay? French?
Rainbow.
Trustees are harassing me.
Police arrive.
Trustees are harassing me. l thought you said you hated this place. l do. l've never been here before. lt's cool.
- Let's get out of here.
- Okay.
Jean, get me a Phillips head, will you?
A which?
Phillips head screwdriver in the toolbox.
Sure.
- Phillips head, right?
- Yeah.
You don't have any.
You got one in your hand.
This is a regular screwdriver.
That's a Phillips head, the cross thing. l'll show you later what all the tools are so you'll know.
- Hi, Rene. Like your suit.
- Trade you for the shoes.
- Can l make a call? Do you mind?
- No, go ahead. lt's to Paris, Bernard.
You know Bernard.
- Okay.
- Okay.
- Will you say hi to him for me?
- l will say hi to him for you.
- Okay.
- Thanks.
But l'm happy with this here.
You'll get there.
You'll get there. lt's good to have something to fall back on.
That's why l became an electrician.
Pays the rent.
You know, l'm an artist too.
- Cool. l didn't know.
- Sure. l sculpt. l'm just really finding myself now.
What are you, 20?
You're just like l was. l'm gonna be 40 in July, and you know, man... l'm glad l never got any recognition. lt's given me time to develop.
- Can we lose some of this shit?
- No, no. You don't do it.
- l can't see this.
- Excuse me, you. What's your name?
Could you come over here and move some of this stuff, please?
My name's Jean Michel Basquiat.
Have you heard of me?
- No. Should l have?
- l'm a painter too.
Really? Too bad.
No, l'm kidding.
Whoever you are, could you please move that stuff someplace else?
We can't see the painting.
That told you.
- Come on, man.
- No, man.
Put out that cigarette, man.
Benny, man, l didn't think we were actually gonna do this.
My goodness, you're shattering all my myths, man.
- About what?
- Play some D.
About you being the first half-Rican to play for the Knicks.
- Play some D. Open your arms.
- l'm open.
Open them up.
Look down. There you go.
Hey, Benny, man, how long you think it takes to get famous?
For a musician or a painter?
Whatever. Famous.
Four years.
Six to get rich.
First you're gonna have to dress right, you know?
Then you're gonna have to hang out with famous people.
You know? Make friends with the right blond people.
Go to the right parties, yeah.
Socialite.
Then you gotta do your work all the time when you're not doing that.
But l'm talking about the same kind of work, the same style... so people can recognize it and don't get confused, you know?
Then once you're famous-- airborne, you know-- you gotta keep doin' it in the same way... even after it's boring-- unless you want people... to really get mad at you, which they will anyway.
- Come on, man, let's go.
- Shoot! Come on. l mean, famous people are usually pretty stupid.
You're too smart.
You don't wanna end up like John Henry, you know, fighting the machine.
- John Henry?
- Absolutely.
John Henry was a steel-driving man that worked the railroad... pounding in the spikes and laying down the track.
Then one day they invented a machine to do his job, right?
And he says...
''Fuck that. l'm a man, right?''
So he challenges the machine to a race to lay down a mile of track, right? lt takes two days.
They go neck and neck the whole time-- l mean, right to the end-- and he beats the machine by one spike.
But he dropped dead, you know, see?
- Boom, but he beat it.
- Boom, but he dropped dead.
- But he beat it.
- You gotta do stuff like you do it. lt's about integrity, you know. l mean, your friends like you.
What else do you want? l mean, everyone walks by, sees your stuff.
- Warhol!
- What?
That's Andy Warhol.
He's a homo.
He's the greatest painter in the world.
No, he paints by numbers.
You don't. What're you doing? l'm giving him one of these, man.
He should have one.
No, don't give him anything, man.
Trade, trade.
Yeah. That's what real artists do with each other.
Besides, he'll just use you, man.
He's famous for it.
- Can l help you?
- You wanna buy some ignorant art?
- Ten bucks apiece.
- No, l think it's okay.
- Of course, Mr. Bischofberger.
- Gee, ignorant art, Bruno.
Yeah, you know, like stupid, ridiculous, crummy art.
- That sounds good. That's new.
- Ten bucks.
Gee, you didn't work very much on these. l can give you, like, five.
Come on, Bruno, you're rich.
Maybe you should talk to Bruno.
You don't even work on your stuff.
No, it's not how much you work on something that matters.
- lt's how much you get for them.
- l can get ten.
These are great, Bruno.
Maybe l'll take two. l'll take--
Let me see these. l'll take this one and-- l don't know.
Bruno, can l borrow some money?
Yeah.
Here. You have change?
You made a good deal.
Here, you can have those too.
Let me look at those, Bruno.
Yeah, but they're mine now, Andy.
Sure, they're yours, Bruno.
Everything good's yours.
Hi. Are those for me?
Bye, Benny.
Which island of Hawaii you want our house to be on?
Maui? Kauai? Oahu? l don't know. l hadn't thought about it.
Maui!
Staten lsland would be fine.
Maybe Oahu.
No, definitely Maui.
Oh, man.
Hey, Gina.
Do you wanna marry me?
What did you do to my dress?
Jean, what have you done to my dress? l painted it for you. lt's beautiful, baby. l was wearing this to see my parents this weekend, Jean!
You can still wear it.
That's great, Jean.
Painting all over my paintings. l couldn't look at them anymore.
They're kind of impersonal.
- Oh, great.
- You're more complex than that.
That's really nice.
How do you like it?
How do you like it if l paint all over your paintings?
- That looks good.
- How do you feel about that?
Do you like me doing that to your paintings?
Do you?
Get off me!
Get off me!
Come here. Listen.
Do you know what he's saying?
Who? Get off me!
He says l'm jealous of the moon, because you look at it.
He's jealous of the sun, because it warms you.
He says l feel you, even when l'm not feeling you. l talk to you when l'm not talking to you. l love you even when l'm not loving you.
You know l love you, Gina.
Willie Mays! Willie Mays!
Hey, come on up, man. l heard you the first seven times. l'm just saying we got some rehearsal space tonight. lt can happen
Friday night, right?
We got some people coming to see us.
Some people always come and see us.
Bye.
Hey, Mike.
Benny, man, be more careful!
Damn!
What?
No, come on. Stop it.
Wait, wait, wait. Okay.
What would you do if l kiss you?
You're out of your mind, Benny.
You should take more drugs.
- Hey, Rockets!
- Hey, man.
- Hey, Rockets, can l have this?
- Yeah.
You got the key?
Yeah, l got it.
Hang on a second.
Did you do this, man?
Yeah, l gave that to Maripol.
She let me stay here for a while.
You do one for me, and it's free.
Rene, look.
Quick, check him out.
He's right there, look.
He's kind of cute, right?
Those silver things on his cowboy boots.
No, honey, l don't think so. l gotta take a pee.
Amazing.
Who did this?
How the fuck should l know?
That's Samo, the dude that was just here. Yo, Benny, where--
Come here, man!
He's right there. Look!
- Here, give me that.
- Right there, right there.
- Keep your eyes on him. Don't lose him!
- Yo, Samo!
Excuse me!
That's your painting up there, back at that loft?
Oh, at the party at Maripol's.
Yeah. You like it?
You know Albert Milo?
Of course. l made that nigga.
Rene Ricard.
You didn't read
Not About Albert Milo?
Listen, l know who to hype. l will make you a star.
You can put me in the ring with Milo? l can put you in the ring with him. l can set the dates.
But the big boys know how to fight.
Make you look real sissy.
God, l saw that painting. lt made me ashamed to own anything.
So, Samo.
You got a real name?
Jean Michel Basquiat.
Well, that sounds famous already.
You want some coffee?
Come on.
Come on.
Hey, who are those fools with the binoculars?
Child, you got no respect at all.
Nobody taught you how to mount paintings?
You know me. lt comes to a mounting, the rougher, the better.
A very important season in New York, Jean.
One's public appearance is absolute.
Geez, Louise!
Come here, doll.
This is Jean Michel Basquiat,
Henry.
- Hi. This is my friend Rob.
- Hi, Rob. Jean Michel.
- So, you're Samo.
- ''Say-mo'', darling.
- l really like your graffiti.
- l was a kid then.
How much for that one?
That one?
For you or the museum? lt's for me.
- Two.
- l'll take it.
Darn right you'll take it.
- Come on, Rob.
- Bye. Nice meeting you.
That's $2,000.
And he's from the
Metropolitan Museum of Art.
So you are ugly star.
Gina, you look beautiful.
Yeah? Really? lt looks good.
Ages! Come here, l want you to meet somebody.
Jean, this is Annina.
Annina, this is Jean Michel Basquiat. l am so happy to meet you. Rene refused to give me your telephone number.
Finders, keepers, doll.
My next show is called ''Public Address'', but you don't fit.
What do you mean, l don't fit? l fit. l can't show you in a gallery because you don't have any paintings.
Hello! Hello!
Well, give me some money, l'll make you some.
Would 300 do?
Yeah, sure, but l don't have a space. l could find a place for you to work.
Hey, do you want a taste?
No, thanks.
You're doing very well.
Very well.
Who is that?
Okay. You are so full of crap, you.
How do you know
Bruno Bischofberger?
- l had lunch with him once.
- Oh, did we?
Kind of a family portrait. lt looks done.
You think so? l think it could use some babies.
Babies with you?
What's wrong with me?
You're your own baby.
- Who is it?
- Annina Nosei.
- Who?
- Annina.
- Hello? Oh, it's you.
- ls Jean Michel here?
- No.
- l'm here to see some work.
There's some right there.
- These are great.
- Aren't they? l like these. l'll take these. l think you should probably talk to him about that.
Do Rene and Jean have a contract together?
- l don't know.
- l think he's ready for a show.
- Really? When?
- Next month.
You know, l think you should probably talk to him about all this.
When?
How about right now?
Well, l'll go get ready. l'll be ready in one minute.
This is it.
United States Savings Bonds and the Mutual Network present:
''Bands For Bonds''.
ln the background we have the choicest collection of modern musicians...
gathered together by Barry Udinov, editor of Metronome magazine.
Dizzy Gillespie, trumpet.
Charlie Parker, alto sax.
John LaPorta, clarinet.
Billy Bauer, guitar.
Lenny Tristano!
Lenny Tristano, piano.
That was Max Roach as the drums.
And Ray Brown on the bass.
These are beautiful. l really love this.
Never tell a painter you like anything.
They'll invariably change it.
Hello?
He's not here right now.
Hang on a second. lt's Benny. He wants to know why you're not at band practice.
Fuck! l forgot about that.
Are you Tony Bennett?
Are you Tony Bennett? You sing on stage?
You paint in your spare time?
- l didn't know Tony Bennett painted.
- That's my point exactly.
Hello. Hello?
Rene, if you're so smart, what are you doing down in this basement with me?
You are the news, and l want the scoop.
Look... when l speak, no one believes me.
When l write it down, people know it's true.
There's never been a black painter in art history... who's been considered really important, you know that?
Are you a writer or a white writer? l may be white, but l'm a nigga.
You ask anybody.
- What time is it?
- lt's 5:11.
That one's for you.
Hey, it's the big a.m.
Rene's been telling me about your work. ls that finished yet? l don't know.
When's your show?
Two weeks.
- How was yours?
- l haven't decided yet.
This is nice. l like that.
Hey, baby. Come on over. l wanna make a painting of you.
- You got any coffee?
- Yeah, l've got... coffee, cream cheese, bagels.
Thanks for lettin' me stop by.
That could use a little bit more pink. lt doesn't need the pink.
See ya.
Albert Milo, what a pleasure it is to meet you.
This is my friend,
Rene Ricard.
- We're Tom and Cynthia Kruger.
- lt's a pleasure. lt's very nice to have met you.
This is Tom and Cynthia Kruger. l heard.
- This is Jean Michel Basquiat.
- Hi.
You've seen the Samo graffiti everywhere. That's his.
This is the true voice of the gutter. l've seen the graffiti, and l've heard wonderful things about your paintings.
Everybody's talking about you.
Your ears must be burning.
Most of these are reserved already.
After Thursday, this work will not be available. lt's a beautiful painting, and it's still free. l don't know. l don't know if l could live with this one. lt's-- l like it, but the green is sort of institutional.
Sweetheart, have you been in an institution lately?
Boom! Jean-Claude Killy!
What's up, man?
You's a nigga to be gettin' paid for this.
- You like it, man?
- Not bad.
Yeah, l do. lt's fascinating, his choice of crossing out words that way.
Yes, well, they are more meaningful in their absence, no?
Yeah, J M, what does it mean? l don't know. l just don't know if l can live with the green.
You want me to make it a nice brown? l beg your pardon?
Nobody makes fun of my wife but me. l don't know. l just can't make up my mind. l really like this one, but it's just-- lt's the green.
Get a decorator.
These paintings aren't even done yet.
We'll take the green one.
- How can l thank you?
- Maybe l can squeeze your titties?
- Want a Mac? Have a Mac.
- No. l want my scarf.
No, l don't want a Mac.
Give me my scarf.
Sweetheart, l dare you to break my heart.
- Oh, man!
- l dare you to break my heart.
Have a Mac.
No. l don't eat junk food.
- Let's go to Lutece.
- What, you're paying?
- You coming?
- No.
- l'm gonna keep the scarf anyway.
- No, you're not. lt's mine.
- What's your name?
- l ain't tellin' you. Too fast.
- No name?
- No.
How about if l call you Big Pink?
Come on!
Hurry up!
Baby, l'm coming.
What are you doing?
You're so loaded!
What'd you do, rob a bank?
- Where are you taking me?
- We're going, like l said.
Yeah, right. ls that real money?
You want a tuna fish sandwich?
Yeah.
- Where'd you get the scarf?
Oh, it's a present l picked up for you.
Let me see.
You look like an angel.
Wake up.
Jean, wake up.
Honk the horn again, please.
Look at him.
What?
There are sick people living in this building.
What time is it, Benny, man?
Thompson and Spring, please.
What time is it, man?
You're late!
That's what time it is!
What's the rush, John Henry? lt's Jean Michel.
Toke?
What is your problem, man? l don't have any problems.
Then what do you have?
Give me my joint, man!
Check you out!
You get a little attention, you start acting all uppity and shit with me.
What's that about?
- About what?
- What's that about?
- What?
- What just--
You mean like uppity nigga?
What gives you the audacity... to even think that, man?
Hey, for all you know, you might just be a flash in the pan, man.
And let me tell you, you can never tell.
You're just jealous 'cause it ain't happening to you.
Think what you want, man.
Fuck you.
Making me feel bad, man.
Yo, pull over. Pull over.
- Yo, Andy, man.
- Jean.
Boom, that jacket.
Can l paint that?
Wow, you look great.
Your show looks great. l can't believe you did all these in your basement.
You kids can do anything.
Oh, Mary, this is Jean.
Jean, this is Mary Boone.
She's showing all the great new painters.
- Yeah, l met her already.
- You should be very pleased.
- lt's a very handsome show.
- Yeah. lt's just in the wrong gallery.
Yeah. l'll see you later at dinner, though.
Are you coming?
Jean, your parents are here.
Those aren't my parents.
Those are not his parents?
- Well, one of them is.
- Which one?
- Hey, Dad.
- You must be very proud.
Very proud.
Quite a production.
So tell me, how does it feel to have a genius in the family?
Good.
Lucky for you. l only have convicts in my family.
- Jean, great show, man.
- Yeah, yeah.
- Hey, step into the office.
- That's mine.
- l can't.
- Hey, it's a gift, man! lt's a gift!
Jean, come on.
This guy wants to take a picture.
Come on, come on.
He won't bite.
Oh, wow.
Twisted his arm, but here he is.
Gentlemen, a little tighter.
- Hey, Albert, get in the picture, man.
- Come on, beautiful.
- Still a great suit.
- Of the painters, please.
- The painters.
- Yeah, no, that's better. Go on.
Mr. Bischofberger, please.
- Thank you.
- Hey, Mom, Dad.
Jackie. Andy.
You know Andy.
- How are you?
- Hi. Yeah. Great color.
This is Jean Michel.
This is my wife.
This is Jack. That's Esther.
My mom and dad.
Are your folks here?
My dad's here with his wife, but my mom couldn't make it.
On such a special occasion?
Why?
- She's sick.
- l'm sorry.
- l don't indulge. Thank you.
- That's cool.
Jean Michel, may l talk to you, please?
Andy, you want to take my picture?
Yeah. l hear you're leaving Annina.
Now, you know l love your painting. l would like to represent you worldwide.
We start with a show in Zurich.
And later... l get us a partner in New York.
Maybe Mary Boone, huh?
Now, l especially like this painting. l would like to have that for my own private collection.
No, l wasn't gonna sell that one.
No? Well, you shouldn't have shown it. l mean, this is the one. l absolutely have to have this one. l mean, this is super-fantastic.
Oh, Jean Michel, l must have it.
Hey, l absolutely must have this painting.
Okay, sure.
Thank you.
Can l borrow your limousine? l'll bring it back to you in an hour. lt's okay.
Just have them drop you at Mr. Chow's.
- We'll all be there.
- Cool, cool. lt's a great show.
You sold my painting?
- l can make you another one.
- You sold my painting?
Let me tell you something.
When climbing that ladder of success... you do not kick out the fucking rungs, and you believe that shit!
- Rene!
What is it about art anyway that we give it so much importance?
Art is so respected by the poor because what they do...
is an honest way to get out of the slum...
using one's sheer self as the medium.
The money earned, proof, pure and simple...
of the value of that individual, the artist.
The picture a mother's son does in jail hangs on her wall...
as proof that beauty is possible even in the most wretched.
And this is a much different idea...
than the fancier notion that art is a scam and a rip-off.
But you could never explain to someone who uses God's gift to enslave...
that you have used
God's gift to be free.
Hey, man, turn that up.
''Bird'', man. l really, really... really admire you, man.
Me? Why? l mean, you did it. l mean, you made it.
You know... l'm a painter too.
Oh, yeah?
Come check out my studio sometime?
Sure. l love it, man.
''Plush, safe he think''.
What's your name, man?
They call me Steve, man, but l prefer Shenge.
Shenge.
You want a job?
Good evening.
Annina's waiting for you.
Mr. Chow, a chair, please.
To a great show, Jean.
- Cheers.
- Here's to you.
You finish it.
He used to. Nixon used to have a place at the Waldorf-Astoria.
But then he moved to Saddle River, New Jersey.
Saddle River, New York.
- Saddle River's in New Jersey.
- Saddle River's in New York.
- lt's in New Jersey.
- lt's in New York!
- Saddle River's in New Jersey.
- New York! l hear your show already sold out.
There is a very important collector interested in buying some of your work.
- lt's in New Jersey.
- New York!
Bring him by the studio sometime. l have some other stuff to show him.
Saddle River's in New York! l didn't know that, did you, Henry?
A bottle of your best champagne, darling.
Hi, Michael. Hello.
Hi, darling.
Well, you cannot buy advertising like this.
This will be the most glamorous party you'll have here all fall, guaranteed.
Oh, my. Could l get some of that imitation crab? l am just famished.
And a chair, please! Dominic, chair.
Well, that was a lovely show.
Absolutely lovely, but hey, we're no longer collecting art... we're buying people, aren't we?
Shut up, Rene.
Oh, Andy, please. Everything's over your head, we all know that.
Even Mr. Chow's menu's over your head.
God, that's beautiful.
Look at that.
Gorgeous. Gorgeous.
Look at that, is he not great?
That is an absolutely stupendous piece of work.
Thank you. He owes me one.
- Doesn't he, Bruno?
- You're too much, Rene.
- Get this guy out of here.
- Oh, come-- Please!
Relax.
Can l have my chair, please?
- You'll never miss me
- Oh, come on! l haven't eaten a thing. l am starved to death, darling.
Please, get your hands off me. lt's okay, we're friends.
We're friends-- please go away.
Get your hands off me! l want a chair!
- Why must we say adieu
- l want a chair! All right, l'm going.
Get your hands off me!
We're friends!
Fuck off. Get your hands off!
Okay, l'm going! l've left Diana Vreeland waiting long enough. lt was such a good drawing, Jean Michel.
You should do another one for Michael.
Perhaps some other time, Andy.
...there and un petit Manet there.
- l lost my station
- lt's great that people are interested.
But if anyone's going to buy anything, l'll handle it for you.
Everything goes through the gallery, even if they come to your studio.
- Oh, Paris, please
- Sure, sure.
Stay the same.
You've had 23 one-man shows.
You've been in 43 group shows from Zurich to Tokyo.
You've had over 50 articles written about you.
You've switched galleries how many times?
You've deejayed in the hottest clubs.
One of the youngest artists ever to be included... in the Whitney biennial.
Produced a rap record. lt's said you're quite the ladies' man.
You dated Madonna... a couple of months, right?
All this at the ripe old age of 24.
One might ask, is there anything left... for Jean Michel Basquiat to do?
Bottom line:
What is it... gets you out of bed in the morning? l hate this, man.
Turn that off.
Oh, come on.
No, it's all right.
Look, come back. l can do better.
Please, please.
Thank you.
Okay. Ready?
You ready?
Can you decipher this for us?
Decipher?
Just words.
Yeah, l understand, but whose words are these? l mean, where do you take them from? l don't know. Would you ask a musician-- would you ask Miles... where'd you get that note from? l mean--
Where do you take your words from?
- You know?
- Right.
Everywhere.
What's that?
The three circles.
- Here?
- Yeah.
- lt's a flea.
- Looks like a chicken.
Trust me, it's a flea.
And that, in the black box?
Those are parasites.
Flea, parasite, and 46 and 47? lt says leeches. lt's number 46 and 47 in a list of thousands... of leeches on this planet.
What's the difference between--
Between a flea, parasite and a leech?
- Hardly any.
- Why are people... so crudely drawn?
Well, most people tend to be pretty-- generally pretty crude. l really don't know that many refined people.
Yeah, that looks good like that, man.
- What's that?
- Oh, it's... a pile of tires l painted. l knew that.
Do you consider yourself some kind of primal expressionist?
You mean a primate?
Like an ape?
Do you consider yourself a painter, or a black painter? l use a lot of colors, not just black. lt's more a creole, you know?
And what l mean by creole is that... it's a mix of Africa and Europe... in much the same way that an African in Haiti speaks French.
Your father's from Haiti.
How do you respond to being called...
''The pickaninny of the art world''?
- Who said that?
- That's from Time magazine.
No, they said l was the Eddie Murphy of the art world.
My mistake.
Let me just open something up here.
You come from a middle class home.
Your father's an accountant.
Why did you live in a cardboard box in Tompkins Square?
Do you feel that you're being exploited or... are you yourself exploiting... the white image of the black artist from the ghetto?
Ghetto? l don't exploit it, no.
Other people--
See, you make me put my foot in my mouth.
Other people, it's possible, other people might exploit it, it's possible. ls it true?
Your mother resides in a mental institution? ls that right?
You angry?
Now, right now?
No, as an artist. ln general.
Okay.
Good, that's good.
Thank you.
- l'm home.
- Hi, Jean.
That's great, Frank.
Can you, l don't know, whiz over here?
More that way.
What's with the wigs? l'm gonna give 'em to people for Christmas.
You think that's a good present?
Who wants an old wig?
Yeah, sure.
Oh, bad painting.
Not bad painting, Jean.
Oxidation art.
Yeah, l hate cleaning brushes too. l'm going to do some more of these.
Frank's been drinking this beer... and it makes it go this great green.
Why aren't you peeing on them yourself? l don't like beer.
Can l get some caviar, please?
Oh, can l taste it first?
- ls that the best you have?
- Yes, it's the best.
- l'll take the whole tin.
- That's $3,000.
Hey, Andy.
Can l get $3,000?
For this caviar?
Jean, we could go to Russia for that.
Put the caviar on the card and l'll get the rest.
Do you check everybody's bills or just mine?
Just yours.
Just gimme my shit, man.
Yeah, but what he said was locked in the basement... you know, l mean, it had such a nasty ring to it. lf l was white, they would have just said ''artist in residence''. l just wish they'd quit writing shit about me.
No, Jean, that's good.
At least they're interested.
And then, everyone's payin', like... top dollar for... anything with Samo on it.
- Scraps of paper, refrigerator doors.
- Sure, yeah.
The other day, l wanted to buy a pack of cigarettes... so l did this drawing for two dollars... and this gallery called me a week later said...
''Somebody's offering us $5,000 for the same drawing, should l buy it?'' l said, ''Yeah, sure, buy it. lt sounds like a good deal to me''.
Sure, buy it, that's a good deal, yeah.
But you've got to stop giving them away!
You know? Oh, Comme Des Garcons want me to, like, model for them.
Maybe you could do that with me.
Yeah, yeah. l could do that.
You could teach me. l couldn't teach you anything.
You're a natural.
You kidding me?
Maybe you could join my modeling agency.
They asked me to do the Mike Todd Room at the Palladium. Should l do that? lsn't Albert Milo doing that?
- They asked him before they asked me?
- Gee, l don't know.
Shit, l'm not doing that. l gotta get out of New York.
Hey, we could go to Pittsburgh! l kinda grew up there.
They have this room there with all the world's famous statues in.
So you don't even have to go to Europe anymore.
Just go to Pittsburgh.
- Boom! Duckman!
- Oh, yeah.
When l was little, my brother and l had two pet ducks.
We called them the Garcia brothers.
Jean, did you see my dermatologist yet?
Say, Gina, Gina! l'm sorry. l thought you were a friend.
Welcome back to Barbetta, maestro.
Haven't seen you in long time.
How was your show in Europe?
- lt was good.
- Good.
We have an excellent
Brunero Di Mont-al-Cino.
- What year? Sure.
So how are you doing? l was gonna get you some flowers. l forgot.
So, l hear you've been hanging out with Andy.
He seems like he's pretty weird.
He's not, you know. He calls me every day when he's out of town.
What's weird about him?
Well, you know, a lot of people think that he's using you.
Why does everyone say that?
He's the only person who doesn't need--
Never mind.
So, what have you been up to?
Well, l'm starting med school at Columbia in the fall.
- Yeah?
- Yeah.
Pretty excited about it, actually.
And Rene hired me as his secretary.
He's getting his poems published. l hate him.
How is he?
He's the same.
That's fine.
- Giorgio?
- Yes, Mr. Basquiat?
- You see this table behind me?
- Yes.
Put their bill on my tab.
All right.
- Giorgio.
- Yes, Mr. Basquiat?
Don't tell them anything.
Just do it, please.
Of course not, Mr. Basquiat.
- Why?
- l mean, what year is this? l think about you a lot, you know.
And me, and the future 'cause-- l'm gonna-- ln my head, l had all these things l was gonna say... but they don't work. l'm sorry--
- l'm sorry--
- You don't need to be sorry.
Well, you know, one good thing came out of it. l realized l'm a really bad painter. lt was a relief. l'm glad l could help. l have to go to the bathroom.
Well, gee, Jean.
That was my favorite part. lt needed more white.
That's better.
You make me feel so worthless.
You're so famous now.
Famous. l don't even have any friends anymore, aside from you.
And everyone says...
''Warhol, that... death-warmed-over person on drugs, he's just using you''.
Well, maybe you just shouldn't take things so seriously.
Bruno called.
He said people in Europe are saying you're burning your candle at both ends.
Well, l think it's awful people are talking like that. l think you should, like, l don't know, stick around, prove them wrong.
No one thought l could make it in the first place.
Then when it happened, they said, yeah, but he'll never keep it up.
Now they say l'm killing myself.
Stuff like this.
But then when l clean up, they say, look, his art's dead. l don't care anyway, because, you know, l'm clean now. l'm healthy.
That's just not true, Jean.
You phone me at 4:00 in the--
What are you doing?
You're painting out everything l do!
Wow.
Oh, that's great.
System with just the ''M''.
Yeah, it's better.
You really think so?
God. l can't even see what's good anymore.
Okay, l see what you mean about that white.
After the show, let's take a nice long vacation.
Go to Hawaii.
You want to go to Hawaii?
That's what l'm gonna do. l'm gonna go to Maui... open a tequila factory... write poetry, play music again.
Give up this painting. l wanna sing.
Boy, that would be a pity.
You're a real painter.
Poster came out great.
Jean Michel sent this.
Great.
Hey, that's mine.
- What's up?
- Mind your own business.
Yeah, my man Samo gonna make us rich.
Hey?
What is your problem?
Now it's worth more.
- l'm Samo.
- What did he say?
- He says he's Samo.
- l'm Samo.
Jean Michel... crawling from the wreckage.
- l need a dealer.
- Don't you have a bunch of them already?
Hey, Mary Boone, did l ever tell you my grandfather was an oyster man?
You know what that means?
Mary, can we switch these?
This should be here.
You should see it when you walk in.
That should be there.
- Hi, Jean. You know?
- l like it there.
- Could we switch 'em? Yeah?
- Well, yes.
- We'll rehang them.
- That's good. That's good there.
So what do you think? l said l need a dealer.
- We could talk about it.
- Here l am.
No. l'll come by your studio.
Thursday at 3:30.
What are you doin'?
- Nothin'.
- Wanna come over?
- What for?
- l'm your friend.
- See you in an hour.
- Good. All right.
- So, what's wrong with tomorrow?
- l'm busy! l'm busy!
Okay? l'll come by your studio.
- Thursday at 3:30.
- 3:30. Yeah, yeah. l'll fit you in.
Yeah, l might even make you some gumbo.
Excuse me. ls this gallery open?
Yeah.
No, please come back later.
You like that painting? l painted that for a friend of mine who died.
Okay, that's good, that's good.
Hey, Jean.
Hang on. Jean.
This is a backdrop for the Kabuki theater in Japan.
Sort of a... rebirth painting. l painted it for Joseph Beuys.
Felt like maybe he could have painted it... or someone else was painting it instead of me. l like it, it's good. Thanks. l'll be up in about ten minutes.
- Cortes.
- l know it.
- You know? You know Cortes?
- Of course.
Here. You know the Chinese calligraphers?
They used to change their name mid-career... so they could start over as someone else.
- Do you ever get sick of it?
- What, spaghetti?
No, the whole thing.
Painting.
That's one of the few things that makes me happy.
- Spaghetti?
- No, painting. l used to cook for a living.
That l got sick of.
You know, l still have a rash from those white bucks?
Hey, Eddie, are we still on the lapdog remark?
That's completely different, though. l think Eddie Murphy's cool, you know?
Yeah, but he can't paint.
Not that l know of.
- What about stupidity they write?
- Let me tell you something.
There's about ten people on the planet... who know anything about painting, and Andy is one of them.
You know, your audience isn't even born yet.
Personally, l'm surprised when anybody comes to my openings. l haven't felt like talking to him since that thing came out. l mean, l'm nobody's mascot, you know?
- Did he say that?
- As long as l've known Andy... he never asked me for a thing, except to speak to you... about getting off drugs.
And he's painted my picture, l've painted his picture... you know, we've eaten dinner together.
He doesn't care about me.
He cares about you.
You're the one he cares about.
You're his friend.
- Did he say that?
- Listen, forget that article! lt doesn't matter.
Forget about it.
Come on, eat.
Good conversation is hard to find in this town.
Papa, the TV's broken.
Can you fix it?
Sure, honey. l'll be there in a minute.
She knows more about painting than Eddie Murphy.
Your hair was different the last time l saw you. lt's nice.
Do you like your dad's paintings?
Some of'em.
Stand still, Stella.
You can keep it.
Thanks.
You're much prettier than that.
- Where'd Jean go?
- He just left.
He did?
He's pissing in our hall.
Really.
Hey, Duckman.
Can l get two ducks, man?
- No, please, please, go away.
- Baby, it's me. lt's me.
- Oh, it's you. What a day.
- What's this mean?
Do l look that bad?
What's the matter?
You haven't heard.
Andy is dead.
Wait for me.
Come here, please.
Come here.
Come here, just f--
Just for a second.
Just come here.
Please.
My mom's in here.
Matilde Basquiat. l want to take her home.
Visiting hours are over.
Come back tomorrow.
Yeah, but l'm not here to visit. l want to take her home.
Look, don't cause me any trouble.
Do me the favor? l don't want to-- l just want to take her home.
Open up, please.
Open up.
- Please, just open up.
- l said, don't cause me any trouble.
- l asked you nicely.
- And l asked you nicely. Open up. l said, open up.
Open up.
Open up! Open up!
Open up!
Willie Mays. Willie Mays.
Hey, Willie.
Come on, Willie.
Come on.
Hey, Willie.
Come on, Willie.
Hey, Benny.
My mom told me this story.
Or was it a dream?
There was this little prince with a magic crown.
And this evil warlock kidnapped him.
Locked him in this cell in this huge tower. Took away his voice.
There was a window with bars...
and the prince kept smashing his head against the bars...
hoping that someone would hear the sound...
and find him.
The crown made the most beautiful sound that anyone had ever heard.
You could hear it ringing for miles.
lt was so beautiful.
The people wanted to grab the air.
They never found the prince.
He never got out of the room.
But that sound he made...
filled everything up with beauty.
lt's definitely time to get out of here.
Benny, forget Hawaii.
Let's go to lreland.
We'll stop in every bar and have a drink.
"I will praise the Lord,
"and so shall be saved from mine enemies!"
"The waves of death have closed about me!
"The cords of hell have encompassed me about,
"and the snares of death have overtaken me. "
"... have encompassed me about,
"and the snares of death have overtaken me!
"In my tribulation,
"I called to the Lord, and cried to my God.
"And he heard my voice cry at his temple. "
Get back.
Clear the way.
Move back.
Keep in line, woman!
By order of Their Gracious
Majesties, Queen Mary and King Philip, we are come to witness the burning of these Protestant heretics, who have denied the authority of the one, true Catholic church and of His Holiness, the Pope.
Let them burn for all eternity in the flames of hell.
"I called to the Lord,
"and cried to my God.
And he heard my voice... "
God bless you, Master Ridley!
For the love of God!
Friends! Help me!
I burn too slowly!
Help them!
For God's sake, help them!
"And so shall be saved from mine enemies... "
Your Grace.
Your Grace.
Your Grace.
Grace.
Grace.
Your Grace, the Queen is with child.
They should have consulted me before they rang the bells.
Is it true?
There are symptoms.
She has ceased to bleed, her breasts have some milk, and her stomach is swollen.
Is it true?
The King has not shared her bed for many months.
He has a repugnance for it, as lately Your Grace has for mine.
Hmm.
Norfolk.
Your Majesties, this is most wondrous news.
Indeed. We do thank God for this, our most happy condition.
We must also thank His Majesty for this blessed event, which is nothing short of a miracle.
What news, my lords, of the rebellion against our authority?
Sussex?
Madam, it is safely dispatched, thanks to His Grace.
Sir Thomas Wyatt and the other leaders are already dealt with.
But if they had succeeded, these Protestants and heretics meant to place your sister upon the throne.
There is no proof against the Lady Elizabeth.
She's plainly guilty.
What need is there of proof?
As long as she remains alive, there will be plots to raise her to the throne.
Ambassador?
I agree with His Grace.
She is a heretic.
She must never be allowed to succeed.
But if she...
If she were brought properly to trial, she would not be found guilty, and we would all be condemned.
She has many friends in Parliament...
My sister was born of that whore, Anne Boleyn!
She was born a bastard.
She will never rule England.
Your Grace will find some proof of her treachery.
I am most sure of it.
It was so fast.
May I join you, my lady?
If it please you, sir.
My lady! My lady!
Princess Elizabeth!
Princess Elizabeth!
You are accused of conspiring with Sir Thomas Wyatt and others against Her Sovereign Majesty and are arrested for treason.
I am commanded to take you hence from this place to the Tower.
Remember who you are.
Do not be afraid of them.
My lady.
Prisoner to the steps.
I cannot confess to something
I did not do!
Your denials are all in vain!
You knew of the rebellion, madam. You were party to it!
It is plain enough.
Where is your proof?
It was to your advantage.
You must let me see the Queen. I must...
You despise the Queen and the Catholic faith!
I am a true and faithful subject.
I attend Mass...
You pretend, but in your heart...
What's that?
What say you, madam?
Speak up!
Madam, if there is some small truth in these charges, however innocently or unknowingly you did proceed, you had best confess.
I ask you why we must tear ourselves apart for this small question of religion,
- Catholic and Protestant...
- Small?
You think it small, though it killed your mother?
We all...
We all believe in God, my lords.
No, madam. There is only one true belief. The other, heresy.
Madam, you are cold.
I do not need your pity.
Accept it, then.
For my sake.
Thank you.
I shall not forget this kindness.
Tonight I think I die.
Madam.
No!
Where do you take her?
Please! What's going on?
Save me! Save me!
Save me!
You...
Oh, no!
I am Your Majesty's most humble servant.
Come here.
Closer, so I might see your face.
When I look at you,
I see nothing of the King, only that whore, your mother.
Hmm.
My father never did anything so well as to cut off her head.
Your Majesty forgets he was also my father.
Why will you not confess your crimes against me?
Because, Your Majesty,
I have committed none.
You speak with such sincerity.
I see you're still a consummate actress.
My husband is gone.
They have poisoned my child.
They say it is a tumor.
Madam, you are not well.
They say this cancer will make you Queen, but they are wrong!
Look there!
It is your death warrant.
All I need do is sign it.
Mary.
If you sign that paper, you will be murdering your own sister.
You will promise me something?
When I am gone, you will do everything in your power to uphold the Catholic faith.
Do not take away from the people the consolations of the Blessed Virgin, their Holy Mother.
When I am Queen,
I promise to act as my conscience dictates.
Well, do not think to be Queen at all!
You may return to your own house at Hatfield, but you will remain there under arrest until I am recovered.
Thank you, Your Majesty.
No.
Feed her to the wolves.
Let her see what they are like.
She's just a child. And yet still you piss yourselves!
Your Grace, Protestants are already returning from abroad.
Yes, and have made plans to massacre every Catholic in England.
There would be butchery, indeed, if such a plan were even conceivable.
They say Walsingham will return from France.
Walsingham is nothing!
Be sure he does not.
There's so little beauty in this world. And so much suffering.
Do you suppose that is what God had in mind?
That is to say, if there is a God at all.
Perhaps there is nothing in this universe but ourselves and our thoughts.
Think before you do this.
If you must do it, then do it now.
And without regret.
But first think carefully.
And be certain why it needs to be done.
Look out there.
There is a whole world waiting for you.
Innocence is the most precious thing you possess.
Lose that and you lose your soul.
Amen.
Father... Sir William!
My lady.
There was nowhere else we could meet in safety.
Listen to me carefully.
All things move in our favor.
Many of our friends are, even now, returning from exile, but...
These are most uncertain times and your life remains in danger.
You must therefore say nothing and meet no one whose visit may compromise you.
No one?
No one. Not even Lord Robert.
But he is a trusted friend!
Child. Listen to me.
Please.
You are most innocent in the ways of this world, and we must do all we may to guarantee the security of your throne.
But there is someone
I do wish you to meet.
Monsignor Alvaro de la Quadra, the Spanish ambassador.
Sir William, why would...
My lady, I bring a message.
The King of Spain is enraptured, and offers you his hand in marriage.
My sister is not yet dead.
Her bed is still warm.
His Majesty finds it already cold.
You must sign it.
For the love of God, sign it.
Will you leave your kingdom to a heretic?
He then said that this King would marry me, but would not expect to share my bed more than two or three times a year.
As much as that?
Well, if he...
He is enraptured...
Naturally.
But his affairs would otherwise keep him in Spain.
Then the King is a fool.
For what affairs could ever be important enough to keep him from your bed?
Robert, you should not say such things.
Then I shall only think them.
Oh, everything's still so uncertain.
Sir William says that my life is still in danger.
Do not listen to everything
Sir William tells you.
Do not listen to any of them.
None of them are of consequence.
When you are Queen...
I am not...
I am not Queen yet.
You will be.
Elizabeth, Queen of England.
A court to worship you, a country to obey you, poems written celebrating your beauty, music composed in your honor, and they will be nothing to you.
I will mean nothing to you.
Oh, how could you ever be nothing to me?
Robert, you know you are everything to me.
All that I am, it is you.
Is she dead?
Give it to her.
My lady.
The Earl of Sussex is here.
The Queen is dead.
Long live the Queen!
Long live the Queen!
"This is the Lord's doing,
"and it is marvelous in our eyes. "
To the north, I present unto you
Elizabeth, your undoubted Queen.
To the south, I present to you
Elizabeth, your undoubted Queen.
I crown thee Elizabeth,
Queen of England,
Ireland and France.
God save Your Majesty.
Your Majesty should know that you have inherited a most powerless and degenerate state.
It's threatened from abroad by the ambitions of France and Spain and is weaker in strength, in men, moneys, and riches than I have ever known it.
What are you saying?
Madam, your treasury is empty.
The navy is run down, there is no standing army, and we are bare of munitions.
There isn't a fortress left in England that could withstand a single shot.
I have no desire to go to war, sir.
But that is not the end of it.
Apart from abroad, here at home there are those who wish Your Majesty ill.
Mary of Scots has already laid claim to your throne.
And Norfolk. Norfolk covets it relentlessly.
Madam.
Until you marry and produce an heir, you will find no security.
Sir Christopher Hatton.
There is...
Oh, I do not see...
Lord Ainsley, Your Majesty.
I do not see why a woman need marry at all.
Come on, come on!
This is Mistress Quickly.
Majesty.
Majesty.
Your Majesty.
Your Majesty.
You will recall His Excellency, the Spanish ambassador, ma'am.
How could I forget?
Excellency.
Your Majesty.
He's French.
You'll have to speak up.
Do I know that gentleman?
That is
Sir Francis Walsingham, madam.
He is returned from exile now and I have appointed him to have a care for Your Majesty's person.
Excellency.
Majesty.
Hey!
Majesty.
May I present the French ambassador,
His Excellency, Monsieur de Foix.
Your Excellency.
I suppose the French do offer some suitor to her.
Naturally.
Everything now depends upon the husband that woman takes.
King Henry of Anjou sends you his brotherly love.
He trusts that with your accession, the relationship between our countries may be much improved.
That is also my hope.
With such consideration, the King expects that you will consider the suit of his brother, the Duke of Anjou.
Well, naturally, Her Majesty will consider the proposal most carefully.
It is unfortunate, however, that at this time the Duke's aunt, Mary of Guise, chooses to garrison Scotland with French troops.
Ladies?
The marriage of a Queen,
Excellency, is born of politics, not of childish passion.
Your Grace.
Walsingham.
Welcome to England.
Your Grace is surprised?
No, only a little disappointed.
Play a volta!
When may I see you in private?
In private?
Have you forgot, my lord?
I am Queen now.
He's coming.
He's coming.
My ladies.
My Lord.
My Lord.
You blush, Lady Knollys.
Are you in love?
No, my lord.
Then you should be, or waste all that beauty.
Does Her Majesty sleep?
Not yet, Sir William.
She is overwrought.
Hmm.
I wish you to show me Her
Majesty's sheets every morning.
I must know all her proper functions.
Proper functions, Sir William?
Indeed.
Her Majesty's body and person are no longer her own property.
They belong to the State.
Yes, sir.
Your Grace.
Your Grace,
Her Majesty is not risen.
Your Grace.
Please, Your Grace.
Her Majesty is not yet ready to receive visitors.
Madam.
You had best get up.
There is some grave news.
My Lady, I'm sorry.
Mary of Guise has increased the French garrison in Scotland by 4,000 men.
Perhaps more.
Madam, I'm afraid the French mean to attack while we are still weak and while Your
Majesty's reign is still uncertain.
What is your counsel?
Madam, we must, with all haste, raise an army to march upon Scotland.
Can... Can...
Can we not send emissaries?
There is no time for that!
As Queen, we look to you for action, unless you are content to wait for the French to send more reinforcements.
Here.
Are you all in agreement?
I say there's never been a better time or occasion to abate the French pride.
Arundel?
War is a sin, but sometimes a necessary one.
I...
Lord Robert, you were appointed to the council to protect the interests of England.
Now it appears you do not have the stomach for it.
I'm in agreement, Your Grace.
If Your Majesty's throne is at risk.
What say you, Walsingham?
Your Majesty!
I say a prince should rather be slow to take action and should watch that he does not come to be afraid of his own shadow.
Now, madam...
With your permission, madam.
You are not, Sir Francis, a member of council, nor are you in the majority.
I do not like wars.
They have uncertain outcomes.
Go back to England, and take this to your Queen.
Hmm?
Where are my counselors?
I know not, madam.
Where is Lord Robert?
Lord Robert, madam, has gone hunting.
Leave me. Go! Go!
I regret to inform Your Majesty of our miserable defeat in Scotland.
The bishops do demand
Your Majesty's removal.
Defiance afoot in every quarter.
Alas, madam, we are come already to catastrophe.
How dare you come into my presence?
Why do you follow me here?
It is my business to protect Your Majesty.
Against all things.
I do not need protection.
I need to be left alone.
Majesty.
They should never have been sent to Scotland.
My father would not have made such a mistake.
I have been proved unfit to rule.
Well, that is what you all think, is it not, Walsingham?
It is not for me to judge you.
Why did they send such children?
Why did they not send proper reinforcements?
Because the bishops would not let them.
They spoke against it in the pulpits.
Then they are speaking against their Queen.
Madam, the bishops are against you and have no fear of you.
They do not expect you to survive.
My lord, the Queen.
Where have you been?
You were not at court.
Majesty. Monsieur de Foix.
Mary of Guise, ma'am, promises to make no further threat against Your Majesty, but on one condition.
What condition?
That Your Majesty considers the proposal of her nephew, the Duke of Anjou.
The Duke is most eager to meet Your Majesty.
He has heard a great deal of your beauty.
For the love of God, ma'am, let not the care of your diseased estate hang in the balance any longer.
In marriage and in the production of an heir lies your only surety.
The Duke is also most handsome.
Very well.
Invite the Duke of Anjou.
We shall see him in the flesh.
Robert!
Go away!
The Duke will not take kindly to a rival for his suit.
He is a traitor and his father before him.
Lord Robert's head will end up on a spike, not on the pillow of a Queen.
Do you think you understand what you just did? Do you?
Must you leave?
I would not miss this for the world.
Today I shall watch the fall of that heretic girl.
I have been placed here as your sovereign...
I am your sovereign.
I have been placed here...
I...
God has...
God has placed me here.
I am your anointed sovereign.
I am your Queen and, like my father, I mean to rule.
There is one thing higher than royalty, my lords, and that is religion.
I pass this Act of...
I ask you to...
I ask you to pass this Act of Uniformity.
It's not for myself.
It's for my people.
They're my people.
My lords, there is one God.
We have a common...
There is one God.
This is for my people.
My people are my care...
Only care.
The truth be, my lords, your votes are nothing without my consent.
If there is no uniformity of religious belief here, then there can only be fragmentation,
Dispute, and quarrel.
Surely, my lords, it is better to have a single Church of England.
A single Church of England with a common prayer book...
And a...
And a common purpose.
Now, I ask you to pass this Act of Uniformity not...
Not for myself, but for my people, who are my only care.
Madam, by this act...
By this act, you force us to relinquish our allegiance to the Holy Father.
How can I force you,
Your Grace?
I am a woman.
I have no desire to make windows into men's souls.
I simply ask, can any man, in truth, serve two masters and be faithful to both?
Madam, this... This is heresy!
Heresy indeed!
Heresy indeed!
No, Your Grace.
This is common sense, which is a most
English virtue.
Where is Gardiner?
Where are the others?
Let us out!
Open the door!
This is Walsingham's doing.
It is the devil's work.
It will not serve her in any case.
The bishops will pass no measure which severs us from Rome.
Your Majesty would improve all these matters if you would agree to marry.
Aye. Marry, then.
Aye.
But marry who, Your Grace?
Will you give me some suggestion?
For some say France, and others Spain, and some cannot abide foreigners at all.
So I'm not sure how best to please you unless I married one of each.
Now Your Majesty does make fun of the sanctity of marriage.
I do not think you should lecture me on that, my lord, since you yourself have been twice divorced and are now upon your third wife.
Each of you must vote according to your conscience.
But remember this.
In your hands, upon this moment, lies the future happiness of my people and the peace of this realm.
Let that be upon your conscience also.
My lords, the house will divide.
Walsingham.
I would know on what authority you have kept us locked up here.
Your Graces must forgive me, but you're now free to go.
I am sure this infernal work has not saved your bastard Queen.
Her Majesty has won the argument.
By what count?
By five, Your Grace.
Five.
You will be damned for this and I pray God your wretched soul will burn in hell!
No...
Because I am Anjou!
Yes, I am Anjou, yes.
I am Anjou.
Yes.
And I can't wait.
Would you like that?
Remove your hand.
Perhaps, Your Grace.
We shall think on it.
But I am deeply religious.
But I am very religious, too, huh?
Very religious, yes.
Your Holiness, the priest from England is here.
Tell me, my son, what is the news of our brothers and sisters in England?
Do they still support the sovereignty of that illegitimate whore?
No, Holy Father.
They pray ceaselessly that England may be recovered from heresy.
Prayers may not be sufficient.
I will ask for guidance in this matter, but do not despair.
Was it not truly said that the righteous shall inherit the earth?
"My true love has my heart, and I have hers
"My heart in me keeps her and me in one
"My heart in her her thoughts and senses guide
"She loves my heart
"for once it was her own
"I cherish hers because in me it bides
"My true love has my heart, and I have hers. "
Marry me.
Marry me.
On a night such as this, could any woman say no?
On a night such as this, could a Queen say no?
Does not a Queen sit under the same stars as any other woman?
Monsignor Alvaro!
Monsignor Alvaro!
Monsignor Alvaro, tell me.
As well as ambassador, are you not also a bishop?
I am, my lord.
Then you can marry us!
Marry you?
Or perhaps he does not know enough
English to perform the ceremony.
Alas, madam, in this matter,
I can be of no help to you.
Madam!
Protect her!
Protect the Queen!
Help her! Help her!
Quickly, form a guard!
Hurry, man!
The Queen! The Queen!
Look to the Queen!
Make way.
It's Her Majesty. Make way.
Isabel, see that the ladies are prepared. Isabel, go!
Where were you,
Sir Francis?
I only hope that Her Majesty may be safely delivered from this present danger.
Get the bedchamber ready, ladies, quickly! We come.
I am perfectly well.
Please do not... Do not fuss.
No one is to enter.
Yes, Sir William.
Stay near now, and keep watch.
Yes, Sir Francis.
Sorry, Lord Robert.
I said no one.
My lord.
A word.
To whose advantage was this?
De Foix?
No. Not with Anjou in play.
Then some madman.
There is always madness,
Master Elyot.
This was devised.
There is reason behind it.
Then Alvaro, for he has most cause.
Yes, yes, yes.
But he was present.
He's too subtle for that.
But Norfolk. He's not so subtle, and has even more cause.
Indeed.
So then he's not in league with the Spanish.
Perhaps. Stay close to him.
The Duke has some other game.
I must find where he plays.
I see it is true that the Queen favors you above all others.
But you have many enemies here. Is it not so?
That is no concern of yours.
It may be.
If you would be prepared in secret to renounce heresy and embrace the true faith, then you might find many new and powerful friends, and keep your Queen.
You are most mistaken,
Monsignor, if you think I might so easily be persuaded to act against my conscience and my love.
Ah.
My lord.
What will a man not do for love?
Madam, if only you would heed my advice.
I narrowly escaped with my life, sir.
I... I cannot now discuss marriage.
Forgive me.
The one cannot be separated from the other.
Have I not told you?
Yes! And I am sick of it.
This entire conversation is ill-timed.
My patience, Sir William, is not infinite.
It is a great joy to see
Your Majesty is not hurt.
It was a terrible affair.
The Duke would still know the answer to his suit.
You may tell the Duke that he shall have his answer shortly.
Oh, madam!
The point is pressing.
The Duke cannot love me so much if he demands my answer so precipitously.
Perhaps Her Majesty will not answer because her heart is already set upon another.
Do not presume, monsieur, to know the secrets of my heart.
Monsieur de Foix may leave.
S'il vous platt, Excellency.
Secrets, madam?
You have no secrets!
The world knows that Lord Robert visits your chambers at night, and that you fornicate with him!
It's even said that you already carry his child.
Yes, Sir William,
I live my life in the open!
I am surrounded by people!
I do not understand how so bad a judgment is being formed of me.
Madam, you cannot marry Lord Robert.
He's already married.
A married man.
Lord Dudley.
Lord Dudley...
Imagine being discovered in another woman's bed.
You mean his wife's bed.
Lord Robert, we are amazed you show your face at court.
The Queen!
Spanish!
Spanish! Spanish!
English pirate!
English pirate!
It's not enough that English pirates attack and rob our ships, but we have to be made fools of in this court.
The King, my master, has become impatient for Your Grace to act.
If you will not, then others may.
You must reassure His Majesty that the time is close at hand.
He must not act precipitously.
English pirate!
His Majesty has also heard a rumor.
The world is filled with rumors, Monsignor.
That Your Grace has made contact with Mary of Scots to promote your ambitions.
Even that you mean to marry her.
Do you suppose me an idiot?
Your master is the most powerful man in the world.
I would not cross him for my life.
Did the Duke not come to dance?
Madam, His Grace is unfortunately indisposed.
He has some pains of the stomach.
Oh. I am very sorry for it.
We wish to give the Duke this ring as a token of our love.
Madam, allow me...
No.
I shall give it to him myself.
Madam, I should not...
Sir William.
Come along.
What?
What?
What? What?
You stare, madame.
What is it? Do you see something strange, perhaps?
You are wearing a dress,
Your Grace.
Oh.
Yes, I am wearing a dress.
Yes, yes, I am wearing a dress.
I wear a dress like this, my mother, and you.
But I only dress like this when I'm alone, in private with my friends.
Your Grace.
Although my affection for you is undiminished,
I have, after an agonizing struggle, determined to sacrifice my own happiness for the welfare of my people.
Oh! My God.
Madam, I will explain.
Madam, is the Duke...
There will be no more talk of marriage.
Lord Robert!
Your Majesty.
Will you dance?
If it please you.
Play a volta.
Why will you not see me?
You must let me explain. Others will take advantage of this.
You must not believe what they tell you.
They are jealous.
And envious.
Because I am nothing to them, and everything to you.
Do you love her?
No. I love you.
I have always loved you.
I was afraid of losing you, because I was not free.
For God's sake, you are still my Elizabeth.
No. I am not your Elizabeth!
I am no man's Elizabeth.
And if you think to rule her, you are mistaken.
I will have one mistress here!
And no master!
It matters nothing to me.
I can live without her.
Most happily.
Better than I could live with her.
I have no need of her love.
Have not I suffered enough already, for loving her and showing it?
I envy you, my lord, to love a woman so deeply.
Monsignor, envy no man for that.
Such love is hateful.
It tears the soul apart.
Envy a man who has never known such love.
Perhaps there may still be a way to reclaim her affections.
Why should I want to?
And to save her life.
You jest with me.
No. Indeed, I do not.
For she will be dead soon enough, perhaps even at Norfolk's hand, if you do not help her.
How can I help her?
She will not even see me.
His Holiness has issued the bull.
It deprives Elizabeth, the pretended Queen of England, servant of wickedness, of her throne, and declares that henceforth her subjects are absolved of their allegiance to her.
His Holiness also decrees that any man who should undertake her assassination will be welcomed by angels into the kingdom of heaven.
Give these letters of blessing and hope to our friends in England.
Your Grace.
Monsignor.
And Thomas Elyot.
You serve your master well, Elyot.
As good as I can, in truth.
I mean your real master.
What's this?
What master?
Walsingham.
The priest is mistaken, my lord.
I am Your Grace's servant, as God is my witness.
Isabel, they are...
Don't fuss.
You should not try them on, Isabel.
They are the Queen's dresses.
Why not?
I must see the Queen.
I am Queen of England.
Tell her I must see her.
Say you're mine.
You're my Elizabeth.
Say you are my Elizabeth.
I am your Elizabeth.
I am your Queen.
Kat!
Kat!
Kat?
Who are you?
You will declare yourself to me.
Madam!
Come quickly. Something has happened. You must come quickly.
Who was with her?
One of the guards found her.
No one was with her.
He said he saw
Lord Robert leave.
No. No, no, madam, no.
The dress was poisoned.
Uncover her.
No! That dress was a gift.
For me.
French silk.
Sir Francis.
You and I, we must be honest with each other.
Your Queen is weak.
She has no army, no friends, only...
Enemies.
Enemies.
Mmm-hmm.
What terms can she propose?
Madam, Her Majesty was,
I believe, too hasty at rejecting the
Duke's proposal of marriage.
But how can I marry such a woman? Huh? She is frigid.
Yes.
They even say she's really a man.
Oh, you must forgive my nephew.
He speaks when he should not. It's terrible.
I hear you are a wise man,
Sir Francis, and a creature of the world.
Like me.
Yes.
I have no illusions.
I know it is only a matter of time before my Queen is overthrown.
Her Majesty rules with the heart.
Not with the head.
I understand.
It is hard for a woman to forget her heart.
But what of you,
Walsingham?
A wise man would be careful not to put himself in the way of harm.
Hmm.
And how would a wise man do that?
He would, as I said, change allegiance.
There are but two choices.
He would get into bed with either Spain or France.
And whose bed would you prefer?
Your Majesty, may I speak with you in private?
Speak.
You are in the greatest danger.
You must believe me.
But you have a friend, someone who can guarantee your safety and your throne.
A friend?
The King of Spain.
Leave us.
How would he guarantee it?
He would marry you.
Only to make an alliance, nothing more.
He would not expect to...
He would live in Spain.
Why do you do this, Robert?
Because I love you, and though you will not see me, I am the only one who would care for you.
You love me so much, you would have me be your whore?
For God's sake,
I do this for us.
I ask you to save some part of us!
Lord Robert, you may make whores of my ladies, but you shall not make one of me.
Your Majesty.
Of course, I shall deny it!
But Your Majesty must publicly dissociate herself from this most bloody act.
I never ordered it.
Of course, madam, of course.
You must also make conciliatory gestures towards the Spanish.
Your dependence upon their goodwill is even greater than ever.
I really must insist... The word
"must" is not used to princes.
I have followed your advice in all the affairs of my kingdom, but your policies would make
England nothing but either part of France or Spain.
From this moment, I am going to follow my own opinion, and see if I do any better.
Forgive me, madam, but you're only a woman.
I may be a woman, Sir William, but if
I choose, I have the heart of a man.
I am my father's daughter.
I am not afraid of anything.
I...
I deeply regret, madam, if I have caused you such offense.
Though God knows all my advice has only ever been to secure
Your Majesty's throne.
And I am grateful for it.
I have decided to create you Lord Burghley, so you may enjoy your retirement in greater ease.
Madam...
That will be all,
Lord Burghley.
Majesty.
Madam, if I may.
A prince should never flinch from being blamed for acts of ruthlessness which are necessary for safeguarding the state and their own person.
You must take these things so much to heart that you do not fear to strike.
Even the very nearest that you have.
If they be implicated.
It has been made known to me there is a priest abroad in the land carrying letters from Rome to those who mean to harm you.
Norfolk's power in court is growing.
It is said that he and his foreign allies are raising an army that will outnumber your own.
If Your Majesty does not act soon, then he will.
Find the priest and those who harbor him.
All right! Search every room! You, upstairs!
I will see everybody in this house!
Where is Lord Arundel?
He's not here, sir.
Do you know where your father is?
You were carrying letters from the Pope.
To whom were you told to give them?
Tell me, what is God to you?
Has he abandoned you?
Is he such a worldly God that he must play at politics and the filth of conspiracy?
Is he not divine?
Tell me the truth as if you were face to face with him now.
I'm a patient man, Father.
Sussex, Gardiner, Arundel.
A man will confess to anything under torture.
And Lord Robert Dudley,
Earl of Leicester.
Madam, this document was also found among the priest's possessions.
"From His Holiness, the Pope,
"to His Grace, the Duke of Norfolk.
"To legitimize your claim to the throne of England,
"His Holiness proposes that Your
Grace should take as your bride
"Mary, Queen of Scots,
"and overthrow Elizabeth... "
"The illegitimate and heretical whore
"who now sits upon the throne. "
All Norfolk need do is sign this paper, and treason would have been committed.
Then let him sign it.
And let it all be done.
In the future, when England is safe again and faithful, they will thank me for this act and forget the manner of it.
Is it not true?
Deliver this most carefully.
What is the meaning of this?
Your Grace is arrested.
You must go with these men to the Tower.
I must do nothing by your orders. I am Norfolk.
You were Norfolk.
The dead have no titles.
You were the most powerful man in England.
And could have been greater still, but you had not the courage to be loyal.
Only the conviction of your own vanity.
I think, Walsingham, a man's courage is in the manner of his death.
I'm content to die for my beliefs.
So cut off my head and make me a martyr.
The people will always remember it.
No.
They will forget.
Your Majesty knows that...
That I did it only for my faith.
Nothing more.
All your many kindnesses are remembered.
You must not think we care not for your children.
Your Majesty is merciful and forgiving.
What kept you, Walsingham?
I've been waiting.
Your Majesty.
They're all gone to the Tower, your friends.
Tell me, how should I serve thee,
Robert?
My course is run.
Just tell me why.
Why?
Madam.
Is it not plain enough to you?
It is no easy thing to be loved by the Queen.
It would corrupt the soul of any man.
Now, for God's sake, kill me.
No.
I think rather to let you live.
Madam, that is not wise.
Lord Robert has committed treason.
He must be made example of.
And I will make an example of him.
He shall be kept alive to always remind me of how close I came to danger.
I have rid England of her enemies.
What do I do now?
Am I to be made of stone?
Must I be touched by nothing?
Aye, madam. To reign supreme.
All men need something greater than themselves to look up to and worship.
They must be able to touch the divine...
Here on earth.
She had such power over men's hearts.
They died for her.
They have found nothing to replace her.
You will be damned for this.
Tonight I think I die.
Speak up!
Kat.
I have become a virgin.
Observe, Lord Burghley.
I am married.
To England.
* Mad about the boy *
* I know it's stupid *
* To be mad about the boy *
* I'm so ashamed of it *
* But must admit the sleepless nights *
* I've had about the boy *
* Walking down the street *
Excuse me. Excuse me.
So where are you from?
Mudgee.
A country girl.
I knew it.
How?
They're always shy.
You blushed when
I asked you to dance.
I did not.
It's just hot.
Have you a boyfriend?
Yes.
Oh, no, no,
I had one, but he's in Egypt or somewhere.
Egypt? Well, forget him.
He's probably chasing some dusky maiden...
'round the pyramids by now.
Know what they call this dance?
No idea.
The Crush.
Do they?
Well, I'm not really complaining.
You're so beautiful,
Rosemary.
So are you.
You can't say that, can you?
Men aren't--
I am not beautiful.
Yes, you are.
* I'm feeling quite insane and young again *
* And all because
I'm mad about the boy *
We've got everyone
Churchill can spare.
Thousands of bloody
Australians... drinking the place dry.
And all to fight tiny little...
Japanese chaps wearing spectacles.
They're all cross-eyed, you know.
Can't aim their damn guns.
At night, they can't see at all.
Do they all have white sticks and guide dogs?
Phyllis, it's true.
Really.
Cyril, remember that
Japanese gardener we had?
He had glasses as thick as--
The bottom of a gin bottle?
Yes.
Man: It's certainly a fact their weapons are useless.
My Godfather! All they can make are tin toys... and cameras that don't work.
If you don't mind me saying so-- even if you do--
I don't think
I've ever heard... such a total load of poppycock.
They've conquered most of Asia.
And those "little
Japanese chaps--"
You heard of a place called Pearl Harbor?
My dear, Topsy,
Adrienne,
Pearl Harbor was a surprise.
A sneak attack.
We're all ready and waiting for them.
I hope you're right.
[ Indistinct,
Talking Under Music ]
Thanks.
Ooh, that one come on a bit strong, eh?
Sort of. He's nice.
I just don't reckon he's got too much upstairs.
Come on, Oggi.
It's what they got downstairs... that really counts.
* A little magic that would finally *
* This dream that pains me and enchains me *
* But I can't because
I'm mad about the boy *
How's that son of yours,
Pargiter?
Where is he?
Westminster?
Robbie, what was that?
Just target practice,
I expect, my dear.
Target practice, at night?
Mmm?
Celia, run upstairs and get my wrap, will you, dear?
You're wearing it,
Mummy.
Oh, so I am!
I was just confused.
* And enchains me, but I can't *
* Because I'm mad about the boy *
* Mad about the boy *
Pardon me, please.
* I'm mad about the boy *
Good evening, ladies and gentlemen.
I'm sorry to disturb this evening's entertainment, but I have some rather unhappy news.
The Japanese have now crossed the Jahore Strait... and have broken through our lines.
And their guns have the city in range.
As you can hear.
But, Colonel, only today, the Straits Times reported... that the Japanese were being driven back.
I'm afraid, sir, the only true thing you read in the newspapers is the cricket scores.
Now, don't worry.
This hotel will be perfectly safe.
Why?
As I'm sure the Japanese high command... will want to stay here... and avail themselves of the facilities.
The city will fall within a few days.
All European women and children... are to leave immediately.
He can't mean us.
They're going to need us.
All soldiers to return to their units.
Good luck.
Well, now we know.
They can see, which we were told they couldn't.
And they can fight, which we were told they couldn't.
And they're here, which we were told they would never be.
Stop it, sir!
It's just up there.
Are you all right?
Come on, girlies.
Just leap down.
That's it.
Nurse: Thanks.
Take cover!
Now, this isn't quite... what I had planned for us.
Oh, really?
I should have sent you home months ago.
Well, at least Charlie will be surprised.
I wouldn't have seen him until your next leave.
Woman: Good evening.
Nice night for the collapse of an empire.
Come on, now.
Before you know it, we'll be back in Portsmouth.... sailing. You are a great outdoor girl, Rosemary.
That's one thing
I love about you.
And indoors? I thought you liked me indoors.
Indoors?
Mmm.
Oh, yes.
What rubbish!
Are you aware that my husband... is the head of Singapore--
He could be the King of Bongo Bongo, but you can still only take... one suitcase on board. That's it.
Oh, Celia, come along quickly.
Seaman:
Gangway stowed!
Mrs. Roberts:
Take care, Robbie.
Bye, Daddy.
Ropes away!
Take it to the end of the wharf, Chee Wan, and push it off.
Yes, sir.
Damned if I'll have some bloody Japanese officer driving it about.
Lifejackets on.
Do them up, nice and tight.
Just ask us if you don't know how.
I'm glad to help you, ladies.
Woman: Thank you.
Lifejackets on, please.
Just let me know if you need any help, miss.
So, what's going to happen to the men, do you think?
Woman: With us out of the way, they're probably already tucked up... with their Malayan girlfriends.
It seems so ridiculous, shoving us out at the last minute.
It seems now they should have... shoved us out months ago.
Oh, in all fairness,
Phyllis, we could have gone.
I think we chose to stay.
Tea?
Thanks. You're all Australians.
That's right.
We've been in Singapore for 2 months.
Now that they must really need nurses, you're leaving.
Phyllis!
Oh, no, it's true.
It's ridiculous.
I was a secretary at Army H.Q.
I saw the reports on what the Japs did to the nurses... in Shanghai and Hong Kong.
Seaman: Lifejackets on, please.
Do them up, nice and tight.
Oh, oh, don't go!
Lovely.
He can wait.
He'll still be there.
Seaman: Lifejackets on, please.
Give them back!
I haven't taken them.
Oh!
It's really quite simple,
Mummy. Look!
Like this.
Boy: Just give them back!
Here, let me do it.
Oh, thank you.
Oh, Mrs.--
Merritt.
Topsy Merritt.
Of course, the American.
Your husband runs the pineapple canning factory.
That's right.
Give them back!
I don't got them!
Perhaps the boys could be restrained a little.
I know... the conditions are somewhat unusual, but this is my cabin.
Your cabin?
It's my cabin.
I understood that Marty arranged this cabin for me.
My husband is an engineer... with coastal traders.
Mine is the head of the P.W.D.
Mine's in pineapples.
Look, girls, we're just going to have to get along.
It's only 5 weeks.
Oh, God!
Oh, very good.
Seaman: Keep your lifejacket on, please.
Oh, thank you.
Excuse me, ladies.
Uh, how much longer... do we have to wear these lifejackets?
A few minutes now, lass.
Once we're 11 hours out of Singapore, we're out of range of Jap fighters.
But the goddess Hera, the wicked stepmother, was so jealous of Hercules... that one night she crept into his room... and put 2 deadly snakes in his cradle.
But he was--
What's that?
Hard to starboard!
Aah!
Seaman: Abandon ship!
Turn sideways, Mummy.
Sideways!
Don't reckon she's got a sideways.
Are we sinking?
Yes, that's right, dear.
We're going to jump into the water, and it's going to be lovely.
Oh!
Take cover!
Get down!
Tommy!
Tommy!
Come on, children.
No, thank you, dear.
I'll stay here.
The ship is sinking,
Mrs. Roberts.
Hello, Mrs. Roberts.
Remember me?
Rosemary
Leighton-Jones.
We met at the cricket club?
Oh, oh, of course, dear.
How are you?
Some other time, maybe.
Yes.
Just take my hand,
Mrs. Roberts.
We'll jump together.
Of course.
Woman: Get in the raft!
Get a place in the boat!
Could be worse,
I suppose.
Do you think so?
Well, the water could be cold.
That's true.
Must be Sumatra.
Yes.
It's amazing how everyone's just disappeared.
It's like one of those girls' adventure annuals... my mother gave me every Christmas.
It's an adventure I could certainly do without.
They always had happy endings.
Oh! Now I'm cold.
If you spend a penny, it'll warm you up.
Huh?
We used to swim in the North Sea... in our school hols.
It was freezing.
We always did it.
Oh!
It's working.
I'm starving.
Yeah, me, too.
Rosemary Leighton-Jones.
My husband is
Dennis Leighton-Jones.
Royal Malayan Volunteers.
How do you do?
Susan Macarthy.
Australian Army
Nursing Corps.
Adrienne Pargiter, wife of tea planter.
How do you do?
Hello.Yeah.
You are English ladies.
Yes.Yes.
Australian.
Ah, yes.
I was for some years in Singapore.
I was a, uh, newspaper correspondent.
May I ask what you ladies are doing here in Sumatra?
Our ship was sunk.
By your planes.
We swam to shore.
What can I say?
Except that attacking the enemy... is a characteristic of war.
The Prince Albert was full of women and children, not soldiers.
A matter of regret.
More than that, there's a Geneva convention... laying down the rules of war.
Japan has signed no Geneva convention.
If a war has begun, it can only mean... the time for rules has ended.
The aim is to win.
Good luck.
Up until you reminded him of the Geneva convention,
I thought we were going to be invited to dine.
Oggi!
Susan! Susan!
How-- How did you get here?
Jap navy boat picked us up.
What were they like?
Oh, gentlemen compared with this lot.
English Empire
Number 10.
Nippon Ichiban,
Number 1.
Hai!
I am Colonel Hirota.
And uh, I am in command of this--of this place.
Days of British and Dutch peoples... exploitation of Oriental people all finish.
Now they exploit
Oriental people.
You Europeans had great
"proudry" and arrogance.
Think Oriental people inferior.
Situation now
100% reversed.
Colonel,
I'd like to know... how long you expect us to remain... in these perfectly--
Aah!
Woman: Take it all to the kitchen, please.
Please, bring everything to the kitchen.
Not so bad, really.
Woman: Uhh!
Disgusting.
At least it's food.
I went to an English boarding school.
I meant by those standards.
It's funny. In the kitchen, there seemed so much.
What do you mean?
Well... How do we know they're dividing it up fairly... those Dutch?
Oh, come off it.
They don't speak English.
Well, I think the food that you saw... had to be divided up among over 400 people.
That's correct.
It doesn't go far.
I don't know that the Dutch are noted for their cooking.
No, not like the English people.
All I can say is,
I hope this is over... very, very soon.
When our boys get here, it'll be just a few weeks.
Your boys? What about our boys?
Frankly, I don't care which boys do it, just as long as we're going home.
She's right. Any boys will do me.
Thought they might.
I've heard they're sending all the noncombatants home.
What do you think about that, now?
Where did you hear that?
Oh, just around and about.
We're all noncombatants,
Mrs. O'Riordan.
No. I mean like me.
See, I'm Irish.
We're neutral.
There's
2 Portuguese ladies.
And you... well, you're...
I have a German passport.
Well, then...you're on their side, aren't you?
So you think.
Already I have escaped
2 madmen in Europe.
Now I'm catched by the oriental version.
You're from Singapore.
I don't think we've met.
I don't think.
The English don't invite Jewish refugees... to the cricket club.
My husband and me, we are doctors in Asian hospital.
Oh, you're a doctor.
That is what I say.
You like perhaps...
I send to Leipzig for the certificate?
Oh, no. I--
Anyway... they're sure to let you go.
No. Japanese men don't like lady.
Call Japanese lady zashiki bita.
Means "old pig in back of house."
Sounds strangely familiar.
I--I was in China when the Japanese invaded, and I think the people they despised most... were Europeans, then prisoners, then women.
Well... that's us.
All three.
Quick.
You see man before?
Well, no.
Only here.
So, you know, some little Oriental men... big like this.
And some big
European men... like this.
You never can tell.
Really.
Mm-hmm.
Bugger!
And I thought being a secretary... was a rotten job.
What if they do win the bloody war?
They'll have us doing this forever.
They're not going to win.
We'll win.
The British don't lose wars.
Yeah? I reckon if I'd paid attention in school,
I could think of a few.
They tell me you are a model.
Oh, yes, it's true.
I think that you're very beautiful.
Yeah.
You have been to Paris?
Many times.
Ohhh... wonderful clothes and... the lovely people.
The elegance.
In Singapore, did you model?
Oh, no. I was visiting my husband there.
Oh.
I'm modeling next season for Hartnell's in London.
London! Ohhh...
Well, I hope I am.
Ja.
You know, you could do some work, Mrs. Tippler.
In this heat?
We're all supposed to work if we're not sick.
You're just lazy.
Lazy
You.
Ohhh...
I'm completely... buggered.
Phyllis!
Well, I'm sorry.
There's simply no other word for it.
I'm buggered.
You know, this place sure ain't Alcatraz.
We could be under that fence... and into that jungle... before you could say "boo."
Well, don't forget to write, Topsy.
You would die in that jungle. It's full of snakes.
Boa constrictors.
Horrible.
Yeah, well, after 3 months in this place... it doesn't sound so bad.
The locals will betray you.
The Japanese have got them all terrified.
That's right. Some of the men escaped, and they brought them back.
They cut off their noses and their ears, and they hung them upside down, so they did.
How awful.
All the loose change... must've fallen out of their pockets.
They'd have hated that.
But it's true!
Yeah, well, you've convinced me.
This place ain't so lousy.
Room service is a bit slow.
Mmm.
What men,
Mrs. O'Riordan?
That guard.
You know, the one that looks like the actor.
Mr. Moto.
He's in all those...
Japanese detective films.
Peter Lorre.
Mr. Moto. Yes,
Mrs. O'Riordan, but what men?
I was telling you.
That guard was saying... there's a camp full of men over the hill... just a few miles away.
Now, they're Dutchmen,
I think.
But he says there are some from Singapore.
Oh, Hudson insisted on growing... masses and masses of red carnations.
Woman: Ooh, lovely.
Hey, Dr. Mizushima.
Get me some quinine, eh? And some bandages... and morphine und a stethoscope.
Even some aspirin is good.
Just Mercurochrome.
Mercurochrome. I know.
I-- You Japanese think it cures everything.
Then you give me some cigarettes, eh?
I'm a German, your ally.
I'm not one of these
British colonialists.
Uhh. Only Japanese?
Taste like cow dung.
How she is?
Oh, Doctor... can't get her to eat anything.
I think it's just... uhh... too much for her, really.
For a lot of them.
They don't adjust, they die, my dear.
How many gone since we come to this wonderful place?
Oh, 4.
Not so bad.
Be worse by Christmas... with the bad food and no medicine.
Christmas?! The war will be over by Christmas.
Don't you bet your fuddler on that one, my darling.
What's a fuddler?
I think I can guess.
Oh, fuddler.
Do you think she's really a doctor?
What do you mean?
Well, who'd know? She certainly got herself... out of working in the field--
Shh!
...and cleaning out the lavatory.
Buck up, Phyllis.
It's Christmas.
Where's the champagne?
The plum pudding
Oh, it's lovely,
Adrienne.
Perhaps now might be a time to deal with that dog.
He'd make a nice stew.
It's only a little dog.
It don't eat much.
Yes, but he does eat what we could give to the children.
But how will Mrs. Roberts cope without him?
She's right, Edna.
It'd be the end of her.
I think... this must be the servants' quarters.
Tell Chen Li... only to come when we call.
Mommy, that's not Chen Li.
That's Wing.
Aiya...
Malaria bad.
So sorry. Yes.
We can't get any quinine?
I think she's been stealing... the sugar again, dear.
You have to watch these Chinese, Robbie.
I get quinine.
[ Shouting
In Japanese ]
[ Shouting
In Japanese ]
[ Shouting
In Japanese ]
Not so young no more.
Quinine?
Oh. Thank you.
Did they see you?
I think maybe no.
Ohhh...
They catch them?
Can't tell.
Here you are,
Mommy. Take this.
That black market could get us all into trouble.
They warned us. They'll cut our rations gain.
She's right.
Here, Mommy.
This can help.
Wait! Wait!
[ Man Shouts
In Japanese ]
What is it?
There's no more gin.
It's sake.
Japan drink.
Very strong.
You no like?
Mmm. I wouldn't say that.
Look who's here.
Kempei-Tai.
What's that? Sounds like a Chinese dish.
Would be better. It's
Japan's secret police.
Ho!
Oh!
Oh!
Ohhh! Oh! Oh!
Uhh!
Ohh!
Ho!
Uhhh!
Wing.
Ohh!
Ohh!
Aaah!
Aaah!
"How silent is this place.
"The brilliant sunshine filters through the trees.
"The leaves are rustled by a gentle breeze.
"A wild and open space,
"by shrubs, pink-tipped,
"mauve-blossomed, is o'ergrown.
"A hush enfolds me,
"deep as I have known,
"unbroken, safe, by distant insects drone.
"A jungle clearing.
"A track... through which we bear our load to Him."
It is our Paradise Road.
How silent is this place.
How sacred is this place.
[ Women
Speaking Dutch ]
One would think they would've learned... a few words of English by now.
They understand a lot more than they let on.
Oh. Wait a minute.
I want my soap.
Where's that soap?
Soap?
Soap?
Soap. Soap.
Ah. Ah.
What else?
Nay.
Nay.
Don't give me that.
I was here. Right there!
I had to write an I.O.U.... for 5 for that soap, and I want it now!
Ladies! Ladies!
Please!
Calm down!
What is this?
So you think they took your soap?
I don't think so.
You don't think so?
Well, I bloody well think so.
Maybe we should just have a look... in their ugly bloody dresses or their silly wooden shoes.
Ladies.
See soap.
Ohhh...
Elgar.
What?
You were humming the Elgar Concerto.
[ Hums Notes
From Concerto ]
Do you know I went to the very first performance.
Felix Salmond.
Leeds, 1920.
That was almost my last concert.
The church sent me to China a few months later.
But... I mean, you're not a musician, are you,
Miss Drummond?
Your poem. I assumed you taught English.
Oh, I taught a bit of everything in China.
But... I did study music at Durham.
Miss Drummond... would you care to take a turn with me... in the gardens before lights out?
I'd be delighted,
Mrs. Pargiter.
Oh. I'm so sorry. I've interrupted your prayers.
Oh, perhaps, it's just as well.
I was about to ask God... to smite Captain Tanaka and the Snake... with a severe case of dysentery.
I studied music at the Royal Academy... under Sir Henry Wood.
What did you play, the violin or the viola?
The violin.
How did you know?
Just a guess.
You were humming... the Symphonie Concertante the other night, and that has leads for both instruments.
Yes.
I came out to Singapore with my father, and I met my husband William, who's an absolute darling, but music was fairly low on the list of priorities... for Singapore society.
Very low, judging by the stories I've read... by Mr. Somerset Maugham.
Oh, well... if you've read him, you think we do nothing but drink G & Ts... and murder one another and indulge in ceaseless--
Wife swapping?
What will they think of next?
Do you know,
Miss Drummond,
I feel I owe you an apology.
Me
My-- My snobbery.
We never mixed with missionaries in Singapore.
We were taught to look down on them.
Oh, what a tedious lot, most of us, and very self-righteous.
You're not serious.
Not really. Well... maybe just a bit.
Oh, dear.
Back we go, or the head prefect will be after us.
Do you know,
Mrs. Pargiter,
I've just had a wonderful idea.
An orchestra?
You're crazy.
Do you expect the Japanese would give us instruments?
Not at all,
Harriet.
I thought I'd made that clear.
We don't need instruments.
I don't think so, Adrienne.
After what happened, no one's in the mood for a sing-along.
But that's just the point.
I don't think it's such a bad idea.
Do you read music,
Mrs. O'Riordan?
Read it? Didn't know you could read it.
But I can sing it all right.
I was in the choir at school.
I think it's a harebrained idea, Adrienne.
We hardly have the strength to talk.
You want my advice, you'll forget the whole thing.
You think the Japs will agree?
Not on your Nellie.
They have forbidden any meetings... or religious services.
We can't even have classes for the children.
You must have perfect recall, Miss Drummond.
I envy you.
They say Mozart could play any piece... after hearing it only once.
But I'm cheating. I know
Dvork back to front.
It's probably full of mistakes.
I don't think so.
It's rather complicated, isn't it?
You'll have your work cut out for you... when you conduct it.
I'm not conducting it.
You are.
Me?
Well, you trained at the Royal Academy.
Yes, but I was a violinist, and that was years ago.
Miss Pargiter, you read music.
And Sir Thomas Beecham isn't available.
Uhh--
After tea, we will go--
Use "shall."
"Shall" is more refined.
...shall go to the member's stand... and vatch the--
And watch.
And watch the gentlemen play the cricket.
Yes!
What are we gonna sing?
I love
Rudy Vallee.
It won't be
Rudy Vallee.
Mrs. Roberts, what about you?
Oh, my dear,
I was a stalwart... of the Cathedral
Choir of Singapore, and my husband Robbie was--
You have a lovely voice, Mummy.
Well, perhaps
I should consider it.
Lovely.
I'll put you down.
Tan, Millie, you've heard about our choir.
You'll join us, won't you?
What kind of people will be in this group, dear?
Mummy!
What's wrong?
I simply asked... what kind of people would be in this group.
People like us, Mommy.
Prisoners of the Japanese.
But that's irrelevant, dear.
One has a certain position.
I mean, one can tolerate the Dutch, some of them, but--
Mummy, I--
What is it, Celia?
Try to finish your sentences.
Do you remember Wing?
Well, of course I do.
Horrible business.
Horrible.
But who knows what kind of contraband... she was trading in?
I mean, probably some Oriental--
Quinine, Mommy. She'd gone to get quinine for you.
You know what
Colonel Hirota said... about writing anything.
They find that, they could execute the whole bloody lot of us.
Perhaps we're all being put... in a precarious position, Adrienne.
Perhaps.
I happen to think... it's worth risking.
Oh!
The Japanese will only find out if somebody says something.
And what's that supposed to mean?
Somebody tells them every time one of us... rolls over in bed.
You've always got plenty of cigarettes.
Do you think that--
I've never heard anything so insulting.
Well, someone told them it was Wing... trading outside the fence that night.
Well, it certainly wasn't me!
What about that Jew doctor?
What-What about that one?
Always making eyes at that bloody guard.
Susan, Mrs. Tippler, that's enough.
S'truth! You were always... the shyest little thing at nursing school.
Maybe nobody there ever got my goat.
Well, then.
Who's first?
Um...Mrs. O'Riordan?
If you would.
* Ah *
[ Hums Scale
Slightly Off
Thank you.
And...
Mrs. Cronje.
Mrs. Cronje, would you, please?
* Ah *
[ Hums Scale
Confidently ]
Quick. Hide it.
Aah!
Oh, God.
Eh, I reckon... she's gonna be all right, Mrs. Roberts.
She might have... a bit of a funny bark.
Thank you, dear.
Thank you so much.
Oh, thank you.
Oh, Tillie, come and have some water, dear.
[ Continues,
Indistinct ]
You okay?
Okay.
No, not so okay, but I breathe, so it's not so bad.
I think you might have a touch of malaria.
I might be able to get some...quinine.
I'll get some whiskey.
Cures everything.
So, after the war, darling, you go to medical school, yes?
Me?
Yes, you. Why not?
You know, my father'll want me back at the station.
He never even wanted me to go into nursing.
Station. He is a railway master?
No. I was--it's a sheep station.
It's like a farm.
You do what you want, darling... not what your father want.
He get plenty of those big Australian men... to work on the station.
So. The Japanese end the ladies' choir... before it even begin.
Oh, not at all. And it's a vocal orchestra, not a choir.
But you can't possibly go on with it, not if they won't let everybody meet.
It's only the large group that attracted the Snake's attention.
You don't give a damn about us... the whole camp.
I beg your pardon?
Isn't all this just so you can lord it... over the rest of us, boss everyone around?
The whole thing might be a bit... grandiose, Adrienne.
I mean, how many women conductors... are there, anyway?
None that I know of.
Well.
Well, then this is probably a first; something to be proud of.
No. Excuse me, Mrs. Roberts, you were late.
Oh, I don't think so, dear.
Yes, Mrs. Roberts.
You must watch me.
I was watching you.
Perhaps everyone else was early.
No, Mrs. Roberts.
Once again, everyone.
* Ah *
Hai!
Hai!
[ Shouting
In Japanese ]
Aah!
Oh!
Ohhh... boring man.
[ Shouting
In Japanese ]
Aah! Oh!
Ohh!
Is there something we can do for you, Sergeant Tomayashi?
Huhh!
"Conner... Griffin... Munn."
Well, it isn't just our orchestra women, is it?
No.
I can't see what it means.
Do they have something in common?
Some of the Dutch girls are on here, too.
Well, repatriations?
Executions?
You're there,
Rosemary.
And Susan and Topsy.
I know. God, what else could they do to us?
It says the main gate after tenko.
We'd better not go.
We just won't go!
Just say you have another engagement.
Mistake. They'll do something awful... if we don't go.
I know what this is.
What?
This is all the younger girls-- all the more attractive ones.
Am I on there?
No!
No!No!
This is Japanese
Officer's Club.
This is Japanese officer men.
Most were educated and refined.
Some speak English... like Englishmen from Oxford.
What rubbish.
Japanese officer look for volunteer... to work in club.
Volunteer have plenty of food... and satin sheet.
And we're the acceptable volunteers?
That is correct interpretation.
Disgusting, is what I call it.
I'd rather kiss a leper from Leopoldville... before I let any of that lot touch me.
Well, we don't have to stay.
They're not forcing us.
Right.
Our own satin sheets?
Ladies who stay in beautiful house... will please to walk in direction indicated.
No. You can't be serious.
Too right I am.
You know bloody well... we've got
Buckley's chance... of getting through the war... in that camp.
You think
I want to end up... in some shallow grave... in Sumatra?
The war's going to be finished soon.
You said that over a year ago.
Bett!
Bett!
Hot water. Ahem.
Is there hot water in this club?
Plenty hot water.
Plenty soap.
Soap!
Soap!
It's been so long.
Oh...
Topsy, don't be absurd.
Japanese officers gonna be any worse... than most of the creeps we've all known?
Probably.
What about Marty?
Well, what he don't know--
Then what about the vocal orchestra?
I'll be an alto short if you go.
Are you asking me to give up food and soap... and God knows what else, so I can starve and sing?!
Yes.
I suppose I am.
Lady... please.
A good Catholic sister like you.
I just can't believe you're not more--
Censorious?
I'm not their judge.
If they want to survive, maybe they will this way.
The will to survive is very strong, stronger than anything.
I just can't believe what you're saying.
Very well, Phyllis.
I've just lost four sopranos in that lot.
You're going to have to join us now.
I'm not interested in your bloody choir.
Well, you could stop lying around and whinging... and jolly well get interested.
Well.
What about you two?
Oh, no, not me. I--
Susan?
Look, to be honest,
I don't like the kind of music you're doing.
It's got no tune.
You really don't know... what you're talking about.
No?
No.
All right, now, altos, it's two notes.
* Mmm *
* Mmm *
* Mmm *
All right?
Ahem.
* Mmm *
* Mmm * Yep.
How many do you have today?
Two. I found them both just staring up... like this.
Just wait till
Mrs. Van der Weyden dies.
She's so big with beri-beri, it will take 10 women... just to carry her out of the hut.
Yeah. We'll have to jump on her... to get her in the coffin.
Dr. Verstak?
Yes. Over here.
So, how it goes, the English ladies' choir?
I can't tell.
Lots of starting and stopping, it seems.
Not much singing.
You sound very disapproving.
Oh, but I'm not.
It will keep the ladies busy, and that is good, but the noise they will make !
It is not for someone... who's heard the great choirs of Leipzig... and Vienna.
What are you doing?
You're pulling out their gold fillings.
Quite right, my dear.
They are of no further use to their owners.
You should not be so squeamish... with all that you have seen.
I think this takes the cake.
So this is how... you get your whiskey and cigarettes.
That is so, and the small amount of medicine that we have.
How do you think we get that, the Japanese give it to us?
I trade with the guards.
Ah!
Amazing how strong.
Anyway, it's best you know all this... in case something happen to me.
What do you mean?
I should carry on doing this?
Only if you want some of the ladies in the camp... to stay alive. Ah!
So what do you sing?
Oh, um... it's all stuff
I've never heard.
Oh, uh, some...
The
Dvork?
Yeah.
They sing Dvork?
Yes, that's it.
You don't know Dvork?
What? They don't teach you anything in Australia?
Only about sheep?
Aah!
Aah! Uhh!
I have perhaps seen you before.
I think not.
I think so.
The insolent lady to whom I gave a ride.
Japanese soldiers never attack women.
You refused to bow to him.
He struck you on the face, quite rightly, then you struck him.
No. He was drunk.
I could smell the sake.
He grabbed me from behind--
Silence!
Uhh!
[ Speaking
Japanese ]
[ Speaking
Japanese ]
Colonel Hirota say incident with the lady... most regrettable, but is death for strike Japanese soldier.
Lady have very bad manners.
Manners very important to Japanese people.
[ Speaking
Japanese ]
That is all.
You're starving and beating woman and children.
You steal our Red Cross parcels for yourselves.
You don't give us any medicine for the sick, not even the quinine for the bloody malaria everyone's got.
You make us work like slaves.
You don't even let us write to our families, and you have the cheek to sit there... and lecture us on good manners!
Tomorrow, lady will be executed.
Please, please!
You tell Colonel Hirota that I saw what happened.
The Colonel knows that I'm a nun, and nuns never tell lies.
The lady only raises her hands... to protect herself.
Like this, and then she hit him by accident, and he fell back into the latrine.
Colonel Hirota say he regret, but the incident all dealt with by Captain Tanaka.
Captain Tanaka with Kempei-Tai.
So Captain Tanaka is in charge of this camp?
I understood it was you,
Colonel Hirota.
Two broken ribs is not so bad.
Better than...
[ Imitates
Knife Cutting ]
Yes?
You will not be able to move around... for maybe a week, maybe two.
That's impossible.
Everything's arranged for Saturday.
It's our anniversary.
Anniversary?
We've been here two years.
Oh... what an anniversary.
Well, you do as you like.
I'm only the doctor.
I told a lie, but God will forgive me.
I think He will even congratulate me.
I have some medicine.
Come.
Cheers.
Oh!
Sister.
Whiskey?
I love whiskey.
I'm a nun, not a saint.
And you, are you a saint?
No, no. That would make me fall over.
Oh, I've never drunk whiskey before.
Let us hope that you do worse things... in your life, darling. Prost.
Bottoms up.
Prost.
Faith, you can do very little with it... and nothing without it.
Cheers.
Yes, Japanese whiskey, not scotch.
Still, we can't have everything.
You got some lipstick?
Orange?
All the rage in Palembang.
Look!
Oh!
Look at these!
Oh, gee, it's been a long time since I kissed a man.
There's nothing nicer.
Only one thing.
Oh?
Heh heh heh!Heh heh!
You look lovely,
Helen.
Some man will be very lucky one day.
Not if we stay here.
Then we meet no one.
We shall not meet anyone.
Shall.
But we won't stay here.
One day we shall all go home.
Ja.
There's gonna be trouble.
Japs won't take this lying down.
Come on.
I'm fallin' down like an old house.
Would you look at me legs?
They look like that little wooden man.
Pinocchio.
Aye.
That's the fellow.
Uh-oh. Winner... of the 1944 Dale Carnegie
Charm School Award,
Tokyo division.
You!
No go!
Stay!
Topsy.
You like?
[ Man Speaking
Chinese ]
It's for you from Chinese man.
"My darling, I hope this finds you well.
"I'm in the camp at Talang-Batu.
"I'm escaping with some of the Aussies.
"See you in Sydney.
Hotel Australia.
All my love."
Bugger the emperor.
Bugger the emperor.
Edna?
Yeah.
Fancy having a flag with a poached egg on it.
Colonel Hirota proud to report further victory... of Japanese armed forces.
American imperialists... removed from many
Pacific Island, and Australia bombed many times.
Australian government... want to make peace with Japan.
That'll be the day.
Churchill and Roosevelt, number 10.
Emperor Hirohito,
Son of Heaven... number one.
You!
You!
Come here.
Oh, no.
Woman: At least it's not me.
You spoke.
What did you say?
I said, "Warm, isn't it, for this time of year?"
[ Speaking
Japanese ]
Sorry.
When you say to Captain Tanaka... that all wars end, you tell him that perhaps the invincible Japanese army... will lose this one.
Who knows?
And if they do, his treatment of this young woman... will not result in the Allies... building any shrines to him.
Maybe they even hang him.
Yes.
I do not think you are in a position... to threaten
Captain Tanaka.
Not a threat.
Advice only.
I'm his ally.
You tell him.
I think it's impossible.
Oh, I can understand this, but, you try... yes?
Uhh!
Lift her up.
Oh, my dear... that's one to tell your grandchildren.
Oh, I knew he was bluffing.
Yeah, show-off.
It's just humming, that's all.
Anybody could do that.
Miss Drummond.
Come.
Bravo!
Marvelous.
I loved it.
Woman: Brava!
Do you know,
Miss Drummond,
I just realized I don't know your Christian name.
It's Daisy.
I've always hated it.
I wish to be called
Margaret.
Well, then,
Margaret it is.
Why not?
A gift... from Colonel Hirota.
Soap.
Oh, thank you.
Oh, this will go a long way among 300 of us.
Colonel Hirota say you will please to sing... one Japanese folk song.
Tell him no.
Oh... but this is very difficult to say.
Tell him my appreciation of the Japanese culture... is at a low ebb.
I think I make some other reason.
As you wish.
You don't hate them, do you?
Why not?
I've tried, but I just can't... bring myself to hate people.
The worse they behave, the sorrier
I feel for them.
Are you comfortable,
Mrs. O'Riordan?
I'm all right.
Gently.
No go!
Boys no go!
Too big.
Go men's camp.
What?
No!
Mom, please!
It'll be all right!
Don't let anybody push you around.
Ugh!
So, Mr. Tomio... where are we going now?
Yes, what's happening?
I don't know.
I think you do know.
No, I don't.
Tell us something,
Mr. Tomio.
Be a man.
General MacArthur back in Philippines.
Chase Japanese soldier all over place.
Try it.
Ohh!
I always wanted to be an engineer, but my father wanted me to be a nun.
Don't worry.
I love God, even though I sometimes wonder what he's doing.
Here.
Arigato.
If my guys are coming, why don't the Japs just go... and leave us here?
I don't think they've ever done anything... that made much sense.
It's the satin sheet brigade.
I knew I should've joined that bunch.
I think maybe we all should've.
Up there is the mountains of Loebok Lingau.
My father would take us there... in the summer.
In the jungle, there are many tigers.
At night we close all the windows and doors, or they come in the house.
I lie there and I hear them... walk up and down the verandah.
Pom, pom.
So heavy they are.
I can hear them breathing... through the other side of the shutter.
One morning,
I opened the door... and a big tiger is sleeping on the front stoop.
Oh.
Ahh.
I spent my summers... at my family's home in Dorset.
No tigers.
Just rain.
Soft days, we called them.
That's where
I met Dennis.
We were 17, and he was my school friend's brother.
I thought he was the best-looking boy...
I'd ever seen, but it took him so long to kiss me,
I thought it was never going to happen.
And then it did?
Oh, yes!
Ha ha ha!
We were in my father's study.
I nearly fainted.
We were so young, they didn't want us to see each other, so we pretended we weren't in love.
So you keep seeing each other?
Oh, yes.
We didn't fool anybody.
I realized love is like a flame.
It burns and is visible to all.
Ah.
Be careful.
Are you all right?
Is Susan here?
Ugh!
If I ever get out of this,
I'll never say a word against New Jersey.
You'll never get out of this.
None of us will ever leave Sumatra.
Come on.
A little towards me.
That's it.
Snake!
Aah!
Where?
Snake.
Kill it.
We'll eat it.
Aah!
Don't give up now.
Dennis vouldn't want that.
Wouldn't.
Rosemary, remember, we are going to Lord's... to watch the gentlemens play cricket.
Then we have some tea.
Snake's not so bad.
The grasshopper's delicious.
Wonder what
Bing Crosby's up to now.
Bing Crosby?
Why?
I miss him.
That's all.
Beaut he is,
Bing Crosby.
We must get the orchestra started again.
We've got to have a rehearsal.
Oh.
Yes, of course,
Margaret.
Show the Japanese we're still alive.
Still got some spirit left.
That bloody choir.
Totally exhausted everyone.
They won't be able to find enough people now... for a barbershop quartet.
Oh, shut up, Harriet.
Shut up?
You were bullied into joining by Adrienne.
That's true.
Best thing that ever happened to me.
Here you are, Mummy.
Mummy, you have to eat something.
No, dear.
I really don't mind dying.
No.
I learned a great deal in the camp.
I did nothing, you know, in Singapore.
Mummy, you're not going to die.
Yes, dear...
I am.
I'm really sorry that I won't see... your dear father again.
I have so much to tell him.
So much.
Doctor.
Rosemary.
The beautiful
English girl.
Paradise Road.
Tomorrow... perhaps tonight.
Sometimes God reaches down... and pulls the wings off his butterflies.
Wh
She doesn't want to live anymore.
Perhaps now she realizes the world is not a place... where lovers are reunited and good always wins.
She saw her husband at the railway yard.
The great love affair.
I can't say I'd pine away after any of my husbands.
If I fall in love, then I hope it is like that.
Good luck, my dear.
"Father, in captivity...
"we would lift our prayer to Thee.
"Keep us ever in Thy love.
"Grant that daily we may prove...
"those who place their trust in Thee, more than conquerors may be."
"Give us patience to endure.
"Keep our hearts serene and pure.
"Grant us courage, charity, greater faith, humility."
"Readiness to own Thy will, be we free or captive still."
Amen.
All: Amen.
Amen.
What are you doing?
The French eat snails, don't they?
Yes, but I think those ones will make you sick.
I'm here, Margaret.
You can't die now.
Not now.
She's asking for something.
"The Lord is my Shepherd.
"I shall not want.
"He maketh me to lie down in green pastures.
"He leadeth me beside the still waters.
"He restoreth my soul.
"He leadeth me in the paths of righteousness...
"for His name's sake.
"Yea, though I walk through the valley...
"of the shadow of death,
"I will fear no evil,
"for Thou art with me.
"Thy rod and Thy staff, they comfort me.
"Thou preparest a table before me...
"in the presence of mine enemies.
"Thou anointest my head with oil.
"My cup runneth over.
"Surely goodness and mercy will follow me...
"all the days of my life,
"and I will dwell... in the House of the Lord forever."
That's what I wanted.
Amen.
The war... is over.
Who won?
Once more... we can be friend.
I have done my best for you.
I know... not enough.
But I could do no more.
Woman: We weren't number 10.
Oh, Tillie!
Does this mean... it's back to picking up groceries, laundry, and all that? My God!
For you, my dear.
For me, it is luxury hotels... and limousine cars.
Yes.
Dr. Verstak.
Yes, Macarthy.
Are you really a doctor?
Yes and no.
My husband is a medical doctor.
I'm Doctor of Philosophy.
I hurt no one.
Maybe I help.
Is wanting to survive so bad?
Susan.
Dear Susan.
Well... we made it.
Yes, we did.
Some of us.
I can't believe it!
[ Vocal Orchestra Performs
Londonderry Air ]
He's coming! He's coming!
All right, now. Let's give a good Colorado welcome here!
- Hello, sir. You're most welcome.
- Thank you, thank you.
All right, everybody, listen up.
I want to introduce you to Oscar Wilde.
Welcome to the Matchless Silver Mine.
Today, we opened up a new seam.
We're gonna name it after you.
How very kind.
I look forward to collecting the royalties.
Now, why don't you follow me over here.
Great lecture you gave last night.
We're honored to have you visit us.
If you'd just like to step in here.
There ya go, sir.
I thought I was descending into hell... but with these angel faces to greet me, it must be paradise.
Is this the way to my personal seam?
Of course, I should have preferred gold... purple and gold.
But we live in a Silver Age, alas.
So much that is exquisitely beautiful is wrought from suffering, from pain... from toil... broken bones and blistered skin.
Benevenuto Cellini understood silver.
He took the metal that you mine so nobly down here... and transformed it into works of art for popes and princes.
Cellini... is he a wop?
The Renaissance man, in every sense.
The greatest silversmith the world has ever seen... but a genius in life as well as art.
He experimented with every vice known to man.
- He committed murder.
- He killed a man?
More than one.
Thank you.
I'd like to meet Cellini.
Why didn't you bring him with you?
I'm afraid he's dead.
Who shot him?
Is Miss Lloyd connected to Lloyd's Bank?
A pity.
But she's comfortable, Ada.
A thousand a year.
Then I congratulate you, Lady Wilde.
Now that Oscar's been to America and sown his Wildean oats... it's time he settled down.
- But weren't they very rough?
- No, charming. Well, charming to me.
With each other, it's true they could be a little brusque.
They hanged two men in the theater one night before I gave a lecture.
I felt like the sorbet after a side of beef.
I know your friend is famous, Ada... notorious, at least... but I don't understand for what.
For being himself, Lady Mount-Temple.
Don't Americans talk the most wonderful slang, though?
Well, I did hear one lady say...
"After the heel-lick
I shifted my day goods."
What on earth did she mean?
She meant that she changed her clothes after a dance.
Connie, my love, Lady Mount-Temple is so anxious to meet you.
I knew your father, Miss Lloyd.
She's delightful, and not stupid.
Really, not stupid at all.
Is that quite a reason to marry her?
Well, I must marry someone.
And my mother has our future planned out in every detail:
I'm to go into Parliament, we're to have a nice house... and live a proper, settled life... literature, lectures... the House of Commons, receptions for the world in general at 5:00.
How dreary.
Your attendance will not be required at those.
But your sphinxiness will be essential for our intimate little dinners at 8:00.
It will be a grand life, a charming life.
I see Constance will be busy preparing the dinners... but what will she contribute to the literature and lectures?
She'll correct the proofs of my articles.
Oh, what a little sunbeam.
I do love her, Ada. She's...
Silent.
- I find her very silent.
- But so sympathetic.
And I do need an audience.
I don't see how you can possibly take it all in, reading at that speed.
Try me.
I know better.
Where are we dining tonight?
At the Leversons.
Then you must show your true colors as a propagandist for dress reform.
The cinnamon cashmere trousers, I think.
And the cape with the ends that turn up into sleeves.
I don't think I can wear those trousers anymore.
A new Wilde for the world!
Another genius for Ireland!
We shall have to buy you a whole new wardrobe.
Ernest proposed to me under that statue.
Really, the things that go on in front of works of art are quite appalling.
The police should interfere.
We were made not to marry, whereas you and Constance are so happy.
Everyone says so.
It's perfectly monstrous how people say things behind one's back... that are absolutely true.
So your audience has proved as responsive as you hoped?
Receptive, yes. Responsive?
I always wonder what she's thinking.
I expect it's about the baby.
Yes. Well, Constance is such a natural mother.
She's invited Robbie into the nest while his parents are abroad.
Robbie is Canadian.
You can tell by his youth.
Have you been brought to England to mature, Mr. Ross?
Well, that was the idea, but it doesn't seem to be working.
I've lived here since I was three, and you see the pitiful result.
Robbie comes from a long line of imperial governors.
His grandfather was
Prime Minister of Upper Canada.
Or was it Lower Canada?
The British will take their class system with them wherever they go.
They apply it even to continents.
Are you planning to govern a continent?
No. I don't even plan to govern myself.
Very nicely turned leg.
Hello, sir.
Shall I give you these, my love?
I'll see if I can find a cab.
Coming through there, gents.
Mind your backs.
Can you move out of the way, please?
Looking for someone?
Cab, cab!
Bedtime.
Just one more cigarette.
No. No, thanks, Robbie.
Don't stay up too late, Robbie.
Good night.
Good night, Oscar.
Good night, Robbie.
He's asleep.
He's so beautiful.
Almost as beautiful as his mother.
I don't know what I'd do without you, my constant Constance.
Good night, my dear.
Good night.
A university education is an admirable thing, of course... so long as you remember that nothing worth knowing can ever be taught... least of all at Cambridge.
But you told me... in ancient Greece the older men taught the younger.
They drew them out.
I look forward to being drawn out immensely.
Yes, well, Greek love... platonic love... is the highest form of affection known to man, of course.
You also told me... that the Greeks put statues of Apollo in the bride's chamber... so she would have beautiful sons.
But I can't help noticing that here the statue's in your bedroom.
Constance prefers a bath.
She was so beautiful when I married her, Robbie.
Slim, white as a lily... such dancing eyes.
I've never seen such love in a pair of eyes.
She was...
Nothing should reveal the body... but the body.
Didn't you say?
There has to be a first time for everything, Oscar... even for you.
Hush. There's a good little fellow.
Come on. Come on, now. There.
Now, come on, Cyril.
It's time for your bath.
Be a good boy. Don't make such a fuss!
You've got to get undressed. Come on.
I know you hate it.
Boys, Mrs. Wilde, they never do what they're told.
Oh, we're going to have a girl next time.
- Aren't we, Oscar?
- I must go.
Good night, my dear.
Now you behave, Cyril.
Remember, a gentleman should take a bath at least once a year.
- Good night.
- Come on, Cyril.
It's not that bad.
I shan't be back till late.
I'm dining with the Asquiths.
Hush now.
Come on, now.
Do you love me?
I feel... like a city that's been... under siege for 20 years.
Suddenly the gates are thrown open... and the citizens come pouring out... to breathe the air and walk the fields... and pluck the wildflowers.
I feel... relieved.
You don't worry about Constance?
"Every afternoon, on their way home from school... the children used to play in the garden of the selfish giant."
Is that the garden where we play?
No, this is much larger and lovelier than that, with soft green grass.
There's grass where we go.
Yes, but are there 12 peach trees that burst into delicate blossoms... of pink and pearl every springtime and bear rich fruit in the autumn?
Are there, Mama?
I don't think there are, Cyril, no.
Would you hand me a matchstick, and I'll put this hussar's head back on?
Thank you.
"The birds sat on the trees and sang so sweetly... that the children used to stop their games to listen.
'How happy we are here,' they said to each other."
I don't know how they could be happy if there was a giant.
There wasn't, you see, not yet.
He was away, visiting a friend.
You're always away.
Yes, but I only go for a night or two at a time, and I always come back.
Whereas this giant, the one whose garden it was... he'd been away for seven years, staying with an ogre in Cornwall.
"And after seven years, when he'd said all he had to say... because his conversation was very limited... he decided to return home to his own castle.
When he found the children playing in his garden, he was very angry.
'What are you doing here?' he cried.
And all the children ran away.
'My own garden... is my own garden!' said the giant.
'And I won't allow anyone to play in it except myself.'
So he built a high wall all around... put up a large notice board on which was written, in capital letters:
'Trespassers will be prosecuted."'
Arthur, you're trespassing.
Cyril will now eat you.
It's Mr. Ross, sir, with Mr. Gray.
Heavens, I must fly.
The horses of Apollo are pawing impatiently at the gates.
I beg your pardon?
Papa must go.
You will come back and finish the story?
Of course I will.
Come on, Cyril. It's almost teatime.
I really don't know why people bother painting portraits anymore.
You can get a much better likeness with a photograph.
A photograph's just one moment in time... one gesture, one turn of the head.
Yes, portraits are not likenesses, Mr. Gray.
Painters show the soul of the subject, the essence.
The essence of the sitter's vanity, you mean.
Well... this is a portrait of Lady Battersby as a young woman.
She's over there, as a matter of fact.
I must go and console her.
How nice to see you.
Poor thing.
I expect in her heart... she thinks she still looks like this.
If we could look young and innocent forever...
Do you think we'd want to?
If our souls were ugly, yes.
Give a man a mask, and he'll tell you the truth.
Have we had enough of this?
Shall we go and have dinner somewhere?
Dorian Gray is the most wonderful book I've ever read.
And the end, when the servants break in... and they find him wizened, old and dead... and the picture young again...
I fainted.
My family say it's dull and wicked.
Dull?
It's sublime.
It's about the masks we wear as faces... and the faces we wear as masks.
That my son should have written a work of such...
People say it's full of dangerous paradoxes.
Hardly anyone will speak to us anymore.
We're ceasing to be respectable.
Artists care nothing about respectability.
It's only jealousy.
It's the spite of the untalented for the men of genius.
Where is Oscar?
He's in the Lake District, writing a play.
- A drama?
- A comedy.
Robbie Ross has gone to keep him company.
I do like Robbie.
And they both love you.
Oh, it'll be a great success.
Oscar's made for the stage.
- Author! Author!
- Author!
Oscar, please!
- Magnificent!
- Well done, everybody.
Ladies and gentlemen,
I have enjoyed this evening immensely.
The actors have given us a charming rendering of a delightful play... and your appreciation has been most intelligent.
I congratulate you on the great success of your performance... which persuades me that you think almost as highly of this play... as I do myself.
Absolutely splendid, Oscar.
An absolute triumph!
- Thank you so much. Thank you.
- Well done.
How sweet of you to say so.
It went so well, Oscar.
Even better than I'd...
They loved it. They absolutely loved it.
And I, dear boy, love you.
Congratulations, Oscar.
Thank you.
It's good to see you.
Hello.
Mr. Wilde. Wonderful, really wonderful.
- Oscar.
- Sphinx!
You really must be careful.
You're in grave danger of becoming rich.
- It was wonderful. I knew it would be.
- Thank you, Robbie.
Everyone's dying to know who the real Lady Windermere is.
The real Lady Windermere is every woman in this room, and most of the men.
- Oscar!
- Lionel!
It's a wonderful play.
My cousin Lord Alfred Douglas is here.
He would like very much to congratulate you.
- Wonderful.
- Oscar, this is Bosie Douglas.
We met last year.
Lionel brought me to tea at Tite Street.
How could I possibly forget?
I love your play.
The audience didn't know whether you meant your jokes or not.
You shocked them... especially with your speech.
But the more frivolous you seem, the more serious you are, aren't you?
- I love that.
- Thank you.
I always say, the young are the only critics... with enough experience to judge my work.
- Splendid, Oscar.
- We need shocking.
People are so banal.
And you use your wit like a foil.
You cut through all those starched shirt fronts.
You draw blood. It's magnificent.
I wish you'd draw some blood down in Oxford... though you'd need a miracle.
All the dons at my college have dust in their veins.
At which college do you educate the fellows?
Magdalen.
My own college.
I shall claim the privilege of a graduate and take tutorials with you.
Come soon, then.
They're threatening to send me down.
How could they be so cruel to one so beautiful?
Dons... they're so middle class.
Oscar, you've shocked the whole of London, smoking on stage like that.
Excellent. Then we shall run for a year.
Oscar, you must say something to Marion Terry.
She was good, wasn't she?
So good, I think she wrote most of the lines herself.
- Excuse me, Lord Alfred.
- Bosie, please.
- You must be so thrilled, Oscar.
- I know.
Isn't it humiliating?
" 'My own garden is my own garden, ' said the giant.
So he built a high wall all round it... and put up a notice board:
'Trespassers will be prosecuted.'
He was a very selfish giant.
The poor children had now nowhere to play.
They tried to play on the road... but the road was very dusty and full of hard stones, and they did not like it.
They used to wander round the high wall when their lessons were over... and talk about the beautiful garden inside.
'How happy we were there, ' they said to each other."
I hope he was a very beautiful boy.
Well, pretty, you know, in a street-Arab sort of way.
There's no point being blackmailed by an ugly one.
What's tiresome is he's threatened to show my letters to my father.
Who will show them to all his friends for the excellence of their style.
You don't know him. He's a brute.
Really. He carries a whip wherever he goes.
He used to beat my mother.
He beat my brothers.
He thrashed me from the age...
My dear boy.
Of course, he's practically illiterate.
He probably won't understand the letters anyway.
By an unforgivable oversight,
I've never been blackmailed myself... but my friends assure me that a hundred pounds will usually suffice.
Really?
God, I... You promise?
Leave it to Lewis...
George Lewis... my solicitor.
He knows what he's doing.
He acts for the Prince of Wales.
Leave me not to pine
Alone and desolate
No fate seem fair as mine
No happiness
So great
Isn't he killing, Mr. Wilde?
- And nature day by day
- He's perfect.
He's perfect in every way.
In accents clear
This joyous roundelay
He loves me
He is here
He loves me
He is here
That was lovely. Well done, Bosie.
Yes, absolutely enchanting.
More tea, anyone?
I don't want to sit here.
I want to sit there.
You heard what Lord Alfred said.
I want everyone to look at us.
I want everyone to say, "Look, there's Oscar Wilde with his boy."
So, what shall we let people see us eating?
Fois gras and lobster and champagne.
For two. We do everything together.
Very good, Mr. Wilde.
I think he enjoyed thrashing me.
All my family are mad.
My uncle slit his throat last year in a railway hotel.
Which station?
Euston.
All life's really serious journeys involve a railway terminus.
And now I must go to the station myself.
Sarah Bernhardt thinks she knows better than I do how to play Salome.
Stay.
Please stay.
At least till this evening.
Sarah is divine, as you are.
She will be wonderful at the play's climax when Salome kisses the lips... of the severed head of John the Baptist.
"Ah, thou wouldst not suffer me to kiss thy mouth, Jokanaan."
Jokanaan is an old Hebrew name for John.
"Well, I will kiss it now.
I will bite it with my teeth as one bites a ripe fruit.
Yes, I will kiss thy mouth, Jokanaan.
Thy body is white like the snows that lie on the mountains... like the snows that lie on the mountains of Judea... and come down into the valleys.
The roses in the garden of the queen of Arabia... are not so white as thy body."
I'm not good enough for him anymore.
I'm just the son of a carpenter, while Bosie...
Oscar's only ever been smitten before.
He was smitten with me.
He was smitten with you.
I wasn't smitten.
I loved him.
Well, now he's fallen in love.
I'm halfway to hellfire. I'm not joking.
Someone else was a carpenter's son.
I've given in and become a Catholic.
I find confession... wonderfully consoling.
I can't go to confession... when I want to kill Bosie... or myself.
- Oscar's furious.
- He has no right to be.
He knew perfectly well the Lord
Chamberlain would never allow... a play with biblical characters.
Oscar doesn't think there should be censorship of plays at all.
Of course there must be censorship.
Or people would say what they meant, and then where should we be?
- When is he coming to join us?
- He's not.
He must stay and look after Lord Alfred.
Those Douglases are always ill, when they're not demented.
One of them roasted a kitchen boy on a spit.
And Bosie's father, Lord Queensberry... he's a dreadful man, Constance... doesn't believe in God or marriage.
A marquis should set a proper example... or what are the upper classes for?
I tell you...
I wouldn't want a daughter of mine to marry a Douglas.
I haven't got a daughter.
Plenty of time still, my dear.
I see.
It's my fault.
After Vyvyan was born, all I could think of was the children.
So that's why Oscar spends so much time with his men friends.
Oscar needs disciples.
Lord Alfred's a poet.
A very fine poet, Oscar says.
He's studying classics.
Oscar and he talk about Plato.
There's nothing wrong.
Really, there isn't.
It's not whether there is anything wrong.
It's whether or not there appears to be.
That's all people care about.
The empire was not built by men like Bosie Douglas.
"Then the spring came... only in the garden of the selfish giant it was still winter.
The birds did not care to sing in it, as there were no children.
And the trees forgot to blossom.
The snow covered up the grass with her great white cloak... and the frost painted all the trees silver."
Let's go out.
If you like.
The thing about renters is you don't have to consider their feelings.
But if someone is willing to give one pleasure, one should show gratitude.
No. Money, that's all they want.
What's wonderful about going to Taylor's is no one pretends.
You just do it and be done with it.
I do love you, Oscar.
But variety is the spice of life.
You can watch me, if you like.
You must attempt to keep a grasp upon your sobriety.
That is disgusting.
We'll have less of that.
- Good evening.
- Lord Alfred.
Alfred Taylor, this is Oscar.
Delighted to make your acquaintance, Oscar.
Charles Parker. I remember you.
Hello, Oscar.
Charming to see you again.
- Do you smoke?
- I do everything.
- Yeah, everything that pays.
- Expertly, I might add.
Mr. Wilde, some wine.
Thank you.
- It's a nice case.
- I want you to keep it.
Thank you.
So, this is a den of vice.
I should call it more of a garden.
Such pretty flowers, Mr. Taylor.
How wise of you to keep the curtains closed.
They would never grow in the common light of day.
- Who are you calling common?
- Certainly not you, dear boy.
You seem to be a flower of the rarest hue.
Bosie never told me that you were a botanist, Mr. Taylor... that you roam the earth, climbing the highest peaks of the Himalayas... and plunging into the darkest forests... of Borneo to return triumphant... to this delightful conservatory in the shadow of Westminster Abbey... to exhibit your specimens.
The boys are all Londoners, actually.
Impossible. I see Londoners every day... but never such exotic blooms as these.
Does he always talk like this?
Not when he's in bed.
I am discreet.
Bosie is far too grand for that.
He wants everyone to know.
- You must understand...
- I must be with young people, Robbie.
They're so frank and free.
They make me feel young myself.
That's all very well, but what would you say... if someone wanted to go to bed with your son?
Cyril's eight.
What will you say when he's 18?
Nothing. He must do as his nature dictates... as I only wish I had done.
"'I do believe the spring has come at last,' said the giant.
He jumped out of bed, and looked out of the window."
- What did he see?
- You tell me.
No, you tell it.
All right.
"He saw the most wonderful sight.
Through a little hole in the wall... the children had crept back into the garden and were sitting... on the branches of the trees.
And every tree that he could see, there was a little child.
The trees were so glad that they..."
They covered themselves with blossoms!
Blossoms!
"And were waving their arms gently above the children's heads.
And the birds were twittering and singing above them with delight.
And the flowers were looking up through the grass and laughing.
Oscar, it's time the boys changed, or we'll miss the train.
Come on, boys.
Papa, can't we stay?
Papa's got to work.
He's got to finish his play.
Yes, poor dear Papa.
Poor Papa.
Poor, poor, poor, poor, poor Papa.
Where is Oscar?
We haven't seen him at all.
Where do you think he is? He's working.
He is a writer, after all.
I hear your father's threatening to shoot Lord Roseberry.
Really? He usually prefers the horsewhip.
Says he's been buggering your brother.
Well, Roseberry is Secretary of State for Foreign Affairs... and Francis is his private secretary.
Actually, Francis is about to get engaged.
What's your father talking about, then?
He's obsessed with sex.
He thinks Oscar's buggering me... as though I'd allow anyone to do that.
I'm sick of the country.
Let's get back to London.
What's the point of us living together if you're always working?
- I have responsibilities... a family.
- God, not that again!
I ask my friends over from Oxford, and you just disappear.
I'd be better off staying at my mother's.
- At least she's there.
- You asked me to take this house...
Now I'm bored with it.
- And with you.
- I can't give it up.
It's paid for in advance.
Until I finish my new...
Bosie, dear... you have beauty, you have breeding... and, most glorious of all, you have youth.
But you are very fantastical if you think that pleasures... don't have to be earned and paid for.
Whenever I want to do anything, you say you can't afford it... but you give all those renters cigarette cases.
But I've lavished presents on you!
Every penny I've earned from my play
I have spent on you!
I'm sure you've been counting.
You're so mean and penny-pinching... and middle-class, all you can think about is your bank balance.
For God's sake! This is intolerable!
No gentleman ever has the slightest idea what his bank balance is!
You're absurd!
Telling everyone how they ought to live.
You're so vulgar!
I never want to see you again, ever.
All right, then.
If that's what you want, then you go!
Get out!
"But in the farthest corner of the garden... it was still winter, and in it was standing a little boy.
He was so small, he could not reach up to the branches of the tree.
'Climb up, little boy, ' said the tree.
But the little boy was too tiny."
Egypt is lovely this time of year.
- But you mustn't idle your time away.
- Mother.
And I want you to promise me something: not to write to Oscar Wilde.
I can't do that. I love Oscar.
I love him as a disciple loves his teacher.
But he's not fit to teach anything.
He's evil.
Do you really think your own son could love someone evil?
I just wish I could love Oscar as loyally, devotedly... unselfishly and purely as he loves me.
But I'm not as good as he is.
I probably never will be.
Good-bye, then.
"I adore simple pleasures.
They are the last refuge of the complex.
But, if you wish, let us stay here.
Yes, let us stay here.
The Book of Life begins with a man and a woman in a garden."
"It ends with 'Revelations."'
Yes. Mr. Tree, may I?
I'm delighted, of course, that you find my lines funny... but please don't try and make the audience laugh with them.
They should sound completely spontaneous and natural... as though people spoke like that all the time.
Yes, of course.
Let's try again.
You should break with Bosie more often, Oscar.
Then we'd have more of your spontaneous and natural plays.
Bosie was envious.
That's why he stopped Oscar working.
- That's not true.
- Of course it is.
His poems aren't nearly as good as you pretend... and he knows it.
- He's just a shallow little...
- Rivulet.
Bosie's a child, a vulnerable child.
He needs love.
We all need love.
But which of us can give it?
Wish you a merry Christmas
We wish you a merry Christmas
And a happy New Year
Good tidings we bring
To you and your kin
We wish you a merry Christmas
And a happy New Year
- Cracker time!
- It is cracker time.
I won this time. Look. There.
One for you, one for me.
"And the giant's heart melted as he looked out.
'How selfish I have been, ' he said.
'Now I know why the spring would not come here.
I will put that little boy on top of the tree... and I will knock down the wall, and my garden shall be... the children's playground forever and ever. '
He was really very sorry for what he had done."
This is really nice, even though...
"So he crept downstairs and opened the front door quite softly... and went out into the garden. that he did not see the giant coming.
And the giant stole up behind him and took him gently by the hand... and put him up into the tree.
And the tree broke at once into blossom... and the birds came and sang on it, and the little boy... stretched out his two arms... and flung them round the giant's neck... and kissed him."
I don't care what people think.
I love you.
It's all that matters to me.
It was agony being away from you.
Well, here I am.
Oh, Bosie, you're my catastrophe, my doom.
Everyone says so, even me.
I missed you.
I thought you might like something to celebrate your return.
When I saw them in the window, they begged me on their knees... to make them yours.
I'll put them on now. They're superb.
- I'll sit there. I want a proper table.
- Is there something wrong, my lord?
This young fool wants me to sit by the service door.
Oh, God, my father.
I'm extremely sorry. He's new, and he didn't know who you were.
Bosie, you're not going to flee.
Give me the menu.
I'll have the pea soup and then the salmon.
Will you have it with us, Papa?
I'm lunching with Oscar Wilde.
Will you join us?
I told you never to see that vile cur again.
He's not vile or a cur.
He's utterly delightful. Come and see.
How do you know what he's like when you've never met him?
You're not a man to be influenced by other people's opinions.
Oscar, you've never met my father, have you?
Lord Queensberry.
Bosie has told me so much about your exploits on the racetrack.
I've never heard such bad luck as yours with the Grand National.
Bosie tells me that you would have won... but that your cousin wouldn't let you ride the horse?
Bloody fool said I was too old.
Why, you're never too old.
I'd ridden Old Joe on the gallops.
Came in at 40 to 1.
No horse could ever have carried me over the jumps, I fear.
What are you having?
- Pea soup and salmon.
- Then I shall join you.
Spring is the time to lunch on salmon... though I always think it tastes so much nicer if you've caught it yourself.
You fish?
I used to when I lived in Ireland.
My father had the most charming hunting lodge... on an island in a lake.
- Do you know the west of Ireland?
- Not really.
Whereabouts, exactly?
The Christians go around pretending they know who God is and how He works.
I've got no time for that tomfoolery.
If you don't know something, you should stand up and say so... not go around pretending you believe in some mumbo jumbo.
I can believe in anything, provided it's incredible.
That's why I intend to die a Catholic, though I couldn't possibly live as one.
Catholicism is such a romantic religion.
It has saints and sinners.
The Church of England only has respectable people... who believe in respectability.
You get to be a bishop not by what you believe but by what you don't.
That's true enough.
It's the only church where the skeptic stands at the altar... and St. Thomas the Doubter is prince of the apostles.
No, I couldn't possibly die in the Church of England.
Where do you stand on cremation?
I'm not sure I have a position.
I'm for it.
I wrote a poem:
"When I am dead, cremate me."
That's how it begins.
"When I am dead, cremate me."
What do you think of that for an opening line?
It's challenging.
I'm a challenging sort of man.
That's why people don't like me.
I don't go along with the ordinary ways of thinking.
Then we are exactly alike.
Another glass of brandy?
I find that alcohol, taken in sufficient quantities... can produce all the effects of drunkenness.
You were there for ages.
You stayed talking till after 4:00.
I knew you'd like him.
Well, he's got charm, I admit that.
But that's bad.
Men shouldn't be charming.
It's disgusting.
I don't think much of his action.
Let's have a look at the bay.
Mind you, Wilde's no fool.
Talks wonderfully, really wonderfully.
But that means nothing when what he says is such rot.
Worse than rot... evil.
Which is why I insist you stop seeing him forthwith.
"Insist"? What's that supposed to mean?
It means I will cut off your allowance if you don't do as I say.
- Trot him up and down a bit!
- Look, Father.
You wasted time at Oxford pretending you were going into the Foreign Office.
Thank God you didn't when that Jew queer Roseberry... can become Foreign Secretary and bugger all the juniors, including your brother.
That's all lies.
You spent your whole time writing obscene poetry.
My poems aren't obscene.
They're in the manner of Wilde.
That's filthy enough for me.
Have you ever actually read any of Oscar's poems?
I wouldn't sully my mind with perverted trash like that.
Tell him to pick his feet up!
He's not straight!
Are you calling Oscar a pervert?
Because that's libelous.
I'm not saying he is one.
I'm saying he's posing as one... which is worse.
His wife's divorcing him.
Did you know that? For sodomy!
- That's completely untrue!
- I hope it is.
Because if it were true,
I'd shoot him on sight.
You will cease to see Wilde, or I'll cut you off without a penny.
As though I wanted your money... what little you have left from your tarts.
How dare you speak to your father like that.
What a funny little man you are.
Come back here, you filthy-minded sissy!
You're absurd!
And you're nothing but a bum-boy!
You're pathetic!
I'm a bloody good shot.
Better than he is.
I'll shoot him through the heart if he threatens me.
Hadn't you better use a silver bullet then?
Here's one for the Black Douglas.
Bosie, for God's sake!
And one for his liver!
One for his lights!
One for his stinking rotten soul!
I'll save one for myself.
My own father... he wants to kill me.
My life is everything I ever wanted.
I have fame.
I have recognition.
With two plays about to open in London...
I may even have money.
The world is at my command... yet I can't command myself.
I can't command my feelings for you.
- Thank you.
- Constance, my dear.
How nice.
I brought you your letters.
You haven't been home for so long.
Thank you.
It's so much more convenient for Oscar living in the West End... when he has a play coming on.
I'm like a northern businessman keeping an eye on his factory.
The boys ask for you all the time.
They're longing to see you.
Oscar has to make sure the play's a success, Constance.
I'll come round this afternoon... for tea.
It's the dress rehearsal this afternoon.
Tomorrow then. I'll come tomorrow.
Well, tomorrow then.
Good-bye, my dear.
Good-bye.
Good-bye, Constance.
- Something like that.
- I'm not trying to get anything.
I hope so. It would be rather fun.
Perhaps a codfish.
Codfish. I've a strong feeling that codfish live rather deeper.
- Do you think we'll have skate...
- Possibly.
I don't think there'll be anything for our table tonight, my love. No luck.
I think I'd better stay.
You're getting a cold.
No, no. I'm all right.
Let's get the boys some ices.
- Boys, you stay and look after nanny.
- Oh, all right.
We'll look after nanny.
I could take the boys to the dentist on Thursday on their way back to school.
But the whole point of them having dentistry now... is so they can stuff themselves with sweets for a week before we lose them.
- Are you quite sure?
- Bosie'll look after me.
Get your coat on, quick!
I've got a present for you!
Oh, God.
- You're not still seedy, are you?
- Bosie, where have you been?
I've had no one to talk to, no one to look after me.
Don't be so pathetic.
I've found you the divinest boy.
- Bosie, you promised Constance...
- Bugger Constance.
I'm not your nanny.
Come on. We're going out.
Bosie, please.
You look such an idiot lying there. Revolting.
- Have you forgotten how to wash?
- As a matter of fact...
I'm dying for a glass of water.
- You know where the jug is.
- Bosie, darling.
It stinks in here. You'll be wanting me to empty your chamber pot next.
Well, I emptied your chamber pot.
I looked after you.
Well, I'm not looking after you.
Not now.
You don't interest me.
Not when you're ill.
You're just a boring middle-aged man with a blocked-up nose.
- Bosie, dearest boy.
- Shut up!
"Dearest boy, darling Bosie."
It doesn't mean anything.
You don't love me. The only person you've ever loved is yourself.
You like me. You lust after me.
You go about with me because
I've got a title. That's all.
You like to write about dukes and duchesses... but you know nothing about them.
You're the biggest snob I've ever met... and you think you're so daring because you fuck the occasional boy.
Please, you're killing me.
You'll just about do when you're at your best.
You're amusing... very amusing... but when you're not at your best, you're no one.
All I asked for was a glass of water.
For Christ's sake! There you are then!
Now will you shut up about the fucking water?
There are two boys waiting out there.
If you're not coming,
I'll fuck them both myself.
I'll take them to the Grand and fuck them in front of the whole hotel... and I'll send you the bill.
Drink this.
- It will help your fever.
- He's ashamed of loving men.
His father bullies him, his mother spoils him... and then berates him for being spoiled.
Neither of them gives him any real love.
They're torturing him.
And what's truly dreadful is that when... he can't bear it and has one of his... he becomes exactly like his father.
- And he hates himself for that.
- You're too kind about him.
You can't be too kind about someone who's been so hurt.
Yet if I go on trying to come between Bosie and his father... that'll destroy me.
Bosie's quite capable of destroying you on his own.
Look how much you wrote while he was away.
Two wonderful plays which will run for years.
Back comes Bosie, and what have you written since?
You know how much I... love and admire you... but you're throwing your genius away.
- For what?
- It's highly ironic.
Queensberry thinks Bosie and I are locked in nightly embrace... and in reality, we've been the purest model of Greek love since...
Bosie doesn't like doing it with me, but I've loved him.
- I've educated him.
- But he's never grown up.
And he never will.
I'm not taking him back, Robbie.
Not again.
I can't.
I've been very foolish, very fond... but now I must grow up myself.
Oh, please, don't do that.
You're an artist.
Artists are always children at heart.
Oh, Robbie, I sometimes I wonder if...
Back page, sir.
My God. Francis Douglas.
- What?
- Bosie's brother.
He's been found shot. He's dead.
But he's just got engaged.
Poor, poor Bosie.
He'll be utterly distraught.
He killed himself.
It was my father. He drove him to it.
I'm sure your father's just as upset as everyone else.
No, he's not.
He says it's a judgment on Roseberry and my mother... and me and you.
We've got to stop him, Oscar... before he drives my whole family to suicide.
I promise you, I won't let him hurt you ever again.
I promise.
It's not enough. I want him stopped.
I want the whole world to know what he's done... what an evil man he is.
Table, my lord?
Is Lord Alfred here?
And that shit and sod Wilde?
No, my lord. Not tonight.
Bugger must be at Kettner's.
Is my son staying here?
Is Lord Alfred Douglas staying here?
No, sir, he's not.
- What about Wilde?
- No, sir.
If I find they have been staying here...
I'll give you the biggest whipping of your life.
Well, I expect you two would like a drink after your exertions.
I must ask you to leave, Mr. Wilde.
My dear man, what are you talking about?
At once, please.
What's the matter? My father cracking the whip downstairs, is he?
- My lord.
- Bosie.
You're not frightened of what this little man thinks, are you?
I think the pleasures of the evening should be resumed elsewhere.
You're such a coward.
You say you despise convention... but you're the most conventional man I know.
Come on then. If we're going, let's go.
Until tomorrow, Tommy.
Good-bye, sir.
I goes in, and there's all this tropical fruit laid out.
Wait a minute, Oscar!
Alfred, how nice to see you.
And Charlie, looking so well.
I'm afraid I'm busy this evening, but we must have dinner again soon.
It's not a question of dinner.
I got a letter of yours to Lord Alfred.
It's a nice letter, Oscar. Beautiful.
"Lips like roses. The madness of kisses in ancient Greece."
Then I expect it's one of my prose poems.
There's a gentleman's offered me 60 pounds for it.
Then you must accept, Alfred.
I've never received so large a sum... for a prose work of that length in all my life.
Tell him I'm delighted that someone in England values my work so highly.
- Well, he's gone away.
- He's gone to the country.
Well, I'm sure he'll be back soon.
Oscar, look. You couldn't let us have something, could you?
Bit short at the moment. You know.
Of course. Of course.
Here's half a sovereign. Now you mind you take good care of that letter.
Lord Alfred is going to publish it in sonnet form in his new magazine.
For fuck's sake.
It's no good trying to rent you.
You just laugh at us.
- Here.
- Thank you.
He can be very careless, Lord Alfred.
What a wonderfully wicked life you lead.
You boys. You boys.
- Where is he?
- Mr. Wilde is not receiving visitors.
- Where is he?
- He's busy, sir. I cannot...
I wish you would get out of my way.
Get out of my way!
Excuse me, sir, there's a gentleman...
You!
Listen to me.
You're a bugger!
I don't allow people to talk to me like that in my house, Lord Queensberry... or anywhere else.
I suppose you've come to apologize for the lies you've been spreading about me?
I've come to tell you to leave my son alone, you sodomite.
The marquis appears to be very obsessed with other people's sexual activities.
Has it anything to do with his new wife...
I wonder, and the fact that she's seeking divorce for non-consummation?
Unless you swear that you'll have nothing more to do with Bosie...
I shall go to Scotland Yard.
You can go to the devil.
You and your... Who is this gargoyle?
You're a queer! And a sham! A poseur!
If I catch you and Bosie together again,
I'll give you such a thrashing.
I believe Lord Queensberry once invented some rules for boxing.
I've no idea what they are... but the Oscar Wilde rule is to shoot on sight.
- Now, kindly leave my house.
- You can shut up!
I shall leave when I'm damn well ready.
It's a scandal what you've been doing.
All the scandal is your own.
Your treatment of your wives... your neglect of your children... and, above all, the depraved insistence... that they be as tyrannical and unloving as you are yourself.
Arthur, this is the Marquis of Queensberry... the most infamous brute and the least tender father in London.
Never let him into my house again.
Very well then.
Let's get out of this stew.
- Out of the way, then!
- I'm sorry, sir!
I'm very sorry, but it's just not possible!
What are you doing? Rotten vegetables?
Give that to Oscar Wilde.
Thank you, sir. We'll take care of it.
I wanted to give it to him personally as a bouquet.
I daresay you did, sir, but you're not going to.
He's a cur and a sod!
And a bugger!
You remember that!
I always told you, Gwendolen, my name is Ernest, didn't I?
Well, it is Ernest after all.
I mean, it naturally is Ernest.
Yes, I remember now that the general was called Ernest.
I knew I had some particular reason for disliking the name.
Ernest! My own Ernest!
I knew from the first you could have had no other name.
Gwendolen, it's a terrible thing for a man to find out suddenly... that all his life he's been speaking nothing but the truth.
Can you forgive me?
I can, for I feel you are sure to change.
- My own one!
- Laetitia.
Frederick! At last!
- Cecily! At last!
- Gwendolen! At last!
My nephew, you seem to be displaying signs of triviality.
On the contrary, Aunt Augusta...
I've now realized for the first time in my life... the vital importance of being earnest.
Allen, you were wonderful!
Thank you all so much.
They're calling for you.
You must come on. Curtain, curtain.
- No, no, George, no, no.
- Come on!
- Mr. Wilde, sir.
- Yes?
- For you.
- Thank you.
"For Oscar Wilde...
Ponce," is it?
"Ponce and 'somdomite."'
"Posing as a sodomite."
He's illiterate... illiterate, ignorant.
- It's hideous.
- We've got him now, Robbie.
He wrote it down. The porter read it.
That makes it a public libel.
Now we can take him to court.
For God's sake.
Oscar, you mustn't do that.
That would be... I mean...
We've just been waiting for a chance to get him in the dock... and show the world what a swine and shit he's always been.
- To me, my mother, my brothers.
- But he'll plead justification.
He'll call all the renters as witnesses for the defense.
Of course he won't.
He doesn't know what a renter is.
I hear he's had detectives following you ever since you came back from Egypt.
He can't prove anything. But we can.
We can prove he's the vilest man that ever walked the earth.
Tear the card up, Oscar.
Pretend you never got it.
Are you mad?
That's our main piece of evidence.
I'm sure if Oscar went abroad for a few months... lived on royalties while your father calms down...
- Whose side are you on?
- Bosie, if this goes to court...
Oscar will have to tell lies... perjure himself... everything will come out.
Whatever the result, it will be utter disaster.
You're an enemy then.
No, no, Bosie, please. Robbie... you're a dear boy, but I can't even think of leaving the country.
As a matter of fact, I can't even leave this hotel. I can't pay the bill.
We can raise you money, for heaven's sake.
Anyway, what about your royalties?
We shall need all the money we can get for the libel case.
My father can't go on making all our lives a torment like this.
Oscar, I beg you.
I'm not going to run away, Robbie.
I'm not going to hide.
That would be the English thing to do.
If you take Queensberry to court, all hell will break loose.
All my life I've fought against the English vice: hypocrisy... not that that's the point.
The point is, Queensberry's already caused the death of one of his sons.
If I don't try and stop him now, whom will he harm next?
He's avoiding me, Robbie.
I know what everyone's saying, but it's not true.
It's not true.
- Is it?
- Of course not.
Oh, it's so shaming.
No, I find it easier to stand.
I'm going to Torquay for a month, try to get my back right.
- Oscar's been so busy...
- I'm sure he'll be terribly upset... when he knows you've been in so much pain.
The truth is, I need some money.
Not even sure where he is to ask for it.
It does seem rather hard when he's having such an extraordinary success.
I think I can find him.
I keep hearing these stories about Bosie and his father.
- I'm sure you don't want to...
- Oh, yes. I do.
Men think women should be protected by not knowing.
Not knowing only makes it worse.
Is there going to be trouble?
I hope not.
I believe a prosecution would certainly succeed... provided... and I stress this... provided there is no truth whatever in the accusation made by Lord Queensberry.
Of course there's no truth in it.
Then so long as I have Mr. Wilde's assurance that that is indeed the case.
There is no truth in the accusation whatever.
Good. Excellent.
The defense, I understand, will be led by Mr. Edward Carson.
Old Ned? I was at college with him in Dublin.
No doubt he will perform his task with all the bitterness of an old friend.
In writing a book or a play,
I'm concerned entirely with literature... with art... I do not aim at doing good or evil... but at making a thing that will have some quality of beauty.
Well, listen, sir. Here is one of your pieces of literature.
"Wickedness is a myth invented by good people... to account for the curious attractiveness of others."
Do you think that true?
Oh, I rarely think anything I write is true.
"If one tells the truth, one is sure, sooner or later, to be found out."
That is a pleasing paradox, but
I do not set store by it as an axiom.
Is it good for the young?
Anything is good that stimulates thought, at whatever age.
Whether moral or immoral?
There's no such thing as morality or immorality in thought.
What about this then?
"Pleasure is the only thing one should live for."
I think that the realization of one's self is the prime aim of life... and that to realize through pleasure is finer than to do so through pain.
I am, on this point, entirely on the side of the ancients, the Greeks.
How long have you known Alfred Taylor?
About two years, two-and-a-half years.
- Is he an intimate friend of yours?
- I wouldn't call him that, no.
But you went often to his rooms?
About seven or eight times, perhaps.
Did you know Mr. Taylor kept ladies' dresses in his rooms?
Did you know he was notorious for introducing young men to older men?
I never heard it in my life.
Has he introduced young men to you?
Yes.
- How many young men?
- About five.
- What were their occupations?
- I really don't know.
Oh, well, let me tell you, Mr. Wilde.
You met a man called
Charles Parker there, I believe.
Yes.
Charles Parker is... a gentleman's valet.
You met his brother there too, I believe.
- Yes.
- He is a groom.
I didn't care tuppence what they were.
I liked them. I have a passion to civilize the community.
I recognize no social distinctions at all of any kind.
To me, youth... the mere fact of youth... is so wonderful that I would sooner talk to a young man for half an hour... than, well, than be cross-examined in court.
So, do I understand that... even a boy you might pick up in the street would be a pleasing companion?
I would talk to a street Arab with pleasure if he would talk to me.
- And take him to your rooms?
- Yes.
And then commit improprieties with him?
Certainly not.
You withdraw your libel action against Lord Queensberry.
Well and good.
But there remains the question of the evidence...
Lord Queensberry's evidence against you.
My information is that the Crown wishes to pursue the matter.
In which case, an arrest and a charge of gross indecency... are certain to follow.
The maximum sentence is two years hard labor.
Nine months hard labor is reckoned to be more... than a man of our background... can survive.
The children, the boys...
- I must go and see them.
- You have no time for that.
But my wife...
I have to say good-bye to my wife.
Unless you positively wish to subject her... to the further humiliation of seeing you arrested... and taken away in front of the gutter press...
Mr. Wilde, you must go.
Oscar, you must take that train.
Practically everyone you know will be on it.
At least 600 single gentlemen, all in abject terror of arrest.
Where your life leads you, you must go.
I defy society.
Tell him to go.
He must save himself.
Tell him to go abroad.
I've been telling him all day.
He won't budge.
People have never understood the courage he needed to be himself.
You must go abroad too.
We must all go abroad at once.
Oscar says, will you tell the boys good-bye.
I need to go through his papers.
You know, I was always too silent.
If I'd known...
If I'd only spoken up.
It wouldn't have made any difference.
Perhaps not... but at least I wouldn't blame myself now.
You're an Irish gentleman.
Of course, you must stay.
Your father fought when he was libeled.
- I was in the courts myself. I fought...
- Yes, I know, Madre.
You will fight these
English philistines, and you'll win.
And even if you lose... if you go to prison... you'll always be my son.
Of course, it's too late to change that now.
If you go, Oscar...
I'll never speak to you again.
No one will ever speak to me again, whatever I do.
Of course I'm your son, Madre... which is why, even if I lose... the English will never forget me.
My darling.
Get out of my way. Get out! Out!
Take me away at once!
Lady Wilde. Lady Wilde!
Have you anything to say about your son's disgrace, Lady Wilde?
Have you anything to say?
Come in.
Mr. Wilde, I believe.
Yes, yes.
We have a warrant here for your arrest... on a charge of committing indecent acts.
I recommend Switzerland as soon as possible.
You will have to change your name, of course.
I can't.
My dear Constance, the name of Wilde will be... a word of execration for the next thousand years.
You can't possibly let your boys grow up with people knowing who they are.
Think of their lives at school.
Thank you for your advice.
I'm sorry our friendship has to end like this.
- Oh, you will always be my friend.
- I am still Oscar's wife.
That must cease forthwith.
Forthwith. Do you understand?
Anybody who has anything to do with Oscar from now on... will never be received in society again... ever.
Oh, God, Ada.
What is going to happen to him?
That's Oscar Wilde's boy.
Oscar, you must let me in the witness box.
If the jury can only hear what I have to say...
Bosie, darling boy.
As soon as they see you in all your golden youth... and me in all my corruption...
You didn't corrupt me.
I corrupted you, if anything.
That's not how it will seem.
But I must have my say. It's outrageous.
Everyone else has said everything, anything that came into his head.
But I'm the person all this is about.
It's me my father wants to get at, not you.
It's outrageous that I can't have my say.
It won't help, Bosie.
It may actually make things worse.
But my father will win.
I can't endure my father winning.
You must go away, dear boy.
I couldn't bear for them to arrest you.
I can't bear what they're saying about you in court.
Jesus Christ.
Good-bye, Bosie, dear boy.
Don't let anyone, anything, ever change your feeling for me... change your love.
- See you next time.
- Time's up, my lord.
Oscar, never. They never will.
I won't let them.
You've been a great deal in the company of Lord Alfred Douglas?
Oh, yes.
- Did he read his poems to you?
- Yes.
So, you can perhaps understand that... some of his verses... would not be acceptable to a reader with an ordinary balance to mind?
I'm not prepared to say.
It's a question of taste and temperament... and individuality.
I should say that one man's poetry is another man's poison.
Yes, I daresay.
But in this poem by Lord Alfred Douglas...
"Two Loves"... there is one love, true love... which... and I quote...
"fills the hearts of boy and girl with mutual flame."
And, there is another:
"I am the love that dare not speak its name."
Was that poem explained to you?
- I think it's clear.
- There's no doubt as to what it means?
Most certainly not.
So, is it not clear that the love described... relates to natural and unnatural love?
Then what is the love that dare not speak its name?
The love that dare not speak its name... in this century... is such a great affection... of an elder for a younger man... as there was between
David and Jonathan... such as Plato made the very basis of his philosophy... and such as you may find in the sonnets of Michelangelo... and Shakespeare.
It is, in this century, misunderstood... so much misunderstood that it may be described as... the love that dare not speak its name.
And, on account of it,
I am placed where I am now.
It is beautiful. It is fine.
It is the noblest form of affection.
There's nothing unnatural about it.
It is intellectual... and it repeatedly exists between an elder and a younger man... when the elder has intellect... and the younger man... has all the joy, hope and glamour of life before him.
That it should be so, the world does not understand.
The world mocks at it... and sometimes puts one in the pillory for it.
The crime of which you have been convicted... is so bad... that I shall pass the severest sentence... that the law will allow.
In my judgment, it is totally inadequate for such a case as this.
It is the worst case I have ever tried!
The sentence of the court... is that you will be imprisoned... and held to hard labor...
- Stand aside, please.
- for two years.
- Shame.
- Pervert.
Pervert!
Shame on you!
Disgusting!
A slim thing, gold-haired like an angel... stands always at my side.
He moves in the gloom like a white flower.
I thought but to defend him from his father. I thought of nothing else.
Now my life seems to have gone from me.
I'm caught in a terrible net.
But so long as I think he is thinking of me... my sweet rose, my delicate flower, my lily of lilies... it is in prison that I shall test the power of love.
I shall see if I can't make the bitter waters sweet... by the intensity of the love I bear you.
He asked me not to change.
Those were his last words to me...
"Don't change."
Well, things are going to have to change when he comes out.
He'll have no money at all.
- So you're blaming me, too, are you?
- I'm not blaming anyone.
Bosie, you're not the only person on this earth Oscar cares about.
You've always hated me, Robbie... because Oscar loved and still loves me when you were just one of his boys.
I'm suffering just as much as he is, you know.
My life's ruined too.
I'm much younger than he is. I've hardly had any life, and it's ruined already.
When Oscar gets out, we'll live together properly.
We'll take a villa somewhere near here... Posilipo...
- or Ischia.
- Or Capri.
I'll take care of him.
I'll give him everything he wants.
I love him, Robbie.
Oscar's mine, and I'm going to have him.
"Years went over, and the giant grew very old and very feeble.
He couldn't play about anymore, so he sat in a huge armchair... and watched the children at their games and admired his garden.
'I have many beautiful flowers, ' he said.
'But the children are the most beautiful flowers of all."'
I'm afraid Cyril has got some idea why you're here.
I'm sending him to school in Germany.
I can't manage them on my own.
Your back isn't better then?
No, not really.
I may have to have an operation.
What I've done to you and the boys...
I can't...
I shall never forgive myself.
If we could choose our natures...
If we could only choose.
But it's no use.
Whatever our natures are, we must fulfill them... or our lives... my life... would have been filled with dishonesty.
Even more dishonesty than there actually was.
I've always loved you, Constance.
You must believe me.
I don't see how you can have done... not truly.
Not if all the time...
I didn't know.
"Know thyself," I used to say.
I didn't know myself.
I didn't know.
I suppose you want a divorce.
You have every reason.
I've been thinking, when you do come out... when they let you out... you can go to Switzerland or Italy... write another play, get yourself back.
You can.
You're so clever. You can.
I don't want a divorce.
Will you ever let me see the children again?
Of course.
But there must be one condition:
Oscar, you must never see Bosie again.
If I saw Bosie now, I'd kill him.
The children love you, Oscar.
They'll always love you.
Did anyone tell you?
They've been performing Salome in Paris.
"The giant hastened across the grass and came near to the child.
And when he came quite close, his face grew red with anger.
And he said,
'Who hath dared to wound thee?'
For on the palms of the child's hands were the prints of two nails.
And the prints of two nails were on his little feet.
'Who hath dared to wound thee?' cried the giant.
'Tell me, that I may take my big sword and slay him. '
'Nay, 'answered the child.
'For these are the wounds of love."'
Bosie thinks I'm jealous.
I think it will come as a shock to Bosie to realize... that even he is relatively unimportant in the scheme of things.
But, no doubt, Bosie will be remembered as long as Oscar... unfortunately.
I sometimes wonder... if I hadn't... pushed him into...
Don't.
Oscar was very lucky to meet you, Robbie.
Think who else it might have been.
Oh, I'll have that one. Thank you.
- Must you go abroad again at once?
- I shouldn't be here now.
But has he got anywhere to go when he's released?
It'll have to be in France.
I'm going to see what I can arrange.
But here... when he leaves prison...
- Good-bye, Mr. Harris.
- Good-bye, sir.
Good-bye, Mr. Snow. Thank you.
My dear Sphinx.
How marvelous of you to know what hat to wear at 7:00 in the morning... to meet a friend who's been away.
- No, I'll keep this.
- What is it.
It's a letter to Bosie telling him... how I love him but can never see him again.
I'm going to ask Robbie to have it copied out before I send it.
I rather fear Bosie might throw it on the fire.
I call it De Profundis.
It comes from the very depths.
"I know not whether laws be right... or whether laws be wrong.
All that we know who lie in jail... is that the wall is strong... and that each day is like a year... a year whose days are long.
Yet each man kills the thing he loves.
By each, let this be heard.
Some do it with a bitter look... some with a flattering word.
The coward does it with a kiss... the brave man with a sword.
Some kill their love when they are young... and some when they are old.
Some strangle with the hands of lust... some with the hands of gold.
The kindest use a knife... because the dead so soon grow cold."
I'm sure we can find an hotel near here.
Somewhere where you can work.
- I've decided to see him again, Robbie.
- Yes.
- I thought you might.
- I've nothing left.
I've lost my wife.
I've lost my children.
They won't allow me to see them now.
No one will ever read my plays or books again.
Yes, they will.
Bosie loves me more than he loves anyone else... as much as he can love... and allow himself to be loved.
I think we need some more wine.
I find that alcohol... taken in sufficient quantities...
Can bring about all the effects of drunkenness.
"Life cheats us with shadows.
We ask it for pleasure.
It gives it to us... with bitterness and disappointment in its train.
And we find ourselves looking with dull heart of stone... at the tress of gold-flecked hair... that we had once so wildly worshipped... and so madly kissed."
In this world, there are only two tragedies.
One is not getting what one wants.
The other is getting it.
I know full well the responsibilities that await me as I enter the door of number 10, and I'll strive unceasingly to try to fulfill the trust and confidence that the British people have placed in me and the things in which I believe, and I would just like to remember some words of
Saint Francis of Assisi, which I think are really just particularly apt at the moment--
"where there is discord, may we bring harmony.
"Where there is error,
"may we bring truth.
"Where there is doubt,
"may we bring faith.
"And where there is despair, may we bring hope."
What are those bastards doing at the bridge?
Clear the road!
The prime minister wants an entirely new approach to the northern Ireland problem.
We've drawn up a 3-pronged strategy-- isolation, criminalization, demoralization.
We've cut off these routes across the border.
We've taken control of these roads.
We isolate the communities.
Criminalization-- these people are criminals.
They are not soldiers.
They are not guerrillas.
There is no war.
There is only crime.
Demoralization--
I want to see these people in jail.
Tim, what's the situation in the prisons at the moment?
In our experience, getting involved in a struggle with the I.R.A. Prisoners in particular merely tends to serve the terrorists as a rallying issue.
Thank you, Tim, but I think we need to change tack slightly.
We want to make the prisons an asset, not a liability, for it is in the prisons that we will break the back of the I.R.A.
Gerard.
Frankie's called an emergency meeting.
I have to go.
Jesus, come on. We can't let them away with this.
We've no clearance from Dublin.
I don't give a shit.
We have to retaliate.
Can anybody get a clean car?
Huh?
What's for breakfast, ma?
Liam Quigley, look at you.
You'll never get a girl looking like that, will you? It's eggs.
Sit down.
- I want a soft one this time.
- All right.
Those bastards.
They're blowing all the Bridges up.
Don't use that language in here, please.
But why?
Why?
To control us.
Us? What do you mean, us?
This egg is hard.
Very funny.
Here you are.
Here's the real one.
Where's my lunch?
Who ate my lunch?
I took an apple.
Why don't you get a job?
It was just an apple.
She's on a diet.
Have some tea.
You must be freezing.
Can I borrow your car?
Car? Why?
I have to get shoes.
OK. Will you drive me to school?
Sure I will.
Good. There you go.
Thanks.
How's your egg?
God, look at the time.
Come on. Come on.
Eat it up quick.
Come on, Gerard.
Hup.
Hup. Hup.
Hold it! Hold it! You're frightening the animals.
Hold it!
Hup. Hup.
Hup. Hup.
Hup. Hup. Hup.
Hup. Hup. Hup. Hup.
What the hell is this?
How are we supposed to get to our cattle?
It's to stop your son murdering people and running back across the border down there.
My son would never run from you, McPeake.
Why don't you go home, Annie, before you get yourself in trouble?
Come on, ma.
Ignore them.
Tell your Frankie we'll get him, no matter what he does.
Tell him yourself.
All right, boys, bring it down.
Stand back there.
Hup. Hup. Go on.
Bastards.
God, I don't believe this.
And I've got concert practice this morning.
Will you pick us up at 4:00?
Yeah.
Don't spend too much money, OK?
Run, Liam.
Sorry I'm late, Brenda.
No problem.
How's it going?
All right? Good.
God, the roadblocks this morning.
I couldn't believe it.
OK, I've got the order here.
Come on.
Let's go.
Go.
Just be calm. Be calm, everybody.
Be calm.
Get off the road!
Get off the fucking road!
Oh, my God.
Get off the road.
Move or I'll have you arrested.
Madam, I don't have time for this.
He cursed at me.
You tramp.
I'm not moving for them.
Get off of me.
Get off.
Leave me alone.
And get those girls in here.
Get away from me.
- You tramp.
- Come on, girls.
Tramp.
Come on. Quickly, girls.
Quickly.
You're home early.
There was a bomb. They had to close the school.
Did you not hear it?
I was in castleward.
Madness.
Did you get any shoes?
There weren't any I liked.
Huh--do you mean to say I had to walk home for nothing?
Oh, God. Make me a cup of tea, will you?
Who did this?
We believe this man did it.
Frank Higgins.
Get him.
Quick.
Uh, hello, sister Bernadina.
Did you strike my daughter yesterday?
I beg your pardon.
You did, and you humiliated her in front of a bunch of brats.
Please, Mrs. Higgins, uh...
You're a troublemaker,
Annie Higgins, and I want you out of my school.
By Jesus, you'll not do that to one of mine.
Get out of my school, or I'll call the police.
Do you think
I'm afraid of the police?
You touch my child again, and that outfit won't save you.
Get up to your classes.
Is everything all right?
He's fine.
He wants to see youse tonight, OK?
So we'll be coming over the back way.
Good. I'll keep the dogs in so.
OK.
Happy Christmas.
I'll see youse later.
Did you see that?
Yeah, I see him.
I got the number.
Ladies and gentlemen, coming up soon, we'll have the Christmas draw,
- how you doing, Gerard?
- But in the meantime...
Take your partners for a slow waltz.
50. Appreciate it.
That's from your granny, OK?
Thanks, granny.
Here you go.
Thanks, Gerard.
Get up and take your ma out for a dance.
She's sitting there all alone.
I can't dance.
Come on.
I'm dying to dance with the best-looking man in the room.
Well, you'll just have to make do with me, then, won't you?
That'll do for me.
God, I always forget how tall you are.
Gerard, sometimes you remind me so much of your father.
No. He was-- he was taller, but his hair was shorter.
Ha ha! That's true.
Ha ha ha.
Oh, listen to me.
I just don't understand why you won't go back to university.
Oh, don't start lecturing on at me again about university.
I don't mean to lecture you, Gerard.
I just want to know why you won't go back.
I need to take a year off.
Why? Ow. Ooh.
To learn how to dance.
I just don't want you to throw your life away.
Hmm?
Ah! Ha ha ha.
Gerard!
Right, kids.
Look who's here.
Ho ho!
Come on up and pick your presents.
I have to go.
I have someone I have to give a present to.
Who?
You don't know her.
 Oh, what fun it is to ride 
 in a one-horse open sleigh 
Bye.
Can I have some more money?
I've spent all mine.
You've spent it?
Oh, come on. Let's see what Santa's got for you.
 O'er the fields we go 
 laughing all the way 
 bells on bobtail ring 
 making spirits bright 
For God's sake, sit down, ma.
They'll be here.
Aye.
Contact.
Backup, stand by.
Alpha team, stand by.
There they are.
How you doing?
How are you?
Come on.
How are you?
You all right?
Yeah.
Theresa, put that dog out.
All right, ma.
Come on, Shep.
What about you, ma?
All right, Da?
Still running about?
Ah, you're funny, you are.
Hey, ma.
Happy Christmas, son.
You all right?
Oh, yeah.
Can you stay long?
Not too long.
Time for a bit of dinner.
Aye.
Good.
Happy Christmas.
You shouldn't have bothered.
All right?
Aye.
Will you have a bite to eat, son?
Yeah, OK.
Good. Sit down there now.
All right, Da, you want a hand?
No, no, no. It's all right.
Now leave me alone.
We'll wait for you.
Thank you.
Thank you.
It'll soon be new year before you sit down there, won't it?
All right. Ha ha ha.
That's grand.
How's it going?
Like it?
I do.
Here, have a cigar.
Cigars-- thanks very much.
Got you a present.
It's--it's Christmas.
Everything's ready now.
Jesus Christ.
Every year we have to sit beside a bloody empty chair.
- I know, I know.
- He's dead. He's not coming back.
I know. Shh.
God, ma, that looks lovely.
Pass the gravy to your daddy, Theresa.
Are you still in a bad mood?
Are you still in a bad mood?
Here, take those.
Take those cigars.
Thank you. You might give us your bad form.
Ha ha. Here you are.
- This way.
- Rrrr...
Unh!
Jesus, Frankie.
Go.
- Ma, what's wrong, ma?
- Oh, Jesus, ma.
Help! Help!
Security forces!
Aah!
No! No, you don't.
Aah! I'm hit.
Aah!
Frankie, we'll take care of that.
Sit down and don't move!
Come on.
Get in here. Get in here.
I can't walk, Frank.
Let's go! Everybody out!
Move it! Move it!
He's hurt.
- Get the back.
- All right.
All units, we're in position.
You! Put your fucking hands up!
We found them, sir.
Well, hello, Frankie.
And who have we here?
Take him.
We've got them!
Oh, Jesus.
Let me go!
Let me go!
Let me go!
Let me go!
Frankie!
Let me go!
Frankie!
Frank! Frankie!
Oh, Jesus! Frank!
Frank! Frankie!
Frankie!
Frank!
I tell you-- anyone who took
Donny to dance ever again...
Ha ha ha.
Pass me the cellotape, would you?
Oh, my God.
What's going on?
You check out the back.
What's going on here?
Who else is in the house?
Just my, uh, just my daughter and my son.
Where's your husband?
He's dead.
You leave me alone!
Liam...
- Let go of me!
- Watch that glass.
Liam, it's all right.
Excuse me. What are you doing in here?
Where's Gerard?
He's with his girlfriend.
Don't tell me lies.
I'm not lying to you.
She's not lying to you.
We have him.
He's under arrest.
He's been charged with attempted murder.
Oh, God, look at you.
No touching.
You got the clothes all right, then?
Aye.
Gerard, a man was shot.
But he was a soldier.
He was somebody's son like you're mine.
He was waitin' to kill us, and he got shot.
You lied to me.
I had to.
I had to lie because
I wanted to protect you.
Protect me?
I didn't think you could handle it.
You spent years, like, running away from all this stuff, OK?
I'm your mother.
Don't you talk to me about protecting me.
I'm sorry.
Sorry's not enough, Gerard.
Listen...Listen, I've got a lawyer downstairs, and he says that he can get your charge reduced to conspiracy.
I have to tell you somethin'.
I'm probably gonna get locked up for a long time.
And I don't need a lawyer, because I'm a prisoner of war.
I am not a criminal.
I don't recognize the court.
Are you out of your mind?
No, I'm not out of my mind.
Time's up.
No, I have--I haven't finished yet. I-- time's up.
I'll be all right.
I'll be all right.
I'll be all right!
Look, I, uh...
I--I have to see him again.
Gerard, I'll be back.
Your bag, please.
Fine. Move along.
Your son refuses to see me, Mrs. Quigley.
I don't care. He has to have representation.
Well, I'll try.
Mrs. Quigley,
I'm Danny Boyle, head of Sinn Fein in Belfast.
Yes, I know who you are.
What are you doing here?
I'm here to support your son.
My son does not need your support, Mr. Boyle.
Frankie!
All right, ma.
All right.
Order! Order!
All rise.
Do the defendants have representation?
I'm here to represent
Gerard Quigley, your honor.
No, you're not.
The defendant refuses counsel.
That is his prerogative.
We are Irish republican army prisoners of war.
We refuse to participate in this non-jury farce.
This British court has no jurisdiction in Ireland.
We will not be treated as criminals.
This is a criminal court of law, sir, empowered by the queen to try you.
I instruct the clerk to enter a plea of not guilty on your behalf.
Let us proceed.
Exhibit "a," your honor.
Uh, your honor, this is a Kalashnikov
AK-47 assault rifle.
It's one of 2 captured at the arrest site.
Forensic have established that the fingerprints of both of the defendants are on these weapons, and that this weapon was fired by the defendant Gerard Quigley.
Exhibit "c," your honor.
Uh, your honor, we also captured this grenade which consists of 2 ounces of
Sentex and a percussion cap that is of a type manufactured and used by the I.R.A.
Under the present emergency legislation, it falls to me to act on behalf of a jury.
Therefore, I find these defendants...
You've no right! These men are political prisoners!
- Guilty.
- They're not criminals!
Remove that woman!
Take your fuckin' hands off her!
Stop! Gerard!
Let go your big fuckin' hands!
Frank Higgins, you are a criminal menace to this society.
I sentence you to life imprisonment without parole.
Screw you, bastard!
Gerard Quigley, you have aided Higgins in his wanton acts of terrorism.
I sentence you to 12 years.
Clear the courtroom!
I'll walk.
I'll walk!
Clear.
Get dressed.
Murphy, you're back again.
What's your problem?
I'm a prisoner of war.
I refuse to wear a criminal's uniform.
You refuse.
What about you?
Do you refuse?
I refuse.
I have a special place for youse.
Could I see your pass, please?
We're here to see
Gerard Quigley.
Hold, please.
Lady here to see Gerard Quigley.
On the protest.
Thank you.
I'm afraid you can't see him today.
Could you back the car up, please?
He's just been sentenced.
I haven't seen him yet.
He's involved in a protest.
There's really nothing I can do.
Could you back the car up, please?
You're blocking the traffic.
Uh...
2 on.
2 on.
2 on.
2 on.
2 on.
Frankie.
McLaughlin?
McLaughlin?
Yes, sir.
2 on.
Slop out.
Frankie, you boy-o.
Good to see you.
Good luck, Gerard.
Right, sands, here's some company.
Bobby?
Do I look that bad?
You look like Jesus Christ.
Here's your uniform, Quigley.
Here's your uniform.
What are you doing here?
I resigned.
What?
I can't work there anymore.
Why?
Nobody trusts me.
What--did someone say something?
No. I just know.
Oh, for God's sake, Alice.
It's a bloody bank, mum, and the I.R.A.
Have robbed it 4 times.
Why should they trust me?
Gerard didn't rob it.
How do you know?
Where will you work?
I can't stay here anymore.
I hate this country.
Come on, Alice.
We're going to be late.
Will you calm down, mummy?
The plane doesn't leave till 11:00.
Is that too heavy for you?
No.
What are you going to do about him?
Whatever I can.
Oh, come on.
Thank you,
Mr. Wilson.
Hello, Sam.
Hello, Tim.
You wanted to see me about something?
This protest has been going on for 2 years, hasn't it?
Yes.
How many are on it at the moment?
Approximately 300, although the figure does vary.
I want these men in prison uniform.
Well, we pretty much tried everything.
No, you haven't.
Come on, get up!
What?
Exercise, lads!
More dips!
Come on, get up.
Jesus.
Takes this prisoner-of-war stuff very serious.
It's freezin'.
Well, what's the fuckin' point?
We're not going anywhere.
To keep our discipline.
Come on. Stop talking and do the dips.
I'll tell you...
Mary would keep you up, wouldn't she?
Oh, Mary!
Oh, go on, Mary!
What?
Shit.
All right, lads,
20 press-ups!
Come on.
On the floor.
Oh, shit.
Start with sands.
Slop out.
No slop out without uniform.
What's going on?
No slop out without uniform.
This won't fuckin' break us.
Right?
Break the window!
Break the window!
Hey, go, go, go!
Get the beds out.
Hello?
Uh, it's Annie Higgins--
Frankie's mother.
Oh.
Hello, Mrs. Higgins.
Your son wants you to go up for a visit.
Well, um, is he coming off the protest?
All I know is you're to go up on Friday.
And, listen, could you ever give us a lift up there?
What's going on,
Mrs. Higgins?
Uh, I don't know.
I don't know.
I have to go. Good-bye now.
I'll see you Friday.
No. I've given them up.
Thank you.
I'd give them up myself only for this bloody country.
You could be dead on the minute.
Quigley.
Oh, yes.
Higgins.
Into 12.
Oh, Gerard.
Sit down.
Beards...
Makes you look older.
How's it going there,
Mrs. Quigley?
Gerard, are you coming off the protest?
No, I'm not.
Well, then...
What's going on?
We had to get word out about what's happened.
They won't let us out to the toilets.
What do you do?
Well...
At the start, we put it out the windows.
Then they blocked up the windows, so we put it under the door.
Then they blocked up under the door, so now we spread it on the walls.
You spread your dirt on the walls?
Well, what else can we do?
God.
How can you live like this?
Look...
I have to get a message out to Danny Boyle.
This is really important, ma.
Let's go.
I love you.
Pass, please.
Raise your arms.
Do you have any contraband?
No.
Go on.
You all right?
Get in.
How dare you.
What?
You knew I was carrying this, didn't you?
I just wanted to see my son.
So what's in this message?
I don't know.
I will not be used as some stooge for violence.
All I know is that Bobby sands needed to get a message out.
Well, I'm going to read this bloody message.
Give me that.
Give me that.
That's I.R.A. Business.
Give it me, Mrs. Quigley.
No.
"My friend, the Brits have finally forced us
"to live in our own dirt.
"The lads' morale is collapsing.
"If you cannot find a solution,
"then we must push this crisis to its conclusion
"by going on hunger strike.
"I'm not threatening you, but stating a cold reality."
"Your friend and comrade, Bobby sands."
Come on.
I'm not going in there.
Give me the letter.
No. You tell him to come out here.
There's 3 people who have been shot dead there.
How you doin'?
My son is wiping his shit on the walls because of you.
Hang on a minute.
It's the British have your son in jail, Mrs. Quigley, not me.
Have you something for me?
You read this.
They're talking about a hunger strike, Danny.
What are you going to do?
You have to do something.
What are you gonna do?
We've got to win this in the streets.
Oh, I see.
Disrupt and destroy.
That's all you people can do, isn't it?
Hold on there,
Kathleen. Hold on.
Are you coming, Annie?
Oh, I see.
Disagree with those people, and you're the enemy.
That's it, isn't it?
Oh, God, I need a drink.
Look at my hands-- shaking like a leaf.
Would you not try a wee Valium?
For your nerves.
No.
Hmph. Suit yourself.
Are you coming?
1.60, please.
Thanks very much.
Move over.
I'm not sitting there.
Why? Why not?
I'm not sitting below her.
She'd sour the drink.
And what does that mean?
Our day will come.
And what day is that, Annie?
The day the Brits go home.
The day the bloody Brits go home is all you people can think about, isn't it?
Well, my life won't change either way.
Right now, your life and my life are 2 very different things, missis.
My son was shot dead by the British, so you can take your Brandy and shove it up your hole.
Annie.
Is everything all right, ladies?
Yes, yes, we're fine. Just
2 more brandies, please.
I'll bring them over.
Oh, I'm so sorry, Annie.
I didn't know that.
Oh, God. That must be a terrible thing to lose a child.
There you are, now.
You OK?
Yes, thank you.
Thanks.
All right, lads. Mass.
Mass.
Time for mass, lads.
Fuck me.
It's Robinson Crusoe.
Sorry, father.
Frankie, would you like to say our mass?
All right.
Your eminence, this is Bobby sands.
Bobby.
I'm really glad you could come, your eminence.
It was the least I could do.
This is the lamb of God who takes away the sins of the world.
Happy are those who are called to his supper.
Lord, I am not worthy to receive thee, but say the word and my soul shall be healed.
Body of Christ.
Body of Christ.
Body of Christ.
Body of Christ.
- Body of Christ.
- Body of Christ.
CBS news, cardinal.
Cardinal?
Have you got a statement?
Did Bobby sands have anything to say?
When I was a young priest,
I worked for a time with the poor in the sewers of Calcutta...
Who let him in?
I did.
Why?
He's the head of the Roman catholic church in Ireland.
...forced to spread their feces on the walls, to pour their urine under the cell doors.
Now, one would not allow an animal to live in such condition, let alone 340 human beings.
I am an m.P.
In the British parliament, and you haven't heard the last of this, I promise you.
Well, the shit has hit the fan, lads.
Gentlemen, I'm glad you find this situation so amusing.
We need to win the moral high ground on this one.
I know compromise is a dirty word in this room, but if we don't come up with some fresh ideas, and soon, we're really going to fuck it up.
What a wanker.
Why do we have to put up with him?
He's got support.
And he may also have a point.
I, uh...
Brought you a few fresh eggs...
And a bit of bread...
For driving me up there.
Oh, you shouldn't have.
I wanted to.
Well, thank you very much.
All the publicity's great, isn't it?
Do you think anything will come of it?
They can't ignore the pope, a cardinal,
and an m.P., now, can they?
Oh, aye.
Oh, Mrs. Higgins, will you have a cup of tea?
Uh, no, thank you. No.
Jimmy's on his own.
I better be getting back.
Thank you,
Mrs. Higgins.
You're welcome.
Jeez, I thought I was shot.
Oh...
God. You know I nearly had a heart attack myself.
Would you ever give us a lift?
Yes. Yes, come on.
We'll put it in the back of the car.
I feel silly.
It must be a great thing to be able to drive.
Right.
What are we doing here?
You have a go.
Come on.
Have a try.
Get in.
OK, now, you just put it into gear and move forward slowly.
Jesus God!
My foot is down.
Put it down.
No, no, not that foot.
The other foot.
What do you mean, the other foot?
Turn the wheel.
Turn the wheel!
- Which way?
- Just turn it!
- Which way?!
- Any way! Just turn it!
There's a guy at the foreign office offering us some kind of deal.
I don't believe you.
I'm serious.
Oh, that's fucking great.
Take it easy.
Take it easy.
Let's not get too excited.
Here.
Jeez, where'd you get that?
He gave it to me.
Kind of a peace pipe, I guess.
Fuckin' nice of him.
So what kind of deal is it?
Civilian clothes, education instead of prison work, win back lost time.
Pretty much everything we asked for.
And who is this guy?
He's a diplomat.
A diplomat.
We'll get 5 or 6 smokes out of this.
Oh.
Jesus, Mary, and Joseph.
God. The tide.
Hello.
Oh, there's someone.
Hey!
Hey!
Hello!
Come on, lads.
Step back, ladies.
All right, lift!
Uhh!
- Lift!
- Uhh!
Oh, God.
Lucky we were here, ladies.
Yes, thank you.
Thank you so much.
Well done.
Not bad.
There. Makes you feel free, doesn't it?
Aye, till you get stuck.
Suppose it's just as well they came along.
Mmm.
I don't hate them all, you know.
Mummy! Mummy!
There's been a deal.
You're joke.
They're getting their own clothes.
Yahoo!
Oh!
Oh! Oh!
Oh, thank God!
Oh, thank God!
Oh, thank God!
Oh.
Gonna have a drink now.
God knows we need it. Jimmy!
 Evening shadows make me blue 
 when each weary day is through 
 how I long to be with you 
 my happiness 
 every day I reminisce 
 dreaming of your 
- No, no, no, no.
-  tender kiss-- 
 oh, you beautiful doll 
 you great big beautiful doll 
 let me put my arms around you 
 I could never live without you 
 oh! 
 You beautiful doll 
 you great big beautiful doll 
 if you ever leave me, how my heart would break-- 
Ma!
I'm tired.
Oh, balls, you.
Sorry, Theresa.
Night.
 Haul away, you rolling king 
 heave away, haul away 
 haul away, you rolling king 
 I'm the man from South Australia 
 as I walked out in the morning air 
 heave away, haul away 
 'twas there I met miss Nancy Blair 
 I'm the man from South Australia 
 haul away, you rolling king 
 heave away, haul away 
 haul away, you rolling king 
 I'm the man from South Australia 
 there's just one thing that's on my mind 
 heave away, haul away 
 that's leaving
Nancy there behind 
 I'm the man from South Australia 
 haul away, you rolling king 
 heave away, haul away 
 haul away, you'll hear me say 
Let's go!
 Heave away, haul away 
 heave away, haul away 
 haul away, you rolling king 
Yeah!
Yeah!
Yeah!
No, I can't take those.
Excuse me.
Just what do you mean, no?
We were assured that they would be allowed to wear their own clothes.
No, not their own clothes.
Civilian clothes.
I don't understand.
Our m.P. Frank Maguire assured us that these are the new rules.
They're allowed their own clothes.
What's this?
These are your new clothes.
The question of whether all prisoners in northern Ireland should be allowed to wear civilian clothes issued by the prison officials, rather than prison uniform.
We decided on that, that it should apply to all prisoners, and therefore we gave that concession to all prisoners.
No, no, no. We didn't say their own clothes.
We said civilian-style clothes.
Now you listen to me.
I'm a diplomat in her majesty's government.
I do not break agreements.
Well, this is war, not diplomacy.
Really? I distinctly remember you saying to me
that it wasn't war.
Look, I want you to start treating these people for what they are-- a bunch of terrorists.
You do what it takes to draw them out into the open, and then you finish them off.
No.
Who's Bobby sands?
Hello.
Blarney roof garden.
Alice?
Alice, it's me.
Mummy.
How you doing?
Fine. Listen, Alice, the prisoners are going on hunger strike.
Has our Gerard gone on it?
No, no.
Are you sure?
Yes. Yes, I'm sure.
OK. Well...
Do you want me to come home?
No. Stay where you are.
You're better off there.
Bobby sands has been on hunger strike now for 15 days.
Surely somebody can do something.
Well, Sinn Fein are doing all they can...
Parents meeting.
Has Frank Maguire spoken yet?
No. Just the usual.
OK.
The Vatican's already been informed.
The pope knows.
Oh, the pope knows?
Yes. The church is doing everything it can in this situation.
But the church is doing nothing except sitting back and allowing the British army-- what has the church-- gentlemen, gentlemen, please.
You're our m.P. What are you gonna do about it?
What are any of youse doing about it?
Now, look, the government needs my vote badly in this budget debate.
Now, I think we can get what we need.
The prisoners can rely on Frank Maguire.
We only need one.
I'm sorry.
It's the rules.
We interrupt this program for a news flash.
The death has taken place of Mr. Frank Maguire, the independent nationalist m.P.
For Fermanagh and South Tyrone.
Mr. Maguire, who held the balance of power at Westminster and was a prominent supporter of the demands of the h-block hunger strikers, died of a heart attack at his home in Lisnaskea.
Damn!
After about 50 days or so, their bodies begin to break down.
The apparently less vital organs-- the eyesight-- would begin to diminish, become hypersensitive to light.
The muscular system would begin to pull away...
I just had a phone call from maze.
I think we've got a problem.
...nervous system, producing spasms.
Listen...
They're going to run sands for Maguire's old seat in the British parliament.
That's a fantastic idea.
Will you help us...
With the campaign?
Who do you mean by "us"?
You mean Sinn Fein?
No. Help the hunger strikers.
Annie, I don't believe in violence.
You must understand that.
But this isn't about violence, Mrs. Quigley.
This is about elections.
Once again, the prime minister stayed unflinchingly firm.
There is no such thing as political murder, political bombing, or political violence.
We will not compromise on this.
There will be no political status.
All attempts to intimidate us will fail.
Political status now.
Don't let them die.
Political status now.
Don't let them die.
Political status now.
Don't let them die.
Political status now.
Vote for Bobby sands, missis.
Here are your pamphlets.
Support the hunger strikers.
Vote for Bobby sands.
Don't forget.
Don't forget the polling date, now, sir.
Put Bobby in.
Vote for Bobby sands.
There you go, missis.
Vote for Bobby sands.
Don't forget there.
Vote for Bobby sands.
A vote for Bobby sands is a vote against British repression in Ireland.
- Vote for Bobby sands!
- Vote for Bobby sands!
- Vote for Bobby sands.
- Come on.
Support the hunger strikers.
There you go, missis.
Vote for Bobby sands.
Don't forget.
Vote for Bobby sands.
Vote for Bobby sands.
Support the prisoners in their fight for political status.
Vote him in to keep them alive.
Vote for Bobby sands.
Support the prisoners in their fight for political status.
Vote for Bobby sands.
Vote him in to keep them alive.
Support the prisoners in their fight for political status.
Vote for Bobby sands.
Vote him in to keep them alive.
Mrs. Quigley...
Can I see you?
You've decided to honor us with your presence.
Yes, I know, mother superior.
I haven't been here much recently, but I'm sure you understand
I've been very busy.
I confiscated these in your class.
You're suspended.
Right.
Good morning,
Mrs. Quigley.
Good morning, class.
All right, Mrs. Wheelan, thank you.
I'll take over now.
Thank you, Mrs. Wheelan.
It's nice to see you.
OK, page 95.
Good morning...
Sit down.
May I talk to you now?
Yes, of course, mother superior.
Get out of my school.
With all due respect, mother superior,
I suggest that you call the cardinal and tell him why you're suspending me.
I have his number if you need it.
In the meantime,
I have a class to teach.
Thank you very much, mother superior.
OK, what page was it?
Page 95.
This man is ready for the hospital wing.
Don't touch him.
I'll do that.
OK, I'm gonna lift you up, OK?
Uhh!
Come on.
You're OK.
OK, I'm just gonna get your legs.
OK, I'm gonna lift you up, OK?
Uhh!
Sit back.
OK.
I won't let you down.
Come on.
Come on.
OK, back in the cell.
Stick with it, lads!
Keep going, Bobby!
Stick with it, lads!
Put your mark?
Oh, I did.
You know, I have a terrible confession to make.
I've never voted in my life before.
Well, we never had much use for the ballot box ourselves.
God, Annie, do you think he could win?
The tension here is electric as we await the results of the Fermanagh and South Tyrone by-election, one of the most bitterly fought campaigns in northern Ireland history, where in an unprecedented move, the prime minister
Margaret Thatcher called for the electorate to reject the I.R.A. Prisoner Bobby sands, now in his 50th day of a hunger strike.
Mrs. Thatcher threw her support behind Harold west...
Shh! Shh!
...as polls show the gap closing between him and the hunger striker.
- Whoo!
- Whoo!
And now, we're going to go live as the polling officer approaches the microphone.
West, Harold...
Unionist and conservative party of Great Britain and northern Ireland...
- Yay!
- Yay!
Sands,
Robert, anti h-block political prisoner...
- yay!
- Yay! by God, he got it.
He fucking got it.
- Yay!
- Yay!
I declare Robert sands duly elected as member of parliament...
For Fermanagh and South Tyrone.
They done it!
Bobby sands, m.P.!
Bobby.
Bobby.
Bobby.
Bobby.
You won.
You made your point.
Is it not time to stop now?
Will they do a deal?
I will see this through...
To the end.
No.
No.
No.
God, no!
Gerard.
What about Liam?
What about Liam?
You can't-- you must-- you must not do this, Gerard, you hear me?
No!
No!
Please, I--I have to talk to him some more.
No. Get him back.
The visit's over.
No.
Please, please.
Please, please, let me speak with him.
There's nothing we can do.
Our hands are tied.
No.
Your son has made his decision.
You don't understand.
Please, I need more time.
Please. Please give me more time.
I just--I just have to see him again.
Please.
It's all right.
Come on, Kathleen.
Shh, calm down. Don't show yourself up in front of them.
Shh, get ahold of yourself.
Give me the keys.
Give me the keys, please.
Give me the keys, come on.
I have to go back.
Oh, Jesus.
OK.
Yes, we are deeply moved, Mrs. Quigley, but can you explain to my colleagues why you are here and what you hope can be achieved?
Well, we've, uh...
We've come to ask-- to beg...You for our sons' lives.
For the life of Bobby sands, a fellow m.P.
We ask you to persuade the government to-- to go in there and speak to them, make some kind of compromise before it's too late-- before someone has died.
But will the hunger strikers give up?
Excuse me, madam.
These men are terrorists.
Her majesty's government-- since I appear to be the only representative-- does not negotiate with terrorists.
My son is not a terrorist.
Your son is a convicted murderer.
Look...
They won't even let Bobby sands talk to the press.
He's our m.P.
We have no voice.
You know, 30,000 people voted for Bobby sands.
That's more than voted for Thatcher, so what are you afraid of?
You may or may not know that it is in fact you that will decide your sons' fate.
The law clearly states that if your sons should lapse into comas, then you have the legal right to take them off the strike.
Surely no mother would allow her son to die.
Tension is mounting in Belfast tonight with the news that h-block hunger striker Bobby sands is only hours away from death.
There was no sign of a last-minute settlement in the prison dispute.
Sands, who was entering his
66th day of hunger strike...
Leave alone Bobby sands!
You bastards!
Leave him alone!
He's our m.P.!
Leave him alone!
Bastards!
Would everyone please join us for a prayer vigil at the police station?
Kathleen.
Form at the corner.
Kathleen.
Holy Mary, mother of God, pray for us sinners now and at the hour of our death. Amen.
Hail Mary, full of grace, the lord is with thee.
Blessed art thou amongst women and blessed is the fruit of thy womb, Jesus.
Hail Mary, full of grace, the lord is with thee.
Blessed art thou among women and blessed is the fruit of thy womb, Jesus.
Holy Mary, mother of God, pray for us sinners now and at the hour of our death. Amen.
Hail Mary, full of grace, the lord is with thee.
Blessed art thou amongst women and blessed is the fruit of thy womb, Jesus.
Hail Mary, full of grace, the lord is with thee.
Blessed art thou among women and blessed is the fruit of thy womb, Jesus.
Holy Mary, mother of God, pray for us sinners now and at the hour of our death. Amen.
Hail Mary, full of grace, the lord is with thee.
Blessed art thou amongst women and blessed is the fruit of thy womb, Jesus.
Holy Mary, mother of God, pray for us sinners now and at the hour of our death. Amen.
Holy Mary, mother of God, pray for us sinners now and at the hour of our death. Amen.
Hail Mary, full of grace, the lord is with thee.
Blessed art thou amongst women and blessed is the fruit of thy womb, Jesus.
Holy Mary, mother of God, pray for us sinners now and at the hour of our death. Amen.
Holy Mary, mother of God, pray for us sinners now and at the hour of our death. Amen.
Holy Mary, mother of God, pray for us sinners now and at the hour of our death. Amen.
Hail Mary, full of grace, the lord is with thee...
Holy Mary, mother of God, pray for us sinners now and at the hour of our death. Amen.
He's dead!
He's dead!
Murdering bastards!
Liam!
Liam!
Liam!
Run, everybody, run!
Liam!
Liam!
No!
No! Come on.
Come on.
Present...Arms!
Load...
Fire!
Load...
Fire!
Load...
Fire!
Some 100,000 people took part in the funeral.
Abroad...
A wave of anti-British protests...
This is a disaster.
Is this the official foreign office line, or is this merely your line, Harrington?
Thomas, do you know anything about the role of Irish martyrs in history?
1916...Pierce Connelly.
Well, you've created another one.
...Thatcher to behave with compassion.
Don't let any more die.
Don't let any more die.
Give us your support.
Give us your support.
Don't let any more die.
Don't let any more die.
Give us your support.
Give us your support.
Remember Bobby sands.
Remember Bobby sands.
You Fenian bastards!
Here.
It's all right.
It's all right.
It's only piss.
Are you all right?
You'll be OK.
Come on, we'll get you home now. Come on.
Are you all right?
I'm fine.
You're all right.
Bastards!
Hello?
Mummy.
Alice.
I had to come home.
Good.
There are now 10 of them on the strike.
The first few are hard-core gunmen and bombers who've murdered innocent people, but further down the line, we've got young men who are only involved peripherally.
And I'm not sure about shifting the onus onto the families.
We're not negotiating, are we?
Who does Harrington report to?
He's a foreign office monitor at the prisons.
Be careful with him.
We have every confidence in you.
Alice.
Hiya, Liam.
Hello, ma.
Jesus Christ, Gerard, can you not stop this?
Oh, God.
Look, is there no other way?
Alice, please.
We've argued this out.
Please respect my convictions.
Youse know something?
I've never seen things as clearly before...
As I can see things now.
He won't do it.
Mum, he won't go through with it.
Oh.
This is the northern Ireland news.
In a further escalation of the prison crisis, the I.R.A. Have issued the following statement:
"Our comrades are prepared to die for their rights."
Morning, lads.
"Those who try to take those rights away must be prepared to pay the same price."
Come on!
Come on!
No!
Help!
No!
Oh!
Oh, no!
Ohh...
I'm proud of you.
Why?
For respecting my beliefs.
Oh, Gerard.
Who said I respected your beliefs?
You had a choice in what you did, but you left us with no choice.
Don't let us die.
Kieran!
Kieran!
I'll see.
Oh!
Can't go out there.
We must all mourn the death of this young man, but we must also mourn the death of 2 prison officers brutally murdered in front of their own families.
Some of you here have your hands steeped in blood.
Who paid you to say that, daly?
I beg you now, stop this violence.
Who put you up to it?
We don't have to listen to this.
It is our solemn duty-- why don't you stick to religion, daly?!
...under God, to save life.
Did the Brits get at you?
We must save life wherever possible, however unpopular it is.
Please...
Don't let anybody else die.
Please don't let anybody else die.
Kieran!
This is wrong.
This is wrong!
What you said in there was an absolute bloody disgrace.
What I said in there is God's law.
You're telling me to betray my son?
It's God's law, Annie!
This isn't a protest anymore.
These people are using these funerals to win support.
These people are our friends and our families.
Look, you have to take your sons off.
You have the right to choose.
You can make a choice.
Leave them alone.
No, I don't.
It's not my choice to make.
Jesus Christ, do you think if it was my choice,
I'd let him die?
Come on, Annie, let's go home.
I-- do you hear me, Kathleen?
He's losing consciousness.
We should contact the next of kin.
Mrs. Quigley?
Tim Harrington.
Leave me alone.
Please, Mrs. Quigley, I think we have a solution.
Excuse me. I'm going to stay with my son.
Look, we can resolve this bloody mess.
Do you want to stop this madness?
Do you?
While there's still time, please take me to Danny Boyle.
Am I safe here?
They'll have to shoot me as well.
You think they won't?
You've got some nerve coming here.
Mr. Boyle,
I have a proposal.
The prisoners can have their specific demands.
As a right?
As a right.
Provided the hunger strike is called off first and your organization makes no statement claiming to have won prisoner-of-war status.
May I have an ashtray?
The government will say that in light of the prisoners' sensible decision to end the hunger strike, we are re-examining the present regime.
You cheated us about the clothes.
Mr. Boyle, I have never cheated anyone in my life.
Now, if the terms are acceptable,
I will go into the prison tonight and outline the changes to the hunger strikers in the presence of a witness of your choice.
Thatcher will never agree to this deal.
Senior concerned parties within the government feel strongly that the prime minister will agree.
I'll have to consult the prisoners first.
And I must talk to my people.
Danny, my son is dying.
We don't have any time.
Can't you just resolve this now?
Do something.
You must do something.
There's nothing I can do.
Please leave.
One on!
Clear the wing!
Keep goin', Frankie.
Keep goin', Gerard.
Hi, tom.
Must be serious if you're here.
I think we have a deal.
Oh!
Kathleen, any sign of Harrington?
No. They told me he was with you.
Tom McLaughlin, the prisoners' leader.
How are you,
Mrs. Quigley?
You all right?
Yes.
So he's not with you?
Where is he? Do you think he's coming?
I have no idea.
He must be in London.
So what do the prisoners think, tom?
The prisoners will agree if the Brits agree.
Oh, thank God.
Can I bum one of those on you?
Oh, yes, yes, of course.
Where is he?
You know Frankie doesn't have long.
Aye, I know.
All we can do is wait,
Mrs. Quigley.
Yes...
Yes, we have a deal.
They'll agree.
No, no loss of face to anyone.
What's going on?
How dare you barge in here?
Your career's over.
We have a deal in place.
It's not a deal.
It's surrender.
I warn you,
I have strong support.
You'll be lucky to get a pension.
Get out.
Now.
Cardinal's office, please.
Yes, your eminence.
I think we can reach a compromise.
That's right.
Kathleen!
Kathleen, Kathleen...
The cardinal organized a deal.
What deal?
What are you doing here?
Where'd this come from?
Farnsworth's office.
You fuckin' idiot.
What's wrong?
"The prisoners will have the privilege of their own clothes."
Jesus Christ.
Privilege.
It's only a word.
We have been in direct negotiations with Harrington, who was prepared to accept the 5 demands as a right!
There are 9 men have died for that right, daly, and you have no reason to come in and interfere in the work that should come from this.
I'm taking him off.
OK, now clear the room.
Frankie!
Annie...
Kathleen...
Oh, Annie, I'm so sorry.
Sure his sufferings are over now anyway.
I took Gerard off.
I had to do it.
Somebody had to do it.
You're lucky you had the choice.
OK, Mrs. Quigley, will you come with me, please?
Oh, Jesus...
Mrs. Quigley, how is your son?
Mrs. Quigley, was it an I.R.A. Directive for your son to quit the hunger strike?
Mrs. Quigley, a few words, please!
 Oh, my love 
 is a small boat 
 and it rises and falls on the tide 
 and as I sail on the ocean 
 I have one, one secret inside 
 I dream of the seabird 
 as it opens its wings to the Gale 
 and as it soars o'er the island 
 it follows the wake of my trail 
 and when the dark night falls 
 and the gray mists surround me 
 my heart is a small boat 
 your smile is the shore 
Hello?
Hi, honey. It's me.
I went to see the doctor today,
'Cause ever since you've been gone,
I had a pain deep down inside.
He says there's nothing really wrong with me.
I'm just missin' my man.
So, honey, please... come on home as soon as you can.
 Doctor's orders 
 Say there's only 
 One thing for me 
 Nothing he can do 
 'Cause only you can cure me 
I heard you have a much better chance
Of getting in if you come by cab.
You're really worried about getting in?
Yes.
I thought you'd been here several times before.
Not the front way.
They were private parties.
We came in the back.
We look really good tonight.
I'm sure we're going to get in.
Get back.
Let's get a cab.
Maybe you're right.
When we get out, don't stop where the crowd is.
Just follow me right in.
When we get out, we just follow you in.
Yeah.
Why don't you put this on?
What?
Just until we get inside.
I don't get it.
We're all together.
Van!
Only him.
We're together. Come on, van.
This is important.
These are my friends.
You can go in, but they'll have to wait.
Hey, nice coat.
Don't worry, Jimmy. We don't care.
I can't believe it.
Yeah, what an asshole.
You know, that had nothing to do
With you guys.
Van just wanted to put me in my place.
Apparently, it happens all the time.
Jerk.
It's happened to you before?
No, but it was overdue.
You know, none of us really wanted to go anyway.
Yeah, we're exhausted.
No, I really wanted to go.
There's Jimmy Steinway.
I can't believe it...
He's already leaving?
You like him?
I could never be interested in anyone
Who worked in advertising.
God. You were right.
This place has gotten really hard to get into.
Who's the other guy you were interested in?
 Doctor's orders 
 Say there's only 
 One thing for me 
Phew. Oh, god. We made it.
This is the last time I'm coming here.
I always want to be able to say,
"I got into the club."
Of course we got in.
Who was the second guy you were interested in?
Tom Platt.
Oh, well, that's a lot better.
How do you mean?
Well, Tom Platt's smart and somewhat cool,
A lawyer involved in environmental causes...
Not to mention tall, dark, and handsome.
 Emotion every day 
 A lovin' spoonful to be taken 
 It's the only thing 
 Stoppin' this empty heart of mine 
 From breakin' 
 Won't get better 
 Till you're back 
Nina!
Please... Stop!
Nina!
Nina!
Please... stop.
Hey, Mcgrath!
Come back here!
It's not what you think.
I'm...
I think I'm gay.
What?
That's not possible.
How?
It's always been there, I guess.
I've only begun to acknowledge it now.
You really think you're gay?
Taxi.
I was just starting law school
When the first up-Tempo
Philadelphia international hits broke:
Some people don't consider that disco...
Because it's good...
But I remember feeling absolutely electrified.
You feel electrified often.
No, but this was different.
I loved the idea that there'd be
All these great places for people to go dancing,
After the terrible social wasteland
Of our college years. Uhff.
You've been to a lot of discos?
No. In fact, practically none.
For me, law school wasn't easy,
And I haven't had much of a social life
Since coming to the city, either.
But I still consider myself a loyal adherent
To the disco movement.
It's a "movement"?
Sort of.
What I found terribly encouraging
Was the idea that when the time in life came
To have a social life,
There'd be all these great places
For people to go to,
Because, as you'll remember,
For many years, there were none.
Yeah.
What I didn't realize... is that it gets so impossible to get into.
Let's call it a night.
No, wait. I have an idea.
Jimmy.
Here take this. Jimmy!
Take this. Jimmy!
Oh, hi.
Hi.
You're des's friend.
Yeah, hi.
Where are Marshall and Steve?
They've gone back to the hotel.
Jim, come on.
I can't believe it.
Jim, let's go.
They wanted me to apologize for them.
They were really bushed.
What a disaster.
No.
I can't believe it.
Wow!
 Your body 
 Your body, my body 
 Everybody 
 With nobody 
Do you like nightmares?
No.
Well, I do.
It's not obviously connected, but...
I think that's what made me a little more tolerant
Of the guys at Hampshire.
What do you mean?
You were a bit critical.
The guys there preferred women more..."laid-Back."
I'm laid-Back.
For whatever reason,
You didn't have much of a social life there.
I had a social life...
Just not one of those terrible pretend-Marriages.
The Hampshire guys were jerks,
Hippy-Dippy suburbanites with all this hair...
And extremely dim intellectual interests.
I'm sorry, I don't consider the guy who did
The Spiderman comics a serious writer.
Alice, one thing I've noticed
Is that people hate being criticized.
Everyone hates that.
It's one of the great truths of human nature.
I think it's why my parents got divorced.
I'm sorry... It's just that you're so terrific...
It makes me sick to think that you might get in
That terrible situation again,
Where everyone hated you...
Hated me?
You're wonderful.
Maybe, in physical terms,
I'm a little cuter than you,
But you should be much more popular than I am... it would be such a shame
If what happened in college repeated itself.
Why would it repeat itself?
You're right.
I just think it's so important
To be in control of your own destiny...
Not to fall into that fifties cliche
Of waiting by the phone for guys to call:
The right ones never do.
Those who do,
You have to make the most ridiculous excuses to:
The nice ones get hurt feelings and hate you;
The jerks inevitably corner you
Into going out anyway.
Late at night you find yourself
With some awful guy with disgusting breath,
Thrusting his belly up against you,
Trying to stick his slobbering tongue
In your mouth. Ugh, yecch.
Thank god this is a whole new era in music
And social models!
We're in complete control.
Look down.
There are a lot of choices out there.
 One night in a disco 
 On the outskirts of frisco 
Fantastic. This place is better
Than I could have imagined.
It's too bad Steve and
Marshall didn't come...
They really would have loved this.
Don't worry about it. So what.
It's so stupid.
I'm sure it's Jimmy.
I think it's much better to wait
Until things happen naturally.
Forcing things never works.
That's not true.
Forcing things usually works beautifully.
You know, even if he's in advertising,
Someone will want him.
I just think it's so important
That we be in control of our own destinies.
It doesn't matter.
Marshall's a really good guy.
He doesn't really care about this kind of stuff.
I can't believe it.
Uh, excuse me... has anyone ever told you you look just like
Kate Preston's brother rod?
Who?
Rod Preston. Do you know him?
Uh, no.
Have you ever noticed that people who look just alike
Never seem to know each other?
Hunh.
Hi.
Hey. How've you been?
Fine. How are you?
He's really depressed.
God, isn't this place great?
It's fantastic! I love it.
I really like this song.
Yeah.
Do you like to dance?
W- W-Would you?
Sure. Great.
Shall we all go?
I... I think he's too depressed to dance.
Hey, Jimmy, we're going to dance... Come on.
I'm too depressed to dance.
Go ahead.
What's wrong?
Absolute disaster.
What?
I had to get some clients into the club,
So I gave the boss my coat to wear...
"Here, wear this."
It's really stupid.
I can't believe what an idiot I am.
Why? Your coat's nice.
Well, that's just it: It is nice.
But this guy's...
Marshall's...
Clothes are hideous.
It's famous.
But to give him my coat to put over them...
It's so stupid.
It's just really stupid.
It's not stupid.
This club's really hard to get into.
It was unbelievably, incredibly dumb.
He's a really nice guy, and I insulted him.
This nice guy that I stupidly insulted
Is basically my boss.
God, it was really stupid.
Guess you're right.
It was pretty stupid.
Uh, can I get you a drink?
Yeah, thanks.
 If we lose our love 
 It's a shame 
 Ooh, wouldn't want 
 To live with the pain 
 Gonna take it 
 Every night 
Des, you're a wonderful man.
Take care of yourself, des.
Ok, van, what's up?
Keep that ad guy friend of yours out of here.
Hi!
What do you mean?
When I turned him away with a group of his clients,
He snuck around back, where you let them in.
I didn't let 'em in.
They're inside.
Rick just saw them.
Is this really important?
I'm not out here on jerk patrol
So you can let them in the back way.
Bernie promised me he'd fire you
If that guy's in the club.
I can't believe that.
You made Bernie promise to fire me?
You really think Bernie keeps his promises?
 Aw, freakout 
 Lefreak 
 Tres chic 
 Freakout 
 Aw, freakout 
 Lefreak 
 Tres chic 
I need to see Bernie.
Bernie's not around.
He's pretty mad, des.
Van told him you were letting people
In the back again.
When you let people in the back,
Is a cover being charged?
Because that money should be coming here.
Of course we're not charging a cover in the back. God!
 Big fun 
 To be had by everyone 
 It's up to you 
 Sure they can be done 
Uh, Bernie... this thing that van's saying
About your promising to fire me
If Jimmy Steinway's in the club,
That isn't true, is it?
No, it's true. I can confirm that.
This Jimmy Steinway,
I don't want in the club.
Why?
Come here.
 Aw, freakout 
You promised to quit letting friends in the back.
No, you said we could still let in people
From the list.
Don't contradict me, des.
I don't want a lot of ad people in the club,
Particularly not this guy.
Well, I didn't let him in.
If van didn't either, he's not in the club.
Did I ever tell you that my first job
Was in advertising... At y&r?
In those days, the big thing was to be nice to everybody...
To the secretaries, to the "media department,"
To the art director, to the client...
Well, I don't think it's that way now.
I don't care.
I don't want that element in the club.
Jimmy is, like, my best friend.
And you've been a good friend to him, des,
But this Jimmy is not a good friend to you.
He's out of control.
He's an egomaniac.
Uh, Jimmy.
Where were you? What a nightmare?
Listen, I don't know how you got in,
But you'd better go.
What?
This way.
You're asking me to leave?
Van has gone crazy.
He made Bernie promise to fire me
If he found you here.
Bernie hates ad agency people. It's nuts.
I can't believe it!
That's like something out of the nazis!
Come on. I will get you back on the list,
But tonight, it's best if you go.
Could I at least go tell my client
That I've got to go...
No.
Please.
Tell him I got ejected.
His name is hap.
Ok.
And that's for this irritating girl
Who's occupying my booth. Alice.
She's irritating?
I thought she seemed nice.
You know her?
Well, she's been here 2 times before.
How is she irritating?
I can't believe it.
You're really gonna throw me out?
Yeah.
Thanks, des! You've really been a good friend to me!
Hey.
Join us.
It's ok.
 Everybody dance 
 Ooh, clap your hands 
 Clap your hands 
 Everybody dance 
Think we'll get in?
This usually works.
 Everybody dance 
Des, I think we need to talk.
Yeah... There's something I have to talk to you about.
 Ooh, clap your hands 
 Clap your hands 
 Music 
 Never lets you down 
 Puts the smile on your face 
 Any time, any place 
 Dancin' helps relieve the pain 
 Soothes the mind 
 Makes you happy again 
 Listen to those dancin' beats 
 Close your eyes 
 And let go 
 It don't mean a thing 
 If it ain't got that swing 
Bopp-Shoo-Wop 
Bopp-Shoo-Wop 
Bopp-Shoo-Wop 
 Everybody dance 
 Ooh-Ooh clap your hands 
 Clap your hands 
 Everybody dance 
 Ooh-Ooh clap your hands 
 Clap your hands 
 Everybody dance 
 Ooh-Ooh clap your hands 
 Clap your hands 
 Everybody dance 
 Ooh-Ooh clap your hands 
 Clap your hands 
 Spinning all around the floor 
 It's as if sadness and despair 
 Turns to life without a care 
 Strutting to obey the dream 
 At the top 
 Always ends too soon 
 It's got us dancing 
Who's she?
They call her "tiger lady."
It's actually a cheetah pattern she's wearing.
At some point, she wore a tiger pattern.
It's always something very slinky and sexy.
You consider her sexy?
Ah, yeah.
The banquette.
Where's Jimmy?
I don't know. He went to get drinks.
What would you like?
Uh, vodka-Tonic.
Me, too.
I'll go with you.
Ever since I was 6 years old or so,
I sensed I was somehow... different.
Then, every time you made love to me...
You must have wanted to vomit.
No. No, no.
Oh, you're beautiful!
You don't have to be some sweaty, horny,
Hetero he-Ape to admire and... And appreciate... female beauty... only very, very recently
Did the final realization come.
Exactly when did the final realization come?
2 days ago.
I get up late and usually turn on the TV,
Sort of as a reflex.
Wednesday afternoon,
There was a rerun of wild kingdom,
Mutual of Omaha's nature program with marlin Perkins
And that... attractive, younger guy.
It triggered something.
Suddenly everything fell into place.
I'm gay... and always have been.
You only found out you were gay
On Wednesday?
Only then definitively.
Wednesday was... gay day for me.
Finished eavesdropping?
I wasn't eavesdropping.
Come on. Anything interesting?
Shh. God!
Listen, it's much better you're with Tom than Jimmy.
You two really look great together.
You think so?
It's too bad we weren't closer friends in college.
I think I could really have helped you there.
For most guys,
Sexual repressiveness is a turn-Off.
You're saying this for my benefit?
You're a good conversationalist but... there's something of the kindergarten teacher
About you.
It's really nice, but... the guys you like also tend to be on the ethereal side.
It can get pretty far away
From any kind of physicality.
This is gonna sound dumb, but it really works.
Whenever you can,
Throw the word "sexy" into your conversation.
It's kind of a signal.
Like, um...
"there's something really sexy about strobe lights."
Or, uh...
"this fabric is so sexy."
Yeah, it is.
 That you and I could make it on through 
  But somethin' went wrong
Josh?
Uh, hi.
What are you doing here?
In New York or in the club?
In the city.
I'm an a.D.A. In Morgenthau's office.
An assistant district attorney for manhattan.
They call us "a.D.A.'S."
You're a prosecutor?
God, how did you get that?
It's not such a big deal...
I'm perfectly competent to do the job, des.
Great. Good.
I wasn't implying anything.
I was just surprised to see you here.
Going to Harvard must have been great.
Well... the people at Hampshire were nice,
And pretty smart, in a nontraditional way,
But I was out of place there.
I'm sorry, I don't consider the guy
Who did the Spiderman comics a serious writer.
Yeah, I thought it was the green hornet
People took more seriously.
Um, excuse me, are you Alice?
Jimmy Steinway gave me this vodka-Tonic to give you,
But I'm afraid I sampled it.
I'll get you another.
Jimmy's gone?
You're "hap"?
Yeah, he wanted me to tell you he's sorry,
But he was ejected from the club.
He was ejected?
Apparently he snuck one of his clients
In the back of the club.
That's odd he knew
I drank vodka-Tonics.
I never told him.
It's uncanny.
You mean, it's a complete cliche?
"All women recent college graduates drink vodka-Tonics,"
Or something like that?
Well, maybe.
So Jimmy think's I'm a total cliche
I ordered a vodka-Tonic, too... So what?
You're plenty original
Without having to order some weirdo drink.
Yeah, I wouldn't worry about it.
Can I get you another?
Thanks. Actually, if you don't mind,
I think I'd prefer... uh, uh, a whiskey sour.
Ok.
 The tide is high 
 But I'm rollin' on 
 I'm gonna be your number one 
 I'm not the kinda girl 
 Who gives up just like that 
You're going already?
It's really late.
I didn't peg you as such a nightcluber.
I mean, you really seem to like it.
I do. This is a great place.
It's what I always dreamed of... cocktails, dancing, conversation...
Exchange of ideas and points of view... everyone's here...
Everyone you know
And everyone you don't know.
You should be proud, des.
This is quite an accomplishment.
Yeah. I am.
Who's the girl you were dancing with?
Oh, Alice Kinnon.
Oh.
Thanks a lot for getting me in.
Great.
I'm a little worried about that guy.
I think he might be having
A manic episode of some kind.
Now, des, don't get started on that.
So you're one of the club's managers?
Yeah.
 Every girl wants you 
 To be her man 
 But I'll wait, my dear 
You knew Tom would be here tonight, didn't you?
God, you're much craftier than I thought.
No, I didn't.
We're going to check out this after-Hours club
Jimmy told hap about.
Why don't you come?
Jimmy might be there.
I don't know.
 But I'm rollin' on 
 I'm gonna be 
 Your number one 
 Number one 
We were all at Harvard together.
How did you get involved with environmental causes?
I think that's great.
You're interested in the environment?
Very much so.
Actually, there's one theory
That the environmental movement of our day
Was sparked by the re-Release of bambi
In the late 1950s.
For many members of the baby boom generation,
It was traumatic... the hunters killing bambi's mother.
Yeah, it was terrible.
For 6-Year-Olds, it's devastating.
To this day, no one wants to identify
With those hunters.
I think you're right.
You're living in some women's residence,
Aren't you?
Yeah. It's terrible.
No guests.
Huh.
Wow.
It's really nice.
Thanks.
Would you like anything to drink?
What?
Um... could I have... a pernod?
Sure.
This is supposed to be good
For cigarette mouth.
Do you smoke?
When I drink or go out at night,
I usually smoke.
I live dangerously.
On the edge.
I'm no kindergarten teacher.
What's this?
Um, I collect original edition
Scrooge Mcduck comics.
It sounds a little odd.
Not at all.
This is original artwork by Carl barks,
Who created the uncle scrooge comics.
He's considered a bit of a genius.
There's something really sexy about scrooge Mcduck.
You really think so?
 Ooh 
I love uncle scrooge.
 How do you like your love? 
  But if you want to know 
 How I really feel 
  Get the cameras rollin' 
 Get the action goin' 
 Baby, you know 
  My love for you is real 
 Take me where you want to 
 Me and my heart, you steal 
 More, more, more 
 How do you like it?
How do you like it? 
 More, more, more 
 How do you like it?
How do you like it? 
 More, more, more 
 How do you like it?
How do you like it? 
 Ooh 
 How do you like your love? 
 Ooh 
 How do you like your love? 
"the author's brother is,
"According to Tibetan Buddhism,
"God.
Recommend..."
"Very kind decline."
Anything interesting?
Not really.
What time did you get back?
I don't know.
You don't know?
I didn't check.
Well, was it light or dark?
Why do you care what time I got in?
Sorry. No reason.
We've got to get an apartment of our own.
Do you know how long it takes
To become an editor?
You mean associate editor.
Yeah. Associate editor.
What's the minimum amount of time
To become an associate editor?
How many years?
That's hard to say.
Approximately.
Maybe 4 years.
But more than years,
Before you can become an associate editor,
You have to have a best seller.
How can you be sure you'll get a best seller?
You cannot.
But what if you don't find one?
You have to.
Show them the outline.
You might want to see this.
It's the Scott Meredith best seller outline.
"Create sympathetic characters,
"With whom readers identify.
Give them problems, make these problems big."
Could I photocopy this?
Yes, but I need it back.
I'd like a copy, too.
That stuff is such crap.
This does describe a lot of best sellers.
That's true.
It's completely formulaic.
Of course it's formulaic. It's a formula.
That's why I prefer nonfiction.
It's good you want to be an editor so much.
In this era of television,
You are devoted to the printed word.
Actually, ultimately,
I'd like to work in television.
But right now, what I need's a raise.
Alice and I have been looking at apartments,
But we can't afford one on what we get as assistants.
That's so comical.
What?
That giris like you really worry about paying rent.
Aren't your fathers heavily subsidizing
Your living expenses with big allowances?
They're not big at all.
In a few years, you'll marry
Some incredibly rich corporate lawyers.
It's not as if you really worry about paying the rent
Like the rest of us.
Oh, you worry about paying the rent?
Yeah.
Then you're way ahead of us
'Cause we don't even have an apartment.
What if, in a few years,
We don't marry some corporate lawyer?
What if we marry some meatball like you?
But not you personally,
But someone with similarly low socioeconomic prospects?
Can you believe that?
They really think that way.
Disco sucks.
What a dope.
Would you ever go out
With anyone who worked in the company?
Fortunately,
There's absolutely no temptation.
Charlotte, telephone.
It's a man.
Hello?
Oh, hi.
We were thinking of having some people for dinner
Saturday night.
Wanted to know if you could come.
About 7:30.
Ok. Where?
Actually, I'll have to call you back with that.
Yeah.
Thanks.
Ok.
Bye.
That was Jimmy Steinway.
He's coming for dinner Saturday night.
You called him?
I thought you said you could never be interested
In anyone who worked in advertising.
No one could say something like that seriously.
It was obviously a joke.
Anyway, it's not like it's a date or anything.
He's invited as part of a group.
It's really important
There be more group social life,
Not just all this ferocious pairing off.
You like Tom.
Invite him.
We don't even have an apartment.
How can we have a dinner party?
Well, it's another incentive to get one.
Does the Lexington avenue express stop at 86th street?
I think so.
We'd better hurry.
Do you really think we know each other well enough
To room together?
Well, maybe that's good.
It's not just that we don't know each other well.
I'm not even sure we really like each other.
That's ok.
You know, Alice,
I'm not so much of a bitch as I might seem.
You'll find holly's a little sensitive
About her intelligence.
She's dumb?
Harvard guys, even the ones that
Seem reasonably cool on the outside,
Are all essentially wimps and bookworms
On the inside.
They love being seen out with this lovely girl,
But after a date or two,
Rather than risk rejection,
They pretend to drop her,
Going around complaining about how dull she was.
Is she dull?
A little, but that's not the point.
Once you start worrying about something like that,
You're lost.
Holly was devastated.
She stopped dating entirely,
And weekends either went home
Or just hung around the library at pine manor.
What do you think you're doing?
Shove off, Mack!
Deviant!
Creep! Off!
So I wouldn't develop any illusions
About Harvard guys.
They can be amazing creeps, too.
Ah, there you are.
Hi.
Our friend still isn't here.
Sorry. I forgot which way the numbers went
On the east side.
It's what's called a railroad apartment.
It's long and rather narrow like a railroad car.
Each room opens directly onto the other.
It's very nice.
The closets are here.
This is the other bedroom.
The bathroom is back here at this end.
And the kitchen.
So to get to the bathroom from the living room,
You have to clomp through both bedrooms?
Well, there are 2 outside doors,
So in theory,
You can use the exterior hall
To go between the kitchen and the living room.
Huh.
Even with 2 roommates, the layout is a bit awkward.
You can't afford something bigger?
We all work in book publishing.
Couldn't your parents help?
They already are.
So what do you think?
I think it's really nice.
Isn't the layout a bit awkward?
Well, I think we should take it.
Here you go.
It's good to see bourgeois giris
Building up a sweat.
Why is that good to see?
You live around here?
There was a guild meeting at asphalt green.
A guild meeting?
The newspaper guild is organizing clerical
And editorial staff for book publishing.
I'm supposed to organize our department.
Oh, my god. We're all gonna lose our jobs.
You should support this.
You were just complaining how lousy the pay is.
Are you rooming with them?
That's gonna be really tough.
Aren't we behind schedule?
Nope. This recipe's extremely fast.
Hello.
Uh, it's Dan.
Dan?
Hi. Come up.
Dan from your department.
I invited him.
Departmental Dan?
You know... he went to Harvard.
So?
Yeah, I've got to meet some clients at 10:00
And get them into the club.
Tom isn't coming?
If he does, he'll be very late.
Isn't this what they call a railroad apartment?
Uh-Huh.
People always say how terrible they are,
But it seems pretty nice.
Well, the layout's not so good.
It's amazing the little things in life
One doesn't appreciate until they're missing,
Such as hallways.
These apartments were actually planned
In the last century as tenement housing
For working class families.
Now all the yuppie roommate combos
Are crowding them out.
Well... that's just tough.
Fight!
Rumble!
Actually, I was thinking I'd go home.
What?
You should come.
I don't know.
I'm not really a disco type.
Well, who is?
I probably wouldn't get in anyway.
Of course you'll get in. Holly's gorgeous.
 There's a new me comin' out 
  And I just have to live 
 And I wanna give 
  I'm completely positive 
  I think this time around
 I am gonna do it like you never knew it 
  Oh, I'll make it through
  The time has come for me to break out of this shell 
 I have to shout 
 That I am comin' out 
 I'm comin' out 
  I want the worid to know
 I got to let it show 
 I'm comin' 
 I'm comin' out 
Thanks, Jimmy.
Have fun, jack, harry.
Thanks a lot, des. I really appreciate it.
Fine, cool.
I'm starting to realize how important eye contact is.
I can't talk to people in this thing.
They get nervous. They don't know who I am.
Well, that's the point.
You think tonight would be a good time
To talk to van?
Try to patch things up, get a reprieve of some sort?
Uh, no.
My job's sort of on the line, des.
And not all clients will be such good sports
As harry and jack.
If it's a question of groveling,
I can do that.
Just point me in the right direction.
Shh! God!
Can I show you something?
Sure. What?
You know something about banking, don't you?
Yeah. Manny hanny used to be a client.
Manufacturers hanover.
I know what manny hanny is.
Note... no lock.
10 is the cover charge.
God. Paying a cover charge to get into a club?
How humiliating.
That's your reaction?
Look at this.
Kind of worrisome, don't you think?
Yeah.
To me, shipping cash to Switzerland
In canvas bags
Doesn't sound honest.
To me, it suggests possible illegality.
Well, what are you gonna do?
Well, I'm not going into that room anymore.
Uh, gimlet, please?
Domestic beer or bud?
Um... whiskey sour?
Excuse me.
You're Alice Kinnon, aren't you?
Yeah.
We met at that party in sag harbor,
Labor day weekend.
You were just coming in as I was leaving,
And you asked me where the kitchen was.
Do you remember?
I do remember getting to the kitchen.
Uh, excuse us.
We're here sort of as a group.
If you don't mind?
Excuse me.
Why did you say that?
I didn't like the look of him at all.
Didn't you notice how he was eyeballing you?
Creepy.
Frankly, I thought he might've been the guy
That bothered me on the subway.
I'm sorry if I overreacted.
Poor guy.
It's no big deal.
That kind of thing happens all the time.
Anyway, you've got Tom.
 I don't wanna lose you 
 This good thing 
 That I've got 
Hey.
I'm sorry I'm so late.
How did it go?
Fine.
You know, they closed the airport.
We had to land in Washington
Until Laguardia reopened.
 Than any love I know 
 Is like thunder 
 Lightning 
 The way you love me is frightenin' 
 You better knock 
 Knock 
 On wood 
 Baby 
 Ooh 
 Ooh ooh ooh ooh 
 Baby 
 Ooh 
Do you remember the conversation we had
Labor day weekend?
Had a huge impact on me.
Really?
Jennifer and I had been talking all year
About either acknowledging
The permanence of our relationship and marrying
Or finally just breaking up.
I had no idea you were even dating anyone.
I thought you knew.
No. We've been together since college.
But the weekend after labor day,
We had this long talk.
Jennifer proposed a trial separation,
Which normally I'd have considered ridiculous,
But I couldn't help thinking of you
And went along.
Out of some sort of
Residual loyalty to Jennifer,
I didn't call you immediately
And instead started coming to the club.
I'm not a very good dancer, but...
No, you are.
I was also curious if the sexual revolution
Went as far as everyone said it had.
But emotionally, I couldn't handle it.
I got so depressed, and... when I saw you that night,
You were... a vision,
Not just of loveliness, but of... virtue... and sanity.
What?
I shouldn't talk about it.
I'll just end up sounding like an idiot.
No, what?
You're very sexy
And good-Looking and modern and hot.
But what I was craving
Was a sort of sentient individual
Who wouldn't abandon her intelligence
To hop into bed with every guy she meets
In a nightclub.
Why... why is it that when people have
Sex-With-Strangers on their mind,
Their I.Q. Just drops, like, 40 points?
All that affected
Sexy seductress slinking around?
And uncle scrooge is sexy?
I mean, my god, is there no limit?
No. That was to...
Do you think I'm an idiot?
I'm so sick of all the lies and nonsense!
Alice?
Alice, what's wrong?
What happened?
Mcgrath! Where is he?
I'd say it's definitely not a good idea
To approach van tonight.
There he is.
Mcgrath!
Drew Mcgrath.
You're out of here right now.
What?
Bernie. Bernie!
Where is he? Here he is.
Bernie, this guy's through.
What's going on?
We had a public safety situation in the front.
This jerk comes out, trying to make it worse.
Is this true?
Public safety situation?
Give me a break.
It was a joke. I'm sorry.
We had a public safety situation.
The cops came. It was no joke.
I tease him a tiny bit.
No teasing, des.
No teasing?
Either he goes or I do.
Come on, van. Des, grow up.
Cut it out.
Ok. Sorry.
It's the ad guy.
So, it's the dancing ad man.
You're finished.
Ok, I work in advertising.
Is that a crime?
What's happening in this country?
There they are! Get 'em!
Get the tin man. Get him.
Get this jerk out of the club.
You're fired, des. You're out of here.
You can't fire me, van.
Only Bernie can fire me.
Ok.
You're fired.
And take this yuppie scum with you.
Good riddance!
Yuppie scum?
In college, before dropping out,
I took a course in the propaganda uses of language.
One objective is to deny other people's humanity
Or even right to exist.
In the men's lounge,
Someone scrawled "kill yuppie scum."
Do yuppies even exist?
No one says, "I am a yuppie."
It's always the other guy who's a yuppie.
I think for a group to exist,
Somebody has to admit to be part of it.
Of course yuppies exist.
Most people would say you two are prime specimens.
We're not yuppies!
You think we're yuppies?
You're seriously saying you're not yuppies?
No.
Yuppie stands for "young upwardly mobile professional."
Nightclub flunky is not a professional category.
Contrary to popular belief,
Junior-Level ad jobs don't pay well at all.
I wish we were yuppies:
Young, upwardly mobile, professional.
Those are good things, not bad things.
Where we going?
Rex's. Oh, no.
What's wrong with rex's?
Well, you can't dance there,
And it's full of boring preppies.
Oh, and we're so interesting.
You can dance at rex's.
Yeah, but why rex's?
Why not some other place?
Well, for one thing,
Everyone at the club knows that I go there,
So when they come looking for me,
I wanna be there.
Why would they come looking for you?
What happened tonight was a mistake,
Which even now Bernie's probably very much regretting.
He's a smart guy.
Not without good qualities... even if very few.
I wouldn't be very surprised if he's already called rex's
To retract my dismissal.
How can you be so sure of that?
Well, I'm not sure of it.
 Opportunity 
 Whoa, opportunity 
  Yeah, yeah, baby
 Opportunity 
 Whoa, opportunity 
 Opportunity 
Hey. Hey, rex.
Welcome to rex's.
Alice, you look like you've seen
The dark side of the moon.
What did Tom say?
No. I feel much better.
I love your idea of social life as a group,
Without all this ferocious pairing off.
I couldn't have stood being alone tonight.
I thought Bernie was smarter than that.
What a blunder.
When they do call, we'll get you immediately.
Thanks, rex.
Rex is such a great guy.
Yeah. Charlotte says she can tell if a guy's gay or not
Just by looking in his eyes.
How?
Maybe it's related to how they look at you.
It's hard to define,
But I think women can tell.
I can't.
Are Jimmy or I gay?
Come on, don't.
Jimmy?
No.
Well, not your eyes,
But you do have a gay mouth.
A gay mouth?
I have a gay mouth?
What does that mean?
Just what I said.
It's true, des. Your mouth does look gay.
God! How moronic can you get?
What nonsense!
Don't think I don't know your whole act.
Excuse me?
Pretending to be gay
To get sympathy from women
While cruelly dumping them,
And to seem cooler than you actually are.
I despise your whole pathetic act.
You're not fit to lick the boots
Of my real gay friends.
Well, I don't want to lick the boots
Of your real gay friends.
You know, I could be gay.
I see through you completely.
Oh, you see through me completely.
Yeah, I do.
That's the dark side of feminism.
What?
You have a kind of free pass to make any kind of wounding
Or derogatory comment you want.
I am hardly a militant feminist.
No, you're not.
A militant feminist would be a lot fairer.
It's women like you whose attitudes to men
Are so dehumanizing.
Like what?
That men are swine,
Obsessed with large breasts
And the sex act,
Devoid of any idealistic or romantic sensibility
When in fact,
We have that idealistic sensibility
In spades.
For instance, you have no idea
What men really think about women's breasts.
What do men think about women's breasts?
Well, it's not something you just blurt out.
It's far more complicated and nuanced than that.
Ok, I'll tell you a story.
When I was in college,
There was a girl I had a crush on
Who always had older boyfriends,
Invariably some senior.
Finally, they all graduated,
And one night we went back to her room alone.
Suddenly, her shirt was off,
And I was confronted with these breasts,
Which turned out to be completely surprising
And frankly, disconcerting.
They were rather large and not ugly
Or especially strange-Shaped,
But in all the time that
I had thought about her,
These breasts had never figured.
She took off her shirt so quickly,
There was no time for adjustment,
And I said something arrogant about it,
As if her abrupt unveiling of her largish breasts
Was somehow going to slay my swinish male self,
As if I hadn't already been slayed
On a much higher level.
Her name was Alice, too.
Oh, come on, des.
You know that's not true.
What do you mean, it isn't true?
Her name wasn't Alice.
Well, I'm not gonna use her real name.
Would you like to dance?
Do you mind?
 When you wear your high ho boots 
 With your hip-Hugger suit 
 Huh, it's all right 
 You're outta sight 
If what's bothering you relates to Tom,
I wouldn't take it personally.
Did you know Tom and Jennifer
Had a trial separation,
Which was to end tonight?
What you might not know
Is that about a week ago,
They started seeing each other on the sly,
Cheating on their trial separation.
How do you know that?
Working at the club,
You find out all kinds of things.
You know, this is the way people used to dance in bars
In the old days.
Do people ever really dance in bars?
I thought that was a myth.
People my older brother's age, uh, they did.
Your brother must be a lot older.
Before disco,
This country was a dancing wasteland.
You know the woodstock generation of the 1960s
That were so full of themselves
And conceited?
None of those people could dance.
Huh.
 I'm crazy 'bout you 
 Now go 
 Now with your bad self 
What happened over there?
I think she noticed
That, for a moment, I flinched.
She dropped me like a rock.
I was crushed.
I couldn't take it, so I dropped out
And got in the night club business early,
Thanks to which
I probably owe my success today.
Let's share a cab.
We're thinking of going.
You're all going?
Yeah.
Have they called yet from the club?
I don't think they will call.
Bernie will probably send some emissary.
That's more his style.
What should we do with the oz costumes,
Just, uh, bring 'em by the club tomorrow?
Actually, those costumes are mine.
Just get 'em back to me when you can.
I thought we were here as a group.
You talked about the tremendous importance
Of group social life.
Well, it's really late.
Yeah, Alice, it's getting really late.
We'd better get going.
Hey, thanks again, des.
Ciao.
Bye.
Bye.
All week charlotte's been talking about
The tremendous importance of group social life,
Opposing all this ferocious pairing off.
Well, group social life has its place,
But at a certain point,
Other biological factors come into play.
Our bodies weren't really designed
For group social life.
A certain amount of pairing off
Was always part of the original plan.
God, I can't believe you'd say that.
What?
What did I say?
What you mean to say is that they've all gone back
To screw their brains out?!
No, I didn't say that!
I said they were going to pair off.
Well, wait, don't go!
I didn't mean to say anything
Anyone could be offended by.
Oh, thank god. He's here.
Des, Bernie regrets what happened.
It was a mistake, and he wants you back.
I'm sorry. I know why you're so upset.
I mean,
I know what really happened with Tom.
What?!
That he thought
You were really slutty or something.
That's so stupid!
You can't worry about what misinterpreters think!
That's so unfair!
Come back to my place. We should talk.
Nothing will happen!
I just need somebody to talk to.
Maybe you do, too.
89th and first.
89th and first.
Hi.
Hi.
 Sexy baby 
 Good-Lovin' daddy 
 Ooh 
 Let me be your rockin' chair 
 Just a-Rock me away from here 
 Let's get it on 
 Come to me, baby... 
Alice, what would your dream book to publish be
If you could publish any book?
Anything that might become a bestseller.
Aside from that. Your dream book.
I'd say... a collection of new J.D. Salinger stories,
But more in the direction of the laughing man
Or raise high the roof beam, carpenters,
Nothapworth 16 orseymour:
An introduction.
Did you know that, in his own day,
Mary McCarthy and Alfred Kazin
Wrote devastating pieces on Salinger?
No.
Yeah. They really destroyed him.
 Sexy baby 
 Good-Lovin' daddy 
 Ooh 
 Let me be your rockin' chair 
 Just a-Rock me away from here 
 Let's get it on 
 Come to me, baby 
 Ooh 
 Let me be your rockin' chair 
 Just a-Rock me away from here 
 Rock me gently 
 Make me feel like a cloud in the sky... 
Maybe we should go the outside way like Alice.
I'm sure it was Jimmy.
It's very quiet.
Get out! Get out!
That was pretty bad.
God!
What's the matter now?
What?
All the noise...
Clomping around, banging pans.
Sorry. I didn't realize it.
You obviously intended it.
What do you mean?
That's very aggressive.
You don't clomp around, banging pans
For no reason.
Like what reason?
You know perfectly well.
Because I only bang pans?
Well, frankly, that's not what I heard.
Ok. Anything I did that was wrong,
I apologize for.
But anything I did that was not wrong,
I don't apologize for.
God, Alice is such a scorpio.
Come here, Rufus. Did she hurt you?
Come here, Rufus. Let's see. Let's see.
Aww. Aw, poor Rufus...
Rufus!
Rufus!
Come here, boy!
Rufus!
Come here!
Hey! Never do that! How dare you?!
Shame on you!
Bitch!
I've decided to go ahead
With the Tibet book proposal.
What?
The memoir by the Dalai lama's older brother?
Oh.
I'd like to bring it up
At Wednesday's editorial meeting.
You really liked that?
Other people liked it, too?
Yeah.
Ok. I'll take another look.
You know, it's considered a little self-Indulgent
To read too much of a manuscript
If it doesn't seem to be going anywhere.
Have you known holly long?
Just since we found the apartment. Why?
She's very, uh... quiet, isn't she?
Well, I would say, not more than normal.
Your standard of normal could be different from other people's.
How do you mean?
I don't understand that.
I guess what
I'm asking is...
You do like holly, don't you?
Yeah, of course.
But... she is intelligent, isn't she?
Well, sometimes I question
Her dating choices.
God, you're tough.
I'm not tough in the least.
No. You're really tough.
 Halston, gucci 
 Fiorucci 
 He looks like a stiff 
 That man is dressed to kill 
 Oh, wa-Wow 
  He's the greatest dancer
 Oh, wa-Wow 
 That I've ever seen... 
Congratulations, Alice.
Yeah, your first book. Great.
It could be a bestseller.
Charlotte. Oh, charlotte.
That was so moving,
What you said about our obligation to writers.
Thanks.
And how often we fall short of that.
Well, let's face it,
Most authors are still conceited dopes.
Oh, you... You can't say that.
You're an editor.
You don't have to deal with them on a daily basis.
When you're an assistant,
It's harder to dodge their calls.
Good going, Alice.
I'm really glad we got this book.
I understand that you know some people at the club.
Do you think that maybe, um,
Sometime you could, uh, get us in there some night?
Yeah. Certainly. We'll arrange that.
Very good. Thanks.
Thanks a lot, Dan.
Sure.
Do you have any idea why Jimmy's
Suddenly so interested in your social life?
No. He's interested in my social life?
Haven't you noticed?
He's always wondering
Why you don't go out or go to the club.
He is?
You know, Alice,
You've been hanging around the apartment a lot.
You've kind of set up office there.
None of the rest of us has any privacy.
The railroad apartment wasn't my idea.
Yeah, that's true, but it's just odd
That you're so much friendlier to Jimmy
Now he's with me.
I just think the situation's kind of awkward.
What do you want me to do,
Promise not to talk to him anymore?
I'm sure you know perfectly well
How to subtly get a guy to cool it
If you really wanted to.
 Turn it upside down 
 Hey, yeah, yeah 
  Love to hear percussion 
 Well 
 Love to hear it 
 Flute player, play your flute 'cause 
 I know that you want to get jumping... 
Oh, damn.
Oh, damn? Thanks.
You're here to see van?
You don't mind, do ya?
Well, I sorta do.
I hate asking that guy for favors.
They're not gonna keep me on much longer
If I can't get clients into the club.
It's that important to you
To stay in advertising?
Ok. Better see him while he's still on his upswing.
Hey, des.
Hi.
God, what happened to you?
Jesus. Josh, you're a mess.
I'm a mess.
I got to talk to you.
You sure you don't want to clean up a little?
It's kind of serious.
I'll look for Alice and charlotte,
See if they've come in.
That's Audrey Rouget,
The youngest person ever to be made an editor
In the history of farrar, Straus.
How do you know her?
She interviewed me.
How did it go?
Have you ever been in an interview
And gotten the impression they see through you completely?
I didn't get an offer.
You don't want to clean up a little?
No.
You know, you look really bad.
I know. That's actually good in my work.
It puts people at ease, looking like this.
They feel, frankly, superior to me
And say things they ordinarily wouldn't.
It's very disarming.
Phew! What happened?!
I was having drinks
With some friends in the village,
And there was this terrible guy
Really bothering this girl,
So I decided to intervene,
But it turns out they were married.
What's this now? You're not here
On official business, are you?
Knowing that we went to college together,
They asked me to talk to you.
Who is "they"?
I can't tell you.
I couldn't believe you'd be involved
In the kinds of things
That have been going on here
And told them so.
I consider you a person of some integrity,
Except, you know,
In your relations with women.
 I don't know if it's right 
 To let you make love to me 
 Tonight 
  I don't know if I should
 Give my love to you 
 When I know you're no good 
No, I don't want to play that stuff.
All right. I'll let him know.
Take the tortoise and the hare.
Ok, the tortoise won one race.
Do you think the hare is really gonna lose
Any more races to turtles? Not on your life.
I liked that tortoise.
So do I, but if you were a betting person,
Would you say, "that tortoise won against the hare.
In future races I'm backing him"?
No. That race was almost certainly a fluke,
And, afterwards, the tortoise is still a tortoise,
And the hare, a hare.
Domestic beer. A bud.
Mm-Hmm.
Vodka tonic, please.
Um, I'll just have a coca-Cola.
You're not drinking?
Alice is not having a cocktail?
I can't believe it.
Well, I'm not.
What is it?
Do you have strep throat or some flu
You're taking antibiotics for?
Oh, my god! You have the clap, don't you?
You're on antibiotics,
And the doctor told you not to drink
Or something.
That's why you're not drinking.
Usually there's no coming between Alice
And a cocktail.
How could you?
No. I'm sure I'm right.
The bottle of tetracycline
On her bureau top.
Tetracycline's specific for the clap.
How could you say that?!
Oh, come on. Everyone gets something.
 Lost inside adorable illusion 
 And I cannot hide 
  I'm the one you're using
 Please don't push me aside 
 We could have made it cruising, yeah... 
Alice.
I am so, so sorry.
I should never have said that.
I have some sort of sick compulsion
To say everything that occurs to me.
I just want to let you know,
As soon as I can find a new rooming situation,
I'm moving out. I can't take it anymore.
It's not possible.
You're not serious.
Just let me know when you're ready to go.
Ok.
Please, Alice.
Rooming with you and holly
Has been the most important thing
To happen to me in my life.
You're the first woman friends I've ever had.
The anger you're feeling now
Is actually more justified than you know.
When we were at Hampshire,
I really hated you.
You seemed so moralistic and judgmental.
I had no idea, then, how you really were.
When guys wanted to ask you out,
I'd talk them out of it.
Oh, my god. I can't believe how evil I was.
But I've completely changed.
If you will give me another chance,
I'll be the best friend you've ever had.
If the apartment situation weren't so impossible,
I'd move out now.
I can understand how you'd feel that way.
You're right to.
But things aren't always as they seem.
Bad and inexcusable as what I said back there
Might have been, I think you'll find
It'll actually improve your reputation
With these guys enormously.
You'll be more popular than ever. Watch.
Vd's not all bad.
You'll find there are actually
Positive aspects to it.
What?
Well, you know that "please inform
All previous partners" thing?
It's actually a terrific way
To get back in touch
With guys you might have liked
But have lost contact with.
Just in my own experience,
It's twice led to renewed relationships
With guys that lasted quite a while
And were really... sweet.
I'm not talking about herpes infections,
Which are far more serious
And apparently incurable,
Just standard vd and other conditions
Easily treatable with antibiotics.
God, are you following me or something?
You said you weren't taking anything.
Well, I'm not. It was a gift.
I never buy the stuff,
And anyway, it hardly affects me.
Oh, no.
Actually, what I'm high about
Is the situation with Alice.
This makes her seem much more accessible.
She's not operating on a plane
So far removed from the rest of us.
There's hope for me.
What did josh want to talk to you about?
Is everything ok?
Uh, no... not exactly.
I'm sorry to bug you about this,
But I'd be really grateful
If we could talk with van soon.
The way it's going, if I can't get people in here,
I'm going to lose my job.
Des! You lied to me!
I thought you were a wonderful man,
But it was all lies!
No!
You said you loved me!
And then you said you were gay,
But you're not!
Everyone knew but me!
You completely humiliated me!
I could be gay.
You're saying again you're gay?
Tell me honestly,
Have you had sex with men?!
 I got to go where the people dance... 
Well, that's defining it rather narrowly.
Bullshit! Bullshit! Bullshit!
Bullshit!
 I want to give it 
 I want to get some, too 
 Ah-Ah, ah-Ah-Ah 
 Whoo-Oh-Oh ahh... 
Between games, as planned,
A huge box containing thousands of disco records
Was blown up.
The rest was unplanned.
Fans stormed out onto the field in the thousands.
Disco records were hurled like frisbees.
Bonfires were set. Bottles where thrown.
The batting cage was torn down and destroyed.
Fistfights broke out.
Manhattan district attorney Robert Morgenthau,
At his press conference,
Congratulated prosecutors on their successful convictions
In the probe of...
...speaking for the first time on his real estate task force's
18 convictions of executives at 6 commercial brokerages,
Promised a vigorous prosecution
Of corporate and white collar crime
In a wide-Ranging series of investigations...
I'll just be a second.
Alice, congratulations on the TV sale.
Thanks.
Hi.
Hi.
How's holly?
Fine.
Is she, um, going out with anyone?
Yeah, this really nice guy who went to Denver university
And works in real estate.
He found her this incredibly cheap apartment.
She no longer lives with you guys?
You hold what happened against me.
Not that you broke up,
Just that you go out with people
Based primarily on looks.
Holly's also very nice.
A lot of people are nice.
You only asked out the fabulously good-Looking one.
You hold that against me.
Well, pretty shallow.
You know, Alice, except for politics,
We've got a lot in common.
We're both pretty serious
And, I think, respect each other's
Bases for judgment.
Occasionally,
I get reactionary thoughts, too.
I'm not reactionary.
Well, aesthetically.
Oh, well, aesthetically.
You mean you think I gave it to you?
How can you be sure?
I'm sure.
Well, you were a lot more active than I was.
You were obviously very experienced.
No.
Oh, come on.
How did you know all that?
Well, I read a lot.
You must've been with some guys.
You weren't a virgin.
I didn't consider myself a virgin,
But... what?
I don't know.
Technically... what?
If I'm making love,
The man... spurts... outside the woman,
Does that count as sexual intercourse?
"Spurts"?
If it squirts outside, without getting in,
Does that count as losing your virginity?
No part of the man got in at any time?
I don't think so.
I think part has to get in... to be considered sexual intercourse.
So then I was a virgin.
Oh... I can't believe that.
The first time you make love, I...
I give you both "g" and an "h" infection.
"H"?
Your move.
I'm beginning to think that maybe
That old system of people getting married
Based on mutual respect and shared aspirations,
And then slowly, over time,
Earning each other's love and admiration,
Worked the best.
Well, we'll never know.
Almost ready.
God, waiting around all night
For the unemployed guy to get around to shaving.
You're so busy you can't shower until midnight?
Excuse me. Unemployed is not who I am.
I'm a fully-Employed person
Who just happens not to have a job right now,
Largely because of some structural problems
In the advertising industry.
I'm sorry. That was really inconsiderate.
Please forgive me.
 Spin me 
  All around the floor... 
Of course, if you talk enthusiastically
About your work in advertising,
You sound like a total cretin.
No. Your enthusiasm
Is actually enormously appealing.
In fact, I used to not think so well
Of people in advertising,
But it's one of the great things
About getting out of college and into the real worid,
How experience changes and improves your views.
During college, I remember seeing couples
With crying babies and thinking "how horrible."
Lately, I've been spending a lot of time
With my niece and nephew.
Saturday, I took my niece, who's 7,
To see the Disney movie,
Lady and the tramp. She loved it,
Was so cute.
I'm beginning to fall in love
With the whole idea of having kids.
I hate that movie.
What?
It's so... tacky,
Not to mention depressing.
This sweet movie about cute cartoon dogs,
You found depressing?
There is something depressing about it.
And it's not really about dogs.
Except for some superficial bow-Wow stuff at the start,
The dogs all represent human types,
Which is where it gets into real trouble.
Lady, the ostensible protagonist,
Is a fluffy blonde cocker spaniel
With absolutely nothing on her brain.
She's great-Looking, but... Let's be honest...
Incredibly insipid.
Tramp, the love interest,
Is a smarmy braggart of the most obnoxious kind:
An oily jailbird out for a piece of tail
Or whatever he can get.
Come on.
No. He's a self-Confessed chicken thief
And all-Around sleazeball.
What's the function of a film of this kind?
Essentially, it's a primer on love and marriage
Directed at very young people,
Imprinting on their little psyches the idea
That smooth-Talking delinquents
Recently escaped from the local pound
Are a good match for nice giris from sheltered homes.
When in 10 years, the icky human version
Of tramp shows up around the house,
Their hormones will be racing,
And no one'll understand why. Films like this
Program women to adore jerks.
God, you're nuts.
The only sympathetic character,
The little scotty who's so loyal and concerned about lady,
Is mocked as old-Fashioned and irrelevant
And shunted off to the side.
Isn't the whole point that tramp changes?
Ok, maybe in the past he stole chickens,
Ran around without a license,
And wasn't always sincere
With members of the opposite sex.
But through his love for lady
And the beneficent influences
Of fatherhood and matrimony, he changes... and becomes a valued member of that,
You know, rather idyllic household.
I don't think people really change that way.
We can change our context, but we can't change ourselves.
What does that mean?
Well, you've changed.
Come on, des.
That's a little different.
I agree with josh.
The scotty is the only admirable character.
It would have been a much better movie
If lady'd ended up with him.
I'm really surprised.
I think tramp really changed.
Maybe he wanted to change, or tried to change,
But there's not a lot of integrity there.
First, he'd be hanging around the house,
Drinking and watching ball games
And maybe knocking lady around a bit,
But pretty soon he'll be back
Down at the town dump chasing tail.
Oh, give me a break.
Are you taking your medication,
'Cause what you're saying is
Completely nuts! God, des... no! I think people should know
That our friend here has a certain condition.
How can Morgenthau shut up! Employ you?
He knows about mass. Mental health
And the loony tunes junior year?
Of course he knows about it.
God!
Jimmy, do you know where Alice is?
No. I don't know where she is.
Uh, excuse me.
Were you at Leo Burnett in Chicago?
Oh, my god, how are you?
Um, do you know betty?
Jimmy Steinway, hi.
Hi.
Are you still with ishmoco?
Yeah. There's a sales conference at the Americana.
I'm actually with the international side now,
Based in Spain.
How's that?
Barcelona's beautiful,
But, in human terms, uh, pretty cold.
How 'bout you?
I was at Mccallum, but just got sacked.
Have you found anything else?
No.
Any leads?
No.
You know, there're a lot of agencies in Spain
Looking for people with experience from here.
There's one in Madrid
Some Burnett people have affiliated with.
I could give 'em a call.
That sounds great.
Michael.
Good times.
I don't identify with tramp at all.
I was just sticking up for him
Because no one else was.
I actually identify
With the loyal scotty dog, too.
I've changed.
 Good times 
  These are the good times
  Leave your cares behind 
  These are the good times
 Good times 
  These are the good times
 Our new state of mind 
  These are the good times
 Happy days are here again 
I can't continue on this case.
There's a conflict.
Well, we know that.
You told us. You know this guy... des Mcgrath.
That's ok.
No, but now there's a real conflict.
 Better let them have their toys 
 Giris will be giris 
 Cute pony tails and curis 
Hi. Hey.
God, what a dump.
Yeah.
No. I don't mean your place.
Outside.
Oh.
You iron your own shirts?
Well, if I'm going to court,
I wear a laundry-Ironed shirt,
But, otherwise, I do it myself.
That's a great moment in life
When you can start
Sending all your shirts out for laundering.
At the agency, after my last promotion,
I briefly had that.
In any case, I doubt I'll be working there much longer.
What?
I'm thinking of quitting.
You can't do that.
Why not? What's it to you?
You assured me if I helped you,
You'd be around to protect des.
Well, the situation's changed.
How's it changed?
I can't say.
You can't say.
Maybe des is more involved than I thought.
Or more involved with someone you know.
That's a conflict, josh.
I still can't believe Alice is really serious about des.
Why not?
She seems smarter than that.
That doesn't matter. There's something
Deeply ingrained in human biology.
Women prefer bad over weak and indecisive
And unemployed.
I don't know about that.
You think they do prefer weak, indecisive,
And unemployed?
 Everybody loves somebody sometimes 
Jimmy's terribly closed off now.
His previous girlfriends weren't very nice to him.
I still think I'll be able to break through
To him emotionally at some point.
Oh...
Bernie wants to see you.
Could you wait for me?
Let's have breakfast together.
I have something I want to talk to you about.
Ok.
Come on.
 There's no telling where love may appear 
 Something in my heart keeps saying 
 My someday is here 
Uh, Bernie, you wanted to see me?
Yeah.
Sometimes I get the impression
You hardly know me, des.
I care about ideas.
I care about them a lot.
Did you know that in college,
My senior paper was on Ernest Hemingway?
Thanks, baby.
I'm not a nice person, des.
But some things are important,
Such as loyalty.
Loyalty's not eyewash, not like niceness.
I've been loyal to you, des.
I could've fired you, lots of times,
But never did.
Maybe you're not aware of this, des,
But there's some sort of investigation underway.
I think to myself,
"how could this happen?
"How could they get this information?
"Has some disgruntled employee,
"Former or current, informed on us?
"Is there some sort of spy here?
How could agents even get in?"
I mean, really,
They would stand out in this crowd
And, normally, not get past the door.
Do you know how they got in?
Uh, no. Could van be letting them in?
They're coming in as ad agency clients.
What?
Oh, I can't believe it.
After all I did for that guy.
So, you don't know anything about this investigation?
No! Well, a sort of acquaintance of mine
Who now works in Morgenthau's office approached me,
But I didn't tell him anything.
You didn't tell me about that.
I didn't think it was important.
It only just happened.
When? Tonight. Just now.
Why did you use the past perfect then?
I used the past perfect?
Yeah. "I was approached..."
Sounds like a while ago.
 Everybody loves somebody 
 Sometimes 
  Everybody falls in love 
 Somehow 
 Something in your kiss 
Des. Get away.
Don't talk to me.
Bernie knows about the investigation.
I haven't told you anything.
There was some leak at the precinct level.
Bernie had an informant, but it's been fixed.
It's not a problem any longer.
It's a problem.
I've never said anything to you.
You have to make that clear to everyone.
That doesn't matter.
What?
When everything comes down,
It's gonna be very rough.
Your whole life will be open for examination,
And it might not look so good.
Cut out the drugs, des.
What?
Don't make such a spectacle of yourself as a drug user.
Don't receive them, don't consume them,
And don't pass them on to others.
What are you talking about?
You could be charged with dealing.
Dealing? Those were gifts!
Well... who's accusing me of this?
This is you, isn't it, josh?
That's a conflict. We both like the same girl.
So, you really want to go to a beef house?
A beetha.
A beefha.
A beefha.
They go topless at a beefha.
I hear san Sebastian's pretty good.
Oh, look, there's blood.
Ciao.
Ciao. Good night.
Look out.
Oh, god!
Oh, my god!
I didn't know anything about it.
The agency just funneled
Clients they wanted to get into the club through me.
Usually, before I got into the car,
I hadn't even met them.
I just assumed they were clients from out of town.
That the I.R.S. Was our largest client
Didn't occur to me then.
I swear I didn't know anything about it, des,
At first.
You scumbag.
Josh promised me you'd be protected.
Oh, great. What's a little shocking
Is that they'd do something so obvious and clumsy
And move so fast,
No matter how richly I may feel you deserved it.
These were just some creeps
Mad van'd turned them away before.
Van's operating under tremendous pressure.
I'm starting to feel a lot of sympathy for the guy.
Oh, great. That's priceless.
You and van, oh, I love that.
Oh!
Want a snort?
Guess not.
I have a very bad feeling about the club, des.
It's like a meteorite is headed straight for it.
It's gonna destroy everything.
The greatest club the worid has ever seen
Is going to be smashed to smithereens.
Yeah, well, I don't think it'll be a meteorite.
Bye.
Alice and I are having breakfast together.
It's a date. You can't come.
Sorry.
Try to get some sleep.
That's what guys do who want to date you?
They say they have a book idea?
Maybe.
Did he say what the book was?
He said he had some crazy ideas
For a book on the criminal justice system.
Of course. That makes sense.
Crazy ideas are the kind that josh would have.
Be careful of that guy.
I was there when he flipped out.
Really scary.
He got up on a table at a cafeteria off Harvard square
And started weirdly singing this hymn.
Apparently, religious mania is highly typical
Of manic depression entering its manic phase.
Josh is not just your garden-Variety loon.
He is a serious nutcase.
What gets me is that this serious nutcase
Now presumes to judge others.
You really think the neurological effects of coffee
Is similar to that of cocaine?
That's what I read somewhere.
In addition to amazing stories,
There are a lot
Of entertaining prosecutors' anecdotes.
And then there's the whole culture
Of the downtown legal district.
It could be good.
Like everything, it all depends on execution.
This is sort of related.
It's an article I wrote for Harper's
During law school.
Did you really just want to have lunch
To discuss a book proposal?
Um... no.
How serious are you and des?
Is it absolutely, completely,
Irrevocably serious?
Did he tell you the story about
How he was traumatized by a Radcliffe girl
Taking off her shirt,
Suddenly revealing her largish breasts,
Which he never thought about before?
He tells that story all the time
To get sympathy and to justify himself,
As if he were the victim
Of female aggressiveness and duplicity.
That wasn't true?
No, it was true. He was the victim
Of female aggressiveness and duplicity,
But so was everyone else.
Not everyone then went on a rampage
Exploiting the opposite sex.
He thinks his problem is just that he falls in love a lot.
Well, a lot of people fall in love a lot.
I'm really surprised you'd be taken in by him.
You should notice I didn't answer your original question.
My original question,
Whether you were absolutely committed to des,
You didn't answer?
What does "loon" mean?
Des calls me that.
I sort of like it.
It's, uh, short for "lunatic"
And also the lake bird with the eerie call.
It's the other terms des uses for me...
"Nutcase,"
"freakazoid," etcetera...
I kind of mind.
A lot of people like to say
They won't take "no" for an answer.
I just wanted you to know
I'm not one of them.
I can be easily discouraged.
I will take "no" for an answer.
Ok.
No.
You don't mean that.
No.
I'm sorry.
She's not in right now.
Ok. I'll have her call you back. Thank you.
Alice, sorry.
What?
You better see bob.
Bob wants to see you right away.
It's something bad?
The author of your
Tibet book doesn't exist.
He's a fraud.
Carol thinks it could be worse
Than the Clifford Irving case.
Carol thinks it's as bad as the Clifford Irving case.
Turns out the author isn't the Dalai lama's brother,
But a Los ngeles writer named John Disimio.
It's a shame. This is a really good book.
Dan thinks it's one of the best things
Ever written on Tibetan Buddhism.
What a mess.
I'm sorry I haven't been more of a help.
I've been a little preoccupied myself.
I'm late for my period.
How late?
A day.
A day late, and you're worried?
I'm sure I'm pregnant.
But isn't that what you wanted?
What do you mean?
Well, I thought you said
You wanted to have
Jimmy Steinway's babies.
Yeah, but not this way.
I'm not an addict.
I'm a habitual user.
I'm sick of you and that nut case
Going around judging everybody.
"Oh, he's an addict."
"Oh, he's basically honorable
Except for his treatment of women."
I am not a womanizer.
In fact, I hate womanizers.
In any case, Alice completely changed all that.
Isn't that a little morbid?
Morbid?
Why take on all that baggage?
Isn't he a bit of a sicko?
From the start, you know he's defective.
Usually you don't find that out
Until much later.
And what if you have kids?
It can be hereditary.
One thing about Jimmy:
I know he'll make a good father.
There's always some problem, some baggage.
Oh, my god, you're serious.
Well, not necessarily.
Coming.
Tonight I'm gonna tell Jimmy.
Wish me luck.
You know, I think my father could have
Been an undiagnosed manic-Depressive.
Hi. Uh, do you know josh is downstairs waiting?
Yeah. Thanks.
Bye.
Bye. Bye.
Alice is so great.
I've gotta be a better friend to her.
Yeah.
Before leaving the D.A.'S office,
I'd like at least once the chance to use
The expression, "book this clown!"
Heh. I thought only police said that.
No, I think an a.D.A. Could,
In certain circumstances,
Perhaps not very typical.
Are you aware
All your clothes are slightly big?
I'm still waiting for my growing spurt.
Both my father and brother are over 6'3".
You can still grow in your twenties.
There are cases on record.
Tall people tend to have great personalities,
This kind, compassionate comprehension
Of the rest of the worid.
My father and brother are both that way.
What's wrong?
Just remembering something.
What?
It's kind of maudlin.
It was here
My depression first descended.
Oh.
"To the valiant seamen
"Who perished in the Maine
By fate unwarned, in death unafraid."
Isn't this the strangest,
Most forlorn monument?
Yeah, it's very sad.
What happened with your depression?
Nothing at first.
I just went back to
Cambridge very depressed.
Then there was the incident at the hayes-Bickford,
After which I was taken to mass. Mental for observation.
While there, I cut my hand trying to open a stuck window,
And they put me on a suicide watch,
Though I don't think I was ever really suicidal,
At least no more than a lot of people that age.
But you're ok now?
Uh... yeah.
Actually, a lot of people spend considerable sums of money
To get the high I get absolutely naturally.
Now, with lithium,
Which is, in fact, a naturally occurring salt,
I can stay on a perfectly even keel,
Perhaps too even.
Did they prescribe lithium right away?
Lithium wasn't so standard then.
There was a lot of muddling through various therapies.
Because my right hand was bandaged,
I used my left to write friends cards,
Which was a mistake.
My handwriting looked weird and really scared people.
I... I don't think
I was ever that... that badly off, but others might disagree.
Do you know the words
To the hymn dear lord and father of mankind?
While I was in the hospital, it became a sort of mantra.
 Dear lord and father of mankind 
 Forgive our foolish ways 
 Reclothe us in our rightful mind 
 In purer lives, thy service find 
  In deeper reverence, praise 
 Drop thy still dews of quietness 
  Till all our strivings cease
 Take from our souls the strain and stress 
 And let our ordered lives confess 
 The beauty of thy peace 
 Breathe through the heat of our desire 
 Thy coolness and thy balm 
 Let sense be dumb, let flesh retire 
 Speak through the earthquake, wind, and fire 
 O, still, small voice of calm 
What's wrong?
You think I'm a wacko?
What's wrong?
Uh, I don't know.
Charlotte's in terrible pain.
It's her back.
No, nothing happened.
We were just talking.
About what?
Charlotte said she had something important
She wanted to talk to me about,
But before we got to that, her period started.
Afterwards, I mentioned that it might be a good time
To start thinking about
Whether we were really right for one another
Or we should start thinking about,
You know, breaking up.
Josh hasn't called since that night.
Of course he hasn't.
What do you mean?
Oh, come on. You told me.
He sang a hymn or something.
You were totally weirded out.
I can't believe how intolerant you are.
Some of those old hymns are beautiful.
I've sung them on the street myself.
I didn't realize it was so controversial.
 Amazing grace 
 How sweet the sound 
 That saved a wretch like me 
 I once was lost 
 But now I'm found 
 Was blind 
 But now I see 
  'Twas grace that taught 
 My heart to fear 
  And grace my fears relieved 
 How precious is... 
Sorry.
 That grace appeared 
 The hour I first... 
There are a couple of alternatives
That aren't that that-Bad.
First, some guy who's already been around a lot
And almost certainly has it anyway,
So it'd be no problem
And, in fact, would give you something in common.
The other would be some guy
So idealistic and in love with you
That he'd want to commit himself to you
Prior to that step because his dream would be
To be with you forever, always, exclusively anyway.
I think skip's a bit that way.
What?
I need to see des. It's urgent.
He's busy.
He'll wanna know this.
Des!
Des!
Des, open up!
I didn't let him in, des.
He got by me.
Jesus Christ. Are you out of you mind?
It's about to start.
Get rid of all your "gifts"
And anything else you might have.
Oh.
Step aside. Coming through.
Names.
Take this guy at the door.
We're on the list.
Jesus Christ, you're not gonna use that against me
With Alice, are you?
Francesca was just feeling terribly needy tonight.
It has nothing to do with how I feel about Alice.
You're not gonna take unfair advantage of that.
Ok.
All right, let's go!
I'm a cop.
This way, gentlemen.
All right, let's go!
Downstairs first. Harry, jack.
We're gonna come in here. This way.
You can't touch those.
Those are my personal papers.
Yeah. Well, they're part of the premises now,
And as such, the warrant applies. Sam.
Book this clown.
Hi.
Hi.
What are you doing here in the dark?
I was just resting.
Have you seen josh at all?
Yeah.
Is he ok?
Sure.
Why wouldn't he be ok?
I don't know.
He hasn't called in a while.
Josh is a bit thin-Skinned.
He's the kind of guy who will take no for an answer.
Sag harbor.
Did you know I was sort of infatuated with you then?
I assumed you preferred Tom.
Also, you seemed a little... irritating.
How was I irritating?
Well... you weren't.
There's no chance of you
Getting infatuated with me again, is there?
Just had to confirm that.
Let me keep your passport for you.
No.
Come on, help me out.
Should people just be allowed
To steal from each other and the government,
And out of selfishness or indifference
Or a kind of fashionable cynicism,
The rest of us do nothing?
I thought better of you than that.
You did?
Well, wrong again.
Listen, you've got all their books and all their documents.
Why do you need me who knew practically nothing?
This is the only body I've got.
Good-Bye, josh.
Kennedy airport.
Are you a bit of a cad,
Leaving town with your girlfriend in the hospital?
It might look that way.
But it isn't?
I've been through this before.
After graduation,
Laurie and I were gonna break up,
But the same day,
She came down with terrible back spasms.
I hung around the hospital all summer,
And I almost bankrupted her parents.
And as soon as I left town, she recovered.
By going away and putting an ocean between us...
I.E., making a definitive break...
Charlotte's likely to recover much faster.
What makes you think putting an ocean between you
Necessarily means a definitive break?
That's a depressing thought.
I'm gonna turn over a new leaf in Spain.
I'm gonna turn over several new leaves.
You know that Shakespearean admonition,
"To thine own self be true"?
It's premised on the idea
That "thine own self" is something pretty good,
Being true to which is commendable,
But what if "thine own self" is not so good?
What if it's pretty bad?
Wouldn't it be better in that case
Not to be true to thine own self?
See? That's my situation.
The one I like is, "et tu, brute."
There are different ways of being loyal.
Some may seem on the surface disloyal,
But they're not.
There's a higher loyalty.
The way I see it,
Brutus was a good friend to Caesar.
By stabbing him in the back,
Brutus was a good friend to Caesar?
You know, I probably should have stayed and testified.
Josh is right.
Bernie is a bad guy, probably worse than they know.
That's what van thinks.
Van's cooperating.
Staying and cooperating would have been the right thing to do,
But instead I'm running like a rat
Because to thine own self be true.
They say I can probably go home tomorrow.
Great.
There's something I've been meaning to ask you.
Do you think Jimmy's going away could have
Had anything to do with him, you know... having some sort
Of bizarre, pathetic crush on you?
I don't know.
Well, did he ever say anything?
Yes.
What?
Well, he...
"Why don't you love me
Instead of jerks like des and josh?"
That kind of thing?
I knew it.
You bitch!
I knew it was something like that.
I don't think I want to room with you anymore.
Being around you hasn't been good for me or my back.
I'd like you to move out.
I don't know how I'll afford it,
But my sanity and my integrity
Are more important to me than money.
I have to start looking out for myself now.
Have you heard the news?
No, what?
They're selling the company.
What?
We're merging with Simon & Schuster.
There'll be the usual consolidation
And economies of scale.
A lot of us are gonna lose our jobs.
God, that's sad.
I love the company.
They've been so great to us there.
Well, I don't know.
We were exploited,
But they were nice about it.
Maybe it'd be good if they got rid
Of some of the deadwood in that company,
Particularly if it meant paying the rest of us
Decently enough to live in this city
With at least a modicum of privacy.
Why don't we do something?
Like what?
Well, at this time of day,
Employed people often have lunch.
I can't. I've gotta go uptown.
Why?
Alice and I are having lunch.
You're having lunch with Alice?
Great. Let's all go.
It's, uh, at Lutece.
You're on unemployment
And taking Alice to Lutece?
Um, doesn't irrational expenditures
Signal the start of a manic phase?
If it were my invitation, you'd be right,
But it's not.
Alice is taking you to Lutece?
Why'd she take you?
Celebrating her promotion.
When Alice wants to celebrate something,
She calls you?
Alice made editor?
Associate editor.
Well, what happened with her book?
I thought it was some kind of fiasco.
What Alice did, rather cleverly,
Was shift the category
From nonfiction to self-Actualization.
The book jackets hadn't been printed yet.
Reincarnation, life after death...
Mumbo jumbo of all kinds
Has been highly commercial
Throughout the history of book publishing.
The first printed book was the bible.
Actually, I'm not upset I was laid off.
This'll motivate me to get a better job in television,
Which is where my interests truly lie.
I've watched television all my life.
If you're really
Interested in television,
You should come over and watch
Wild kingdom sometime.
Sure.
Are you taking the "e" train?
Yeah.
$2. Thanks.
Hey, van!
What happened?
Ah, the new owners couldn't make it work.
Finally had to hire people to stand outside,
Pretend that they couldn't get in.
Anyway, disco's over. It's dead.
What do you mean?
Well, people just aren't going out like they used to.
They're tired.
Some are sick or strung out.
It's not just the prosecutions
And all the owners that Bernie squealed on.
Could part of it be related to the herpes epidemic?
Maybe. I've got a friend
At Casablanca records and tapes,
And she says that, like, 2 months ago,
The bottom dropped out of all disco record sales.
Suddenly, it's... dead, over.
God, that's sad.
We're getting older.
We've lived through a period that's ended.
It's like dying a little bit.
Disco will never be over.
It will always live in our minds and hearts.
Something like this, that was this big
And this important and this great,
Will never die.
Oh, for a few years, maybe many years,
It'll be considered pass? And ridiculous.
It will be misrepresented
And caricatured and sneered at,
Or worse, completely ignored.
People will laugh about John Travolta,
Olivia newton-John, white polyester suits
And platform shoes and going like this.
Though we had nothing to do with those things
And still loved disco.
Those who didn't understand will never understand.
Disco was much more and much better than all that.
Disco was too great
And too much fun to be gone forever.
It's got to come back someday.
I just hope it will be in our own lifetimes.
Sorry. I've got a job interview this afternoon,
And I was trying to get revved up,
But most of what I said, I, uh, believe.
I was pretty furious when you had
My passport lifted, confiscated,
At the airport, but you were right.
I'm glad I stayed.
At least you saved me
From being stuck in some foreign city
With the likes of Jimmy Steinway.
But there's one thing I don't get.
You did a good job with the prosecution,
Getting Bernie to squeal that way.
Why'd they lay you off?
There was a conflict involving
Giving preferential treatment to a friend
Which they felt I handled badly.
Oh.
Well, congratulate Alice for us.
Bye.
Bye.
Bye.
I don't envy her, though, stuck in book publishing.
Oof. Yeah.
I've gotta get to unemployment and sign up.
I'm going to Florida this afternoon.
So long.
Bye. Bye.
One of the things that makes me happy in life
Is knowing that I don't envy anyone.
I don't want to be anybody else
Or do anything but what I'm doing,
Which, right now, is nothing,
But I have good projects for the future.
Can I speak honestly?
Yeah.
You and I are similar.
We both got big personalities.
That's good. The worid, frankly, needs more big personalities.
But perhaps ours burn too brightly,
Are too big for people with normal,
Healthy-Size personalities like Alice
Or abnormal, healthy-Sized personalities like josh
Or itsy-Bitsy, teeny-Weeny,
Polka-Dot-Bikini-Size personalities
Like Jimmy Steinway.
That's why I'm confident
I'll ultimately be successful in television.
Absolutely. See, one of the problems
Of finding the right person and settling down
Is it takes all the fun and interest
Out of going to nightclubs.
I mean, if you're already living with somebody,
Why bother going out?
Getting seriously involved with someone
Really just means ruining your nightlife.
What I mean to say is,
Jimmy, Alice, Josh... so what?
That's what I say.
I think I agree with you.
 People all over the worid 
 Everybody 
 Join hands   join 
 Start a love train, love train 
 People all over the worid 
 All the worid now 
 Join hands 
 All right 
 Start a love train, love train 
 The next stop that we make 
 Will be England 
 Tell all the folks in
Russia and china, too 
 Don't you know that it's time to get onboard 
 And let this train keep on ridin' 
 Ridin' on through? 
 Well, well 
 People all over the worid 
 Come on, people 
 Join hands   come on  
 Start a love train, love train 
 Don't need no ticket, come on 
 People all  ride over the worid 
 Join hands 
 Ride this train, y'all 
 Start a love train   come on  
 Love train 
 All of your brothers over in Africa 
 Tell all the folks in
Egypt and Israel, too 
 Please don't miss this train at the station 
 'Cause if you miss it 
 I feel sorry 
 Sorry for you 
 Well, yeah! 
 People all over the worid 
 Sisters and brothers 
 Join hands   join, uh-Huh 
 Start  ride a love train  this train  
 Love train   uh-Huh 
 People all over the worid 
 Y'all don't need no ticket  
 Join hands   all right 
 Start  start it a love train 
 Love train 
 Ride 
 Let it ride 
 Let it ride 
 Let it ride 
 People, get onboard 
 People all over the worid 
 Join hands   ride to France 
 Start a love train   yeah 
 Love train   to japan, y'all 
 People all  straight, over the worid  uh-Huh 
 Join  you can ride hands  or stand 
 Start a love train   yeah 
 Love train   take a look 
 Around the worid, y'all 
 Join hands   come on  
 Start a love train   hey! 
 Love train 
 People all over the worid 
 Join hands   come with me, y'all 
 Start a love train   ride 
 Love train   'round the worid 
 People all over the worid 
 Join hands   baby 
 Start a love train   hey! 
 Love train   come on  
 People all  come on  over the worid 
 Join hands   oh, yeah 
 Start a love train 
 amazing grace 
 How sweet the sound 
 That saved a wretch like me 
 I once was lost 
 But now I'm found 
 Was blind 
 But now I see 
 'Twas grace that taught  
 My heart to fear 
 And grace my fears relieved  
 How precious is 
 That grace appeared 
 The hour I first believed? 
What's this war in the heart of nature?
Why does nature vie with itself?
The land contend with the sea?
Is there an avenging power in nature?
Not one power, but two?
I remember my mother when she was dying.
She looked all shrunk up and gray.
I asked her if she was afraid.
She just shook her head.
I was afraid to touch the death
I seen in her.
I couldn't find nothing beautiful or uplifting... about her going back to God.
I heard people talk about immortality.
But I ain't seen it.
I wondered how it'd be when I died.
What it'd be like to know that this breath now... was the last one you was ever gonna draw.
I just hope I can meet it the same way she did... with the same calm.
'Cause that's where it's hidden... the immortality I hadn't seen.
Kids around here never fight.
Sometimes.
Sometimes when you see them playing.
They always fight.
- Is she afraid of me?
- Little bit.
- Are you afraid of me?
- Yes.
- Why?
- 'Cause you look...
You look as an army.
- I look army.
- Yes.
Well, that don't matter.
It doesn't matter.
- Baby's tired.
- Yes.
If she swims, she wants, she will sleep.
Okay.
There you go.
Go, go, go, go. Go.
Go, go, go. Go!
Witt, patrol boat.
She's American.
What's it doing out here all alone?
You haven't changed at all, have you, Witt?
You haven't learned a thing.
All a man has to do is leave it to you, you put your head in the noose for him.
How many times you been AWOL?
You been in the army, what, six years now?
Ain't it about time you smartened up and stopped being such a punk recruit?
I mean, if you're ever gonna.
We can't all be smart.
No, we can't. That's a shame.
Look at you.
Truth is, you can't take straight duty in my company.
You'll never be a real soldier.
Not in God's world.
This is C Company, of which I'm first sergeant.
I run this outfit.
Now, Captain Staros, he's the C.O., but I'm the guy that runs it.
Nobody's gonna foul that up.
You're just another mouth for me to feed.
Normally you'd be court-martialed.
But I worked a deal for ya.
You oughta consider yourself lucky.
I'm sending you to a disciplinary outfit.
You'll be a stretcher bearer.
You'll be taking care of the wounded.
I can take anything you dish out.
I'm twice the man you are.
In this world... a man himself... is nothin'.
And there ain't no world but this one.
You're wrong there, Top.
I seen another world.
Sometimes I think it was just my imagination.
Well... then you've seen things I never will.
We're living in a world that's blowing itself to hell as fast as everybody can arrange it.
In a situation like that, all a man can do is shut his eyes and let nothing touch him.
Look out for himself.
I might be the best friend you ever had.
You don't even know it.
He hates you worse than poison.
I never felt he hated me.
'Cause I don't hate him.
I love Charlie Company.
They're my people.
They call it "The Rock."
Now, nobody wants this island.
The Japs just put an airfield there.
All the fighting's confined to this area.
As you can see, this is their road to Australia... and this is their way of controlling the sea lanes to America.
Now, if we're gonna stop the Japs' advance... into the South Pacific, we've got to do it right there.
The marines have done their job.
Now it's our turn.
Worked my ass off.
Brown-nosed the generals.
Degraded myself... for them, for my family... my home.
- I admire you, Colonel. I do.
- Thank you, sir.
Most men your age would have retired by now.
It's okay.
We need general officers with maturity and character like you.
We've got good sergeants.
We've got good lieutenant colonels.
But once a man gets those eagles...
He can't wait to get that star.
Can he? He becomes a politician, right?
Goes along to get along.
So goddamn hard to stay upright.
- You said it there, sir.
- With the admiral watching, which he will be.
There's always someone watching you.
Like a hawk.
Always someone ready to jump in if you're not.
Do you have a son, Colonel?
- Yes, sir. I do.
- Good.
'Cause we don't want our sons or our grandsons... fighting this war
30 years from now, do we?
- No, sir. We sure don't.
- Then you crush 'em without mercy.
You... You dig them out of the hills and protect that airfield.
Yes, sir.
Do you wonder why... why did they...
Why did the Japs put an airfield there, of all places?
I guess we don't know the bigger picture though, do we?
If there is such a thing.
What do you think?
- Well, sir, I never asked myself that question.
- Mmm.
You're a humble man.
Nobody wants that island, but you.
How much do you want it?
As much as I have to, sir.
All they sacrificed for me... poured out like water on the ground.
All I might have given for love's sake.
Too late.
Dyin'... slow as a tree.
You feel it?
Yes, sir.
Thank you, sir.
Take topside to the signal bridge.
The closer you are to Caesar, the greater the fear.
I just can't help how damn scared I am, Sarge, all right?
I just can't help how damn scared I am, Sarge, all right?
I can't help it. I got...
You know, my stepdaddy took a block and beat me when I was real little.
And I... I was scared.
And I used to run. I used to hide.
Hell, I slept in a chicken coop a whole lot of nights.
And...
I never thought it'd get no worse than that.
But I'm living by the... by the minute over here.
I'm counting the seconds.
- Yeah.
- And we're gonna be landing...
We're gonna be landing soon.
There's gonna be air raids.
We're probably gonna die before we get off the beach.
This place is...
It's like a big floating graveyard.
- What's your name, kid?
- I want to own an automobile when I get out.
- What's your name?
- Edward... Edward B. Train.
Train.
The only things that are permanent is... is dying and the Lord.
That's it.
That's all you got to worry about.
This war ain't...
This war ain't gonna be the end of me.
- And it ain't gonna be the end of you neither.
- Think we'll catch an air raid?
How in the hell should I know?
All's I know is them crew guys said they didn't catch no air raid the last time they made this run.
On the other hand, time before last, they nearly got blew up.
- What do you want me to tell you?
- You're a big help, Tills.
Nothing. Tell me nothing.
Tell you something.
We're sitting out here on this ocean like a couple of fuckin' ducks in these here boats.
- That's what.
- I already know that.
Well, brood on it, Tills.
Brood on it.
- Ain't you watching the fun?
- Ain't interested.
- Yeah, I guess it is pretty crowded.
- Wouldn't be interested even if it wasn't.
Well, I'm on my way to get me that pistol.
- Yeah? Well, have fun.
- Yeah, have fun.
You'll wish you had one once we get ashore... and run into some of them samurai sabers.
Open this door!
Open this goddamn door!
Open the door!
I learned to deal these cards before...
All right. Here I am sleeping.
Yeah.
All right, ladies.
Is this a sewing circle or a card game?
- All right, jacks high, jack bet.
- Robert's got two jacks.
I never bargained for nothing like this when I signed up for this man's army... back in the Bronx before the war.
How was I supposed to know there was gonna be a fuckin' war?
Answer me that.
All I know is old Charlie Company's always gettin' screwed. Always.
And I can tell you whose fault it is too.
It's that captain of ours.
First he gets us stuck off on this boat, clear away from our own outfit... where we don't know a fucking soul.
Then he gets us stuck way down...
Hello, Captain.
Read in your 201 file you were an officer before the war.
How'd you end up a private?
'Cause of my wife.
I was in the Corps of Engineers.
We'd never been separated before.
Not even for a night.
I...I took it for four months... and then I quit.
Just resigned.
Th-They... They sent me back to the States.
They told me I'd never get another commission.
They said they'd see to it I got drafted and that I for damn sure'd be in the infantry.
Sons of bitches.
No, I don't blame them.
Well, where is she now?
She's home.
Why should I be afraid to die?
I belong to you.
Move! Move! Move!
Move! Move!
Move, move! Movin' out!
If I go first, I'll wait for you there... on the other side of the dark waters.
Put your helmet on.
Be with me now.
- Feeling the pressure, Captain?
- Yes, sir.
I like you, Captain.
And I just want you to know... well, we're in this thing together. All right?
You keep pressing inland till you reach the line.
- I'll catch up with you there.
- Yes, sir.
It's all yours, Captain. Gangway!
Gangway, there! Coming through!
Squad leaders! Both teams!
This way, son. This way.
Right here.
Stand by to go inside!
Our Father who art in heaven...
- And forgive us our debts as we forgive our debtors.
- Okay.
For Thine is the kingdom and the power and the glory.
Your outfit's lucky.
Transports must've been spotted.
You're getting out of here just ahead of time. You're lucky.
Ho! Ho! Ho! Take a breath, mister!
You gotta breathe!
- Are you Charlie Company?
- Yeah.
We went in about a mile, sir.
There ain't nothing there.
Some oil drums, a burned-out spot.
There'd be nothing there for at least...
- About a week.
- About a week, sir.
But we didn't spot any casualties.
Japs must have hauled ass.
Couple of mortars hit the beach, but most of the guys came in standing up.
Darnedest thing I ever did see, sir.
They got fish that live in trees.
Oh, if they didn't know this beach was deserted, what else don't they know?
Who are you who live in all these many forms?
Your death that captures all.
You too are the source of all that's gonna be born.
Your glory... mercy... peace... truth.
You give calm a spirit... understanding... courage.
The contented heart.
- Blankets.
- We need a medic now!
Maybe all men got one big soul... who everybody's a part of.
All faces of the same man.
One big self.
Everyone looking for salvation by himself... each like a coal... drawn from the fire.
We're going straight up that hill there.
We can't do that, Colonel.
Well, there's no way to outflank 'em.
Now, on the left there's a cliff that falls straight down into the river.
The Japanese hold the jungle.
It has to be taken frontally.
What about water, sir?
Water's not getting up here.
My men are... passing out, sir.
Only time you worry about a soldier is when he stops bitchin'.
We're all gonna attack abreast,
3rd platoon in reserve.
We've got to cross those three folds of ground. You see?
Once we get beyond that, we gotta attack that hill.
Colonel says there's no way to outflank it... so we gotta take it head-on by frontal assault.
- Whyte?
- Yeah?
- You see those grassy ridges at the foot of that hill?
- Yeah.
When you get to the end of that field... you're to locate and eliminate all the hidden strong points on those ridges.
I'm sure the Japs got something there to protect the approaches.
Are you here?
Let me not betray you.
Let me not betray my men.
In you, I place my trust.
Eos Rotodoctolos...
Rosy-fingered dawn.
You're Greek, aren't you, Captain?
Did you ever read Homer?
We read Homer at the Point.
In Greek.
What kind of artillery support do we have, sir? Over.
Two batteries of 105s.
- They won't make a dent in that position. Over.
- No, but it bucks the men up.
It'll look like the Japs are catching hell.
Okay, you guys. This is it.
We're going down in groups of 10.
There's no point in going by in rushes.
We'll only make a better target stopped.
Run all the way.
We ain't got no choice.
We're picked, so we gotta go.
I'm gonna take the first bunch myself.
I want Charlie Dale with me. Dale... you go organize them guys that's up there.
Movin' out in five minutes.
Let's go.
Sico, what's wrong with you?
I'm sick to my stomach.
Sico, you get up right now, or I'll kick you so hard in the stomach...
- you're gonna be sick.
- I can't, Sergeant. I would if I could.
I'm... I'm sick.
- I'm sick.
- You ain't sick. Get up!
- What's the matter, Sico?
- I don't know, Sergeant.
It's my stomach.
I'm in pain. I got cramps.
I can't even sit up straight. I'm sick.
- Come on. Get up.
- Leave him.
I need a volunteer to carry the B.A.R. Drop your gear, Sico.
I'm taking you to the medics.
Thank you, Sergeant.
Don't argue with me.
Good luck, Keck.
Plug that hole on your right.
Move!
- Maybe they pulled out.
- Mm-mmm.
Hit dirt! Hit dirt!
Calm down. Calm down.
Calm down. Calm down.
Stretcher bearers!
Move it out! Move out!
Come on!
- Stretcher bearers, this way!
- Come on!
Go get that man!
We already got eight or nine down there.
We're not supposed to...
Don't argue with me!
I'm Captain Staros. Go get that man.
Jim, he's not the one we should be thinking about.
Goddamn it, all of you!
Am I in command here or am I not?
Am I the captain or a goddamn private?
We got others that are hit bad, sir.
That was all I meant.
- I gave you an order, Private!
- Yes, sir!
Hello, First Sergeant.
Who we going after over here?
We think it's Jacques.
Jockey?
Well, shoot.
That's... That's... That's too bad.
Sir? Sir.
Sir, can I come back to the company after we get Jockey back to the battalion?
- Okay. But you gotta get permission.
- Sure.
- All right.
- And my rifle.
Get up, Nicky!
You're still alive!
Keep moving! Keep moving!
Magnificent, Staros! Magnificent!
The finest thing these old eyes have seen in a long time!
Beautifully conceived! Beautifully executed!
You'll be mentioned in battalion orders.
Young Whyte led beautifully.
- Yes, sir. Over.
- But sending in your second too was brilliant.
Just brilliant! They might well have carried the ridge with luck.
I don't think they were hurt too bad.
Blane led well too.
Now, how many emplacements did they locate?
Did they knock any out?
We oughta have those ridges cleaned out by noon! Over.
Hello? Hello?
Staros, are you there?
Here, sir. Over.
I said, how many emplacements did they locate?
Did they knock any out? Over.
Children.
I don't know, sir.
What the hell do you mean, you don't know?
How can you not know? Over!
I'm right here behind the first swell, sir.
I'm right here behind the swell.
You want me to stand up and wave? Over.
No, I can see where you are.
I want you to do something.
I want you to get up there and see what the situation is.
I want Hill 210 in my hands tonight.
Now, goddamn it, the admiral got up at dawn for this!
Come to life down there, Staros! Out!
Move up!
Hey, Keck!
Yeah.
- We gotta get out of here.
- I know it.
Blane's dead.
You're in charge.
We know you there, Yank.
Tojo eats shit!
No! Roosevelt eats shit!
I got him! I got him!
I killed a man.
Hey, Queen!
Queen, you there?
Worst thing you can do.
Worse than rape.
Queen! You see them Japs leaving that left ridge?
- I killed a man. Nobody can touch me for it.
- No, I ain't seen much of nothing.
Well, get your fuckin' head up and look around!
I'm serious!
I counted seven Japs leaving that left-hand grassy ridge!
I got me one of 'em!
- So?
- I think maybe they're pulling out!
Maybe somebody oughta go tell the captain!
Well, you wanna be the one to do it?
You just stay put!
I'm ordering you!
Stay down!
Stay low.
Go! Go! Go, go!
What do we do now?
We wait right here. Maybe they'll send us up some reinforcements.
To do what?
To capture some of these goddamn fucking positions around here! What do you think?
- You mean you really want to go on with this?
- I don't know.
No. No. Not no uphill charge, but... if they send us up some reinforcements, maybe we could... scout around and locate these machine guns.
Anyway, it's better than going back down through that.
- You wanna go back down?
- Something's coming. They're coming.
What are they doin'?
If they wanna throw us out of here... why... why didn't they come in force?
Maybe they was acting on their own.
Maybe they wanted to get into nirvana.
They're coming.
Keck!
- Jesus.
- Oh, Jesus!
I blew my butt off!
- It's all right. It's all right.
- I blew my butt off!
Lay down!
- What a fucking recruit trick to pull!
- Take it easy. Take it easy.
I grabbed it by the pin!
You write my old lady. You tell her...
I want her to know I died like a man.
Nobody's gonna have to write your old lady.
You're gonna make it.
- Don't you bullshit me!
- Stay down!
Hey, hey.
I got mud on my face.
Wipe it off.
Get it off. No!
I'll write her. I promise.
Take my canteen.
There's still some water in there.
Maybe it's for the best.
I'm all messed up down there.
I can't...
I can't fuck no more.
Wha...
Where am I?
Where am I?
You're gonna be all right.
Even if you die.
You didn't let your brother down.
Hey, if you hadn't thrown yourself against that embankment, we'd have all been killed.
I'm gettin' cold.
I'm cold.
I'm freezing.
You gonna write his wife?
Fuck, no.
I don't know his old lady.
That's the company commander's job.
That ain't mine. You out of your mind?
- I ain't... I ain't no good at writing no letters.
- You told him you would.
I'll say anything to 'em when they're like that.
- Somebody ought to do it.
- Well, then you write her. You write her.
What's wrong, Jim?
- Aaah!
- There's nothing anybody can do for him.
He'll be dead before they can ever get him back to a surgeon.
- Then I can't ask you to go out there.
- Well, maybe it's worth a try.
At least I could get a syrette of morphine into him.
Would it keep him quiet?
Not for long.
But I could give him two.
And I could maybe leave him three or four for himself.
Couldn't you give 'em to him all at once?
That's what you are.
That's all there is for us.
That's us. That's us.
I lost all 12. I lost all 12.
All 12 of 'em.
It's insanity up there.
I told 'em what to do. I showed 'em where to go, and I gave 'em a push.
Come on! Somebody help!
I know you. I know you. I know you.
- Sergeant, it's insane.
- I don't know who's in charge.
- I don't know who's in charge! But don't let him go!
- All right.
- Don't let him go! I'm outta here. I'm outta here.
- Take him back.
- Let me hold your rifle.
- I'm outta of here. All right. Move, feet, move.
Move, move, move.
Move! Move! I'm moving.
I'm moving. I'm moving now.
Please, don't touch.
Don't touch. Don't look at me.
Don't touch. Okay, I'm outta here.
Come on. My feet are all right.
All right.
Somebody help me! Help me!
How goes it, kid? You gotta be quiet!
I came to help you, Tella.
Okay, calm down.
Fuck you! I'm dying!
I'm dying, Sarge!
Okay. Well, goddamn it, do it with less noise!
- Are you gonna get me out of here?
- I'm gonna take you back.
Come on. Come on.
Come on.
Put me down! Put me down!
Leave me alone. Leave me alone.
Please, leave me alone.
Give me more. Give me more.
Give me more.
Give me more. Give me more.
Give me more.
- Okay.
- Give me more.
- Give me more.
- Here, Tella.
Good-bye. Good-bye.
Bye, kid.
Bye, Sarge. Good-bye.
Well, f-fortunately, Jim, the fate of the company doesn't depend on one man.
Sergeant, I saw the whole thing through the glasses.
I want you to know I'm gonna mention you in orders tomorrow.
I'm gonna recommend you for the Silver Star.
- That's the most courageous thing...
- Captain.
Captain, if you say one more word to thank me, I'm gonna knock you right in the teeth.
You mention me in your fuckin' orders, and I'll resign my rating so fast... and leave you here to run this busted-up outfit by yourself.
You understand?
Property!
Whole fuckin' thing's about property.
What the hell's the matter with you, Staros?
Those men should be reinforced immediately!
What the hell are they doing?
I can see 'em through my glasses!
They're just lying there behind that ledge!
They should be up and out, cleaning out those machine guns! Over.
I don't think you understand what's going on down here, sir.
We've had heavy casualties.
We had a man...
His gut got shot out on the slopes, sir.
It created quite an upset.
Fine, fine.
Now, what about those reinforcements? Over.
I have two squads to...
First platoon I can send up, sir. Over.
What the hell do you mean, two squads?
Goddamn you, Staros! When I say reinforcements, goddamn it, I mean it!
You commit everybody you have there and do it right now! Everybody!
Your first platoon too. I see 'em lying down there on their fat asses doing nothing.
You get a man to 'em right now with orders to attack!
And you move 'em by the flank to the ridge!
Then you get that second platoon... you move 'em over to the hill!
Have 'em press the center.
Go straight up that goddamn hill!
You attack them right now!
Jesus Christ, Staros! Do I have to give you a 10-cent lesson on infantry tactics... while your men are getting their asses shot off?
Colonel, I don't think that you fully understand what is going on down here.
My company alone cannot take that position, sir.
The Japs are too well dug in.
They've got too much firepower.
Colonel, there's a... there's a bunker up there.
We can't see it, and it's - it's chewing my men to pieces, sir.
I formally request to be given permission for patrol reconnaissance around... to the right of Hill 210 through the jungle.
I believe the entire position, sir, can be outflanked with a maneuver there in force.
- No!
- It might save lives.
Goddamn it, I tell you no!
There will be no flanking move!
- Now listen to me, Staros.
- Damn!
You're not gonna take your men around into the jungle... to avoid a goddamn fight!
Now do you hear me, Staros?
I want you to attack.
I want you to attack right now with every man at your disposal.
Now attack, Staros!
That's a direct order!
Come on!
Sir, I must tell you that I refuse to obey your order.
This is not your fault, Jim.
He's ordering you to.
I again request permission for patrol reconnaissance around to the right in force.
The time, sir... is 1321 hours, 25 seconds.
I've got two witnesses here listening to what I've said.
I request that you do the same with witnesses there. Over.
Staros, don't you pull this guardhouse lawyer bullshit with me!
Now, I know you're a goddamn lawyer!
This is not a court of law!
This is a war! It's a goddamn battle!
Now, I want that frontal attack!
I repeat my order! Over!
Colonel, I refuse to take my men up there in a frontal attack.
It's suicide, sir.
I've lived with these men, sir... for two-and-a-half years, and I will not order them all to their deaths.
Over.
This is a very important decision you're making, Staros.
But if you feel that strongly, maybe you have a reason.
- So I'm coming down there.
- Take a look.
Now, I'm not rescinding my order to you, son.
But if I find there are extenuating circumstances when I get down there...
I'm gonna take that into account.
Now, in the meantime, goddamn it,
I want you to hold on until I get there!
And if possible, you get those men on the ridge out and moving! Out.
One spot's as good as another, men.
There's no place to hide.
Just take it easy, son.
Take it easy.
Take it easy.
Where's... Where's Fife?
Fife? He's right here, son. Fife.
Hold my hand, Fife.
Hold my hand.
I got it.
Oh.
I'm dying, Fife.
Oh, Captain.
Shut up in a tomb.
Can't lift the lid.
Played a role I never conceived.
Get that blouse on, soldier!
It's not a goddamn bathing beach.
Yeah, right here.
Put it on right now.
What are you aiming at, son?
Let's go get those son of a bitches!
Move up!
What are you doing laying down there where you can't see a damn thing?
Observing, sir. Just sent 1st platoon forward to the ridge, sir.
- How many of 'em were hit this time?
- None, sir.
None? Not one?
That doesn't sound much like the situation you described to me over the sound power.
Well, it's not, sir. The situation's changed, sir, just in the last five minutes, sir.
Captain, you listen to me.
Now, we're going over there, and we're taking everybody with us.
Now, do you have any more formal complaints or demurrers?
- No, sir. Not now.
- All right, goddamn it!
We're gonna do things my way! My way!
You understand that, Captain?
We're taking everybody over to that ledge!
We may take that ridge by nightfall!
I think the ridge is quite a way from being reduced, sir.
Show me how to see things the way you do.
Show me how to see things the way you do.
We're just dirt. We're just dirt.
We're gonna get killed if we stay here.
Bell, take six men... and go see what's up there.
And we'll cover you best we can from down here.
Okay. You guys... You guys stay here.
Okay?
I'm goin' up alone.
Come out.
Come out where I am.
There was a...
There's a bunker up there.
It's five guns. It's five guns.
That strongpoint up there... somewhere up there around those rocks... is the key to this ridge.
Bell here is quite right.
From their knob up there, those goddamn little brown brothers... can cover the whole of the ground in front of this position for a thousand yards.
They've left this ledge unguarded.
Now, goddamn it, that's a mistake.
That's a hell of a mistake.
We need to take advantage of it before they see their error.
All right. All right,
I know you're all pretty exhausted.
And we've had a hell of a time getting water up here.
For that I'm sorry.
I apologize to you all.
But if we can reduce this bunker tomorrow,
I think we can take this ridge.
So I'm asking for volunteers.
Go back up there and knock it out.
Sir?
I'll be glad to... to go back up and lead the way back for a party.
- All right, Bell.
- I'll go, Colonel, sir.
And you. All right.
I'd like to lead the party, Colonel.
I'd like that very much, sir.
All right, John.
I was hoping you'd say that.
- Go ahead. You'll be in command.
- All right. I'll go, sir.
- All right, you.
- Sir.
You.
All right, men. That's enough.
Seven is plenty. Gather up.
I don't know if you realize the importance of this operation, Staros.
Once our position is secured, we can move the bombers in.
That means air power for a thousand miles in every direction.
Guadalcanal may be the turning point in the war.
It'll cost lives, Staros.
- Is that what's troubling you?
- No, sir.
Now, I explained to you the importance of this objective.
How many men do you think it's worth?
How many lives?
I can't say, sir.
Are you prepared to sacrifice the lives of any of your men in this campaign?
How many?
One? Two?
Twenty?
Lives will be lost in your company, Captain.
And if you don't have the stomach for it, now is the time to let me know.
No, sir. You're right.
About everything you said.
Fine. Fine.
That's all, Captain.
One more thing, Staros.
It's not necessary for you to ever tell me that you think I'm right.
Ever.
We'll assume it.
Dismissed.
I feel sorry for you, kid.
- Yeah?
- Yeah, a little.
This army's gonna kill you.
If you were smart, you'd take care of yourself.
There's nothing you can do for anybody else.
Just running into a burning house where nobody can be saved.
What difference you think you can make?
One single man in all this madness.
If you die, it's gonna be for nothin'.
There's not some other world out there where everything's gonna be okay.
There's just this one.
Just this rock.
Go ahead. Come on.
Who's deciding who's gonna live?
Who's deciding who's gonna die?
This is futile!
Look at me.
I stand right up here and not one bullet!
Not one shot!
Why?
How come they all had to die?
I can stand right here. I can stand right up, and nothing happens to me!
We.
We together.
One being.
Flow together like water... till I can't tell you from me.
I drink you.
Now.
Now.
You're my light.
My guide.
John, we'll be right behind you.
If you can break through, we'll come pouring after.
We'll charge at your whistle signal.
All right, let's go, men.
Go get 'em.
Shit. Shit. Shit.
Okay.
Stay down, below this ledge... and I'll call down the data from above.
Once the 81 s have plastered that rock as much as possible... we're gonna crawl along the big rock for cover... and then flank them to the right.
Okay?
Okay. Okay.
Azimuth 1-4-7-0... from Easy Roger Seven.
100 left. Add 200.
Uncle Baker One, fire mission.
Azimuth 1-4-7-0 from Easy Roger Seven.
Left 100. Add 200.
Machine gun. Will adjust. Over.
Understand.
1-4-7-0 from Easy Roger Seven.
Left 25, drop 50.
Left 25, Uncle Baker One.
Left 25, drop 50.
Fire for effect. Over.
Roger, Uncle Baker One. 1-4-7...
Let's go!
Okay, we're gonna continue on up the hill to the right.
Nobody fire or throw their grenades till I give the signal.
Okay, let's do it.
Is he okay?
- Is he all right?
- What do you want to do now, sir?
- We can't take him with us.
- No, we can't leave him here!
Shut up. He's from your platoon.
You stay with him.
We can leave him and pick him up on the way back if he's still alive.
- Is he dead?
- Not yet.
Dale, stay with him!
Cover our flank! Move!
We're pinned down!
Fall back!
Go!
Move back!
Look out!
Watch out!
Clear!
Clear!
Come on! Get down!
Come on. Get out of there.
Come on.
Want to kill soldiers?
You piece of shit?
Son of a bitch!
Son of a bitch!
You all right?
I shot a man.
Stinks around here.
All these dead people.
Put a cigarette up your nose.
Fire in the hole!
Look at 'em move!
Look at 'em move!
We got 'em on the run!
Way to go, John!
When they saw you make that attack and win, it was like you'd put their hearts right back in 'em.
- Hey! Hey!
- Don't do that, soldier!
Take good care of the others, men.
G-2 will want them.
There'll be somebody around before long.
I think we've wasted enough time here.
Let's go!
Sir, I've got a few recommendations for decorations I'd like to turn in to you.
Yes, yes, John. We're gonna get everything for all of 'em that we can, but later.
In the meantime, I want you to know that I'm personally recommending you for something, John.
- Perhaps the big one.
- Thank you, sir, but I don't feel I deserve it.
Oh, yes, you do, John.
Yes, you do.
Getting it for you, now, that's gonna be the goddamn problem.
But, hell, it would just be a big thing for the battalion and the regiment too if you did get it.
Now, we better get moving out of here.
We need to extend our lines, hook up with the other companies and push on to the top.
Would you like to take command of Baker Company over on the left?
Of course.
Sir, I don't mean to be a wet blanket or anything like that, but about the water...
- If we don't get some water to these...
- Don't worry about water.
John, I don't want anything to break up this attack of ours, now that we have the momentum.
We'll have some water in a couple of hours.
I've arranged for that.
Now, we just can't stop now, goddamn it, and wait for it.
No, sir.
That's right.
And if some of the men... pass out... why, hell, they'll just have to pass out.
All right.
They could...
You know they could die from it.
Well, they could die from enemy fire too!
They're all tough boys.
Come on, men, let's go!
You'll see plenty more of those where we're going!
Are we going up this hill or aren't we?
John, I'm convinced that the Japanese position can be broken right now.
All we have to do is keep going and we'll have this hill.
We'll have this hill by sundown.
You see the spirit in these men?
Do you see the new spirit?
Well, I want to take advantage of that before something happens to sap their strength.
To have this battalion relieved in... in a defeat... or even to have it reinforced from troops from the reserve regiment...
If we were to stall before reaching the top, well...
Jesus Christ, that's just a hell of a lot more than I could stand!
I've waited all my life for this.
I've worked, slaved, eaten, oh, untold buckets of shit to have this opportunity... and I don't intend to give it up now.
You don't know what it feels like to be passed over.
I mean, you're young.
You're just out of the academy.
You know, you... you've got your war.
Fifteen years, this... this is my first war!
John, someday you'll understand.
You're like a son to me, John.
You know what my son does?
He's a bait salesman.
You've done a hell of a job, John.
I'm gonna make sure that you get everything... everything that you deserve.
Thank you, sir.
God...
Goddamn it! I want three runners!
Get me three runners!
You go back to the rear as far as you have to go to find water... and get back here with it as fast as you can!
We attack in one hour!
We'll throw everything we got at 'em!
We're going all the way!
Nothing's stopping us!
It's high ground by nightfall!
You seen many dead people?
Plenty.
They're no different than dead dogs... once you get used to the idea.
They're meat, kid.
Are you righteous?
Kind?
Does your confidence lie in this?
Are you loved by all?
Know that I was too.
Do you imagine your sufferings will be less because you loved goodness?
Truth?
This way!
Get down!
Get on the fucking ground!
Get fucking down now!
Get down! Get down!
Get down! Stay there!
Get back!
Get on the fucking ground!
Now!
This great evil.
Where does it come from?
How did it steal into the world?
What seed, what root did it grow from?
Who's doing this?
Who's killing us... robbing us of life and light... mocking us with the sight of what we might have known?
Does our ruin benefit the earth?
Does it help the grass to grow, the sun to shine?
Is this darkness in you too?
Have you passed through this night?
I'm gonna sink my teeth into your liver.
You're dying.
See them birds up there?
They're gonna eat you raw.
Where you're going, you're not coming back from.
What are you to me?
Nothin'.
Have a seat here.
Staros, I'm relieving you of your command.
Lieutenant Band will take over for you.
I already told him.
It's a hard thing to do.
Difficult decision to make.
I don't think you're tough enough.
You're too soft.
You're just too soft-hearted.
You're not tough-fibered enough.
Anyway, it's... it's my decision to make, and I've already made it.
I don't like to see my men get killed, sir.
Have you ever had anyone die in your arms, sir?
Have you?
I don't see any reason to make a scandal out of this.
I don't want it in the records of the battalion where I commanded... and there's no reason for you to have it on your records.
This has nothing to do with cowardice or inefficiency.
Look at this jungle.
Look at those vines, the way they twine around the trees, swallowing everything.
Nature's cruel, Staros.
I'm going to let you apply for reassignment... to the Judge Advocate General's Corps in Washington for reasons of ill health.
You're a lawyer.
You had malaria yet?
- No, I haven't.
- Doesn't matter.
I can fix that.
Anyway, you probably will have it.
I'm also recommending you for the Silver Star... and I'll recommend it in such a way it definitely won't be refused.
Might as well have the Purple Heart too.
Why?
Because of that scratch on your face... and because of those cuts on your hands.
Now, you listen to me, Staros.
I think it's best you go back right away with the next batch of wounded and prisoners.
It is no goddamn good for you to keep hanging around.
The quieter we keep this, the better it'll be for all.
This is from Colonel Tall.
"Our victory gives us the highest reasons for pride."
"It will prove a milestone in the battle for Guadalcanal."
"Tomorrow, the division commander will arrive to make a personal inspection of the line."
"After the inspection, we're to be relieved by a battalion of the division's reserve regiment."
"I've secured for the battalion a week's rest off the line."
That's all.
Hours like months.
Days like years.
Walked into the golden age... stood on the shores of a new world.
I would've come by and paid you guys a visit... but...
I just felt like being alone, you know.
Yeah?
We... We wanted to thank you, sir... for asking to make that flanking move... for watching out for us... keeping us together.
We're all sorry to see you go.
We feel like you got a rotten deal.
Well, I'm not sure that you're right.
The tough part is... not knowing if you're doing any good.
That's the hard part.
But it doesn't matter.
I don't care. I'm...
I'm glad to be going.
I'm glad.
There's still time.
We could file a complaint.
For what?
What good would that do?
Anyway, I want to go.
Leave it alone. Let it lay.
What does that mean, sir?
It means,
"You've been like my sons."
You are my sons.
My dear sons.
Push up.
You live inside me now.
I'll carry you wherever I go.
Can't nothing make you forget it.
Each time you start from scratch.
War don't ennoble men.
It turns 'em into dogs.
Poisons the soul.
My dear wife.
You get something twisted out of your insides... by all this blood, filth and noise.
I want to stay changeless for you.
I want to come back to you the man I was before.
How do we get to those other shores... to those blue hills?
Love.
Where does it come from?
Who lit this flame in us?
No war can put it out... conquer it.
I was a prisoner.
You set me free.
No matter how much training you got, how careful you are... it's a matter of luck whether or not you get killed.
Makes no difference who you are or how tough a guy you might be.
If you're in the wrong spot at the wrong time, you're gonna get it.
I look at that boy dying...
I don't feel nothing.
I don't care about nothing anymore.
Sounds like bliss.
I don't have that feeling yet... that numbness.
Not like the rest of you guys.
Maybe 'cause I knew what to expect.
Maybe I was just frozen up already.
I haven't touched another woman since I was called up.
Or talked to one.
I don't want to...
I don't want to feel the desire.
All right. Abrahams!
Abrahams, here you go.
Stack! Where's Stack?
Bring him out. Here.
Bell?
Bell!
Another one for Bell.
Another one for Bell.
Dear Jack...
I've met an Air Force captain.
I've fallen in love with him.
I want a divorce to marry him.
I know you can say no, but I'm asking you anyway... out of the memory of what we had together.
Forgive me.
It just got too lonely, Jack.
We'll meet again someday.
People who have been as close as we've been always meet again.
I have no right to speak to you this way.
I can't stop myself.
A habit so strong.
Oh, my friend of all those shining years... help me leave you.
What's your name?
We were a family.
How'd it break up and come apart... so that now we're turned against each other... each standing in the other's light?
How did we lose the good that was given us... let it slip away... scatter it, careless?
What's keeping us from reaching out... touching the glory?
I'd have had you, Witt, if you was a Jap... long ago.
They leave you here?
Yep.
I slowed 'em up.
Don't mind, really.
The medic, he fixed me up pretty good.
I got plenty of ammo.
Somebody'll be along for me eventually.
- They got you good.
- Right in the knee.
Yeah.
I'm out of this war for good, Witt.
What are you doing down here?
Just, you know...
I'm heading back to the company.
Yeah.
Well, you give all them boys my best.
You can come with me if you want.
I'll help you along.
Nah, it's nice and quiet... peaceful up here.
I'd just slow you up.
There'll be somebody along.
I'll remind 'em.
Okay.
Hey, Witt.
Who you making trouble for today?
What do you mean?
Well, isn't that what you like to do?
Turn left when they say go right?
Why are you such a troublemaker, Witt?
You care about me, don't you, Sergeant?
I always felt like you did.
Why do you always make yourself out like a rock?
One day I can come up and talk to you.
By the next day... it's like we never even met.
Lonely house now.
You ever get lonely?
Only around people.
Only around people.
You still believing in the beautiful light, are you?
How do you do that?
You're a magician to me.
I still see a spark in you.
One man looks at a dying bird... and thinks there's nothing but unanswered pain.
But death's got the final word.
It's laughing at him.
Another man sees that same bird... feels the glory... feels something smiling through it.
We need to get out of here right now.
You explain to... to headquarters the situation?
- No.
- Do they know where we are?
'Cause we're sitting ducks out here.
Well, I think that's up to me to judge, Sergeant.
No, I think we just need to send somebody up there and find out how close they are.
Okay? It's easy.
Hey, Weld get headquarters on that thing.
The fire's coming closer, sir.
Line's cut.
This line?
Well, we need to send somebody out there to find out where that line is being cut... and we need to find out how close they are.
Come on.
Okay, okay.
Hey, you.
You go.
You're going, Fife.
Coombs. You go too.
- Come on.
- I'll go.
But I want you to know I think the whole thing's a bad idea though.
If they come down here in any strength, Lieutenant... they're gonna knock our position to hell and flinders.
Well, you don't have to go, Private.
There's others who'll volunteer.
No, I want to go, sir. In case something bad happens, I want to be there.
All right.
Y-You stay by the river.
That jungle's too thick.
And be very careful.
I will.
Good luck, Witt.
You okay, Fife?
A reinforced battalion.
We need to go back, tell the lieutenant.
Let's go.
I'm hit!
Do it! Split up!
Get back!
One of us needs to stay here and hold 'em off.
We'll be all right.
My friend here doesn't have long.
So, you go.
You go on ahead.
Witt.
They're coming.
I gotta go.
I don't want you to be afraid.
Just hide out here till you hear firing.
Then push on down the river.
- Where's Coombs?
- Get back. Get back. They're coming!
Fall back.
Where's Witt?
Fife, where's Witt?
Fife, where's Witt?
Fife. Fife, where's Witt?
America.
Where's your spark now?
Now, I know you men have been making and drinking this goddamn swipe.
That's okay by me.
Everything a lie.
Any man in an outfit of mine can get as drunk as he wants to every night.
Everything you hear, everything you see.
As long as he's ready and in shape to make reveille and carry out any assignment he is given.
If he can't do that, he's gonna have trouble from me.
So much to spew out.
Now, I prefer to think of myself as a family man... and that's what we all are here, whether we like it or not.
We are a family.
I'm the father.
Guess that makes
Sergeant Welsh here the mother.
They just keep coming, one after another.
And whether you guys like it or not, that makes you all the children in this family.
Now, a family can have only one head, and that is the father.
Father's the head, mother runs it.
That's the way it's gonna work here.
If any of you men want to see me about anything...
- You're in a box.
- Anything at all...
A moving box.
You will find that I am available.
This war is not gonna be over by next Christmas.
It's gonna be a long time before we get home.
They want you dead... or in their lie.
Only one thing a man can do... find something that's his... make an island for himself.
If I never meet you in this life... let me feel the lack.
A glance from your eyes... and my life will be yours.
Somethin' I can come back to.
Some kind of foundation.
I mean, I don't know what, you know... what your plans are, but...
I'm determined now.
I've been through the thick and thin of it.
You know, I may be young, but I've lived plenty of life.
I'm ready to start living it good.
You know, my daddy always told me it's gonna get a whole lot worse before it gets better.
You know, 'cause life ain't supposed to be that hard when you're young.
Well, I... I figure after this, the worst is gonna be gone though.
It's time for things to get better.
That's what I want.
That's what's gonna happen.
I'm getting older now.
By no means old, but older.
Where is it that we were together?
Who were you that I lived with... walked with?
The brother.
The friend.
Darkness and light.
Strife and love.
Are they the workings of one mind... the features of the same face?
O my soul... let me be in you now.
Look out through my eyes.
Look out at the things you made.
All things shining.
Man, what's takin' you so long?
It's cold as a motherfucker out here.
I had to get the last stop.
Quiet, punk.
- I'll shut your hairy ass up, man.
- Come on, man. I'm freezin' my fuckin' nuts out here!
Mush, motherfucker, mush!
Ant, Juanita gave you some of that pussy yet?
- Man, get out of here, man.
- What?
Man, I thought we was homies, man.
I'm just askin'.
Well, why you gotta be askin' me all that? I mean...
I'm just lookin' out for you.
All I'm sayin', man, fine as she is, she should be giving you something.
I bet you ain't even smelled the pussy, eh?
You two realize that soon we're gonna be out of school, right?
- Oh, sure.
- After four long years of that shit, man.
I can't fuckin' wait to get out. That's all I've been thinkin' about, man.
You know? I just be thinkin' about like what am I gonna do afterwards, right?
You know, I can dig some travelling.
Nigger, you sound like you rich or somethin'.
Hear this nigger?
He ain't even got a fuckin' job.
- I know.
- Man, you better take your ass off to college, man, I'm tellin' you... before Uncle Sam grab your ass like he gonna do this stupid motherfucker.
Oh, bullshit, Skip, man.
Ain't nobody gonna grab me.
Jose, a recruiter can see your dumb ass a mile away.
Look at you.
You're a recruiter's dream. You a 1-A.
A one-way ticket to motherfuckin'
Vietnam if I ever saw one.
That's why I'm goin' to Hunter College.
You goddam right.
I ain't fightin' no white man's war. Shit.
Them Vietcongs, chongs, whatever the fuck, ain't done shit to me.
I don't even know them motherfuckers, man.
And I ain't afraid of no war.
Man, what the fuck you been smokin'?
Look, y'all might think
I'm crazy, but...
I just wanna do somethin' that's different.
Yeah, well, gettin' your fuckin' head blown off is different.
Hey, man, turn that shit down!
And slow this motherfucker down!
- Ain't nobody in a hurry to go to school.
- Man, leave that shit up.
You know I fucked Monica, right? Her mama came in, caught us the other day.
Came in, seen my dick, jumped in the bed too.
- Later on, you chump suckers.
- Ah, fuck you.
- Your mama!
- Punk ass, jivin' around.
- Hey, this is for you,
Anthony, right here.
- Close this motherfuckin' door.
It's cold as hell out here.
Sit your nasty ass down.
Oh, hey. How you doin'?
You up kinda early.
Um, I heard your truck.
Seems like you hear my truck every mornin'.
Well, uh, morning is the best time to study, so...
You should, uh, try workin' on your first boyfriend.
I'm too busy studyin' to be worryin' about boys.
Your sister up?
Uh, Sleeping Beauty?
Yeah.
Look, uh, tell her I said hey.
See ya.
- Good morning, Anthony.
- Oh, hey.
- I thought you were sleeping.
- You woke me up.
- Uh, so you goin' to school today?
- Mmm.
I could lay in bed all mornin'.
Oh. See, now...
Now that'd be real nice.
- Don't even think about it.
- Well, look, uh...
I'm gonna get on out of here.
I'll talk to you later.
- Okay.
- See ya.
Keep on pushin'
Keep on pushin'
- I'll be down there later on.
- Got to keep on pushin'
I can't stop now
Hard shoe.
Come here, hard shoe.
Come here, man.
What's up? What's up?
Listen, I want you...
I want you to tell Kirby I want 645.
- Straight, now. Listen. And, uh...
- Straight.
- We've been rollin' here.
- Come on, man. I ain't got time.
- Let me get the money.
- I want you to be back here tonight...
- Man, straighten your hat out.
- With my money, you little motherfucker.
- What's goin' on, baby?
- All right, baby.
- All right, cat daddy. All right.
- Hey, Anthony. How you doin'?
- Hey.
You know, you brought me luck the other day. So look, ten of that's for you.
- See? Now, that's how it goes.
- Hey, now.
- L-I'm gonna use the same number too.
- Don't forget me, man.
What's goin' on?
Hey, what's goin' on?
Hey there, Jellybean.
What's goin' on?
Hey, what's goin' on?
How you been?
Kirby back there?
All right. Cool.
- Go on, get that shot. Get that shot.
- All right, thanks, youngblood.
Hey there, Peanut! What's goin' on?
What's up there? What...
Blood.
- Come on, come on, come on.
- Kirby's back there in the back, man.
Put that in Brooklyn and get ahold of that fuckin' Spyder.
- Okay, man.
- Hey, brother.
- Aw, man, take them.
- Yeah, yeah.
Here's the numbers and the cash.
- We got five.
- Hubba hubba!
Ain't you supposed to be duck huntin' with your daddy?
Oh, yeah.
We gonna go next weekend.
- Aw, shit!
- Oh, man, Kirby.
Made me miss my shot.
You know these motherfuckers down South.
I wonder if half the time they believe what they be sayin'.
What's a nigger gonna do?
We got blood in this land from slaves.
Been to war. Spilt our blood.
Shit, I been to war. I spilt blood.
Ha! That's right.
Tell 'em, Kirby.
You over there fightin' in Korea.
That's how I got this plastic-ass leg.
Nicky, fix me a drink.
Ko-motherfuckin'-rea.
Damn! Mmm!
Never gonna give you up
That's why I had to leave that motherfucker, because if I'd have...
If I'd have still been down there,
I'd have killed me a motherfucker.
Man, shit ain't gonna change.
What make you think shit gonna change?
Nigger, what's your little narrow ass doin' up in here, man?
Leave that boy alone and let him shoot.
Aw, Kirby, man, you know he too goddam young to be up in here, man.
He can outshoot you.
Oh, shit.
Oh, I know you out your motherfuckin' mind, man.
Put your money where your mouth is.
I take your money.
Rack 'em, boy.
- Uh, huh, huh, huh
- Watch this.
I got the feelin'
Baby, baby, I got the feelin'
- Yes!
- You don't know
You got my two dollars?
Game ain't over yet, man.
Got the eight ball, corner pocket.
Oh, man!
Don't run out of here without payin' me after that boy whup you.
Yeah, at least I will run out of this, motherfucker.
People that owe me money don't pay me,
I take care of 'em.
Man, will you get the fuck off my motherfuckin' table, please?
- Baby-baby-baby, baby-baby-baby
- Chicken-haired motherfucker.
Ain't no goddam business bein' here in the first place.
Ooh, missed it by that much.
- Cleanup time.
- You don't never play with me.
Eight ball, corner pocket.
Oh! Yes! Game.
Hey, that's a good game, Cowboy.
You're a lucky motherfucker, you know that?
Aw, I wouldn't say luck, but, you know.
- Just know how to play a little bit.
- Here's the money.
- Give that to Kirby.
- All right.
Uh, wait, wait.
This is two dollars.
See, uh, you bet me, so that means, uh, you owe me some money too.
Man, fuck you.
Why you gotta cheat?
Man, who the fuck you think you talkin' to, man?
You know what? I'm gonna tell everybody around here... when it comes to playin' pool,
Cowboy likes to cheat.
Nigger, I'll kick your little monkey ass, man.
Oh, man.
Shut your motherfuckin' mouth, man.
I oughta cut you.
Little motherfucker. Yeah.
It hurt, don't it?
What the fuck?
What the fuck are you doin'?
Get the fuck off of me, man!
Kirby, what the fuck you doin', man?
- What the fuck are you doin'?
- What the fuck are you doin', man?
- Get on out of here!
- You a bad motherfucker!
- And don't you come back in here unless you come correct.
- Fuck you!
- You all right, kid?
- Oh, yeah.
Just a little cut, you know.
It's all right.
Yep. You do a real good job for me with them numbers.
Well, you know, I try.
But, uh, you better be cool.
Don't let your mom and pop find out.
Oh, no way.
I won't do that.
It's for you.
Oh, man. Whoa!
- Hey, thanks, Kirby.
- Ain't nothin' to thank me for.
- You earned it.
- Oh. Twenties.
Hey, kid, you wanna take a little run with me?
Yeah, I'll take a little run with you.
Say, uh, Kirby, where we goin'?
Like I told you, just a little run.
A run. Okay. All right.
- Wanna drive, kid?
- Who, me?
No, not "me."
You, motherfucker.
Well, Kirby,
I don't have my licence yet.
Aw, shit. Fuck the dumb shit.
You wanna drive or what?
Yeah. All right, I'll drive.
Yeah.
- Pull over here.
- All right.
Come on. Come on.
What you call her, Nellie?
Come on, Nellie.
I call this bitch whatever I wanna call her.
Listen here.
Keep that motor runnin'.
- I'll just be a minute here.
- Yeah, all right.
- Stop messin' with my gold!
- Wait a minute!
- How many times I gotta tell you?
I ain't no motherfuckin' play toy! I'll kick your ass!
- Get the fuck up!
- You get the fuck up off of Spyder!
No.
You got more heart than your punk-ass old man. Come here.
- Oh, man, Kirby!
- Oh, what the...
Give me my fuckin' leg, you stupid son-of-a-bitch!
You grabbed the wrong leg, you stupid cocksucker. Come here!
- Get on back in here now, Spyder.
- You asshole!
- I want my motherfuckin' money, hear?
- Easy, Kirby.
- Now!
- Easy, man!
- Dumb son-of-a...
Give me my fuckin' leg, you stupid cocksucker.
- I'll fuck you up.
- Get on back down there.
- They gonna call the police.
- I got 15 miles to go now
- Come on. Come on!
- And I can hear my baby callin' my name
Floor this motherfucker.
Floor it.
Now I'll be so glad to see my baby
And hold her in my arms one more time
Now when I kiss her lips
- I'll turn a backward flip
- You did good, kid.
You're almost as good a getaway driver as me.
Uh, thanks. Say, uh...
So you were a getaway driver, huh?
- Son-of-a-bitch!
- What? Wh-What's wrong?
- I oughta go back there and kill that bastard.
- Why? What happened?
Motherfucker made me lose a whole pack of cigarettes.
A pack of cigarettes?
A pack of cigarettes?
I thought maybe you should be worried about your leg or somethin'.
- Oh, that shit's funny to you, huh?
- No, no, it's not funny.
I tell you what. The next time the motherfucker grabs me by... the wrong leg, I'm gonna use it to kick his ass between his shoulder blades.
- Hey, man, you really did that sucker.
- Yeah, everybody in town... know I got one leg, and that motherfucker grab the wrong one.
Me and Kirby, baby. Yeah.
- This is wonderful news, Edward.
- Thank you.
All right, all right.
You see, Anthony?
You be thankful you can go to City
College on the financial aid programme.
Yeah, in four years, you can be just like me.
Just like you?
You can graduate and maybe even go to graduate school too.
Well, I'll tell y'all one thing.
My mama sure would've been proud.
Never would've believed
I got two college graduates.
You think about what you're gonna major in, baby?
The Marine Corps.
Uh, Dad, could you pass the salt?
What'd you say?
Thanks. I said the, uh, Marine Corps.
- I'm... I'm joinin'.
- Marine Corps?
- Yeah.
- Now that's original.
What you talkin' about, Anthony?
I'm talkin' about
I wanna do somethin' else.
I don't wanna go to college.
I'm sick of school.
I mean, I don't know why everybody got this strange look on their face.
- It's my life.
- Yeah.
It's your life.
Looks like to me you're tryin' to ruin it, baby.
You're an idiot.
You know that?
Dad, I don't wanna go to college.
I'm just not ready for no college.
You always said the marines and fightin' over in Korea made a man out of you.
I figure I be, you know, livin' my own life.
I'll talk to your mama.
When your baby and you are tight and everything is right
- And you is mellow
- Give me that.
There you go.
Now, drink some wine.
You keep everything all right
And you know that you're the only fellow
Ain't that a groove
Ain't that a groove
Ain't that a groove
Told your little ass you couldn't drink with me.
- Ain't that a groove
- Hey, James. Want some of this?
- Now, lookee here, fella
- Yeah! Whoo!
Girls like to be in the mood whenever they think their man is yellow
- Whoo! Yeah!
- Hit me, baby
Say, Skeeter, I still can't believe you graduated, man.
- Man, shut up.
- Glad we out of school, man.
I'm sick of these stupid-ass brothers.
I'm about to get my pimp thing on started.
You know, I got so many ho's now, man,
I gotta get an assistant pimp... just to keep in track of 'em, you know, make sure they on the right streets and shit.
Say, Skippy, why... why you always talkin' about this pimp stuff, man?
What's happenin'?
'Cause it's real, man. I'm a pimp.
Pimpin' run in my family.
My great-great granddaddy was a slave, and he was a pimp.
He used to have his ho's pick his cotton in the field.
He didn't have to do shit.
You better be careful, man. You're gonna catch something, Skip. Watch.
That's all right, motherfucker.
I was born by the pussy,
I'll die by the pussy.
Don't worry about what the fuck I do.
Hey, Skip, do you believe in superstition?
Hell, no.
Well, you should, man.
Your stupid ass jinxed me.
- What the fuck you talkin' about?
- Uncle Sam, man.
Dropped a motherfuckin' 1-A on me.
I told you, didn't I?
Didn't I tell you?
- Say, when did that happen?
- Last week, Anthony, man.
Yeah, right, motherfucker.
Pass the joint.
- Anthony, man.
- What?
You know that, um, that me and Marisol, we tight, man.
Yeah, man, y'all are...
Y'all pretty down.
- You would say I love her?
- I don't know.
I could say that you love her.
- I'm thinkin' about marrying her, man.
- Oh, wait a minute.
- Hey, don't do that shit.
- Hey, man, you might be goin' a little too fast now.
Hey, I love her, man, and did you see how she looks today at that party, man?
- She looks good enough to marry.
- I'm glad to hear you want me.
What you over here talkin' about, Anthony?
- Why you standin' over here?
- Shut up, Skippy.
- Shut up.
Anthony, I know you ain't gonna stay over here talkin' to Skip while my song's playin'.
Not if they expect to be with us tonight.
- Look here, Skippy, we gonna have to cut on out, bro.
- Uh, yeah.
- Man, where y'all goin'?
- Uh, we gonna go hang on out.
- Look it, have some chicken.
- I thought we was hangin', man.
- Have some chicken, man.
I told you about them broads, old punk-ass.
And anyway, Skip,
Brenda lookin' for you.
I don't give a fuck.
You tell her I'm at where I at and I'll be where I be.
Motherfuckin' pimp.
If I gotta go where every ho want me to be, I be confused.
Motherfucker. Tell her don't make me hurt my hand again.
If you want a do-right all day
Woman
You gotta be a do-right
All night
Jose, I love you.
I love you too, mama.
If you give my pussy away to somebody else... while I'm gone...
I'm gonna come back and blow that motherfucker up.
I got this itch
I need to be scratched.
S-S-S-So... So you're sayin' that y-your, your mama... is workin' a night shift tonight?
Mm-hmm.
And you know what else?
You could scratch it all night long if you want to.
You know I'm the nigger. I'm the nigger.
You know I'm the nigger. I'm the nigger.
You swear Big Bertha won't get off work early?
She's not gonna get off from work early.
- You scared?
- No, I ain't scared. I just don't...
You act like you're scared.
Come on. Shut up.
- Where Delilah at?
- She in her room. Come on!
- Say it loud
- I'm black and I'm proud
- Get out.
- Say it loud
- I'm black and I'm proud
- Go to your own room.
- Say it loud
- I'm black and I'm proud
Once upon a time
I almost lost my mind
I was lonely
So lonely
Once upon a time
Oh, Juanita.
Look, it's okay.
It's all right.
It's okay.
- Okay. Okay.
- Let me get your bra.
- Okay.
- Let me get it.
- Ow. Just unhook it. Just unhook the...
- I can't. I can't.
I'll get it.
I'll do it. I'll do it.
- Okay. Okay.
- Wait, wait, wait, wait, wait.
Don't peek. Don't look at...
Don't look at me. Okay.
Okay. Okay.
- Oh!
- What?
That's not it.
Up, up, up, up. Higher. Ow.
- That's too high. Wait. Down, down.
- Okay, wait.
- Right there? Okay.
- Yeah.
- Okay. Okay.
- All right.
- It's okay.
- Uh-oh. Wait.
Okay. Easy. Ow!
Ah!
Oh, shit. Wait, wait, wait.
- Oh, shit.
- Okay.
- Okay.
- Baby.
You know, Marisol and Jose goin' down to city hall tomorrow.
Oh, yeah? What for?
To get married.
- Is that right?
- What you think about that?
Nothin', I guess.
So I guess you don't want me to wait for you either.
Look, Juanita,
I didn't say that.
So then you're gonna marry me when you get back?
I mean, if you ain't got somebody else.
I don't want nobody else.
Juanita, have you ever thought maybe... maybe I might get hurt out there and never come back?
You know, I don't want you waitin' for nothin'.
You're not scared of losing me?
I didn't say that either.
I'm scared of losing you.
So, do you think we could probably do it one more time before I go?
Uh-huh.
Oh, no.
- It's Ma!
- Shh! But it's just 6:30!
- She just pulled up.
- Well, go stall her. And close my door!
- Shoot! Shoot! Shoot!
- Oh, man.
I shouldn't have never messed around with you in the first place.
- Right.
- You know Bertha gonna kill us.
- Wait a minute.
- Uh-uh. Ain't gonna wait no minute.
Would you move?
- Wait a minute!
Come on. Let me help you with them packages.
- Delilah!
- I got it.
Girl, you got my good groceries all on the ground.
Pick those up.
Since I work, the least you girls could do is keep this place clean.
You know I'm gonna wait for you, Anthony.
Juanita, I gotta go.
I gotta go, Juanita.
- Nigger, get out of my yard!
- Fuck you!
Shut up!
What's your status? Over.
Shit.
Head for the rally point!
Get back to the rally point!
Get the fuck outta here!
Let's go! Pick it up!
Pick it up! Come on! Come on!
Come on! Move!
Move! Let's go!
Load 'em up! Load 'em up!
Oh, fuck!
I'm out of ammo!
- Devaughn! Cover me!
- Stay down!
I got him! Hurry up!
Don't check out on us, Martin.
You're gonna be all right.
You're gonna be all right.
- I got him!
- Cover fire!
Goddam it! They got us pinned down!
We'll never make the rally point!
Dugan!
You think it's time we get these fucking dinks off our asses? Huh?
- Relax.
- Fuck you!
Fuck you, fuck you, fuck you!
Radio, up!
God don't like dinks.
- How's he doin', Curtis?
- Thanks. Thanks for not leavin' me, man.
- Where the fuck is that radio?
Get that radio up here!
- No, no, no, no, no.
Radio comin'! Radio comin'!
Get that cover fire, Ferguson.
You wanna die, boy?
Sir, sir! Lieutenant!
Arty freak!
Hammerhead, Hammerhead. Recon Cobra.
Emergency fire mission. Over.
Hold on, brother. Come on.
Come on, come on.
You gonna make it, dude.
You only got a little longer.
- You gonna make it.
- Grid five, seven, one-niner.
- Tell my mama...
- No, no, I don't...
Gooks in the bush.
Request firecracker salvo. Will adjust.
How copy? Over.
Roger. Solid copy.
Firecracker shot out.
Incoming!
Down! Down! Down!
Curtis, get down!
Curtis, get down!
Out-fucking-standing job.
Saddle up. Let's get to the rally point, take that whirlybird home.
- We got some beer to drink.
- We goin' to the rally point now?
The mission's been compromised.
We're goin' to site 37.
It ain't compromised no more.
They're dead.
Now this is Sneaky Pete.
Reconnaissance.
Some of them dead gooks... they could have important intelligence papers on their bodies.
All right.
- Move 'em out.
- Move out!
Hammerhead, Hammerhead.
Cobra on site of your mission now.
I count ten... say again, ten...
November-Victor-Alpha-Kilo-lndia-Alpha.
- How copy? Over.
- I copy, one-zero. Good job.
Hammerhead, Cobra. Solid copy.
Good job. Cobra out.
Aw, shit, man! What you doin'?
He already dead.
Motherfucker.
Looks like we nailed us an officer.
You lucky bastard. You get back to C.P., you name your own price, sir.
No way, D'Ambrosio.
I'm keepin' this one.
Been lookin' for one of these since Cleon and I got here in '66.
Ain't that right, Cleon?
I walked right by that guy.
You gotta keep your eyes open.
Oh, man, what the fuck?
You hungry or somethin', Cleon?
Just like you, sir.
I'm collectin' me a souvenir.
Saddle up. We're movin' out.
That's all he's gonna say? You ain't got nothin' to tell this fuckin' shit, man?
- Man, that nigger Cleon crazy.
- Yeah.
- Did you see that shit?
- I saw it.
- Nigger, did you see that shit?
- Yes.
I heard that nigger's supposed to be a preacher's son and shit.
He cuttin' off motherfucker's heads for souvenirs and shit.
Now, if you hadn't flunked out of Hunter College, pimp daddy Skippy... you would've missed all this good shit down in Vietnam.
Kiss my ass, nigger. You the reason why I'm at this motherfucker anyway.
You didn't tell me 'bout this recon shit.
- That's 'cause you didn't ask me when you were writin' me.
- Nigger, I didn't have to.
- Shit, I figured it was better than being a grunt.
- It is.
Ant, motherfucker, we out in the woods all day.
Them motherfuckin' gooks jumpin' out like Indians every five minutes.
- Man, a nigger ain't made for this shit.
- You thought this was a skate.
Nigger, ain't nothin' wrong with no skate.
You could just call me a skatin' motherfucker.
I skate my ass right out of here, they give me a chance to.
- Ain't no shitbirds on my squad.
- Man, what you jivin' about?
Hey. Hey.
Ant. To the Bronx.
Yeah, uh... to the youngblood who couldn't be with us today.
- Lance Corporal Martin.
- To Lance Corporal Martin.
- Yes.
- Yo, Ant, man.
What they be puttin' in your head out here, man?
I mean, you done got into this shit a little bit too deep, don't you think?
You're in recon now, Skip.
You in deep too.
Man, fuck this shit, man.
- Oh, come on, man.
- Man, this ain't our war, man.
Shit, our black ass should be back in the Bronx where we belong.
Joe-ass got lucky. They sent him home, gettin' wounded and shit.
Heard he wounded his hand pretty bad, man.
Shit, that's all right, though.
He got out of this shit.
I rather be home with a fucked-up hand up in some pussy than to be out here... healthier than a motherfucker without it.
- Shit.
- Same old Skip. Boy, you ain't changed.
That's right.
You heard from Juanita?
She used to write me a lot during my first tour.
We got a package for ya!
Turns out, man, before I left, fucked around and got her pregnant.
- Man, you bullshittin'.
- No, I ain't.
- No shit?
- Dead serious, man.
Got a little girl back at home.
Oh, man, that's groovy, man. That's groovy. I can dig it. That's cool.
Hey, dig, man, I know you got a picture, man.
- Let me see her picture. Shit.
- Can't even look at her, man.
Man, what the fuck you mean, bro?
That's your little girl, man.
That's your baby.
You know how I survived
26 months in the bush?
Because I don't think about the world,
Skip. That shit don't exist to me.
I don't give a fuck about anything or anyone in it... because the minute I do, I'm a dead man out here, and you remember that shit.
We'll talk about the world when we get back.
Yeah, whatever, man.
I'm gonna go get high.
I mean real high. And I'm gonna get my dick sucked too.
Big dick. Big.
Very, very big.
Can you handle it?
"Hey there, Kirby.
What's happenin' back in the world?
If you hadn't heard, doin' my second tour."
- Fire in the hole!
- Fire in the hole!
"We spend most of our time livin' in the bush.
Kind of numb to everything out here.
Tryin' to keep my head clear.
Our lieutenant is this crazy white boy named Dugan from Ohio.
He's good at gettin' us out of crazy situations.
We got this one wild-ass brother out here named Cleon."
Gook fuck.
"His daddy's this big-time preacher, but you'd never know from his crazy son."
Now you're good.
Now Jesus loves you.
"He's from Mount Vernon.
Oh, yeah. You won't believe it... but Skip volunteered for my unit.
I don't think he's cut out for recon.
He's always gettin' high and shit, tryin' to keep his mind off things.
Me, I'm just tryin' to take it one day at a time and do what's right... whatever that is.
See you when I get back to the Bronx.
Anthony."
That fuckin' shit stinks.
I don't wanna pull rank, Cleon, but if you don't get rid of that fuckin' head...
I don't hear nobody else complainin' but you.
Well, maybe you should listen to your team.
Medical advice, Cleon:
You dump that shit.
Hey, Doc, shut the fuck up.
You don't know shit.
Fuck you, man. It stinks like a sack full of assholes.
Ain't a one of us got as much as a splinter in his finger... since I cut this head off.
This head is our good-luck charm.
Nah, this here's our good-luck charm.
If you don't mind, Sergeant, l...
My vote is to get rid of it.
Man, Cleon, you need to get the fuck on with that bullshit, man.
- That head smell like shit.
- Bottom line, Staff Sergeant.
You either get rid of that fuckin' head
A.S.A. fuckin' P., or I'm gonna... have your ass court-martialed when we get back to the rear.
We clear?
Cobra, Cobra, Delta six. Over.
Delta six, Delta six, Cobra.
Copy. Over.
Cobra, Delta six.
Execute Charlie, Michael...
We're in a world of shit now.
I just buried our luck.
Listen up. Change of mission.
A patrol from 25 has found... a shitload of weapons in a vill about a klik and a half to our whisky.
Platoon commander wants us to interrogate on the spot.
Betancourt, you're the closest one in the area that speaks that gook shit.
So that's where we're headin'.
All right, saddle up. We're movin' out.
- So now where's D'Ambrosio?
- He went to go take a shit.
- When?
- When Cleon was diggin' the hole.
- Why the hell didn't you go with him?
- You know how he is.
- He don't like nobody around when he's shittin'.
- Oh, man.
Grab his shit.
Let's find him.
Aww.
Fuck! Doc.
- D'Ambrosio, what'd they do?
You'll be all right.
Doc's gonna take care of you, okay?
This morphine is all
I can do for him right now.
Here, Doc. You can use mine if that's not enough.
Are you crazy? Another one of those would kill him right now.
What the fuck you got there, Curtis?
Somethin' about
"Black men, go home.
This isn't your war."
You get rid of that cocksucking commie bullshit right now.
- Yeah. Right.
- Hey, Curtis.
- Apply some pressure here.
- We gotta hump this man back to the rally point.
Oh, shit.
Save me, Curtis.
Look, Adam, you don't worry 'bout nothin'.
We're a team, okay, brother?
- We gonna take care of you.
- Please.
Yeah. It's not much longer.
We're almost there.
Kill me.
Kill me!
I would do it for you.
I would do it for you, Curtis.
Buttermilk 17.
Cobra, over.
Cobra, Cobra. Buttermilk 17. Inbound your buzz. Contact on your visual.
- Shh.
- Buttermilk 17. Cobra.
Hey, you gonna be all right.
The medevac will be here in a minute.
Do it.
You think
I don't mean it?
I can't go home like this.
- Hey, what's he saying?
- He's delirious, man.
- Please.
- Uh, Cobra, Buttermilk.
- Hooking direct to your 12. Stand by.
- Cobra standing by. Over.
Shh-shh-shh.
Uh, Cobra, Buttermilk 17.
Roger your visual. Pop smoke. Over.
Buttermilk 17, Cobra.
Smoke. Over.
Pop the smoke.
Get that man ready for medevac!
- When'd he go?
- A few minutes ago.
It's better to check out than go home all fucked up.
No shit.
Oh, shit!
Get down!
Fuckin' assholes!
- Stay down! Stay down!
- I'm gonna get these motherfuckers!
Return fire! Fire!
Get these motherfuckers!
- Skip! Return some fire!
- Shoot them motherfuckers!
Mission aborted! We get the fuck out of Dodge, back to the rally point!
Ferguson! Get some fuckin' rounds goin'!
Skip! Cover me!
- Dugan!
- Dugan, wait!
Dugan!
Dugan!
Skip! Skip!
Snap out of that shit. Go!
- Fuck this, man.
Let's bug out, Cleon!
- Cobra, move the fuck out!
- Get up! Come on!
- Move it! Move it!
Move! Get up!
Get up! Come on!
- What are you doin'?
- What is this, man?
- Slow down, man.
- Fuckin' grunts!
- Say, get a special shot for Skip.
My man's goin' home today.
- Count of three: 1-2-3.
All right. Good.
Now come on, now. Skip, come on, now.
Let's see a dap, man.
- All right!
- Get one like this. Get one like this.
Come on, now.
Everybody, come on. Get closer.
- Ah, man!
- This is Cobra, baby.
- Recon Cobra!
- It's Cobra. Hey, hey!
Team Cobra, ready?
Come on
Come along, come on and get up and get down too
- Get down, get up
- Say, h-h-hold on a sec.
- Keep the metre running.
- Get down, get up and move your feet
Come on and rise, rise, rise
Shake your get-up
Straighten up there, marine!
He a friend of yours?
Friend of yours and
I'll give a discount, marine.
No, man.
Oh, shit.
Man, look who's back in the motherfuckin' world.
Dig this motherfucker right here, man.
Look at you, man. That's a mackin' outfit if I've ever seen one.
- Look, with all the stripes and shit.
What, you a captain now?
- No, man.
Look, man, you wear that motherfucker for about a month, this nigger get all the pussy, man.
Check this motherfucker out, man.
Well, look, man... Yeah, you go get me some squares, man.
I gotta take care of a couple things, baby. I'll get back with you. All right?
You stay up now, all right?
What's happening, blood?
Hey, man, I'm back.
My nigger!
Come on and get down
Hey, Luther!
Tell your sister I'm gonna be over there later on.
Hey, fuck you!
Man, the neighbourhood is changin'.
Aw, it's still a good place.
White people movin' out, though.
Oh, dig. I saw Juanita the other day, man.
Man, she finer than a motherfucker.
Is that right?
You need to go check her out, man.
Go see your little daughter.
Remember them big-ass ears you had when you was young?
She got 'em, just like you.
That's how I know it was yours.
So, what's up with Joe, man?
Is he, uh... Is he workin' or what?
Aw, post office, you know.
Three-quarter gig, part-time.
He gotta do what he gotta do.
He got mouths to feed, you know.
What about you, man?
How you doin'?
- Who, me?
- Yeah.
I'm cool, baby. I'm Skippy, baby.
I'm still pimpin'.
Need any money or anything, you know?
Man, I got over like a fat rat when I got out, man.
Dig, I got my school money comin' from the government once a month.
I got my veteran's cheque comin' once a month.
I got my fifty percent medical cheque comin' to me for the rest of my life.
I ain't gotta do a goddam thing else but go to the mailbox, you dig?
Hey, man, how the hell you pull a fifty percent medical?
Nigger, you ain't disabled.
Man, some shit got into me over there, man.
What?
All I know is my blood cells are all fucked up.
Some nights I wake up in cold sweats and shit.
Don't look at me like that, man.
It ain't the heroin.
The heroin ain't never did nothin' to me. A lot of vets comin' down with this shit.
- And they don't know what it is?
- Square biz.
Damn. Look, man, you wanna come on in the crib or somethin', man?
Nah, man. I'm cool, baby.
Hey, I'm gonna split.
But you here, baby. You home.
We got plenty of time to do our thing.
You know what I'm sayin'?
- Brother.
- Brother. Go see your mama.
- Right on. I'm gonna check her out.
- With her fine ass.
You know, I been takin' care of your mama while you been gone.
Boy, I'll kick your head in.
Don't talk like that.
Mmm.
You all right?
Yeah.
Well, can't you look me in my eyes?
I ain't seen you in four years.
Well, what'd you do over there?
What was it like?
Look, uh, I'd rather not talk about that right now.
Well, Anthony, you gonna have to tell us something.
Now, you know a lot of them boys went over there and got hooked on them drugs and stuff. You know.
Look, I was in a special unit out there... and bad habits could've cost us our lives.
Well, that's what I'm talkin' about, them bad habits, honey.
Now, if you picked up some of them things, there's a lot of places you can go and get help.
No bad habits, Ma.
'Cept a little killin'.
For my country, of course.
Hey. Let me give you some more of these collards.
- Yeah.
- Baby, this sure is good.
Oh, shit. Look who back.
Look at this motherfuckin' man.
- Hey, what's happenin', youngblood?
- What's goin' on, cool breeze?
- Long time, no see.
- All right now, Pops. What's happenin'?
Hey there. What's goin' on, blood?
Ain't seen you in a long time, man.
- Boy just got back.
- Hey, blood.
- All right.
- Cheers. My man. Drink!
- All right. How you feel? All right.
Hey, what's goin' on?
Hey, I got next game.
- You know that's my table.
- You call that a break?
- I got the thing made
- Hold up there, now. It's my shot.
Say, chump.
Don't I know you from somewhere?
- Ha-ha!
- My man, Joe! What's happenin'?
- Oh, look at you!
- How you doin', man?
- Good, man. What's goin' on, man?
- Jesus Christ, man.
- I can't believe it's you!
You cool, man!
- What's goin' on, man?
Say, man,
I heard you got wounded out there.
Yeah, man. I was in demolitions and my fuckin' hand gets blown off, man.
- Oh, man. Shit.
- Yeah, man. But hey... motherfuckers told me everything there is to know about explosives, man!
- That right?
- Check you out, Pappy.
You got all those kids now.
Man, hey. You gotta check out Kirby, man. He's over in the back room.
Yeah. Let's go on back.
He's still back here, huh?
- All right. Dig it.
- Hey. Abre la puerta! Hey! Hey!
Doin' all right. You know, Kirby just all hangin' in there, you know?
- Who the fuck is it?
- It's me.
Blood! What's up, blood?
- Hey, Nicky. What's happenin', man?
- Skin!
Kirby back there, man.
That boy looked at me, he say, "Kirby... when she pulled off them drawers,
I thought I'd never stop seein' ass!"
- What's happenin', Captain?
- Who the fuck is that?
- Youngblood?
- Yeah, it's me!
Youngblood! Come on, boy!
- How you doin'? Come on in the back here, boy. Come on.
- Oh, boy. All right.
Man, I been everywhere lookin' for a gig.
Aw, motherfuckers forget about you gettin' your ass almost blown off... or whatever the fuck.
Yeah. Look, uh, Kirby, uh...
I was thinkin', man.
Maybe, uh, come back and work for you.
What? Work for me?
Yeah. You know. Runnin' numbers.
Like we used to do.
Shh. Fuckin' pigs run me out of business.
How... How the pigs run you outta business, man?
You had 'em on the payroll.
Pigs are greedy.
And you gotta remember I'm dealing with the NYPD... greediest, most corrupt pigs on the face of the earth.
So I got the fuck out.
I told that motherfucker I'd rather eat cat shit with a knittin' needle.
I wasn't gonna bust my ass sendin' some cop kids to college. Shit.
I dig it.
This place ain't never made much money.
So I'm just hustlin' here and there.
Tryin' to get over, just like everybody else.
It's gonna be all right, kid.
Here's to gettin' over.
I hope, man. Hope. Shit.
- You afraid of blood?
- Uh, that's all I been around for the past three years.
Anthony Curtis.
You related to Tony?
The actor?
N-No. Not...
Oh! The act... No, no, no.
- Different colour, right?
- Yeah! He's a white cat. Yeah.
And his name was Schwartz.
Schwartz, not Curtis.
- Okay.
- Know anything about butchering?
Uh, I'm a fast learner.
Here, put that on.
- Here. Take this.
- Need some help, man!
All right.
Hey, uh, is Juanita in?
No, she's not, but she'll be back in a... in a while.
So you gonna stand out there, or you comin' in?
I'm gonna come on in.
Girl, check you out.
I thought you were goin' over to the communists.
Ah. Nah. Not me.
Now, dig, if you were smart, that's what you would've done.
What?
Man, you don't know what the hell you talkin' about, girl.
No, it's cool. I mean it's not your fault you been brainwashed by America.
I mean, at least you made it back alive, right?
You know, "Hello, how you doin'?"
That would've been real nice... before you got off onto all this political shit.
Welcome home.
And welcome to the revolution.
- So, this is Sarah's?
- Mm-hmm.
Oh, wow.
- So, is she a smart baby?
- Ahh.
Why don't you find out for yourself?
Hey, y'all. Sorry I'm late.
Traffic on the Cross Bronx was a mess.
Oh. All righty.
There we go.
There you go.
Go play with your blocks.
Go play with your blocks.
Hey.
Oh, no. Look, Juanita.
I'm in one piece.
Hey, I got somebody
I want you to meet.
Come here, Sarah.
Come to Mommy.
Good girl. Come here.
Look at that.
- That's Daddy. Say hi.
- Hi.
This is Sarah Marie Curtis.
- Hi.
- Hello.
Hold her, silly. She's yours.
Oh.
Hey. Mmm.
Hey, um...
Oh, yeah. Be advised.
What's goin' on, my brothers?
- This is it, huh?
- Yeah. This is home.
Dig it. Dig it.
Check out Sleepin' Beauty back there.
Boy, I still can't get over how gorgeous she is.
Oh, she got that from her mama.
Oh. Okay.
You know, Juanita...
I wanna let you know l...
I did miss you. A lot.
Don't you think I know that, Anthony?
It's not important anyway. The important thing is that you're here now.
Shh. Come here.
Oh.
Hey, baby girl.
Hey, Cutty.
Came by to see you a little earlier, but you weren't home.
Oh, you know I had class tonight after work... and then I stopped over by my mother's.
- Oh, yeah. I forgot. It's Saturday.
- Yeah.
I see my little girl's sleepin' back there, huh?
Yeah. She's all played out.
- Cutty, I wanted you to meet, um...
- Look here.
- Got a little somethin' for Sarah.
- Smiling faces
- Buy her something real nice.
- Smiling faces sometimes
Hey, Cutty, I told you to stop spoilin' her like this.
Smiling faces
Smiling faces tell lies
- Somebody's gotta do it.
- And I got proof
- Beware
- Cutty, I want you to meet Anthony.
Okay. All right.
Let me just put her to bed. You come on in and make yourself at home.
Come on in.
Okay. Can I get you something to drink, or...
Look, Juanita.
Uh, I think I better go.
But you just got here.
Who knows, you could be expectin' company or something.
Nobody's comin' here, Anthony.
I think I still should go.
Anthony.
I used to see Cutty.
Is that what you wanna hear?
Oh. Blood made that very clear to me.
So then, what's the problem?
Problem?
Why, man throwed two yards on your car.
You askin' me what's the problem?
Shit. Obviously nothin'.
Don't come up in here judgin' me.
What the fuck, man?
You got a pimp around my daughter?
Oh, he is not a pimp.
And besides, if you cared anything about havin' a daughter... you'd have wrote me back after I sent you our picture.
But don't jump on me for havin' a life.
You didn't want one with me.
So now what?
Are you gonna leave?
Some bullshit.
Come here.
Come on. Come here.
Ooh, hey
Ya gotta, gotta payback
Payback
- Damn!
- Revenge
A man
The big payback
Got to get back
Cleanup time, Cowboy.
See, man, why the fuck you always gotta talk some shit?
Payback
Right there
- See, that's why I kicked his fuckin' ass when he was a little kid, man.
- Payback
- Always gettin' smart and shit.
- A man
Get down with my girlfriend
That ain't right
Now you gonna play this marine war hero.
Out of touch
You know what I think?
- I think y'all was some goddam fools goin' over there...
- Gonna fight fightin' that white man's war.
- That's right.
- Payback everything you got to see
- What you got when you get back here, huh?
- Yeah
- Never do any damn thing
- Not a goddam thing.
Course, you do got that fine-ass Juanita.
- Throw me out
- Now, what the fuck you lookin' at me like that for, man?
I'm just complimentin' you on your taste.
Throw me away
You had all the rage
- You had me down
- Course you know...
- That's the facts
- Baddest motherfucker this side of Nicky Barnes...
- Now, you punk
- My boss man Cutty...
Gettin' ready for the big payback
I thought that might ring a bell.
The big payback
That's where I learned
He used to tap that ass while you was over in Nam.
- The big payback
- Motherfucker!
- Goddam!
- You do some fuckin' talkin', don't you, goddam it!
Try this on, motherfucker.
- No, no, no. He needs his ass whipped.
- What you mean "no"?
Get the fuck outta here!
Talk shit now, huh, motherfucker?
- Shut the fuck up. Come on. Come on.
Motherfucker. Now what?
- I'm ready to be respected
You wanna fuck with me or what?
I'm gonna fuckin' kill your ass!
- Say somethin' now, motherfucker.
- That's enough, youngblood.
- Pull out your goddam knife!
- No! That's enough. Come on!
- I gonna kill this motherfucker!
- That's enough!
That mother! I'm gonna kill this motherfucker!
- Let me go, Kirby! Let me go!
- No. He's already beat up. Come on now.
- Oh, shit.
- Come on. Let's go get some air.
Don't need no fuckin' air!
Let me go!
- Let me hit him, hit him, hit him
- That's game.
Shit.
Gonna have the aeroplane corn bread.
Here we go.
Ooh!
- You gonna spoil that girl.
- Mm-hmm.
Gonna spoil that one in your belly too.
I don't need no spoiled kids.
Hey, why not?
Not enough black babies are spoiled.
Ain't that right, Sarah, hmm?
You got a point there.
Come on. Sit on down.
Big girl. Come here.
Come here.
Look at you.
Fat girl.
See what we got ourselves here.
Oh, you know what? I think we're gonna have ourselves a little boy.
Yeah, come on, man.
You got to be a boy.
Boy, boy, boy. Mm.
Ant Junior.
See, it's the power of the mind.
We will ourselves a little boy.
Then can you will yourself a better job?
Can you will yourself to stop drinkin' so much?
Come on, honey.
Don't even start that shit, all right?
I thought we supposed to be havin' a nice time here.
Look, Juanita. l-I'm gonna get myself a... a good job.
You know how long you been singin' that same old song now, Anthony?
I mean, in case you haven't noticed, this here's the real world.
Ain't no free meals here like in the marines.
Say, let me tell you somethin'.
Wasn't nothin' free in the marines.
I earned every meal and every fuckin' dollar, all right?
Look, everything's gonna be cool.
You know I'll be five months next week.
You're five months pregnant, you can't be no nurse's aide.
I said we'll be all right.
Hey, um... Anybody want some speed?
Get the fuck outta here with that shit.
Say, why don't you cut the bullshit, Joe?
Can't you clear your mind for one sec, man?
Now, you sure that they pick up cash money?
Hey, cash money, bro.
Like clockwork, once a month.
Then they stop by the post office... before they make their final run to Washington, man.
All the way to Washington, D.C., where they burn the money.
Can you believe that shit?
Old bills, man.
Sometimes a couple million.
- How many guards?
- Four.
Two in the front and one in the back carry revolvers.
The other one, 12-gauge shotgun, man.
You think we can take 'em?
I can't say, man.
I mean... four guards, and all of 'em packin'?
I put up the guns. I get the money together to get the plans goin'.
But you got to be the master planner.
You got medals for blowin' motherfuckers up out there.
- Man, I heard you were like John Wayne.
- Well, then that's the deal.
Yeah, all that money.
Ah, man.
Anthony. You down?
- Ahh.
- The look
- Of love
- Let's drink on it anyway.
- Is in your eyes
- Mmm.
- Ahh.
- A look
- Ooh, ooh, ooh.
- Your heart
- Say, man. Shhh.
- Can't disguise
- Hmm?
Put the goddam thing away.
Get your little pyromaniac ass...
- You gonna be walkin' in a minute.
- Aw, cool out, Kirby, man.
I'm not gonna burn your car.
Not yet, at least.
Don't go
Forget it, Juanita.
Come on. Watch out there.
The look of love
What's the problem, Anthony?
What is it? I mean, is it because I'm pregnant?
Shh. Come on.
Now, don't be silly.
So, then what's the problem?
Come on. Talk to me.
What is it?
I told you. You need to leave that alcohol alone.
- No! No!
- Anthony! Anthony, baby!
It's me.
It's me. It's all right.
It's all right.
Come here.
Shh. Shh. Shh.
It's just another dream.
It's just another dream.
This is my best cut,
Mrs Stein. Enjoy.
Thank you very much, Saul.
- He's such a nice man.
- What did he give you?
- We need to talk.
- Oh.
- So what's happenin'?
- You're a good man.
Aw, come on, Saul.
I ain't got time to kibitz with ya.
I got a whole lot of meat to cut.
I'm closing down the shop.
Should've told you sooner, but I thought maybe... business, you know, pick up a little.
Sorry.
- Here.
- Oh, no, look, Saul... No. I can't.
What am I gonna do with it?
I have to get rid of it.
Come on.
Now I know
We have great respect
For the sister and mother
It's even better yet
But there's the joker in the street
Here you go, brother.
Don't let the bullshit get to you.
I'm tryin', man. I'm tryin'.
You wanna get the man's foot off your neck?
Come check us out.
Take care of yourself, brother.
Live righteous.
Here you go, brother.
Here you go.
Take care of yourself, brother.
Come see us now.
Don't let us hang around this town
- Here you go, sister.
- And let what others say come true
Brothers and sisters, here you go.
Heh, heh, heh, heh, heh.
Hey, youngblood.
Bringin' in the groceries, huh?
Lord, have mercy.
Man, I remember when I was married.
I used to love to bring home the groceries.
Made me feel real good.
Like a man. Know what I mean?
Hey, listen, youngblood. Uh...
I just dropped by to see Juanita and Sarah.
- You know, lay a little somethin' on 'em.
- Stopped by to see my baby?
Is that right?
You know, youngblood...
I took care of your woman and your baby when you were in the war.
Now, a man oughta get a little respect for somethin' like that.
Now, I ain't gonna lie to you.
I care about Juanita.
I care about her a whole lot.
But you back now, and I'm gone.
So from this point on, you should consider me like a friend of the family.
Find yourself in a jam and shit, need a little cash... you come see me,
I'll front you.
- Keep your shit.
- Listen, brother.
I know about pride.
But you got mouths to feed.
Now, I laid a little cash on Juanita.
Say, man, stay the fuck away from my family.
What did you say?
You heard me, goddam it.
I said, "Stay the fuck away from my family."
See, I ain't the enemy, youngblood.
I don't want no trouble.
Shit.
See, I tried to be a friend, motherfucker.
Surprise, nigger.
Big bad marines.
Look at you now.
Does she suck you?
Fuck you?
Make you feel like a man?
Make you feel real good?
Huh, boy?
Now, she wasn't doin' it like that before you went to the war, now was she?
Now you gettin' all that good lovin'... and you can't even put food on your fuckin' table.
Come on, Santa Claus.
Open your mouth and suck this.
Come on. I got a present for you.
Suck it!
- Suck it, nigger!
- Kill me, motherfucker.
Shoot me right now.
What you gonna do, shoot me?
You lucky this is personal, nigger.
I ain't gonna kill you over no woman.
Don't you ever... in your fuckin' life... bite the hand that feeds you, nigger.
See ya, Santa Claus.
- Hold still now.
- I'm all right.
- Hold still.
- No, I'm all right. Damn!
You givin' him that money back.
He won't take it back.
What the fuck you talkin'...
You better get his shit back to him!
Even if I wanted to give it back to him,
Anthony, he wouldn't take it back.
W-W-W-Wait. What the fuck you talkin' about, "if you wanted to give it back"?
No, no, no, no.
Fuck that shit.
Have you forgotten you just lost your damn job? We need that fuckin' money.
- We don't need his money.
- Yeah, well, Anthony,
I'll tell you what.
You start bringin' some real money in here, like a real man, and then
I'll think about givin' it back to him.
Until then, I don't wanna hear shit.
You need to get your tight ass together, that's what you need to do, and stop feelin' sorry for your damn self.
Sometimes it's like you ain't even the same man I knew before the war.
That's who I was in love with.
That's who I thought showed the fuck back up here.
I don't know who the fuck you are.
So, what? You just, uh, suck his dick so good... he just start throwin' money at you, right?
What is with you?
Why you so damn paranoid?
I ain't fuckin' him.
Not at this moment, you ain't. No.
But the motherfucker ain't sniffin' around here... tossin' money in your motherfuckin' face for nothin'!
Yeah, well, I sleep with you every night, don't I?
You know, Juanita, that's a damn good question.
Come on. Go ahead.
Admit this shit, man. Be honest.
You fuckin' him, right?
- Is that what you wanna hear, Anthony?
That's what you wanna hear?
- Uh-huh. Yeah. Yeah.
Fine. I'm fuckin' him.
So, uh, whose baby is that?
D-Don't even answer that shit.
No, you right. I ain't gonna answer it.
I mean, shit. You Anthony.
You the big marine man with no damn job.
You know every fuckin' thing.
Answer this for me: If you think
I'm jivin' you so much, Anthony, why the hell you with me? Huh?
Why the fuck you with me?
What, you think I need you?
Do you think I need this shit?
Fuck. You can't get a decent job, you won't fuck me.
The only time I get to hold you is when you're havin' one of them silly-ass nightmares...
Shut the fuck up!
Shut the fuck up!
You don't know, girl.
You really don't know.
- Don't you fuckin' walk away from...
- You better get the fuck off of me!
- Don't walk away from me, Anthony.
- Let me go.
- Don't you... What about Sarah?
- I'll fuckin' kill you, girl!
Don't you ever run up on me! Ever!
Ever run up on me again!
I'll fuckin' kill you, Juanita!
Get the fuck off me!
Bunch of shit!
- Yeah!
- That's right. You can't trust them!
- Now, they send our men off to Vietnam...
- That's what they do. to fight for this so-called democracy.
- That's right. Preach, sister.
- Yeah! Yeah!
But when they get back down to the South Bronx... and to Bed-Stuy and Harlem and Watts, etc., etc... shit is worse than ever.
- There is something very sick about that.
- He's a devil.
That's right, he's the devil.
That's right!
Go, sister! Go on!
- Power to the people!
- Power to the people!
- In 'n' out.
- Never, never gonna give you up
I'm never, ever gonna stop
Not the way
I feel about you
- Girl, I just can't live without you
- There you go.
- I'm never, ever gonna quit
- What can I get you, baby?
Anyway, so like I was sayin',
I ran into this brother... and he, uh, gave me this flyer.
So I figured I'd go over and check it out.
And there you were, up there talkin' that ol' righteous shit.
I'm just a college student tryin' to do her part to rally the people together.
But, dig, we need more than talk. It's... It's time to do.
- Do what?
- Revolution.
Oh, wait a minute. See.
Y'all a little outta my league now.
Is that what you're gonna say when the revolution comes?
W-When it's time to pick up a gun?
What you know about weapons?
I'm qualified to handle a.45... an M-16 rifle, a.38-calibre pistol... and a Russian AK-47.
An AK-47?
Why don't you join us?
A lot of brothers from the war have.
Baby, I got enough heavy shit to deal with.
- I got you, brother.
- Relax.
You're so uptight.
Damn, I got to make some fuckin' bread.
I'm through with your sister, but...
I still got to take care of my baby girl, Sarah.
Shit, and the one that's on the way.
Damn!
Look, anyway, uh, I got this plan to make some money.
I want you to keep this shit to yourself.
At 6:15 a.m., the truck pulls outta the post office... at 149th and Grand Concourse.
Now, it makes one stop before it goes to D. C... which is a mail drop-off at First Federal Loan and Savings... which is on Noble Street and West.
Now, Kirby... you're gonna position yourself in a getaway car... at the end of the corner, where you can see everything.
Jose. Me and you gonna position ourselves behind the bank... underneath the left and the right side of the loadin' dock.
Delilah, you're gonna position yourself inside the Dumpster... which is located directly across from the loadin' dock.
Now, Skippy, I want you to position yourself... approximately ten feet from the alleyway.
There, you post a lookout.
We all know what to do at the point of attack... because we've gone over that shit enough.
If anybody gets caught, you shut the fuck up, and we'll keep your money.
Shh! Fuck that shit, man.
I'm telling you right now, if I get caught...
- I'm shooting my fuckin' way out.
- Nigger, put that shit down.
I think we need another man on the street with Skip.
Someone to cover the other side.
- I agree.
- Oh, man! Hell, no!
We don't need no 'nother man.
Shit, I can see.
- Besides, we got too many motherfuckers anyway.
- Fuck that shit, Kirby, man.
Everybody trusts everybody here, right?
I can get somebody from our organization.
Oh, no, no, no, no.
I don't want none of them revolutionary niggers involved.
You can cut your eye at me all you want to.
I ain't too keen on havin' that broad up in here neither.
Well, you the one talkin' about we need another man.
Make up your goddam mind.
You have somebody in mind,
Anthony?
We might as well put a motherfuckin' ad in the paper.
Then we gonna get everybody.
Shit, ain't gonna be no money left for a nigger.
Oh, yes! Y'all didn't know your reverend was a gamblin' man?
A sinnin' man?
I was a man who maimed!
I was a man who killed!
We all know it was done in the name of the wicked one.
The one that was cast down from heaven.
- Hallelujah!
- Amen!
I said y'all know who I'm talkin' about!
Can I get a "hallelujah" in this house of God?
Hallelujah!
Hallelujah!
Well, look here, man.
Skip is in. Period. All right?
I stand a lot to lose if this thing blows up in my face.
The last time I saw him, he was shooting poison in his veins.
Yeah, I know. Well, you know, he's tryin' to shake that shit, man.
- He's still on drugs.
- And I still trust him with my life, Cleon.
Remember that last battle?
He froze up.
For a minute.
Then h-he broke out of it.
And when he "broke out of it,"
Dugan was dead.
Come on, Cleon. You know that could've happened to any of us.
Now either you in or you out. Which one?
How much money did you say was in that truck?
We still got about 15 minutes.
I tell ya, I could've used another cup of coffee.
Let's make this quick.
Bank security.
- How ya doin'?
- Good.
- Mornin'.
- Good mornin'.
Oh, f...
You waitin' on the number 11 bus?
Yes.
I don't think she runs this early.
I caught it the other morning, uh, at this same time.
You sure about that?
Uh-huh.
- Let me check for you.
- No need to go to any trouble, Officer.
No, no, no.
No trouble at all, brother.
I see by that patch on your jacket you were in recon.
I was a 5th marine. Always willin' to help out a fellow leatherneck.
Brown on patrol.
Brown on patrol.
Requesting off-hour route check on number 11.
Dispatch to Brown.
Hold for schedule.
That's a copy.
Do somethin', Cleon.
- Ambush! Ambush!
- Drop it, motherfucker!
What the hell?
Shit!
Joe! Come on. Let's move.
Oh, goddam it!
Fuck! Shit!
Oh, shit!
Anthony!
- Did you see that shit, man?
- Hey, what the fuck wrong with you?
- See the way the fuckin' doors blew off, man?
- No, motherfucker!
Motherfuckin' Joe, you blew the whole motherfuckin' truck up, motherfucker!
- It blew up like that, man!
- That's how you fucked your hand up last time!
You... And the money... You fucked up.
I'm gonna kick your motherfuckin' ass!
Grab what you can, motherfucker, before the whole thing burns!
Hey, Anthony and Delilah gotta see this shit, man.
I'm gonna go get 'em!
Hey, Anthony!
You gotta see the shit I did, man.
I blew that shit up, man!
You gotta see it, man!
You gotta see the shit I did!
Let's get outta here.
Put the gun down. Put the gun down.
Come on, Delilah.
Let's get up. Up. Let's go.
Come on, bro.
We gotta go, man.
I can't...
I can't leave her.
You ain't gotta leave her, bro...
'cause she's already gone.
Get up here!
Go on!
Unit 1004, do you copy?
Please respond.
Do you require assistance?
Do you copy?
Any available units in the vicinity of Noble Street.
Two-eleven in progress.
Code three. Repeat.
Two-eleven in progress.
Code three.
God's not gonna forgive me for this one.
I'll tell you what, Reverend.
With this kind of money, you can buy your way into heaven.
That's where you're wrong, brother.
We done bought our way into hell.
The plain fact is that I promised the Lord I would never sin like this.
To tell you the truth, I'm not sure
I even want any of this dirty money.
Well, I'll tell you what,
Reverend.
We'll find somethin' to do with your share.
- Amen to that shit.
- No. No, no, no, no.
- I'll take the money.
- You lyin' sack o' shit.
I'm sure the Lord will find another way for me to do my penance.
Just tell me one thing, Cleon.
Why the fuck you didn't grab the cop?
You killed him.
A young brother.
If you wouldn't have froze up like a bitch, maybe I wouldn't have had to do that shit, now wouldn't I?
Would y'all shut the fuck up?
Man, Delilah. Shit.
Man, radio said they got
Joe's stupid ass.
Fucked it up.
The whole plan was fucked up.
We ain't do shit right out there, man. Shit.
Y'all make sure that Jose's share goes to Marisol and his kids.
- Walk on by
- Done.
Your junkie ass really messed up out there.
Don't blame me for your fuck-ups.
I told Anthony I didn't want nothin' to do with a crazy, devil-filled junkie!
- What?
- You listenin' to me? Look at him.
- Oh, shit!
- Now say some more shit!
I'll knock your ass right back down.
Fake-ass wanna-be preacher, no-members-havin' motherfucker!
Why don't y'all stop actin' like some fuckin' clowns?
You know, you niggers sure is silly.
Now, you're standin' here fightin', and we got over $300,000... of cold, hard, unmarked U.S. cash to split up five ways.
Let me tell ya somethin'.
You make me lose count again,
I'm gonna shoot me a motherfucker... and then we gonna be splittin' this thing up four ways, hear?
Man, I can't believe this.
They was gonna burn all this shit.
All this shit, and a nigger can't even find a job.
Well, that's Uncle Sam for you, baby.
Money to burn.
Police have issued an all-points bulletin for the remaining...
...Reserve Bank on Noble Street.
Faces painted skeleton white.
Cobra, request your status.
Over.
- Five federal security guards...
- Anthony!
- She's already gone.
- Do it. Kill me.
The bloody shootout erupted... an armoured truck... explosives...
No, motherfuckin' Joe.
You blew the whole motherfuckin' truck up, motherfucker!
...the deaths of nine people.
The heroin ain't never did nothin' to me.
...just moments away from the scene of the crime... Robbery turned bloody...
- Had some shit got into me over there, man.
- Crushed to death by...
Rudolph the red-nosed reindeer
Had a very shiny nose
- And if you ever saw it
- What you slowin' down for?
- Be cool. Be cool.
- What you doin'?
- Come on. Come on.
- What the fuck, man? Aw, shit!
- All of the other reindeer
- What the fuck we doin' over here?
- Say, man, check out all these kids.
- Man!
Hey, let's go to the liquor store and go to the club.
Look, man, I'm gonna take care of you.
We're gonna go down to the club.
- We don't know them motherfuckers!
- That's the whole point, baby.
Come on. Get in the spirit.
Hey, y'all come on over here!
- Nigger, we gonna get robbed.
- Hey, be cool, nigger.
Y'all come on over here.
- Be cool, man. Damn.
- Rudolph, with your nose so bright
All of y'all gonna get some.
All right. All right.
- Merry Christmas! Merry Christmas!
- What, motherfu...
Yeah, man. Merry Christmas, motherfucker. Go on. Leave me alone.
Say, say, Skippy. Hey, man, why don't you bring your ass over here and quit that jivin'.
Come on. Yeah, yeah. Y'all take all the toys. All right. Get one.
- See what I'm sayin'?
I ain't kiddin'. We givin' it away.
- All right. All right. Yeah.
That's why Santa Claus don't wanna come 'round here 'cause he's scared he's gonna get shot or robbed.
All right. Just one. Hey, hey, hey.
Give me this, man. Get a... Get a...
Get a toy.
- Come on, come on, come on.
- Why you stealin'?
You ain't gotta steal.
- All right, all right, all right.
- Funky little brothers.
I talked to him.
He says he ain't never gonna come down here unless he's got police protection.
Last year, one of y'all niggers stole one of his reindeer.
No, no. I say let's just go up there and kill that motherfucker.
Man, me and Anthony gave out a couple of things, but that was it.
You gave toys and turkeys to people.
Then you got the hell outta Dodge.
Man. Y'all sayin' my man is goin' around handin' out $100 bills... and sayin' that
God Almighty gave it to him?
My cousin lives up there in Mount Vernon. He says that Cleon's up there actin' a goddam fool.
That ol' high-profile ass nigger.
Bought a brand-new Caddy.
Folk know he can't afford it.
- Look, man, I'm gonna go over there and talk to him.
- No, no, no. Fuck the talk!
I'm drivin' up there, and I'm gonna take him out before he rats us out.
Look, Kirby.
I'm gonna handle everything, all right?
- I'm gonna straighten this shit out.
- All right.
But if you don't take care of this,
Anthony, I promise you, I will.
I told you we didn't need another man.
That's y'all's motherfuckin' punk-ass friend!
People runnin' from their worries
While the judge and his juries
They take the law that's part of the flaw
No. Oh, shit, Cleon!
Love, fallin', fussin' and a-cussin'
Damn!
The feelin' now is killin'
For peace no one is willin'
Kinda make you get that feelin'
Everybody's startin'
Use the pill and the dope
Educated fools
From uneducated schools
Right now we'd like to bring on a young man who believes in doing things his own way.
And based on the way he kinda get next to all of the folks who've seen him work... his way has gotta be pretty hip.
So let's lay some noise on the mighty Al Green.
Apartment 13!
I'm so tired of bein' alone
I'm so tied up on my own
Won't you help me, girl
Just as soon as you can
Don't move, mister!
I been wantin' to get next to you, baby
You see, sometime
I fold my arms, I say
- Ooo-ooo
- Mmm-hmm-mmm
Whoa-oh-oh
Oh, baby, hey
Needing you has proven to be
To be my greatest dream
Yeah
- I'm so tired of being alone
- Oh, tired, baby
- Here's the rest of the fifties.
- Put it in there.
You know, I still feel fucked-up about this whole situation.
Look, feelin' fucked-up don't help a goddam thing and it ain't gonna bring nobody back.
- Shit!
- So, just worry about yourself.
We just gotta get outta here.
- Come on.
- Say, man, you got everything?
Yeah, grab that bag.
This is a bitch.
This is it, man.
This is it.
All we got to do, boy, is make it to Mexico.
We'll be fine.
We'll get us a villa, see?
And then, and buy a boat and sail all around the gulf.
Everything will be fine.
We just gotta get the fuck outta here.
Yeah, maybe I can send for Sarah once we get down there.
Well, anything's possible.
Come on.
Wait a minute.
Run, Anthony! Hyah!
Y'all get back!
Get away right there! Get off me!
Shit!
- You pity fool, you pity fool
- Fuck!
You better have some sympathy
Yeah
'Cause there's educated people
Runnin' the lives of our society
Makin' up the rules
Mr Curtis, you have been lawfully tried in this court... and found guilty on all charges.
Do you have anything to say on your own behalf before I pronounce sentence?
Uh... no, ain't nothin' I say gonna get me out of this.
But things were gettin' bad for me, and...
I had to do what I had to do to s... to survive.
Maybe it was wrong, but l...
I certainly didn't mean for anybody to be hurt.
Uh, Your Honour, please consider before sentencing... that my client served his country proud in the Marine Corps.
As a matter of fact, he was a member of an elite unit... a sergeant, decorated with many medals.
In fact, one of those medals was the, uh, Silver Star, for valour.
I realize that my client had a difficult time adjusting when he...
Excuse me, Counsel. l, too, was a marine... and I served my country proudly in World War Il, a real war, I may add.
- Yes, Your Honor...
- I'm not finished yet, please.
I received the Purple Heart at Guadalcanal.
Now, this young man has obviously forgotten some very... fundamental things like decency and dedication and honor... everything the corps taught us.
He is a disgrace to everyone that has ever put on that uniform... and I will not permit you or him to use the Vietnam War as a cop-out here.
Anthony Curtis, for your participation in this crime... a crime that took the lives of several innocent people, I do hereby... sentence you to the custody of the
Attorney General of the United States... for a period of 15 years to life.
Oh, my God.
These proceedings are concluded.
This court is adjourned.
"Life"? What the fuck he mean "life"?
After all the shit I did for this motherfuckin' country?
What the fuck he talkin' about, "life"?
Man, fuck you! Fuck you!
- Hey!
- Oh, Anthony!
After all the shit I did for this motherfuckin' country?
You, remove the prisoner from the court!
- You hear me?
- Fuck you! Fuck you!
- Restrain the prisoner!
Get him outta here! Let the record show... Let the record show... that a chair was thrown at the judge.
Whoa, whoa
If you see me walkin' down the street
And I start to cry
Each time we meet
Then walk on by
Walk on by
Make believe
That you don't see the tears
You just let me grieve in private
'Cause each time I see you
I just can't help myself
I think about how tight we used to be
I break down and cry
Oh, baby
Walk on by
Hmm-mmm-mmm
I just can't get over losing you
So if I seem
Broken in two
Please walk on by
Walk on by
Foolish pride
Is all that I have left
So let me hide
The tears and the sadness you gave me
You put the hurt on me
You socked it to me, mama
When you said goodbye
So, please, walk on by
Make believe you never see the tears I cry
So do me a favour
And walk on by
So I'm beggin' you to
Walk on by
Oh, yeah
And make believe you never see the tears I cry
So I'm beggin' you
I'm beggin' you
To walk on by
Make believe you never see the tears I cry
Oh
There's no dust in my eye
Oh, no
Smoke ain't makin' me cry
No, no, no
It's the hurt you put on me, yeah
I don't want you to see this man cry
Where is the love
Where is the love
Where is the love
Where is the love
Where is the love
Where is the love
Where is the love
Ooh, yeah, yeah
Where is the love
You said you'd give to me
Soon as you were free
Will it ever be
Where is the love
You told me that you didn't love him
And you were gonna say goodbye
But if you really didn't mean it
Why did you have to lie
Where is the love
You said was mine all mine
Till the end of time
Was it just a lie
Where is the love
If you had had a sudden change of heart
I wish that you would tell me so
Don't leave me hangin' on these promises
You've gotta let me know
Oh-ohh
Do-do do-do
Do-do do-do
Do-do do-do-do
